amount tissue-specific proteins	amount non tissue-specific proteins	amount general P proteins	GO term name	GO term definition
3	1	0	mitochondrial genome maintenance	The maintenance of the structure and integrity of the mitochondrial genome; includes replication and segregation of the mitochondrial chromosome.
0	1	0	reproduction	The production of new individuals that contain some portion of genetic material inherited from one or more parent organisms.
3	1	1	single strand break repair	The repair of single strand breaks in DNA. Repair of such breaks is mediated by the same enzyme systems as are used in base excision repair.
1	2	0	single-stranded DNA endodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within a single-stranded deoxyribonucleic acid molecule by creating internal breaks.
0	0	3	phosphopyruvate hydratase complex	A multimeric enzyme complex, usually a dimer or an octamer, that catalyzes the conversion of 2-phospho-D-glycerate to phosphoenolpyruvate and water.
1	3	0	regulation of DNA recombination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of DNA recombination, a DNA metabolic process in which a new genotype is formed by reassortment of genes resulting in gene combinations different from those that were present in the parents.
1	1	0	regulation of mitotic recombination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of DNA recombination during mitosis.
0	2	0	mitotic spindle elongation	The cell cycle process in which the distance is lengthened between poles of the mitotic spindle. Mitotic spindle elongation begins during mitotic prophase and ends during mitotic anaphase B.
1	0	0	alpha-1,2-mannosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a mannose residue to an oligosaccharide, forming an alpha-(1->2) linkage.
4	7	5	ribosomal large subunit assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of constituent RNAs and proteins to form the large ribosomal subunit.
2	5	3	ribosomal small subunit assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of constituent RNAs and proteins to form the small ribosomal subunit.
2	0	0	mannosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a mannosyl group to an acceptor molecule, typically another carbohydrate or a lipid.
1	0	0	alpha-1,3-mannosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a mannose residue to an oligosaccharide, forming an alpha-(1->3) linkage.
1	1	1	very long-chain fatty acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a fatty acid which has a chain length greater than C22.
5	10	6	autophagosome assembly	The formation of a double membrane-bounded structure, the autophagosome, that occurs when a specialized membrane sac, called the isolation membrane, starts to enclose a portion of the cytoplasm.
0	0	1	peptidyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: peptidyl-tRNA(1) + aminoacyl-tRNA(2) = tRNA(1) + peptidylaminoacyl-tRNA(2).
12	12	8	tRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with transfer RNA.
3	0	1	urea cycle	The sequence of reactions by which arginine is synthesized from ornithine, then cleaved to yield urea and regenerate ornithine. The overall reaction equation is NH3 + CO2 + aspartate + 3 ATP + 2 H2O = urea + fumarate + 2 ADP + 2 phosphate + AMP + diphosphate.
1	0	0	citrulline metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving citrulline, N5-carbamoyl-L-ornithine, an alpha amino acid not found in proteins.
0	3	1	ribosomal subunit export from nucleus	The directed movement of a ribosomal subunit from the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
0	4	2	ribosomal large subunit export from nucleus	The directed movement of a ribosomal large subunit from the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
0	3	2	ribosomal small subunit export from nucleus	The directed movement of a ribosomal small subunit from the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
2	4	1	fatty-acyl-CoA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a fatty-acyl-CoA, any derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is in thiolester linkage with a fatty acyl group.
0	0	1	L-ornithine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-ornithine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-ornithine is 2,5-diaminopentanoic acid.
6	7	3	mitotic sister chromatid segregation	The cell cycle process in which replicated homologous chromosomes are organized and then physically separated and apportioned to two sets during the mitotic cell cycle. Each replicated chromosome, composed of two sister chromatids, aligns at the cell equator, paired with its homologous partner. One homolog of each morphologic type goes into each of the resulting chromosome sets.
3	2	0	DNA replication checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that prevents the initiation of nuclear division until DNA replication is complete, thereby ensuring that progeny inherit a full complement of the genome.
6	10	4	DNA damage checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that regulates progression through the cell cycle in response to DNA damage. A DNA damage checkpoint may blocks cell cycle progression (in G1, G2 or metaphase) or slow the rate at which S phase proceeds.
10	6	2	regulation of cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity.
6	14	8	G1/S transition of mitotic cell cycle	The mitotic cell cycle transition by which a cell in G1 commits to S phase. The process begins with the build up of G1 cyclin-dependent kinase (G1 CDK), resulting in the activation of transcription of G1 cyclins. The process ends with the positive feedback of the G1 cyclins on the G1 CDK which commits the cell to S phase, in which DNA replication is initiated.
5	5	5	regulation of transcription involved in G1/S transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any process that regulates transcription such that the target genes are involved in the transition between G1 and S phase of the mitotic cell cycle.
21	26	37	G2/M transition of mitotic cell cycle	The mitotic cell cycle transition by which a cell in G2 commits to M phase. The process begins when the kinase activity of M cyclin/CDK complex reaches a threshold high enough for the cell cycle to proceed. This is accomplished by activating a positive feedback loop that results in the accumulation of unphosphorylated and active M cyclin/CDK complex.
2	0	0	sulfur amino acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving amino acids containing sulfur, comprising cysteine, homocysteine, methionine and selenocysteine.
0	1	0	sulfur amino acid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of amino acids containing sulfur, comprising cysteine, methionine and selenocysteine.
1	1	0	sulfate assimilation	The pathways by which inorganic sulfate is processed and incorporated into sulfated compounds.
0	0	2	nucleotide-excision repair complex	Any complex formed of proteins that act in nucleotide-excision repair.
0	0	1	nucleotide-excision repair factor 2 complex	One of several protein complexes involved in nucleotide-excision repair; possesses damaged DNA binding activity. In S. cerevisiae, it is composed of Rad4p and Rad23p.
0	1	0	regulation of transcription involved in G2/M transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any process that regulates transcription such that the target genes are transcribed as part of the G2/M transition of the mitotic cell cycle.
9	13	8	histone deacetylase complex	A protein complex that possesses histone deacetylase activity.
0	1	0	RNA polymerase I transcription regulator complex	A transcription factor complex that acts at a regulatory region of a gene transcribed by RNA polymerase I.
97	116	94	negative regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase II	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transcription mediated by RNA polymerase II.
3	6	5	histone acetyltransferase complex	A protein complex that possesses histone acetyltransferase activity.
3	3	1	SAGA complex	A SAGA-type histone acetyltransferase complex that contains Spt8 (in budding yeast) or a homolog thereof; additional polypeptides include Spt group, consisting of Spt7, Spt3, and Spt20/Ada5, which interact with the TATA-binding protein (TBP); the Ada group, consisting of Ada1, Ada2, Ada3, Ada4/Gcn5, and Ada5/Spt20, which is functionally linked to the nucleosomal HAT activity; Tra1, an ATM/PI-3 kinase-related protein that targets DNA-bound activators for recruitment to promoters; the TBP-associated factor (TAF) proteins, consisting of Taf5, Taf6, Taf9, Taf10, and Taf12, which mediate nucleosomal HAT activity and are thought to help recruit the basal transcription machinery; the ubiquitin specifc protease Ubp-8.
2	1	1	PCAF complex	A large multiprotein complex that possesses histone acetyltransferase activity and is involved in regulation of transcription. The composition is similar to that of the SAGA complex, but includes fewer Spt and Ada proteins, and more TAFs.
1	0	1	transcription factor TFIIIB complex	A transcription factor complex that is involved in regulating transcription from RNA polymerase III (Pol III) promoters. TFIIIB contains the TATA-binding protein (TBP) and two Pol III-specific proteins, B'' and BRF.
0	2	2	transcription factor TFIIIC complex	A heterotrimeric transcription factor complex that is involved in regulating transcription from RNA polymerase III (Pol III) promoters. TFIIIC contains three conserved subunits that associate with the proximal Pol III promoter element, and additional subunits that associate with sequence elements downstream of the promoter and are more diverged among species. It also functions as a boundary element to partition genome content into distinct domains outside Pol III promoter regions.
6	4	6	establishment of mitotic spindle orientation	A cell cycle process that sets the alignment of mitotic spindle relative to other cellular structures.
2	1	1	Golgi cis cisterna	The Golgi cisterna closest to the endoplasmic reticulum; the first processing compartment through which proteins pass after export from the ER.
0	2	1	Golgi trans cisterna	The Golgi cisterna farthest from the endoplasmic reticulum; the final processing compartment through which proteins pass before exiting the Golgi apparatus; the compartment in which N-linked protein glycosylation is completed.
54	60	49	Golgi membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding any of the compartments of the Golgi apparatus.
3	4	2	exocyst	A protein complex peripherally associated with the plasma membrane that determines where vesicles dock and fuse. At least eight complex components are conserved between yeast and mammals.
8	5	10	microfilament motor activity	Catalysis of movement along a microfilament, coupled to the hydrolysis of a nucleoside triphosphate (usually ATP).
6	9	15	SNARE binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a SNARE (soluble N-ethylmaleimide-sensitive factor attached protein receptor) protein.
14	16	5	ubiquitin ligase complex	A protein complex that includes a ubiquitin-protein ligase and enables ubiquitin protein ligase activity. The complex also contains other proteins that may confer substrate specificity on the complex.
1	0	1	rRNA modification	The covalent alteration of one or more nucleotides within an rRNA molecule to produce an rRNA molecule with a sequence that differs from that coded genetically.
0	3	0	protein phosphatase type 2A complex	A protein complex that has protein serine/threonine phosphatase activity that is polycation-stimulated (PCS), being directly stimulated by protamine, polylysine, or histone H1; it constitutes a subclass of several enzymes activated by different histones and polylysine, and consists of catalytic, scaffolding, and regulatory subunits. The catalytic and scaffolding subunits form the core enzyme, and the holoenzyme also includes the regulatory subunit.
3	1	5	protein phosphatase type 1 complex	A protein complex that possesses magnesium-dependent protein serine/threonine phosphatase (AMD phosphatase) activity, and consists of a catalytic subunit and one or more regulatory subunits that dictates the phosphatase's substrate specificity, function, and activity.
31	45	56	MAPK cascade	An intracellular protein kinase cascade containing at least a MAPK, a MAPKK and a MAP3K. The cascade can also contain an additional tiers: the upstream MAP4K. The kinases in each tier phosphorylate and activate the kinase in the downstream tier to transmit a signal within a cell.
10	4	4	nucleotide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a nucleotide, any compound consisting of a nucleoside that is esterified with (ortho)phosphate or an oligophosphate at any hydroxyl group on the ribose or deoxyribose.
0	1	2	ribonuclease MRP complex	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains an RNA molecule of the snoRNA family, and cleaves the rRNA precursor as part of rRNA transcript processing. It also has other roles: In S. cerevisiae it is involved in cell cycle-regulated degradation of daughter cell-specific mRNAs, while in mammalian cells it also enters the mitochondria and processes RNAs to create RNA primers for DNA replication.
7	4	3	3'-5'-exoribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 3' terminus of an RNA molecule.
3	2	0	nuclear exosome (RNase complex)	A ribonuclease complex that has 3-prime to 5-prime processive and distributive hydrolytic exoribonuclease activity and endoribonuclease activity, producing 5-prime-phosphomonoesters. Participates in a multitude of cellular RNA processing and degradation events preventing nuclear export and/or translation of aberrant RNAs. Restricted to processing linear and circular single-stranded RNAs (ssRNA) only. RNAs with complex secondary structures may have to be unwound or pre-processed by co-factors prior to entering the complex, esp if the 3-prime end is structured.
3	2	2	cytoplasmic exosome (RNase complex)	A ribonuclease complex that has 3-prime to 5-prime processive hydrolytic exoribonuclease activity producing 5-prime-phosphomonoesters. Participates in a multitude of cellular RNA processing and degradation events preventing nuclear export and/or translation of aberrant RNAs. Restricted to processing linear and circular single-stranded RNAs (ssRNA) only. RNAs with complex secondary structures may have to be unwound or pre-processed by co-factors prior to entering the complex, esp if the 3-prime end is structured.
3	3	1	exosome (RNase complex)	A ribonuclease complex that has 3-prime to 5-prime exoribonuclease activity and possibly endoribonuclease activity, producing 5-prime-phosphomonoesters. Participates in a multitude of cellular RNA processing and degradation events preventing nuclear export and/or translation of aberrant RNAs. Restricted to processing linear and circular single-stranded RNAs (ssRNA) only. RNAs with complex secondary structures may have to be unwound or pre-processed by co-factors prior to entering the complex, esp if the 3-prime end is structured.
1	0	1	rDNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA sequences encoding ribosomal RNA.
3	6	3	rDNA heterochromatin assembly	The assembly of chromatin characterized by the modified histone H3K9me3, into heterochromatin, resulting in the repression of transcription of rDNA.
18	37	31	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, nonsense-mediated decay	The nonsense-mediated decay pathway for nuclear-transcribed mRNAs degrades mRNAs in which an amino-acid codon has changed to a nonsense codon; this prevents the translation of such mRNAs into truncated, and potentially harmful, proteins.
2	1	1	activation of MAPKKK activity	Any process that initiates the activity of the inactive enzyme MAP kinase kinase kinase (MAPKKK).
4	12	10	activation of MAPKK activity	The initiation of the activity of the inactive enzyme MAP kinase kinase (MAPKK).
11	20	23	activation of MAPK activity	The initiation of the activity of the inactive enzyme MAP kinase (MAPK).
3	4	5	inactivation of MAPK activity	Any process that terminates the activity of the active enzyme MAP kinase.
33	34	29	protein polyubiquitination	Addition of multiple ubiquitin groups to a protein, forming a ubiquitin chain.
1	0	2	meiotic spindle organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the microtubule spindle during a meiotic cell cycle.
1	0	0	tRNA-intron endonuclease activity	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of pre-tRNA, producing 5'-hydroxyl and 2',3'-cyclic phosphate termini, and specifically removing the intron.
2	0	0	tRNA-intron endonuclease complex	A protein complex that catalyzes the endonucleolytic cleavage of pre-tRNA, producing 5'-hydroxyl and 2',3'-cyclic phosphate termini, and specifically removing the intron.
0	1	0	tRNA 2'-phosphotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2'-phospho-[ligated tRNA] + NAD+ = mature tRNA + ADP ribose 1'',2''-phosphate + nicotinamide + H2O. This reaction is the transfer of the splice junction 2-phosphate from ligated tRNA to NAD+ to produce ADP-ribose 1'-2' cyclic phosphate.
0	2	0	DNA secondary structure binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA containing secondary structure elements such as four-way junctions, bubbles, loops, Y-form DNA, or double-strand/single-strand junctions.
13	19	50	microtubule cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising microtubules and their associated proteins.
2	6	8	nuclear chromosome	A chromosome that encodes the nuclear genome and is found in the nucleus of a eukaryotic cell during the cell cycle phases when the nucleus is intact.
2	0	0	astral microtubule	Any of the spindle microtubules that radiate in all directions from the spindle poles and are thought to contribute to the forces that separate the poles and position them in relation to the rest of the cell.
2	7	1	pericentriolar material	A network of small fibers that surrounds the centrioles in cells; contains the microtubule nucleating activity of the centrosome.
1	0	2	commitment complex	A spliceosomal complex that is formed by association of the U1 snRNP with the 5' splice site of an unspliced intron in an RNA transcript.
2	5	2	spliceosomal tri-snRNP complex assembly	The formation of a tri-snRNP complex containing U4 and U6 (or U4atac and U6atac) snRNAs and U5 snRNAs and associated proteins. This includes reannealing of U4 and U6 (or U4atac and U6atac) snRNAs released from previous rounds of splicing to reform the U4/U6 snRNP (or U4atac/U6atac snRNP) as well as the subsequent association of the U5 snRNP with the U4/U6 snRNP (or U4atac/U6atac snRNP) to form a tri-snRNP that is ready to reassemble into another spliceosome complex.
3	6	6	spliceosomal complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a spliceosomal complex, a ribonucleoprotein apparatus that catalyzes nuclear mRNA splicing via transesterification reactions.
2	0	0	3-keto sterol reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a 3-beta-hydroxyl sterol + NADP+ = a 3-keto sterol + NADPH + H(+).
1	0	0	allantoin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving allantoin, (2,5-dioxo-4-imidazolidinyl)urea, an intermediate or end product of purine catabolism.
0	2	6	mitochondrial fission	The division of a mitochondrion within a cell to form two or more separate mitochondrial compartments.
1	0	1	peroxisome targeting sequence binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a peroxisomal targeting sequence, any of several sequences of amino acids within a protein that can act as a signal for the localization of the protein into the peroxisome.
1	0	1	mitochondrial proton-transporting ATP synthase, stator stalk	One of two stalks that connect the catalytic core of the hydrogen-transporting ATP synthase to the mitochondrial membrane-associated F0 proteins; is thought to prevent futile rotation of the catalytic core.
1	0	0	mitochondrial proton-transporting ATP synthase complex, catalytic sector F(1)	The catalytic sector of the mitochondrial hydrogen-transporting ATP synthase; it comprises the catalytic core and central stalk, and is peripherally associated with the mitochondrial inner membrane when the entire ATP synthase is assembled.
1	0	0	mitochondrial proton-transporting ATP synthase complex, coupling factor F(o)	All non-F1 subunits of the mitochondrial hydrogen-transporting ATP synthase, including integral and peripheral mitochondrial inner membrane proteins.
18	21	38	mitotic cell cycle	Progression through the phases of the mitotic cell cycle, the most common eukaryotic cell cycle, which canonically comprises four successive phases called G1, S, G2, and M and includes replication of the genome and the subsequent segregation of chromosomes into daughter cells. In some variant cell cycles nuclear replication or nuclear division may not be followed by cell division, or G1 and G2 phases may be absent.
12	15	10	mitotic cytokinesis	A cell cycle process that results in the division of the cytoplasm of a cell after mitosis, resulting in the separation of the original cell into two daughter cells.
0	1	0	1-phosphatidylinositol-3-phosphate 5-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3-phosphate + ATP = a 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3,5-bisphosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
22	40	41	magnesium ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with magnesium (Mg) ions.
2	4	0	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, deadenylation-dependent decay	A major pathway of degradation of nuclear-transcribed mRNAs that proceeds through a series of ordered steps that includes poly(A) tail shortening and that can regulate mRNA stability.
3	7	3	nuclear-transcribed mRNA poly(A) tail shortening	Shortening of the poly(A) tail of a nuclear-transcribed mRNA from full length to an oligo(A) length.
1	2	1	deadenylation-dependent decapping of nuclear-transcribed mRNA	Cleavage of the 5'-cap of a nuclear mRNA triggered by shortening of the poly(A) tail to below a minimum functional length.
0	0	1	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, exonucleolytic	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the transcript body of a nuclear-transcribed mRNA that occurs when the ends are not protected by the 5'-cap or the 3'-poly(A) tail.
0	1	0	ferric-chelate reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 Fe2+ + NAD+ = 2 Fe3+ + NADH + H(+).
0	0	1	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, endonucleolytic cleavage-dependent decay	A minor degradation pathway nuclear-transcribed mRNAs that begins with an endonucleolytic cleavage to generate unprotected ends.
0	0	1	adenine nucleotide transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of adenine nucleotides (AMP, ADP, and ATP) from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	spermine transport	The directed movement of spermine, N,N-bis(3-aminopropyl)-1,4-diaminobutane, a polyamine formed by the transfer of a propylamine group from decarboxylated S-adenosylmethionine to spermidine, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	retrograde transport, vesicle recycling within Golgi	The retrograde movement of substances within the Golgi, mediated by COP I vesicles. Cis-Golgi vesicles are constantly moving forward through the Golgi stack by cisternal progression, eventually becoming trans-Golgi vesicles. They then selectively transport membrane and luminal proteins from the trans- to the medial-Golgi while leaving others behind in the trans-Golgi cisternae; similarly, they selectively move proteins from the medial- to the cis-Golgi.
2	1	1	response to reactive oxygen species	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a reactive oxygen species stimulus. Reactive oxygen species include singlet oxygen, superoxide, and oxygen free radicals.
2	1	0	response to superoxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a superoxide stimulus. Superoxide is the anion, oxygen-, formed by addition of one electron to dioxygen (O2) or any compound containing the superoxide anion.
0	1	0	response to singlet oxygen	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a singlet oxygen stimulus. Singlet oxygen is a dioxygen (O2) molecule in which two 2p electrons have similar spin. Singlet oxygen is more highly reactive than the form in which these electrons are of opposite spin, and it is produced in mutant chloroplasts lacking carotenoids and by leukocytes during metabolic burst.
4	0	5	cyclin-dependent protein kinase holoenzyme complex	Cyclin-dependent protein kinases (CDKs) are enzyme complexes that contain a kinase catalytic subunit associated with a regulatory cyclin partner.
1	0	1	cytoplasmic cyclin-dependent protein kinase holoenzyme complex	Cyclin-dependent protein kinase (CDK) complex found in the cytoplasm.
0	1	0	nicotinamide-nucleotide adenylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + nicotinamide nucleotide = diphosphate + NAD+.
1	1	0	storage vacuole	A vacuole that functions primarily in the storage of materials, including nutrients, pigments, waste products, and small molecules.
1	0	0	lytic vacuole	A vacuole that is maintained at an acidic pH and which contains degradative enzymes, including a wide variety of acid hydrolases.
0	1	1	protein deneddylation	The removal of a ubiquitin-like protein of the NEDD8 type from a protein.
3	2	3	RNA cap binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a 7-methylguanosine (m7G) group or derivative located at the 5' end of an RNA molecule.
3	4	2	RNA 7-methylguanosine cap binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the 7-methylguanosine group added cotranscriptionally to the 5' end of RNA molecules transcribed by polymerase II.
0	5	2	transcription export complex	The transcription export (TREX) complex couples transcription elongation by RNA polymerase II to mRNA export. The complex associates with the polymerase and travels with it along the length of the transcribed gene. TREX is composed of the THO transcription elongation complex as well as other proteins that couple THO to mRNA export proteins. The TREX complex is known to be found in a wide range of eukaryotes, including S. cerevisiae and metazoans.
0	1	2	THO complex	The THO complex is a nuclear complex that is required for transcription elongation through genes containing tandemly repeated DNA sequences. The THO complex is also part of the TREX (TRanscription EXport) complex that is involved in coupling transcription to export of mRNAs to the cytoplasm. In S. cerevisiae, it is composed of four subunits: Hpr1p, Tho2p, Thp1p, and Mft1p, while the human complex is composed of 7 subunits.
0	1	0	generation of catalytic spliceosome for first transesterification step	Formation of a catalytic spliceosome complex ready to perform the first splicing reaction. This occurs by an ATP-dependent conformational change of the pre-catalytic spliceosome.
0	1	1	cis assembly of pre-catalytic spliceosome	Assembly of a spliceosomal complex containing the intact pre-mRNA and all of the spliceosomal snRNPs. This occurs when the tri-snRNP associates with the pre-mRNA and associated snRNPs in an ATP-dependent manner.
3	7	6	RNA splicing, via transesterification reactions	Splicing of RNA via a series of two transesterification reactions.
2	0	0	tRNA-type intron splice site recognition and cleavage	RNA processing that begins when the tertiary structure of a tRNA type intron is recognized, and ends when the endonucleolytic cleavage of the RNA at both the 5' and 3' splice sites occurs.
0	3	11	alternative mRNA splicing, via spliceosome	The process of generating multiple mRNA molecules from a given set of exons by differential use of exons from the primary transcript(s) to form multiple mature mRNAs that vary in their exon composition.
2	9	20	regulation of alternative mRNA splicing, via spliceosome	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of alternative splicing of nuclear mRNAs.
0	1	0	second spliceosomal transesterification activity	Catalysis of the second transesterification reaction of spliceosomal mRNA splicing. Ligation of the two exons occurs via a transesterification reaction where the free 3'-hydroxyl group of the 5' exon is the nucleophile attacking the 3' splice site. Non-expressed sequences are now detached from the exons. In cis splicing, the intron is in a lariat structure.
5	5	3	spliceosomal snRNP assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of one or more snRNA and multiple protein components to form a ribonucleoprotein complex that is involved in formation of the spliceosome.
0	0	1	spliceosome conformational change to release U4 (or U4atac) and U1 (or U11)	Rearrangement of the pre-catalytic spliceosome containing U4 (or U4atac) and U1 (or U11) snRNPs to unpair U4 (or U4atac) from U6 (or U6atac) and release it from the spliceosomal complex along with U1 (or U11).
1	3	0	mRNA 3'-splice site recognition	Recognition of the intron 3'-splice site by components of the assembling U2- or U12-type spliceosome.
1	0	1	spliceosomal complex disassembly	Disassembly of a spliceosomal complex with the ATP-dependent release of the product RNAs, one of which is composed of the joined exons. In cis splicing, the other product is the excised sequence, often a single intron, in a lariat structure.
1	0	3	mRNA 5'-splice site recognition	Recognition of the intron 5'-splice site by components of the assembling spliceosome.
26	61	70	mRNA splicing, via spliceosome	The joining together of exons from one or more primary transcripts of messenger RNA (mRNA) and the excision of intron sequences, via a spliceosomal mechanism, so that mRNA consisting only of the joined exons is produced.
1	3	1	four-way junction DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA containing four-way junctions, also known as Holliday junctions, a structure where two DNA double strands are held together by reciprocal exchange of two of the four strands, one strand each from the two original helices.
0	3	0	Y-form DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with segment of DNA shaped like a Y. This shape occurs when DNA contains a region of paired double-stranded DNA on one end and a region of unpaired DNA strands on the opposite end.
0	0	1	heteroduplex DNA loop binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA containing a loop. A loop occurs when DNA contains a large insertion or deletion that causes a region of unpaired single-stranded DNA to loop out, while the rest of the DNA is in a paired double-stranded configuration.
0	3	3	bubble DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA that contains a bubble. A bubble occurs when DNA contains a region of unpaired, single-stranded DNA flanked on both sides by regions of paired, double-stranded DNA.
0	1	0	double-strand/single-strand DNA junction binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a region of DNA that contains double-stranded DNA flanked by a region of single-stranded DNA.
3	4	2	phagophore assembly site	Punctate structures proximal to the endoplasmic reticulum which are the sites where the Atg machinery assembles upon autophagy induction.
0	1	0	EKC/KEOPS complex	A protein complex involved in t6A tRNA modification; originally proposed to be involved in transcription as well as promoting telomere uncapping and telomere elongation. For example, in Saccharomyces cerevisiae the complex contains Bud32p, Kae1p, Gon7p, Cgi121p, and Pcc1p.
4	4	4	protein peptidyl-prolyl isomerization	The modification of a protein by cis-trans isomerization of a proline residue.
0	0	1	regulation of histone H3-K36 methylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of a methyl group to the lysine at position 36 of histone H3.
1	1	0	negative regulation of histone H3-K36 methylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of a methyl group to the lysine at position 36 of histone H3.
1	0	0	HIR complex	A protein complex proposed to be involved in replication-independent nucleosome assembly, by promoting histone deposition onto DNA. For example, in Saccharomyces, the complex contains Hir1p, Hir2p, Hir3p, and Hpc2p.
5	3	3	autophagosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding an autophagosome, a double-membrane-bounded vesicle in which endogenous cellular material is sequestered.
3	5	4	autophagy of mitochondrion	The autophagic process in which mitochondria are delivered to a type of vacuole and degraded in response to changing cellular conditions.
1	1	1	mitophagy	The selective autophagy process in which a mitochondrion is degraded by macroautophagy.
0	0	2	pexophagy	The selective autophagy process in which a peroxisome is degraded by macroautophagy.
1	1	0	regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter by glucose	Any process involving glucose that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter.
1	1	0	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter by glucose	Any process involving glucose that activates or increases the rate of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter.
0	1	0	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter by galactose	Any process involving galactose that activates or increases the rate of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter.
0	0	1	transcription factor TFIIH core complex	The 7 subunit core of TFIIH that is a part of either the general transcription factor holo-TFIIH or the nucleotide-excision repair factor 3 complex. In S. cerevisiae/humans the complex is composed of: Ssl2/XPB, Tfb1/p62, Tfb2/p52, Ssl1/p44, Tfb4/p34, Tfb5/p8 and Rad3/XPD.
0	0	1	MIS12/MIND type complex	A multiprotein kinetochore subcomplex that binds to centromeric chromatin and forms part of the inner kinetochore. It helps to recruit outer kinetochore subunits that will bind to microtubules. In humans, it consists of MIS12, DSN1, NSL1 and PMF1.
0	1	2	THO complex part of transcription export complex	The THO complex when it is part of the TREX (TRanscription EXport) complex that is involved in coupling transcription to export of mRNAs to the cytoplasm. In S. cerevisiae, it is composed of four subunits: Hpr1, Tho2, Thp1, and Mft1, while the human complex is composed of 7 subunits.
0	3	1	endonucleolytic cleavage in ITS1 to separate SSU-rRNA from 5.8S rRNA and LSU-rRNA from tricistronic rRNA transcript (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Endonucleolytic cleavage between the SSU-rRNA and the 5.8S rRNA of an rRNA molecule originally produced as a tricistronic rRNA transcript that contained the Small SubUnit (SSU) rRNA, the 5.8S rRNA, and the Large SubUnit (LSU) rRNA, in that order, from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript.
0	1	0	cleavage in ITS2 between 5.8S rRNA and LSU-rRNA of tricistronic rRNA transcript (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Endonucleolytic cleavage within ITS2 between the 5.8S rRNA and the LSU-rRNA of an rRNA molecule originally produced as a tricistronic rRNA transcript that contained the Small SubUnit (SSU) rRNA, the 5.8S rRNA, and the Large SubUnit (LSU) rRNA, in that order, from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript.
0	1	0	enzyme-directed rRNA 2'-O-methylation	The addition of methyl groups to the 2'-oxygen atom of nucleotide residues in an rRNA molecule during ribosome biogenesis where the methylase specifies the site that becomes methylated without using a guide RNA.
0	1	0	snoRNA guided rRNA pseudouridine synthesis	The intramolecular conversion of uridine to pseudouridine in an rRNA molecule during ribosome biogenesis using a snoRNA guide that targets the position of pseudouridylation.
1	0	1	enzyme-directed rRNA pseudouridine synthesis	The intramolecular conversion of uridine to pseudouridine during ribosome biogenesis where the enzyme specifies the site that becomes pseudouridylated without using a guide RNA.
2	3	0	maturation of 5.8S rRNA	Any process involved in the maturation of a precursor 5.8S ribosomal RNA (rRNA) molecule into a mature 5.8S rRNA molecule.
5	6	3	maturation of SSU-rRNA from tricistronic rRNA transcript (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Any process involved in the maturation of a precursor Small SubUnit (SSU) ribosomal RNA (rRNA) molecule into a mature SSU-rRNA molecule from the pre-rRNA molecule originally produced as a tricistronic rRNA transcript that contains the Small Subunit (SSU) rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, and the Large Subunit (LSU) in that order from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript.
2	6	0	maturation of LSU-rRNA from tricistronic rRNA transcript (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Any process involved in the maturation of a precursor Large SubUnit (LSU) ribosomal RNA (rRNA) molecule into a mature LSU-rRNA molecule from the pre-rRNA molecule originally produced as a tricistronic rRNA transcript that contains the Small Subunit (SSU) rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, and Large Subunit (LSU) in that order from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript.
1	2	0	maturation of 5.8S rRNA from tricistronic rRNA transcript (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Any process involved in the maturation of an rRNA molecule originally produced as part of a tricistronic rRNA transcript that contained the Small SubUnit (SSU) rRNA, the 5.8S rRNA, and the Large SubUnit (LSU) rRNA, in that order, from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript.
0	2	0	exonucleolytic trimming to generate mature 3'-end of 5.8S rRNA from tricistronic rRNA transcript (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Exonucleolytic digestion of a pre-rRNA molecule to generate the mature 3'-end of a 5.8S rRNA molecule derived from an originally tricistronic pre-rRNA transcript that contained the Small Subunit (SSU) rRNA, the 5.8S rRNA, and the Large Subunit (LSU) rRNA in that order from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript.
0	2	0	cleavage involved in rRNA processing	Any phosphodiester bond hydrolysis involved in the conversion of a primary ribosomal RNA (rRNA) transcript into a mature rRNA molecule.
2	3	2	maturation of LSU-rRNA	Any process involved in the maturation of a precursor Large SubUnit (LSU) ribosomal RNA (rRNA) molecule into a mature LSU-rRNA molecule.
1	3	0	endonucleolytic cleavage to generate mature 5'-end of SSU-rRNA from (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Endonucleolytic cleavage between the 5'-External Transcribed Spacer (5'-ETS) and the 5' end of the SSU-rRNA of a tricistronic rRNA transcript that contains the Small Subunit (SSU) rRNA, the 5.8S rRNA, and the Large Subunit (LSU) rRNA in that order from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript, to produce the mature end of the SSU-rRNA.
0	1	0	endonucleolytic cleavage of tricistronic rRNA transcript (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Endonucleolytic cleavage of a pre-rRNA molecule originally produced as a tricistronic rRNA transcript that contains the Small SubUnit (SSU) rRNA, the 5.8S rRNA, and the Large SubUnit (LSU) rRNA, in that order, from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript. Primary ribosomal RNA transcripts with three genes, in this order, are produced in the nuclei of many eukaryotic species, including S. cerevisiae.
1	3	0	endonucleolytic cleavage in 5'-ETS of tricistronic rRNA transcript (SSU-rRNA, 5.8S rRNA, LSU-rRNA)	Endonucleolytic cleavage within the 5'-External Transcribed Spacer (ETS) of a tricistronic rRNA transcript that contains the Small Subunit (SSU) rRNA, the 5.8S rRNA, and the Large Subunit (LSU) rRNA in that order from 5' to 3' along the primary transcript. Endonucleolytic cleavage within the 5'-ETS of the pre-RNA is conserved as one of the early steps of rRNA processing in all eukaryotes, but the specific position of cleavage is variable.
1	3	1	box C/D snoRNP assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and a box C/D snoRNA to form a box C/D small nucleolar ribonucleoprotein (snoRNP) complex.
0	1	0	box H/ACA snoRNP assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and a box H/ACA snoRNA to form a box H/ACA small nucleolar ribonucleoprotein (snoRNP) complex.
1	0	2	box C/D snoRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of a box C/D snoRNA molecule.
0	0	2	box H/ACA snoRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of a box H/ACA snoRNA molecule.
9	13	12	proteasome complex	A large multisubunit complex which catalyzes protein degradation, found in eukaryotes, archaea and some bacteria. In eukaryotes, this complex consists of the barrel shaped proteasome core complex and one or two associated proteins or complexes that act in regulating entry into or exit from the core.
0	0	1	purine-specific mismatch base pair DNA N-glycosylase activity	Catalysis of the removal of purines present in mismatches, especially opposite oxidized purines, by cleaving the N-C1' glycosidic bond between the target damaged DNA base and the deoxyribose sugar. The reaction releases a free base and leaves an apurinic (AP) site.
0	1	0	oxidized pyrimidine nucleobase lesion DNA N-glycosylase activity	Catalysis of the removal oxidized pyrimidine bases by cleaving the N-C1' glycosidic bond between the oxidized pyrimidine and the deoxyribose sugar. The reaction involves formation of a covalent enzyme-pyrimidine base intermediate. Release of the enzyme and free base by a beta-elimination or a beta, gamma-elimination mechanism results in the cleavage of the DNA backbone 3' of the apyrimidinic (AP) site.
0	1	0	meiotic DNA double-strand break processing	The cell cycle process in which the 5' to 3' exonucleolytic resection of the DNA at the site of the break to form a 3' single-strand DNA overhang occurs. This takes place during meiosis.
0	0	1	meiotic mismatch repair	A system for the identification and correction of base-base mismatches, small insertion-deletion loops, and regions of heterology that are present in duplex DNA formed with strands from two recombining molecules. Correction of the mismatch can result in non-Mendelian segregation of alleles following meiosis.
2	3	2	resolution of meiotic recombination intermediates	The cleavage and rejoining of intermediates, such as Holliday junctions, formed during meiotic recombination to produce two intact molecules in which genetic material has been exchanged.
1	4	8	nucleotide-excision repair, DNA damage recognition	The identification of lesions in DNA, such as pyrimidine-dimers, intrastrand cross-links, and bulky adducts. The wide range of substrate specificity suggests the repair complex recognizes distortions in the DNA helix.
2	3	7	nucleotide-excision repair, DNA duplex unwinding	The unwinding, or local denaturation, of the DNA duplex to create a bubble around the site of the DNA damage.
0	0	1	nucleotide-excision repair, DNA damage removal	The removal of the oligonucleotide that contains the DNA damage. The oligonucleotide is formed by dual incisions that flank the site of DNA damage.
0	1	1	pyrimidine dimer repair by nucleotide-excision repair	The repair of UV-induced T-T, C-T, and C-C dimers by the recognition and removal of the damaged DNA strand from the DNA helix as an oligonucleotide. The small gap left in the DNA helix is filled in by the sequential action of DNA polymerase and DNA ligase.
2	2	0	telomere maintenance via recombination	Any recombinational process that contributes to the maintenance of proper telomeric length.
6	12	7	telomere maintenance	Any process that contributes to the maintenance of proper telomeric length and structure by affecting and monitoring the activity of telomeric proteins, the length of telomeric DNA and the replication and repair of the DNA. These processes includes those that shorten, lengthen, replicate and repair the telomeric DNA sequences.
12	14	7	double-strand break repair via homologous recombination	The error-free repair of a double-strand break in DNA in which the broken DNA molecule is repaired using homologous sequences. A strand in the broken DNA searches for a homologous region in an intact chromosome to serve as the template for DNA synthesis. The restoration of two intact DNA molecules results in the exchange, reciprocal or nonreciprocal, of genetic material between the intact DNA molecule and the broken DNA molecule.
0	1	0	non-recombinational repair	A DNA repair process in which that does not require the exchange of genetic material between the broken DNA molecule and a homologous region of DNA.
1	3	2	double-strand break repair via break-induced replication	The error-free repair of a double-strand break in DNA in which the centromere-proximal end of a broken chromosome searches for a homologous region in an intact chromosome. DNA synthesis initiates from the 3' end of the invading DNA strand, using the intact chromosome as the template, and progresses to the end of the chromosome.
4	5	1	DNA double-strand break processing	The 5' to 3' exonucleolytic resection of the DNA at the site of the break to form a 3' single-strand DNA overhang.
0	3	1	DNA synthesis involved in DNA repair	Synthesis of DNA that proceeds from the broken 3' single-strand DNA end and uses the homologous intact duplex as the template.
0	1	0	strand displacement	The rejection of the broken 3' single-strand DNA molecule that formed heteroduplex DNA with its complement in an intact duplex DNA. The Watson-Crick base pairing in the original duplex is restored. The rejected 3' single-strand DNA molecule reanneals with its original complement to reform two intact duplex molecules.
0	1	0	DNA strand renaturation	The identification and annealing of complementary base pairs in single-strand DNA.
0	2	0	DNA catabolic process, endonucleolytic	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of DNA, involving the hydrolysis of internal 3',5'-phosphodiester bonds in one or two strands of deoxyribonucleotides.
0	2	1	DNA catabolic process, exonucleolytic	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of DNA, involving the hydrolysis of terminal 3',5'-phosphodiester bonds in one or two strands of deoxyribonucleotides.
0	2	3	adenyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity	Stimulates the hydrolysis and exchange of adenyl nucleotides by other proteins.
10	14	11	chromosome, centromeric region	The region of a chromosome that includes the centromeric DNA and associated proteins. In monocentric chromosomes, this region corresponds to a single area of the chromosome, whereas in holocentric chromosomes, it is evenly distributed along the chromosome.
11	16	21	kinetochore	A multisubunit complex that is located at the centromeric region of DNA and provides an attachment point for the spindle microtubules.
8	14	18	condensed chromosome kinetochore	A multisubunit complex that is located at the centromeric region of a condensed chromosome and provides an attachment point for the spindle microtubules.
3	2	2	condensed nuclear chromosome kinetochore	A multisubunit complex that is located at the centromeric region of a condensed nuclear chromosome and provides an attachment point for the spindle microtubules.
2	3	5	condensed chromosome, centromeric region	The region of a condensed chromosome that includes the centromere and associated proteins, including the kinetochore. In monocentric chromosomes, this region corresponds to a single area of the chromosome, whereas in holocentric chromosomes, it is evenly distributed along the chromosome.
14	26	25	chromosome, telomeric region	The terminal region of a linear chromosome that includes the telomeric DNA repeats and associated proteins.
1	1	3	nuclear telomere cap complex	A complex of DNA and protein located at the end of a linear chromosome in the nucleus that protects and stabilizes a linear chromosome.
128	115	70	chromatin	The ordered and organized complex of DNA, protein, and sometimes RNA, that forms the chromosome.
14	17	23	nucleosome	A complex comprised of DNA wound around a multisubunit core and associated proteins, which forms the primary packing unit of DNA into higher order structures.
2	9	10	euchromatin	A dispersed and relatively uncompacted form of chromatin.
8	11	15	heterochromatin	A compact and highly condensed form of chromatin.
1	7	7	condensed chromosome	A highly compacted molecule of DNA and associated proteins resulting in a cytologically distinct structure.
5	7	4	condensed nuclear chromosome	A highly compacted molecule of DNA and associated proteins resulting in a cytologically distinct nuclear chromosome.
2	2	3	synaptonemal complex	A proteinaceous scaffold found between homologous chromosomes during meiosis. It consists of 2 lateral elements and a central element, all running parallel to each other.  Transverse filaments connect the lateral elements to the central element.
0	3	3	condensin complex	A multisubunit protein complex that plays a central role in chromosome condensation.
2	3	2	lateral element	A proteinaceous core found between sister chromatids during meiotic prophase.
0	0	1	central element	A structural unit of the synaptonemal complex found between the lateral elements.
0	2	0	sex chromosome	A chromosome involved in sex determination.
1	0	0	X chromosome	The sex chromosome present in both sexes of species in which the male is the heterogametic sex. Two copies of the X chromosome are present in each somatic cell of females and one copy is present in males.
1	0	0	Y chromosome	The sex chromosome present in males of species in which the male is the heterogametic sex; generally, the sex chromosome that pairs with the X chromosome in the heterogametic sex. The Y chromosome is absent from the cells of females and present in one copy in the somatic cells of males.
0	2	0	origin recognition complex	A multisubunit complex that is located at the replication origins of a chromosome.
2	4	3	Swr1 complex	A multisubunit protein complex that is involved in chromatin remodeling. It is required for the incorporation of the histone variant H2AZ into chromatin. In S. cerevisiae, the complex contains Swr1p, a Swi2/Snf2-related ATPase, and 12 additional subunits.
0	4	0	ESCRT I complex	An endosomal sorting complex required for transport. It consists of the class E vacuolar protein sorting (Vps) proteins and interacts with ubiquitinated cargoes.
3	2	1	ESCRT III complex	An endosomal sorting complex required for transport. Consists of two soluble subcomplexes of highly charged coiled-coil proteins and is required for sorting and/or concentration of multivesicular body (MVB) cargoes.
0	0	1	nuclear MIS12/MIND complex	A multiprotein kinetochore subcomplex that binds to centromeric chromatin and forms part of the inner kinetochore of a chromosome in the nucleus. It helps to recruit outer kinetochore subunits that will bind to microtubules. Nuclear localization arises in some organisms because the nuclear envelope is not broken down during mitosis. In S. cerevisiae, it consists of at least four proteins: Mtw1p, Nnf1p, Nsl1p, and Dsn1.
0	1	2	sister chromatid segregation	The cell cycle process in which sister chromatids are organized and then physically separated and apportioned to two or more sets.
1	0	0	regulation of arginine metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving arginine, 2-amino-5-(carbamimidamido)pentanoic acid.
0	1	1	inositol hexakisphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with inositol hexakisphosphate.
0	1	1	inositol-1,3,4,5,6-pentakisphosphate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 1D-myo-inositol 1,3,4,5,6-pentakisphosphate = ADP + diphospho-1D-myo-inositol tetrakisphosphate. The isomeric configuration of diphospho-1D-myo-inositol tetrakisphosphate is unknown.
0	2	1	inositol hexakisphosphate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 1D-myo-inositol 1,2,3,4,5,6-hexakisphosphate = ADP + diphospho-1D-myo-inositol-pentakisphosphate. The isomeric configuration of diphospho-1D-myo-inositol-pentakisphosphate (PP-IP5) is unknown.
0	1	1	inositol heptakisphosphate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + diphospho-1D-myo-inositol-pentakisphosphate = ADP + bis(diphospho)-1D-myo-inositol-tetrakisphosphate. The isomeric configurations of the diphospho-1D-myo-inositol-pentakisphosphate (PP-IP5) and bis(diphospho)-1D-myo-inositol-tetrakisphosphate (bis-PP-IP4) are unknown.
0	1	1	inositol hexakisphosphate 5-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 1D-myo-inositol 1,2,3,4,5,6-hexakisphosphate = ADP + 5-diphospho-1D-myo-inositol (1,2,3,4,6)pentakisphosphate.
2	0	0	Hrd1p ubiquitin ligase complex	A multiprotein complex that recognizes and ubiquitinates proteins with misfolded luminal and membrane domains during ER-associated protein degradation (ERAD). In S. cerevisiae, this complex contains the ubiquitin ligase Hrd1p. In mammals, this complex contains the ubiquitin ligase HRD1 (Synoviolin) or AMFR (gp78).
2	0	0	Hrd1p ubiquitin ligase ERAD-L complex	A multiprotein complex that recognizes and ubiquitinates proteins with misfolded luminal domains during ER-associated protein degradation (ERAD). In S. cerevisiae, this complex contains the ubiquitin ligase Hrd1p.
2	1	1	translation repressor activity, mRNA regulatory element binding	Antagonizes the ribosome-mediated translation of mRNA into a polypeptide via direct binding (through a selective and non-covalent interaction) to nucleic acid.
3	11	15	cell morphogenesis	The developmental process in which the size or shape of a cell is generated and organized.
0	3	1	actomyosin contractile ring assembly	The process of assembly of a ring composed of actin, myosin, and associated proteins that will function in cytokinesis.
0	1	0	actomyosin contractile ring contraction	The process of an actomyosin ring getting smaller in diameter, in the context of cytokinesis that takes place as part of a cell cycle.
0	0	1	septin ring assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of septins and associated proteins to form an organized structure resembling a ring at the cell cortex.
22	27	18	spindle pole	Either of the ends of a spindle, where spindle microtubules are organized; usually contains a microtubule organizing center and accessory molecules, spindle microtubules and astral microtubules.
1	0	1	equatorial microtubule organizing center	A microtubule organizing center formed by a band of gamma-tubulin that is recruited to a circumferential band of F-actin at the midpoint of a cell and which nucleates microtubules from the cell division site at the end of mitosis.
1	1	3	gamma-tubulin complex	A multiprotein complex composed of gamma-tubulin and other non-tubulin proteins. Gamma-tubulin complexes are localized to microtubule organizing centers, and play an important role in the nucleation of microtubules. The number and complexity of non-tubulin proteins associated with these complexes varies between species.
9	22	12	P-body	A focus in the cytoplasm where mRNAs may become inactivated by decapping or some other mechanism. Protein and RNA localized to these foci are involved in mRNA degradation, nonsense-mediated mRNA decay (NMD), translational repression, and RNA-mediated gene silencing.
1	1	1	GARP complex	A quatrefoil tethering complex required for retrograde traffic from the early endosome back to the late Golgi and biogenesis of cytoplasmic vesicles.
1	1	0	condensed chromosome inner kinetochore	The region of a condensed chromosome kinetochore closest to centromeric DNA; in mammals the CREST antigens (CENP proteins) are found in this layer; this layer may help define underlying centromeric chromatin structure and position of the kinetochore on the chromosome.
1	2	1	condensed chromosome outer kinetochore	The region of a condensed chromosome kinetochore most external to centromeric DNA; this outer region mediates kinetochore-microtubule interactions.
0	0	1	condensed nuclear chromosome inner kinetochore	The region of a condensed nuclear chromosome kinetochore closest to centromeric DNA; this layer may help define underlying centromeric chromatin structure and position of the kinetochore on the chromosome.
1	0	1	condensed nuclear chromosome outer kinetochore	The region of a condensed nuclear chromosome kinetochore most external to centromeric DNA; this outer region mediates kinetochore-microtubule interactions.
1	4	4	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of nuclear-transcribed mRNAs in eukaryotic cells.
0	1	0	mitochondrial mRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of mRNA transcribed from the mitochondrial genome and occurring in the mitochondrion.
0	0	2	negative regulation of mitochondrial RNA catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving catabolism in the mitochondrion of RNA transcribed from the mitochondrial genome.
1	1	0	positive regulation of mitochondrial RNA catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving catabolism in the mitochondrion of RNA transcribed from the mitochondrial genome.
0	1	0	mitochondrial RNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of an RNA molecule transcribed from a mitochondrial genome; occurs in the mitochondrion.
1	2	0	transcription-dependent tethering of RNA polymerase II gene DNA at nuclear periphery	The chromosome organization process in which the DNA sequence containing a gene transcribed by RNA polymerase II is maintained in a specific location at the nuclear periphery. In S. cerevisiae, this process involves cis-acting DNA sequences such as the TATA box and upstream activating sequence (UAS) elements, trans-acting transcriptional activators, and also the 3'-UTR of the transcript.
0	1	0	posttranscriptional tethering of RNA polymerase II gene DNA at nuclear periphery	The chromosome organization process in which the DNA sequence containing a gene transcribed by RNA polymerase II is maintained in a specific location at the nuclear periphery even after transcription has been repressed.
1	3	1	Prp19 complex	A protein complex consisting of Prp19 and associated proteins that is involved in the transition from the precatalytic spliceosome to the activated form that catalyzes step 1 of splicing, and which remains associated with the spliceosome through the second catalytic step. It is widely conserved, found in both yeast and mammals, though the exact composition varies. In S. cerevisiae, it contains Prp19p, Ntc20p, Snt309p, Isy1p, Syf2p, Cwc2p, Prp46p, Clf1p, Cef1p, and Syf1p.
32	30	17	transcription regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific sequence of DNA that is part of a regulatory region that controls transcription of that section of the DNA. The transcribed region might be described as a gene, cistron, or operon.
21	28	11	RNA polymerase II transcription regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific sequence of DNA that is part of a regulatory region that controls the transcription of a gene or cistron by RNA polymerase II.
131	94	34	RNA polymerase II cis-regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific upstream regulatory DNA sequence (transcription factor recognition sequence or binding site) located in cis relative to the transcription start site (i.e., on the same strand of DNA) of a gene transcribed by RNA polymerase II.
1	3	4	RNA polymerase II core promoter sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DNA sequence that is part of the core promoter of a RNA polymerase II-transcribed gene.
126	85	26	DNA-binding transcription factor activity, RNA polymerase II-specific	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific double-stranded genomic DNA sequence (sometimes referred to as a motif) within the regulatory region of a RNA polymerase II-transcribed gene to modulate transcription. Regulatory regions include promoters (proximal and distal) and enhancers. Genes are transcriptional units.
7	9	1	cis-regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific upstream regulatory DNA sequence (transcription factor recognition sequence or binding site) located in cis relative to the transcription start site (i.e., on the same strand of DNA) of a gene transcribed by some RNA polymerase. The proximal promoter is in cis with and relatively close to the core promoter.
1	9	8	RNA polymerase II complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with RNA polymerase II core enzyme, a multisubunit eukaryotic nuclear RNA polymerase typically composed of twelve subunits.
0	1	0	RNA polymerase III core binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with RNA polymerase III core enzyme, a multisubunit eukaryotic nuclear RNA polymerase typically composed of seventeen subunits.
1	0	1	RNA polymerase III general transcription initiation factor activity	An activity that contributes to transcription start site selection and transcription initiation of genes transcribed by RNA polymerase III. Factors required for RNA polymerase III transcription initiation include TFIIIA, TFIIIB and TFIIIC.
0	2	1	RNA polymerase III type 1 promoter sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of DNA that is a part of a type 1 promoter that controls transcription by RNA polymerase III. Type 1 promoters are found in 5S rRNA genes, downstream of the transcription start site within the sequence of the mature RNA, and require TFIIIA for recognition.
0	2	1	RNA polymerase III type 2 promoter sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of DNA that is a part of a type 2 promoter that controls transcription by RNA polymerase III. Type 2 promoters consist of an A box and a B box downstream of the transcription start site within the sequence within the sequence of the mature RNA. Type 2 promoters are found in many tRNA genes as well as in other small RNAs.
1	2	2	RNA polymerase III type 3 promoter sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of DNA that is a part of a type 3 promoter that controls transcription by RNA polymerase III (Pol III). A type 3 Pol III promoter is composed of elements upstream of the transcription start site, including a TATA box. The human U6 snRNA gene has a type 3 promoter. Type 3 Pol III promoters have not been observed in S. cerevisiae.
0	0	1	RNA polymerase III transcription regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DNA region that controls the transcription of a gene by RNA polymerase III. Binding may occur as a sequence specific interaction or as an interaction observed only once a factor has been recruited to the DNA by other factors.
1	0	0	mitochondrial promoter sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DNA region that controls the transcription of the mitochondrial DNA.
2	1	0	RNA polymerase I core binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with RNA polymerase I core enzyme, a multisubunit eukaryotic nuclear RNA polymerase typically composed of seventeen subunits.
2	5	2	core promoter sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of DNA that is part of a core promoter region. The core promoter is composed of the transcription start site and binding sites for the RNA polymerase and the basal transcription machinery. The transcribed region might be described as a gene, cistron, or operon.
0	1	0	RNA polymerase I activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nucleoside triphosphate + RNA(n) = diphosphate + RNA(n+1). Utilizes a DNA template that contains an RNA polymerase I specific promoter to direct initiation and catalyzes DNA-template-directed extension of the 3'-end of an RNA strand by one nucleotide at a time. Can initiate a chain 'de novo'.
0	2	0	regulatory region nucleic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a nucleic acid region that regulates a nucleic acid-based process. Such processes include transcription, DNA replication, and DNA repair.
0	1	0	regulatory region RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a RNA region that regulates a nucleic acid-based process. Such processes include transcription, DNA replication, and DNA repair.
3	13	9	RNA polymerase II transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA polymerase II transcription factor, any protein required to initiate or regulate transcription by RNA polymerase II.
0	0	1	TFIIB-class transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a general RNA polymerase II transcription factor of the TFIIB class, one of the factors involved in formation of the preinitiation complex (PIC) by RNA polymerase II.
0	3	3	TFIID-class transcription factor complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a general RNA polymerase II transcription factor belonging to the TFIID complex, one of the factors involved in formation of the preinitiation complex (PIC) by RNA polymerase II.
0	1	0	TFIIF-class transcription factor complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a general RNA polymerase II transcription factor belonging to the TFIIF complex, one of the factors involved in formation of the preinitiation complex (PIC) by RNA polymerase II.
0	1	1	TFIIH-class transcription factor complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a general RNA polymerase II transcription factor belonging to the TFIIH complex, one of the factors involved in formation of the preinitiation complex (PIC) by RNA polymerase II.
0	1	0	negative regulation of exit from mitosis	Any process involved in the inhibition of progression from anaphase/telophase (high mitotic CDK activity) to G1 (low mitotic CDK activity).
5	9	10	RNA polymerase II activating transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA polymerase II transcription activating factor, a protein involved in positive regulation of transcription.
8	5	3	RNA polymerase II repressing transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA polymerase II transcription repressing factor, a protein involved in negative regulation of transcription.
0	1	1	transcription termination site sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of DNA that promotes termination by RNA polymerase. The transcribed region might be described as a gene, cistron, or operon.
0	1	1	TFIIIC-class transcription factor complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a general RNA polymerase III transcription factor belonging to the TFIIC complex, one of the factors involved in formation of the preinitiation complex (PIC) by RNA polymerase III.
1	0	1	intronic transcription regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an intronic DNA sequence that regulates the transcription of the transcript it is contained within.
0	1	1	RNA polymerase II intronic transcription regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA polymerase II intronic DNA sequence that regulates the transcription of the transcript it is contained within.
2	1	0	RNA polymerase I core promoter sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the regulatory region composed of the transcription start site and binding sites for transcription factors of the RNA polymerase I transcription machinery. This site is often referred to as the CORE element. In mammalian cells, the CORE element functions in conjunction with the Upstream Control Element (UCE), while in fungi, protozoa, and plants, the CORE element functions without a UCE.
1	0	0	RNA polymerase I cis-regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific upstream regulatory DNA sequence (transcription factor recognition sequence or binding site) located in cis relative to the transcription start site (i.e., on the same strand of DNA) of a gene transcribed by RNA polymerase I. RNA polymerase I elements are referred to either enhancers or upstream control element (UCE, or alternately referred to as the upstream element).
2	1	0	RNA polymerase I general transcription initiation factor activity	An activity that contributes to transcription start site selection and transcription initiation of genes transcribed by RNA polymerase I. Factors required for RNA polymerase I transcription initiation include upstream activation factor (UAF), core factor (CF), TATA binding protein (TBP) and RRN3.
1	1	1	RNA polymerase I preinitiation complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins on promoter DNA to form the transcriptional preinitiation complex (PIC), the formation of which is a prerequisite for transcription from an RNA polymerase I promoter.
1	2	0	DNA-binding transcription activator activity	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific double-stranded genomic DNA sequence in order to activate or increase the frequency, rate or extent of transcription by a RNA polymerase.
3	2	0	DNA-binding transcription repressor activity	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific double-stranded genomic DNA sequence in order to stop, prevent, or reduce the frequency, rate or extent of transcription by a RNA polymerase.
3	0	1	transcription cofactor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a transcription cofactor, any protein involved in regulation of transcription via protein-protein interactions with transcription factors and other transcription regulatory proteins. Cofactors do not bind DNA directly, but rather mediate protein-protein interactions between regulatory transcription factors and the basal transcription machinery.
1	2	2	transcription corepressor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a transcription corepressor, any protein involved in negative regulation of transcription via protein-protein interactions with transcription factors and other proteins that negatively regulate transcription. Transcription corepressors do not bind DNA directly, but rather mediate protein-protein interactions between repressing transcription factors and the basal transcription machinery.
3	4	0	transcription coactivator binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a transcription coactivator, any protein involved in positive regulation of transcription via protein-protein interactions with transcription factors and other proteins that positively regulate transcription. Transcription coactivators do not bind DNA directly, but rather mediate protein-protein interactions between activating transcription factors and the basal transcription machinery.
0	0	2	RNA polymerase II transcription coactivator binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA polymerase II transcription coactivator, any protein involved in positive regulation of transcription of RNA polymerase II via protein-protein interactions with transcription factors and other proteins that positively regulate transcription. Transcription coactivators do not bind DNA directly, but rather mediate protein-protein interactions between activating transcription factors and the basal transcription machinery of RNA polymerase II.
7	4	3	RNA polymerase II transcription corepressor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA polymerase II transcription corepressor, any protein involved in negative regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase II via protein-protein interactions with transcription factors and other proteins that negatively regulate transcription. Transcription corepressors do not bind DNA directly, but rather mediate protein-protein interactions between repressing transcription factors and the basal transcription machinery of RNA polymerase II.
37	35	10	DNA-binding transcription repressor activity, RNA polymerase II-specific	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific double-stranded genomic DNA sequence (sometimes referred to as a motif) within the regulatory region of a RNA polymerase II-transcribed gene to repress or decrease transcription. Regulatory regions include promoters (proximal and distal) and enhancers. Genes are transcriptional units.
47	39	11	DNA-binding transcription activator activity, RNA polymerase II-specific	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific double-stranded genomic DNA sequence (sometimes referred to as a motif) within the regulatory region of a RNA polymerase II-transcribed gene to activate or increase transcription. Regulatory regions include promoters (proximal and distal) and enhancers. Genes are transcriptional units.
0	1	0	age-dependent response to reactive oxygen species	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of reactive oxygen species, where the change varies according to the age of the cell or organism.
0	2	2	SAM complex	A large complex of the mitochondrial outer membrane that mediates sorting of some imported proteins to the outer membrane and their assembly in the membrane; functions after import of incoming proteins by the mitochondrial outer membrane translocase complex.
0	1	0	guanine nucleotide transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of guanine nucleotides (GMP, GDP, and GTP) from one side of a membrane to the other.
14	10	10	skeletal system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the skeleton over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The skeleton is the bony framework of the body in vertebrates (endoskeleton) or the hard outer envelope of insects (exoskeleton or dermoskeleton).
3	2	0	cartilage condensation	The condensation of mesenchymal cells that have been committed to differentiate into chondrocytes.
8	10	2	ossification	The formation of bone or of a bony substance, or the conversion of fibrous tissue or of cartilage into bone or a bony substance.
0	0	2	neurotransmitter uptake	The directed movement of neurotransmitters into neurons or glial cells. This process leads to inactivation and recycling of neurotransmitters.
2	1	1	action potential	A process in which membrane potential cycles through a depolarizing spike, triggered in response to depolarization above some threshold, followed by repolarization. This cycle is driven by the flow of ions through various voltage gated channels with different thresholds and ion specificities.
2	5	4	RNA methylation	Posttranscriptional addition of a methyl group to either a nucleotide or 2'-O ribose in a polyribonucleotide. Usually uses S-adenosylmethionine as a cofactor.
1	0	0	dihydronicotinamide riboside quinone reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-(beta-D-ribofuranosyl)-1,4-dihydronicotinamide + a quinone = 1-(beta-D-ribofuranosyl)nicotinamide + a hydroquinone.
1	0	0	selenocysteine incorporation	The incorporation of selenocysteine into a peptide; uses a special tRNA that recognizes the UGA codon as selenocysteine, rather than as a termination codon. Selenocysteine is synthesized from serine before its incorporation; it is not a posttranslational modification of peptidyl-cysteine.
2	0	2	prostaglandin biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of prostaglandins, any of a group of biologically active metabolites which contain a cyclopentane ring.
0	0	1	voltage-gated sodium channel complex	A sodium channel in a cell membrane whose opening is governed by the membrane potential.
0	1	0	peptide amidation	The posttranslational conversion of C-terminal glycine-extended peptides to C-terminal alpha-amidated peptides. Occurs to over half of all peptide hormones to give bioactive peptides. This is a two step process catalyzed by a peptidyl-glycine alpha-hydroxylating monooxygenase and a peptidyl-alpha-hydroxyglycine alpha-amidating lyase. In some organisms, this process is catalyzed by two separate enzymes, whereas in higher organisms, one polypeptide catalyzes both reactions.
1	1	0	outer dense fiber	A supramolecular fiber found in the flagella of mammalian sperm that surrounds the nine microtubule doublets. These dense fibers are stiff and noncontractile. In human, they consist of about 10 major and at least 15 minor proteins, where all major proteins are ODF1, ODF2 or ODF2-related proteins.
13	8	5	retinoid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving retinoids, any member of a class of isoprenoids that contain or are derived from four prenyl groups linked head-to-tail. Retinoids include retinol and retinal and structurally similar natural derivatives or synthetic compounds, but need not have vitamin A activity.
16	36	23	angiogenesis	Blood vessel formation when new vessels emerge from the proliferation of pre-existing blood vessels.
0	2	2	microfibril	Extracellular matrix components occurring independently or along with elastin. Thought to have force-bearing functions in tendon. In addition to fibrillins, microfibrils may contain other associated proteins.
3	4	4	lipopolysaccharide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with lipopolysaccharide.
7	7	9	cornified envelope	A type of plasma membrane that has been modified through addition of distinct intracellular and extracellular components, including ceramide, found in cornifying epithelial cells (corneocytes).
1	0	0	N-acetylgalactosamine 4-O-sulfotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate + N-acetyl-D-galactosamine = adenosine 3',5'-bisphosphate + N-acetyl-D-galactosamine 4-sulfate.
10	9	9	amyloid-beta binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with amyloid-beta peptide/protein and/or its precursor.
10	4	2	ovarian follicle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the ovarian follicle over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	ovulation from ovarian follicle	The process leading to the rupture of the follicle, releasing the centrally located oocyte into the oviduct. An example of this is found in Mus musculus.
1	0	0	ovarian follicle rupture	Disruption of theca cell layer releasing follicular fluid and/or the oocyte.
0	1	0	initiation of primordial ovarian follicle growth	Increase in size of primordial follicles including proliferation and shape changes of granulosa and/or theca cells until oocyte is surrounded by one layer of cuboidal shaped granulosa cells (primary follicle).
0	1	0	primary ovarian follicle growth	Increase in size of primary follicles including oocyte growth and granulosa and/or theca cell proliferation until more than one layer of granulosa cells is present (preantral follicle).
1	0	0	preantral ovarian follicle growth	Increase in size of follicles surrounded by two or more layers of granulosa cells up to the onset of antrum formation.
0	1	0	antral ovarian follicle growth	Increase in size of antral follicles due to cell proliferation and/or growth of the antral cavity.
0	1	0	ovarian cumulus expansion	Increase in size of the cumulus surrounding the oocyte including change in morphology due to proliferation and dispersion of cumulus cells.
1	0	0	ovarian follicle atresia	A periodic process in which immature ovarian follicles degenerate and are subsequently re-absorbed.
2	1	0	luteinization	The set of processes resulting in differentiation of theca and granulosa cells into luteal cells and in the formation of a corpus luteum after ovulation.
1	1	1	luteolysis	The lysis or structural demise of the corpus luteum. During normal luteolysis, two closely related events occur. First, there is loss of the capacity to synthesize and secrete progesterone (functional luteolysis) followed by loss of the cells that comprise the corpus luteum (structural luteolysis). Preventing luteolysis is crucial to maintain pregnancy.
0	0	1	oocyte growth	The developmental growth process in which an oocyte irreversibly increases in size over time by accretion and biosynthetic production of matter similar to that already present.
5	4	2	oocyte maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for an oocyte to attain its fully functional state. Oocyte maturation commences after reinitiation of meiosis commonly starting with germinal vesicle breakdown, and continues up to the second meiotic arrest prior to fertilization.
5	14	13	regulation of cell growth	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, extent or direction of cell growth.
0	0	1	regulation of cell growth by extracellular stimulus	Any process in which external signals modulate the frequency, rate or extent of cell growth, the irreversible increase in size of a cell over time.
3	0	0	fatty acid alpha-oxidation	A metabolic pathway by which 3-methyl branched fatty acids are degraded. These compounds are not degraded by the normal peroxisomal beta-oxidation pathway, because the 3-methyl blocks the dehydrogenation of the hydroxyl group by hydroxyacyl-CoA dehydrogenase. The 3-methyl branched fatty acid is converted in several steps to pristenic acid, which can then feed into the beta-oxidative pathway.
5	9	4	blood vessel development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a blood vessel over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The blood vessel is the vasculature carrying blood.
3	2	3	branching involved in blood vessel morphogenesis	The process of coordinated growth and sprouting of blood vessels giving rise to the organized vascular system.
4	7	3	vasculogenesis	The differentiation of endothelial cells from progenitor cells during blood vessel development, and the de novo formation of blood vessels and tubes.
1	1	0	ganglioside metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ceramide oligosaccharides carrying in addition to other sugar residues, one or more sialic acid residues.
2	7	10	microtubule bundle formation	A process that results in a parallel arrangement of microtubules.
1	0	0	medium-chain fatty acid transport	The directed movement of medium-chain fatty acids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. A medium-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length of between C6 and C12.
1	3	0	detection of chemical stimulus involved in sensory perception of bitter taste	The series of events required for a bitter taste stimulus to be received and converted to a molecular signal.
12	13	10	virus receptor activity	Combining with a virus component and mediating entry of the virus into the cell.
1	0	0	cysteinyl leukotriene receptor activity	Combining with a cysteinyl leukotriene to initiate a change in cell activity. Cysteinyl leukotrienes are leukotrienes that contain a peptide group based on cysteine.
1	0	1	adenylate cyclase inhibiting G protein-coupled glutamate receptor activity	Combining with glutamate and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating the alpha-subunit of an associated heterotrimeric G-protein complex to inhibit downstream adenylate cyclase activity.
1	0	0	group III metabotropic glutamate receptor activity	A G protein-coupled receptor that is activated by L-AP-4 and inhibits adenylate cyclase activity.
12	16	23	osteoblast differentiation	The process whereby a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of an osteoblast, a mesodermal or neural crest cell that gives rise to bone.
20	21	30	fibrillar center	A structure found most metazoan nucleoli, but not usually found in lower eukaryotes; surrounded by the dense fibrillar component; the zone of transcription from multiple copies of the pre-rRNA genes is in the border region between these two structures.
0	0	1	dense fibrillar component	A structure found in the nucleolus, which contains newly synthesized preribosomal RNA (pre-rRNA) and a collection of proteins.
1	1	1	granular component	A structure found in the nucleolus, which contains nearly completed preribosomal particles destined for the cytoplasm.
2	6	1	eye development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the eye over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The eye is the organ of sight.
1	1	0	urogenital system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the urogenital system over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
4	2	1	metanephros development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephros over time, from its formation to the mature structure. In mammals, the metanephros is the excretory organ of the fetus, which develops into the mature kidney and is formed from the rear portion of the nephrogenic cord. The metanephros is an endocrine and metabolic organ that filters the blood and excretes the end products of body metabolism in the form of urine.
5	1	0	ureteric bud development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the ureteric bud over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
5	3	1	branching involved in ureteric bud morphogenesis	The process in which the branching structure of the ureteric bud is generated and organized. The ureteric bud is an epithelial tube that grows out from the metanephric duct. The bud elongates and branches to give rise to the ureter and kidney collecting tubules.
4	0	1	temperature homeostasis	A homeostatic process in which an organism modulates its internal body temperature.
1	0	0	fever generation	The heat generation process that results in a rise in body temperature above the normal, often as a response to infection.
2	2	4	behavioral fear response	An acute behavioral change resulting from a perceived external threat.
2	9	10	G protein-coupled receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a G protein-coupled receptor.
22	21	23	response to hypoxia	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating lowered oxygen tension. Hypoxia, defined as a decline in O2 levels below normoxic levels of 20.8 - 20.95%, results in metabolic adaptation at both the cellular and organismal level.
1	3	1	ameboidal-type cell migration	Cell migration that is accomplished by extension and retraction of a pseudopodium.
10	5	9	acrosomal vesicle	A structure in the head of a spermatozoon that contains acid hydrolases, and is concerned with the breakdown of the outer membrane of the ovum during fertilization. It lies just beneath the plasma membrane and is derived from the lysosome.
3	1	5	ATPase activator activity	Binds to and increases the ATP hydrolysis activity of an ATPase.
0	2	0	regulation of chromatin assembly or disassembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin assembly or disassembly.
4	1	2	male germ cell nucleus	The nucleus of a male germ cell, a reproductive cell in males.
0	0	1	female germ cell nucleus	The nucleus of the female germ cell, a reproductive cell in females.
1	1	1	acrosome assembly	The formation of the acrosome from the spermatid Golgi.
1	1	2	long-chain fatty acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving long-chain fatty acids, A long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
1	5	5	cellular glucose homeostasis	A cellular homeostatic process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of glucose within a cell or between a cell and its external environment.
0	1	3	tRNA 5'-leader removal	Generation of the mature 5'-end of the tRNA, usually via an endonucleolytic cleavage by RNase P.
1	0	0	pseudophosphatase activity	Maintains the phosphorylation state of certain molecules by associating with them and preventing them from associating with active phosphatases, and thus inhibiting the enzyme activity without interacting with the enzyme. Often pertains to proteins belonging to dual-specificity phosphatase family but lacking critical active site residues.
1	0	0	gastric acid secretion	The regulated release of gastric acid (hydrochloric acid) by parietal or oxyntic cells during digestion.
18	33	20	in utero embryonic development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the embryo in the uterus over time, from formation of the zygote in the oviduct, to birth. An example of this process is found in Mus musculus.
2	1	1	gastrulation with mouth forming second	A gastrulation process in which the initial invagination becomes the anus and the mouth forms second.
1	1	0	endoderm formation	The formation of the endoderm during gastrulation.
1	3	3	mesoderm formation	The process that gives rise to the mesoderm. This process pertains to the initial formation of the structure from unspecified parts.
2	5	0	cell fate specification	The process involved in the specification of cell identity. Once specification has taken place, a cell will be committed to differentiate down a specific pathway if left in its normal environment.
2	2	0	cell fate determination	A process involved in cell fate commitment. Once determination has taken place, a cell becomes committed to differentiate down a particular pathway regardless of its environment.
1	0	0	mesodermal cell fate commitment	The cell differentiation process that results in commitment of a cell to become part of the mesoderm.
1	1	2	endodermal cell fate commitment	The cell differentiation process that results in commitment of a cell to become part of the endoderm.
0	1	0	endodermal cell fate specification	The cell fate determination process that results in a cell becoming capable of differentiating autonomously into an endoderm cell in an environment that is neutral with respect to the developmental pathway; upon specification, the cell fate can be reversed.
5	8	30	stress fiber	A contractile actin filament bundle that consists of short actin filaments with alternating polarity, cross-linked by alpha-actinin and possibly other actin bundling proteins, and with myosin present in a periodic distribution along the fiber.
19	25	26	ruffle	Projection at the leading edge of a crawling cell; the protrusions are supported by a microfilament meshwork.
1	0	1	lipid kinase activity	Catalysis of the phosphorylation of a simple or complex lipid.
1	1	0	2'-5'-oligoadenylate synthetase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP = pppA(2'p5'A)n oligomers. This reaction requires the binding of double-stranded RNA.
0	7	2	formation of translation preinitiation complex	The joining of the small ribosomal subunit, ternary complex, and mRNA.
4	6	3	formation of cytoplasmic translation initiation complex	Joining of the large subunit, with release of IF2/eIF2 and IF3/eIF3. This leaves the functional ribosome at the AUG, with the methionyl/formyl-methionyl-tRNA positioned at the P site.
2	0	0	mRNA (N6-adenosine)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + RRACH = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + RRm6ACH; R is a purine, and H is C, A, or U.
0	1	0	establishment of planar polarity	Coordinated organization of groups of cells in the plane of an epithelium, such that they all orient to similar coordinates.
0	2	2	morphogenesis of a polarized epithelium	The morphogenetic process in which the anatomical structures of a polarized epithelium are generated and organized. A polarized epithelium is an epithelium where the epithelial sheet is oriented with respect to the planar axis.
1	0	1	sex chromatin	Chromatin that is part of a sex chromosome.
2	1	1	Barr body	A structure found in a female mammalian cell containing an unpaired X chromosome that has become densely heterochromatic, silenced and localized at the nuclear periphery.
3	3	0	XY body	A structure found in a male mammalian spermatocyte containing an unpaired X chromosome that has become densely heterochromatic, silenced and localized at the nuclear periphery.
10	5	3	photoreceptor outer segment	The outer segment of a vertebrate photoreceptor that contains a stack of membrane discs embedded with photoreceptor proteins.
1	2	0	eye photoreceptor cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a photoreceptor cell, as found in the eye, the primary visual organ of most organisms.
8	3	2	neural crest cell migration	The characteristic movement of cells from the dorsal ridge of the neural tube to a variety of locations in a vertebrate embryo.
1	5	2	somitogenesis	The formation of mesodermal clusters that are arranged segmentally along the anterior posterior axis of an embryo.
2	2	1	retinal dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: retinal + NAD+ + H2O = retinoate + NADH. Acts on both 11-trans and 13-cis forms of retinal.
1	0	0	organ induction	The interaction of two or more cells or tissues that causes them to change their fates and specify the development of an organ.
2	1	0	morphogenesis of a branching structure	The process in which the anatomical structures of branches are generated and organized. A branch is a division or offshoot from a main stem. Examples in animals would include blood vessels, nerves, lymphatics and other endothelial or epithelial tubes.
10	11	15	neuron migration	The characteristic movement of an immature neuron from germinal zones to specific positions where they will reside as they mature.
0	2	2	membrane raft assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a membrane raft, a small (10-200 nm), heterogeneous, highly dynamic, sterol- and sphingolipid-enriched membrane domains that compartmentalizes cellular processes.
1	0	1	membrane raft polarization	The clustering and aggregation of membrane rafts at a single cellular pole during activation of particular cell types, such as lymphocytes.
0	0	3	establishment of T cell polarity	The directed orientation of T cell signaling molecules and associated membrane rafts towards a chemokine gradient or a contact point with antigen presenting cell.
1	0	0	establishment of natural killer cell polarity	The directed orientation of natural killer cell signaling molecules and associated membrane rafts towards a chemokine gradient or a contact point with a cell displaying natural killer cell activating ligands.
1	4	3	immunological synapse formation	The formation of an area of close contact between a lymphocyte (T-, B-, or natural killer cell) and a target cell through the clustering of particular signaling and adhesion molecules and their associated membrane rafts on both the lymphocyte and target cell, which facilitates activation of the lymphocyte, transfer of membrane from the target cell to the lymphocyte, and in some situations killing of the target cell through release of secretory granules and/or death-pathway ligand-receptor interaction.
8	8	9	immunological synapse	An area of close contact between a lymphocyte (T-, B-, or natural killer cell) and a target cell formed through the clustering of particular signaling and adhesion molecules and their associated membrane rafts on both the lymphocyte and the target cell and facilitating activation of the lymphocyte, transfer of membrane from the target cell to the lymphocyte, and in some situations killing of the target cell through release of secretory granules and/or death-pathway ligand-receptor interaction.
1	0	1	myeloid dendritic cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a dendritic cell resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
2	3	2	microglial cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a microglial cell resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
1	0	0	cell activation	A change in the morphology or behavior of a cell resulting from exposure to an activating factor such as a cellular or soluble ligand.
1	2	3	plasma membrane repair	The resealing of a cell plasma membrane after cellular wounding due to, for instance, mechanical stress.
3	1	3	natural killer cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a natural killer cell.
1	0	2	neutrophil homeostasis	The process of regulating the proliferation and elimination of neutrophils such that the total number of neutrophils within a whole or part of an organism is stable over time in the absence of an outside stimulus.
0	1	0	neutrophil apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a neutrophil, any of the immature or mature forms of a granular leukocyte that in its mature form has a nucleus with three to five lobes connected by slender threads of chromatin, and cytoplasm containing fine inconspicuous granules and stainable by neutral dyes.
4	5	2	B cell homeostasis	The process of regulating the proliferation and elimination of B cells such that the total number of B cells within a whole or part of an organism is stable over time in the absence of an outside stimulus.
2	2	1	B cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a B cell, a lymphocyte of B lineage with the phenotype CD19-positive and capable of B cell mediated immunity.
6	20	6	phosphotyrosine residue binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a phosphorylated tyrosine residue within a protein.
5	8	17	phosphatidylserine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylserine, a class of glycophospholipids in which a phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of L-serine.
0	1	0	natural killer cell proliferation	The expansion of a natural killer cell population by cell division.
0	1	0	polymeric immunoglobulin receptor activity	Combining with a J-chain-containing polymeric immunoglobulin of the IgA or IgM isotypes via the Fc region, and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of type IIa hypersensitivity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of type IIa hypersensitivity, a type of inflammatory response.
2	3	4	regulation of cytokine production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of production of a cytokine.
5	3	3	negative regulation of cytokine production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of production of a cytokine.
3	6	5	positive regulation of cytokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of production of a cytokine.
13	13	5	kidney development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the kidney over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The kidney is an organ that filters the blood and/or excretes the end products of body metabolism in the form of urine.
1	2	1	blastocyst development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the blastocyst over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The mammalian blastocyst is a hollow ball of cells containing two cell types, the inner cell mass and the trophectoderm.
3	1	1	blastocyst formation	The initial formation of a blastocyst from a solid ball of cells known as a morula.
0	0	1	inner cell mass cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an inner cell mass cell.
0	1	0	inner cell mass cell fate commitment	The cell fate commitment of precursor cells that will become inner cell mass cells.
0	1	0	inner cell mass cellular morphogenesis	The morphogenesis of cells in the inner cell mass.
1	2	3	trophectodermal cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a trophectoderm cell.
0	1	0	trophectodermal cellular morphogenesis	The morphogenesis of trophectoderm cells.
1	2	1	blastocyst growth	An increase in size of a blastocyst due to expansion of the blastocoelic cavity cell shape changes and cell proliferation.
1	2	0	inner cell mass cell proliferation	The proliferation of cells in the inner cell mass.
3	1	1	blastocyst hatching	The hatching of the cellular blastocyst from the zona pellucida.
6	3	4	release of cytochrome c from mitochondria	The process that results in the movement of cytochrome c from the mitochondrial intermembrane space into the cytosol, which is part of the apoptotic signaling pathway and leads to caspase activation.
6	2	9	epithelial to mesenchymal transition	A transition where an epithelial cell loses apical/basolateral polarity, severs intercellular adhesive junctions, degrades basement membrane components and becomes a migratory mesenchymal cell.
1	1	1	neural tube formation	The formation of a tube from the flat layer of ectodermal cells known as the neural plate. This will give rise to the central nervous system.
0	1	0	neural fold formation	The process in which the neural fold is formed. The edges of the neural plate thicken and move up to form a U-shaped structure called the neural groove.
6	10	8	neural tube closure	The last step in the formation of the neural tube, where the paired neural folds are brought together and fuse at the dorsal midline.
1	1	0	protein insertion into mitochondrial membrane involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	The process in which a protein is incorporated into a mitochondrial membrane as the initial phase of the mitochondrial membrane permeabilization that takes place in the apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	1	0	phagolysosome assembly	The process that results in the fusion of a phagosome, a vesicle formed by phagocytosis, with a lysosome.
0	1	0	opsonin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an opsonin, such as a complement component or antibody, deposited on the surface of a bacteria, virus, immune complex, or other particulate material.
1	0	0	opsonin receptor activity	Combining with an opsonin and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	1	complement binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any component or product of the complement cascade.
0	1	3	complement component C1q complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the C1q complex, a component of the classical complement cascade.
1	0	0	complement component C3a binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the C3a product of the complement cascade.
2	2	0	complement component C3b binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the C3b product of the complement cascade.
1	0	0	complement component C4b binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the C4b product of the classical complement cascade.
0	1	0	complement component C5a binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the C5a product of the complement cascade.
1	0	0	complement component C4b receptor activity	Combining with the C4b product of the classical complement cascade and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	0	NK T cell proliferation	The expansion of a NK T cell population by cell division.
1	0	1	complement activation, lectin pathway	Any process involved in the activation of any of the steps of the lectin pathway of the complement cascade which allows for the direct killing of microbes and the regulation of other immune processes.
0	2	0	negative regulation of complement activation, lectin pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of complement activation by the lectin pathway.
0	1	0	(1->3)-beta-D-glucan binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with (1->3)-beta-D-glucans.
0	3	2	response to yeast	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus from a yeast species.
1	0	0	Mullerian duct regression	The process in which the Mullerian ducts, primordia of the oviducts, uterus and upper vagina, undergo regression in male embryos.
1	1	2	receptor recycling	The process that results in the return of receptor molecules to an active state and an active cellular location after they have been stimulated by a ligand. An active state is when the receptor is ready to receive a signal.
0	0	1	nucleoside binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a nucleoside, a compound consisting of a purine or pyrimidine nitrogenous base linked either to ribose or deoxyribose.
1	1	0	endothelial cell development	The progression of an endothelial cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
2	4	0	endothelial cell morphogenesis	The change in form (cell shape and size) that occurs during the differentiation of an endothelial cell.
3	0	0	selenium compound metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving compounds that contain selenium, such as selenocysteine.
9	11	10	liver development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the liver over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The liver is an exocrine gland which secretes bile and functions in metabolism of protein and carbohydrate and fat, synthesizes substances involved in the clotting of the blood, synthesizes vitamin A, detoxifies poisonous substances, stores glycogen, and breaks down worn-out erythrocytes.
7	6	2	placenta development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the placenta over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The placenta is an organ of metabolic interchange between fetus and mother, partly of embryonic origin and partly of maternal origin.
2	5	6	phagocytic cup	An invagination of the cell membrane formed by an actin dependent process during phagocytosis. Following internalization it is converted into a phagosome.
2	3	1	embryonic placenta development	The embryonically driven process whose specific outcome is the progression of the placenta over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The placenta is an organ of metabolic interchange between fetus and mother, partly of embryonic origin and partly of maternal origin.
0	2	1	maternal placenta development	Maternally driven process whose specific outcome is the progression of the placenta over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The placenta is an organ of metabolic interchange between fetus and mother, partly of embryonic origin and partly of maternal origin.
3	4	4	tissue homeostasis	A homeostatic process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state within a defined tissue of an organism, including control of cellular proliferation and death and control of metabolic function.
4	3	16	retina homeostasis	A tissue homeostatic process involved in the maintenance of an internal equilibrium within the retina of the eye, including control of cellular proliferation and death and control of metabolic function.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cytolysis by symbiont of host cells	Any process in which an organism stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cytolysis by that organism of cells in its host organism. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
1	0	0	cell killing	Any process in an organism that results in the killing of its own cells or those of another organism, including in some cases the death of the other organism. Killing here refers to the induction of death in one cell by another cell, not cell-autonomous death due to internal or other environmental conditions.
0	1	0	leukocyte mediated cytotoxicity	The directed killing of a target cell by a leukocyte.
1	0	0	regulation of leukocyte mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of leukocyte mediated cytotoxicity.
1	0	0	positive regulation of leukocyte mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of leukocyte mediated cytotoxicity.
2	1	1	T cell mediated cytotoxicity	The directed killing of a target cell by a T cell through the release of granules containing cytotoxic mediators or through the engagement of death receptors.
0	1	0	regulation of T cell mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of T cell mediated cytotoxicity.
2	0	1	negative regulation of T cell mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of T cell mediated cytotoxicity.
1	2	5	positive regulation of T cell mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T cell mediated cytotoxicity.
3	5	5	photoreceptor inner segment	The inner segment of a vertebrate photoreceptor containing mitochondria, ribosomes and membranes where opsin molecules are assembled and passed to be part of the outer segment discs.
0	2	0	regulation of receptor recycling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of receptor recycling.
1	1	1	negative regulation of receptor recycling	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of receptor recycling.
0	3	6	positive regulation of receptor recycling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of receptor recycling.
0	2	0	B-1 B cell homeostasis	The process of regulating the proliferation and elimination of B cells of the B-1 subset such that the total number of B-1 B cells within a whole or part of an organism is stable over time in the absence of an outside stimulus. B-1 B cells are a distinct subset of B cells characterized as being CD5 positive, found predominantly in the peritoneum, pleural cavities, and spleen, and enriched for self-reactivity.
1	2	4	uropod	A membrane projection with related cytoskeletal components at the trailing edge of a cell in the process of migrating or being activated, found on the opposite side of the cell from the leading edge or immunological synapse, respectively.
6	6	10	regulation of protein phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of addition of phosphate groups into an amino acid in a protein.
10	13	11	negative regulation of protein phosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate of addition of phosphate groups to amino acids within a protein.
19	28	25	positive regulation of protein phosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of addition of phosphate groups to amino acids within a protein.
1	3	2	endothelial cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of endothelial cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population. Endothelial cells are thin flattened cells which line the inside surfaces of body cavities, blood vessels, and lymph vessels, making up the endothelium.
5	4	8	negative regulation of endothelial cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate or extent of endothelial cell proliferation.
12	6	6	positive regulation of endothelial cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of endothelial cell proliferation.
1	3	0	female pronucleus	The pronucleus originating from the ovum that is being fertilized.
1	1	0	male pronucleus	The pronucleus originating from the spermatozoa that was involved in fertilization.
6	2	1	hair follicle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the hair follicle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A hair follicle is a tube-like opening in the epidermis where the hair shaft develops and into which the sebaceous glands open.
1	2	4	vasculature development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the vasculature over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The vasculature is an interconnected tubular multi-tissue structure that contains fluid that is actively transported around the organism.
0	1	0	lymph vessel development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a lymph vessel over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	3	0	lymphangiogenesis	Lymph vessel formation when new vessels emerge from the proliferation of pre-existing vessels.
4	7	3	heart looping	The tube morphogenesis process in which the primitive heart tube loops asymmetrically. This looping brings the primitive heart chambers into alignment preceding their future integration. Heart looping begins with dextral-looping and ends when the main regional divisions of the mature heart and primordium of the great arterial trunks become established preceeding septation.
1	1	1	intestinal D-glucose absorption	Uptake of D-glucose into the blood by absorption from the small intestine.
2	3	1	regulation of cell-matrix adhesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of attachment of a cell to the extracellular matrix.
1	4	2	negative regulation of cell-matrix adhesion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate or extent of cell adhesion to the extracellular matrix.
3	4	2	positive regulation of cell-matrix adhesion	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of cell adhesion to an extracellular matrix.
0	1	0	blood vessel maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for a blood vessel to attain its fully functional state.
1	0	3	positive regulation of neurotransmitter secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a neurotransmitter.
0	1	2	intramembranous ossification	Direct ossification that occurs within mesenchyme or an accumulation of relatively unspecialized cells.
4	5	2	endochondral ossification	Replacement ossification wherein bone tissue replaces cartilage.
1	2	0	regulation of cytokine-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the cytokine mediated signaling pathway.
1	1	2	negative regulation of cytokine-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the cytokine mediated signaling pathway.
1	1	0	positive regulation of cytokine-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of a cytokine mediated signaling pathway.
1	2	0	synaptic transmission, dopaminergic	The vesicular release of  dopamine. from a presynapse, across a chemical synapse, the subsequent activation of dopamine receptors at the postsynapse of a target cell (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell) and the effects of this activation on the postsynaptic membrane potential and ionic composition of the postsynaptic cytosol. This process encompasses both spontaneous and evoked release of neurotransmitter and all parts of synaptic vesicle exocytosis. Evoked transmission starts with the arrival of an action potential at the presynapse.
1	0	1	startle response	An action or movement due to the application of a sudden unexpected stimulus.
3	3	3	G-protein alpha-subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a G-protein alpha subunit. The alpha subunit binds a guanine nucleotide.
0	0	1	thigmotaxis	The directed movement of a motile cell or organism in response to touch.
1	0	0	suckling behavior	Specific behavior of a newborn or infant mammal that results in the derivation of nourishment from the breast.
4	9	0	fibronectin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a fibronectin, a group of related adhesive glycoproteins of high molecular weight found on the surface of animal cells, connective tissue matrices, and in extracellular fluids.
1	0	1	positive regulation of activation of membrane attack complex	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the activation of the membrane attack complex components of the complement cascade.
1	0	0	negative regulation of activation of membrane attack complex	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the activation of the membrane attack complex components of the complement cascade.
1	0	1	retinoic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with retinoic acid, 3,7-dimethyl-9-(2,6,-trimethyl-1-cyclohexen-1-yl)-2,4,6,8-nonatetraenoic acid.
0	1	1	G protein-coupled adenosine receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a receptor binding to extracellular adenosine and transmitting the signal to a heterotrimeric G-protein complex to initiate a change in cell activity.
2	6	2	blood vessel remodeling	The reorganization or renovation of existing blood vessels.
4	2	6	response to amphetamine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an amphetamine stimulus. Amphetamines consist of a group of compounds related to alpha-methylphenethylamine.
0	0	1	nervous system process involved in regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure	The regulation of blood pressure mediated by detection of stimuli and a neurological response.
1	0	0	negative regulation of heart rate involved in baroreceptor response to increased systemic arterial blood pressure	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of heart contraction as a result of the baroreceptor response to increased blood pressure.
1	0	0	regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure by vasopressin	The regulation of blood pressure mediated by the signaling molecule vasopressin. Vasopressin is produced in the hypothalamus, and affects vasoconstriction, and renal water transport.
1	0	0	norepinephrine-epinephrine vasoconstriction involved in regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure	A process that results in a decrease in the diameter of an artery during the norepinephrine-epinephrine response to decreased blood pressure.
1	0	0	positive regulation of heart rate by epinephrine-norepinephrine	The process in which the presence of epinephrine or norepinephrine in the bloodstream activates, maintains or increases the rate of heart contraction.
1	0	0	positive regulation of the force of heart contraction by epinephrine-norepinephrine	Any process that increases the force with which the cardiac muscles of the heart pump blood through the circulatory system as a result of the presence of epinephrine or norepinephrine in the bloodstream or released from the nerve endings.
2	2	0	angiotensin maturation	The process leading to the attainment of the full functional capacity of angiotensin by conversion of angiotensinogen into mature angiotensin in the blood.
6	0	4	morphogenesis of an epithelium	The process in which the anatomical structures of epithelia are generated and organized. An epithelium consists of closely packed cells arranged in one or more layers, that covers the outer surfaces of the body or lines any internal cavity or tube.
1	2	1	morphogenesis of an epithelial sheet	The process in which the anatomical structures of an epithelial sheet are generated and organized. An epithelial sheet is a flat surface consisting of closely packed epithelial cells.
0	1	0	regulation of blood volume by renin-angiotensin	The process in which the renin-angiotensin system controls the rate of fluid intake and output into the blood.
0	1	0	renin-angiotensin regulation of aldosterone production	The process in which an increase in active angiotensin stimulates the adrenal cortices to secrete aldosterone.
0	1	0	regulation of renal output by angiotensin	The process in which angiotensin directly modulates the rate of urine output by the kidney.
18	15	18	protease binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protease or peptidase.
2	0	1	response to dietary excess	The physiological process in which dietary excess is sensed by the central nervous system, resulting in a reduction in food intake and increased energy expenditure.
1	0	0	reduction of food intake in response to dietary excess	An eating behavior process whereby detection of a dietary excess results in a decrease in intake of nutrients.
3	0	8	regulation of the force of heart contraction	Any process that modulates the extent of heart contraction, changing the force with which blood is propelled.
2	1	10	regulation of heart rate	Any process that modulates the frequency or rate of heart contraction.
1	0	3	regulation of sodium ion transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of sodium ions (Na+) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	desensitization of G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	The process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway after prolonged stimulation with an agonist of the pathway.
0	1	0	G protein-coupled receptor internalization	The process that results in the uptake of a G protein-coupled receptor into an endocytic vesicle.
1	1	0	regulation of blood vessel diameter by renin-angiotensin	The process in which the diameter of a blood vessel is changed due to activity of the renin-angiotensin system.
0	1	0	positive regulation of L-glutamate import across plasma membrane	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of L-glutamate import into a cell.
14	18	16	p53 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with one of the p53 family of proteins.
3	5	0	sprouting angiogenesis	The extension of new blood vessels from existing vessels into avascular tissues, this process includes the specialization of endothelial cells into leading tip and stalk cells, proliferation and migration of the endothelial cells and cell adhesion resulting in angiogenic sprout fusion or lumen formation.
1	4	3	cell migration involved in sprouting angiogenesis	The orderly movement of endothelial cells into the extracellular matrix in order to form new blood vessels involved in sprouting angiogenesis.
1	2	0	blood vessel endothelial cell proliferation involved in sprouting angiogenesis	The multiplication or reproduction of blood vessel endothelial cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population contributing to sprouting angiogenesis.
0	1	0	opsin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an opsin, any of a group of hydrophobic, integral membrane glycoproteins located primarily in the disc membrane of rods or cones, involved in photoreception.
2	0	0	osteoblast fate commitment	The commitment of mesenchymal cells to the specific cell fate of an osteoblast. An osteoblast is a bone-forming cell which secretes an extracellular matrix. Hydroxyapatite crystals are then deposited into the matrix to form bone.
4	0	2	positive regulation of neuroblast proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate of neuroblast proliferation.
2	1	2	positive regulation of mesenchymal cell proliferation	The process of activating or increasing the rate or extent of mesenchymal cell proliferation. Mesenchymal cells are loosely organized embryonic cells.
0	1	0	adenine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with adenine, a purine base.
7	5	4	chondrocyte differentiation	The process in which a chondroblast acquires specialized structural and/or functional features of a chondrocyte. A chondrocyte is a polymorphic cell that forms cartilage.
0	1	0	chondrocyte development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a chondrocyte over time, from its commitment to its mature state. Chondrocyte development does not include the steps involved in committing a chondroblast to a chondrocyte fate.
1	5	0	epithelial cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an epithelial cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. An epithelial cell is a cell usually found in a two-dimensional sheet with a free surface.
1	0	0	glandular epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a glandular epithelial cell. A glandular epithelial cell is a columnar/cuboidal epithelial cell found in a two dimensional sheet with a free surface exposed to the lumen of a gland.
0	0	1	glandular epithelial cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a glandular epithelial cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A glandular epithelial cell is a columnar/cuboidal epithelial cell is a cell found in a two dimensional sheet with a free surface exposed to the lumen of a gland.
0	1	0	epithelial cell maturation	The developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for an epithelial cell to attain its fully functional state. An epithelial cell is a cell usually found in a two-dimensional sheet with a free surface.
2	0	0	extraocular skeletal muscle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the extraocular skeletal muscle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The extraocular muscle is derived from cranial mesoderm and controls eye movements. The muscle begins its development with the differentiation of the muscle cells and ends with the mature muscle. An example of this process is found in Mus musculus.
1	2	1	osteoblast development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an osteoblast over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Osteoblast development does not include the steps involved in committing a cranial neural crest cell or an osteoprogenitor cell to an osteoblast fate. An osteoblast is a cell that gives rise to bone.
1	1	0	inner acrosomal membrane	The acrosomal membrane region that underlies the acrosomal vesicle and is located toward the sperm nucleus. This region is responsible for molecular interactions allowing the sperm to penetrate the zona pellucida and fuses with the egg plasma membrane.
2	1	1	acrosomal membrane	The membrane that surrounds the acrosomal lumen. The acrosome is a special type of lysosome in the head of a spermatozoon that contains acid hydrolases and is concerned with the breakdown of the outer membrane of the ovum during fertilization.
1	1	0	outer acrosomal membrane	The acrosomal membrane region that underlies the plasma membrane of the sperm. This membrane fuses with the sperm plasma membrane as part of the acrosome reaction.
0	2	0	regulation of oxidative phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the phosphorylation of ADP to ATP that accompanies the oxidation of a metabolite through the operation of the respiratory chain. Oxidation of compounds establishes a proton gradient across the membrane, providing the energy for ATP synthesis.
1	0	0	protein depalmitoylation	The removal of palymitoyl groups from a lipoprotein.
3	0	3	regulation of respiratory gaseous exchange by nervous system process	A process carried out by the nervous system that is required for the proper control of respiratory gaseous exchange. This process occurs in the respiratory center of the brain in vertebrates.
4	2	4	lens development in camera-type eye	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the lens over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The lens is a transparent structure in the eye through which light is focused onto the retina. An example of this process is found in Mus musculus.
3	2	1	lens morphogenesis in camera-type eye	The process in which the anatomical structures of the lens are generated and organized. The lens is a transparent structure in the eye through which light is focused onto the retina. An example of this process is found in Mus musculus.
0	2	0	regulation of receptor internalization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of receptor internalization.
2	2	3	negative regulation of receptor internalization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of receptor internalization.
2	4	2	positive regulation of receptor internalization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of receptor internalization.
1	0	0	auditory receptor cell morphogenesis	Any process that alters the size or shape of an auditory receptor cell.
1	0	1	caveolar macromolecular signaling complex	A complex composed of proteins required for beta adrenergic receptor activation of protein kinase A. It includes the Cav 12. subunit of L-type calcium channel, protein kinase A regulatory subunit 2(PKAR2), adenyl cyclase, beta-adrenergic receptor, G-alpha-S, protein phosphatase 2A (PP2A) and caveolin 3 (CAV3).
0	1	0	polkadots	A punctate, filamentous structure composed of Bcl10 that appears in the cytoplasm of T-cells shortly after T-cell receptor stimulation. Polkadots stands for Punctate Oligomeric Killing and Activating DOmains Transducing Signals.
1	1	0	tRNA wobble uridine modification	The process in which a uridine in position 34 of a tRNA is post-transcriptionally modified.
5	4	14	podosome	An actin-rich adhesion structure characterized by formation upon cell substrate contact and localization at the substrate-attached part of the cell, contain an F-actin-rich core surrounded by a ring structure containing proteins such as vinculin and talin, and have a diameter of 0.5 mm.
0	1	0	interleukin-33 receptor activity	Combining with interleukin-33 and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	2	1	store-operated calcium entry	A calcium ion entry mechanism in the plasma membrane activated by the depletion of calcium ion from the internal calcium ion store in the endoplasmic reticulum.
3	1	0	semaphorin receptor complex	A stable binary complex of a neurophilin and a plexin, together forming a functional semaphorin receptor.
0	1	0	tRNA nucleoside ribose methylation	The process that results in the modification of the sugar of a nucleoside in tRNA at the 2'O position.
0	1	0	polycystin complex	A stable heterodimeric complex composed of polycystin-1 and polycystin-2.
0	0	1	UTP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with UTP, uridine 5'-triphosphate.
0	0	1	CTP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with CTP, cytidine 5'-triphosphate.
0	1	0	stereocilia ankle link complex	A complex of proteins that connect growing stereocilia in developing cochlear hair cells, composed of Vlgr1, usherin, vezatin, and whirlin.
1	1	0	tRNA wobble position uridine thiolation	The process in which a uridine residue at position 34 in the anticodon of a tRNA is post-transcriptionally thiolated at the C2 position. This process involves transfer of a sulfur from cysteine to position C2 by several steps.
0	1	0	hypochlorous acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hypochlorous acid.
0	0	1	G-quadruplex RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with G-quadruplex RNA structures, in which groups of four guanines adopt a flat, cyclic hydrogen-bonding arrangement known as a guanine tetrad.
1	0	0	steroid receptor RNA activator RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the steroid receptor RNA activator RNA (SRA). SRA enhances steroid hormone receptor transcriptional activity as an RNA transcript by an indirect mechanism that does not involve SRA-steroid receptor binding.
0	0	1	thyroid hormone mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals mediated by the detection of a thyroid hormone.
1	1	0	regulation of thyroid hormone mediated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a thyroid hormone mediated signaling pathway.
0	0	4	desmosome assembly	A cellular process that results in the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a desmosome. A desmosome is a patch-like intercellular junction found in vertebrate tissues, consisting of parallel zones of two cell membranes, separated by an space of 25-35 nm, and having dense fibrillar plaques in the subjacent cytoplasm.
3	2	0	aminoacyl-tRNA editing activity	The hydrolysis of an incorrectly aminoacylated tRNA.
2	0	4	dystroglycan binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with dystroglycan. Dystroglycan is glycoprotein found in non-muscle tissues as well as in muscle tissues, often in association with dystrophin. The native dystroglycan cleaved into two non-covalently associated subunits, alpha (N-terminal) and beta (C-terminal).
0	1	0	3-methylcrotonyl-CoA carboxylase complex, mitochondrial	A mitochondrial protein complex which is capable of 3-methylcrotonyl-CoA carboxylase activity. In mammals, at least, consists as a dodecamer of 6 alpha and 6 beta subunits. MCCC-alpha has a covalently bound biotin essential for the ATP-dependent carboxylation. MCCC-beta possesses carboxyltransferase activity which presumably is essential for binding to 3-methylcrotonyl-CoA.
1	0	2	protein localization to paranode region of axon	A cellular protein localization process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, the paranode region of an axon.
0	1	0	male germ cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of male germ cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population.
0	2	2	manchette	A tubular array of microtubules that extends from the perinuclear ring surrounding the spermatid nucleus to the flagellar axoneme. The manchette may also contain F-actin filaments.
14	23	26	cytoplasmic translation	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a protein in the cytoplasm. This is a ribosome-mediated process in which the information in messenger RNA (mRNA) is used to specify the sequence of amino acids in the protein.
0	0	1	cytoplasmic translational elongation	The successive addition of amino acid residues to a nascent polypeptide chain during protein biosynthesis in the cytoplasm.
1	2	0	cytoplasmic translational initiation	The process preceding formation of the peptide bond between the first two amino acids of a protein in the cytoplasm. This includes the formation of a complex of the ribosome, mRNA or circRNA, and an initiation complex that contains the first aminoacyl-tRNA.
0	0	1	cytoplasmic translational termination	The process resulting in the release of a polypeptide chain from the ribosome in the cytoplasm, usually in response to a termination codon.
0	2	1	translation reinitiation	A gene-specific translational control mechanism where the small ribosomal subunit remains attached to the mRNA following termination of translation, then resumes scanning on the same mRNA molecule and initiates again at a downstream start site. Reinitiation depends on de novo recruitment of the ternary complex that is required to recognize the next AUG codon.
0	3	2	ribose phosphate diphosphokinase complex	A protein complex having ribose phosphate diphosphokinase activity.
0	1	0	cap-independent translational initiation	The process where translation initiation recruits the 40S ribosomal subunits in a Cap and 5' end independent fashion before an AUG codon is encountered in an appropriate sequence context to initiate mRNA or circRNA translation.
1	0	1	cap-dependent translational initiation	The process where the cap structure, composed of a 7- methylguanosine (m7G) group and associated cap-binding proteins, located at the 5' end of an mRNA molecule, which serves as a molecular tag that marks the spot where the 40S ribosomal subunit, is recruited and will then scan in a 5' to 3' direction until an AUG codon is encountered in an appropriate sequence context to initiate mRNA translation.
0	1	0	IRES-dependent translational initiation of linear mRNA	The process where translation initiation recruits the 40S ribosomal subunits via an internal ribosome entry segment (IRES) before an AUG codon is encountered in an appropriate sequence context to initiate linear mRNA translation.
1	0	0	MAML1-RBP-Jkappa- ICN1 complex	A protein complex that consists of the intracellular domain of Notch1 (ICN1), the DNA-binding transcription factor RBP-Jkappa, and the transcriptional coactivator Mastermind-like-1 (MAML1); the complex is involved in transcriptional activation in response to Notch-mediated signaling.
0	1	0	hepatocyte cell migration	The orderly movement of a hepatocyte during the development of the liver. Hepatocytes emerge from the hepatic epithelium, populating the septum transversum and lateral mesenchymal areas of the hepatic lobes.
1	0	0	Ser-tRNA(Ala) hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of misacylated Ser-tRNA(Ala).
0	3	3	zona pellucida receptor complex	A multisubunit complex comprising the chaperonin-containing T-complex and several other components involved in mediating sperm-oocyte Interaction.
0	0	1	behavioral defense response	A behavioral response seeking to protect an organism from an a perceived external threat to that organism.
4	1	11	activation of innate immune response	Any process that initiates an innate immune response. Innate immune responses are defense responses mediated by germline encoded components that directly recognize components of potential pathogens. Examples of this process include activation of the hypersensitive response of Arabidopsis thaliana and activation of any NOD or TLR signaling pathway in vertebrate species.
1	0	0	pattern recognition receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a pattern recognition receptor (PRR) binding to one of its physiological ligands. PRRs bind pathogen-associated molecular pattern (PAMPs), structures conserved among microbial species, or damage-associated molecular pattern (DAMPs), endogenous molecules released from damaged cells.
11	18	25	stimulatory C-type lectin receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to a C-type lectin receptor capable of cellular activation.
5	5	8	toll-like receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to a toll-like receptor. Toll-like receptors directly bind pattern motifs from a variety of microbial sources to initiate innate immune response.
5	4	3	innate immune response in mucosa	Any process of the innate immune response that takes place in the mucosal tissues.
5	2	6	positive regulation of defense response to virus by host	Any host process that results in the promotion of antiviral immune response mechanisms, thereby limiting viral replication.
0	1	1	response to molecule of bacterial origin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus by molecules of bacterial origin such as peptides derived from bacterial flagellin.
5	4	9	hematopoietic progenitor cell differentiation	The process in which precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of a hematopoietic progenitor cell, a class of cell types including myeloid progenitor cells and lymphoid progenitor cells.
0	1	0	wound healing involved in inflammatory response	The series of events that restore integrity to damaged tissue that contribute to an inflammatory response.
2	0	0	connective tissue replacement involved in inflammatory response wound healing	The series of events leading to growth of connective tissue when loss of tissues that are incapable of regeneration occurs, or when fibrinous exudate cannot be adequately cleared that contribute to an inflammatory response.
39	29	17	adaptive immune response	An immune response mediated by cells expressing specific receptors for antigen produced through a somatic diversification process, and allowing for an enhanced secondary response to subsequent exposures to the same antigen (immunological memory).
1	0	0	organ or tissue specific immune response	An immune response taking place in an organ or tissues such as the liver, brain, mucosa, or nervous system tissues.
0	1	0	activation of immune response	Any process that initiates an immune response.
1	0	0	lymphocyte homeostasis	The process of regulating the proliferation and elimination of lymphocytes such that the total number of lymphocytes within a whole or part of an organism is stable over time in the absence of an outside stimulus.
2	1	0	myeloid cell homeostasis	The process of regulating the proliferation and elimination of myeloid cells such that the total number of myeloid cells within a whole or part of an organism is stable over time in the absence of an outside stimulus.
0	0	1	cell activation involved in immune response	A change in the morphology or behavior of a cell resulting from exposure to an activating factor such as a cellular or soluble ligand, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
1	1	0	astrocyte activation involved in immune response	A change in the morphology or behavior of an astrocyte resulting from exposure to an activating factor such as a cellular or soluble ligand, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
1	1	0	follicular dendritic cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized precursor cell acquires the specialized features of a follicular dendritic cell.
1	0	0	leukocyte activation involved in inflammatory response	A change in the morphology or behavior of a leukocyte resulting from exposure to an activating factor such as a cellular or soluble ligand, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an inflammatory response.
0	0	1	plasmacytoid dendritic cell activation	A change in the morphology or behavior of a plasmacytoid dendritic cell resulting from exposure to an activating factor such as a cellular or soluble ligand.
1	0	0	basophil activation involved in immune response	A change in morphology and behavior of a basophil resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, soluble factor, or to (at least in mammals) an antigen which the basophil has specifically bound via IgE bound to Fc-epsilonRI receptors, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
1	0	1	myeloid dendritic cell activation involved in immune response	The change in morphology and behavior of a myeloid dendritic cell resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
1	3	2	macrophage activation involved in immune response	A change in morphology and behavior of a macrophage resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
1	2	0	neutrophil activation involved in immune response	The change in morphology and behavior of a neutrophil resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
0	2	1	T cell activation involved in immune response	The change in morphology and behavior of a mature or immature T cell resulting from exposure to a mitogen, cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or an antigen for which it is specific, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
1	1	0	T cell activation via T cell receptor contact with antigen bound to MHC molecule on antigen presenting cell	The change in morphology and behavior of a mature or immature T cell resulting from exposure to an antigen for which its T cell receptor is specific bound to an MHC molecule on an antigen presenting cell, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
0	1	0	T cell differentiation involved in immune response	The process in which an antigenically naive T cell acquires the specialized features of an effector, regulatory, or memory T cell as part of an immune response. Effector T cells include cells which provide T cell help or exhibit cytotoxicity towards other cells.
1	0	0	T-helper cell lineage commitment	The process in which a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell becomes committed to becoming a T-helper cell, a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell specialized to promote various immunological processes.
0	1	1	T-helper 1 cell lineage commitment	The process in which a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell becomes committed to becoming a T-helper 1 cell, a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell specialized to promote immunological processes often associated with resistance to intracellular bacteria, fungi, and protozoa, and pathological conditions such as arthritis.
0	1	0	CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation involved in immune response	The process in which an antigenically naive CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell acquires the specialized features of an effector, regulatory, or memory T cell as part of an immune response. Effector T cells include cells which provide T cell help or exhibit cytotoxicity towards other cells.
1	1	1	T cell proliferation involved in immune response	The expansion of a T cell population by cell division as part of an immune response.
1	1	0	germinal center B cell differentiation	The process in which a B cell in the spleen acquires the specialized features of a germinal center B cell. Germinal center B cells are rapidly cycling B cells which have downregulated IgD expression and exhibit high levels of binding by peanut agglutinin (PNA).
0	5	0	marginal zone B cell differentiation	The process in which a B cell in the spleen acquires the specialized features of a marginal zone B cell. Marginal zone B cells are localized in a distinct anatomical region of the spleen that represents the major antigen-filtering and scavenging area (by specialized macrophages resident there). It appears that they are preselected to express a BCR repertoire similar to B-1 B cells, biased toward bacterial cell wall constituents and senescent self-components (such as oxidized LDL).
0	0	1	plasma cell differentiation	The process in which a B cell acquires the specialized features of a plasma cell. A plasma cell is a lymphocyte which develops from a B cell and produces high amounts of antibody.
1	0	0	myeloid progenitor cell differentiation	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of a myeloid progenitor cell. Myeloid progenitor cells include progenitor cells for any of the myeloid lineages.
0	1	0	memory B cell differentiation	The process in which a B cell acquires the specialized features of a memory B cell. Memory B cells are cells that can respond rapidly to antigen re-exposure by production of high-affinity antibody.
2	1	0	lymphoid progenitor cell differentiation	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of a lymphoid progenitor cell. Lymphoid progenitor cells include progenitor cells for any of the lymphoid lineages.
0	1	1	B cell proliferation involved in immune response	The expansion of a B cell population by cell division following B cell activation during an immune response.
1	0	0	natural killer cell activation involved in immune response	The change in morphology and behavior of a natural killer cell resulting from exposure a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
1	3	0	B cell lineage commitment	The process in which a lymphoid progenitor cell becomes committed to become any type of B cell.
3	0	1	immature B cell differentiation	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of an immature B cell.
1	1	0	pro-B cell differentiation	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of a pro-B cell. Pro-B cells are the earliest stage of the B cell lineage and undergo heavy chain D and J gene rearrangements, although they are not fully committed.
0	0	1	pre-B cell allelic exclusion	Expression of a single heavy chain allele during pre-B cell differentiation.
0	1	0	transitional one stage B cell differentiation	The process in which immature B cells from the bone marrow acquire the specialized features of T1 stage B cells in the spleen. T1 stage B cells do not express either CD23 or CD21.
0	0	1	B-1a B cell differentiation	The process in which B cells acquire the specialized features of B-1a B cells. B-1a B cells are B-1 cells that express CD5 and arise from fetal liver precursors.
1	0	0	B cell negative selection	Any process leading to negative selection in B cells. Mechanisms of negative selection include anergy and deletion.
2	0	0	plasma kallikrein-kinin cascade	A series of reactions that takes place outside the cell occurring in response to tissue damage and initiated within blood plasma by the action of activated Factor XII (Hageman Factor) on prekallikrein to convert it to plasma kallikrein, and the subsequent reaction of plasma kallikrein with high molecular weight kininogen. The ultimate product of the plasma kallikrein-kinin cascade is bradykinin, an agent known to induce smooth muscle contraction, vasoconstriction, and increased vascular permeability.
1	2	0	defense response to tumor cell	Reactions triggered in response to the presence of a tumor cell that act to protect the cell or organism.
0	2	0	T cell lineage commitment	The process in which a lymphoid progenitor cell becomes committed to becoming any type of T cell.
0	1	0	leukocyte activation involved in immune response	A change in morphology and behavior of a leukocyte resulting from exposure to a specific antigen, mitogen, cytokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor, leading to the initiation or perpetuation of an immune response.
6	4	1	immune system process	Any process involved in the development or functioning of the immune system, an organismal system for calibrated responses to potential internal or invasive threats.
0	1	0	immune response in brain or nervous system	An immune response taking place in the brain or nervous system.
0	1	0	hepatic immune response	An immune response taking place in the liver.
0	0	1	mucosal immune response	An immune response taking place in mucosal tissues, including those of the intestinal tract, nasal and upper respiratory tract, and genital tract.
0	2	1	dendritic cell chemotaxis	The movement of a dendritic cell in response to an external stimulus.
1	0	0	antigen transcytosis by M cells in mucosal-associated lymphoid tissue	The process of antigen transcytosis carried out by M cells in the mucosal-associated lymphoid tissue (MALT). Transcytosis is the process of the directed movement of endocytosed material through the cell and its exocytosis from the plasma membrane at the opposite side. M cells are specialized epithelia cells with a microfold structure that are adept at moving antigens from the gut lumen to antigen presenting cells in the MALT.
0	1	0	immunoglobulin transcytosis in epithelial cells mediated by polymeric immunoglobulin receptor	The process of transporting polymeric IgA and polymeric IgM immunoglobulin, via transcytosis mediated by the polymeric immunoglobulin receptor (pIgR), from the basolateral surface to apical surface of an epithelial cell. At the apical surface the immunoglobulin binding portion of the pIgRis cleaved and remains bound to the transported immunoglobulin as secretory component (SC). The same process is used for the transport and excretion of IgA immune complexes to the luminal surface of the mucosa.
0	1	0	immune response to tumor cell	An immune system process that functions in the response of an organism to a tumor cell.
0	0	1	T cell mediated cytotoxicity directed against tumor cell target	The directed killing of a tumor cell by a T cell through the release of granules containing cytotoxic mediators or through the engagement of death receptors.
0	0	1	immune response-activating cell surface receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a receptor on the surface of a cell capable of activating or perpetuating an immune response.
3	1	0	complement receptor mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a component of the complement pathway binding to a complement receptor. Such components include both whole complement proteins and fragments of complement proteins generated through the activity of the complement pathway.
0	1	1	Fc receptor mediated stimulatory signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a the binding of the Fc portion of an immunoglobulin by an Fc receptor capable of activating or perpetuating an immune response. The Fc portion of an immunoglobulin is its C-terminal constant region.
0	1	0	granuloma formation	The formation of nodular inflammatory lesions, usually small or granular, firm, persistent, well-structured, and containing compactly grouped T lymphocytes and modified phagocytes such as epithelioid cells, giant cells, and other macrophages. Granuloma formation represents a chronic inflammatory response initiated by various infectious and noninfectious agents. The center of a granuloma consists of fused macrophages, which can become necrotic.
0	0	1	immune complex clearance	A process directed at removing immune complexes from the body. Immune complexes are clusters of antibodies bound to antigen, to which complement may also be fixed, and which may precipitate or remain in solution.
1	0	0	immune complex clearance by erythrocytes	The process of immune complex clearance by erythrocytes. The process often starts with binding of complement receptor 1 (CR1) on the surface of erythrocytes to a complement coated immune complex. The complex bound to erythrocyte CR1 is then transported to the liver or spleen where it is presented to phagocytes. The process ends when the complex is removed from CR1, allowing the erythrocyte to return to general circulation.
1	3	2	inflammatory response to antigenic stimulus	An inflammatory response to an antigenic stimulus, which can be include any number of T cell or B cell epitopes.
3	1	1	acute inflammatory response to antigenic stimulus	An acute inflammatory response to an antigenic stimulus. An acute inflammatory response occurs within a matter of minutes or hours, and either resolves within a few days or becomes a chronic inflammatory response.
1	0	0	chronic inflammatory response to antigenic stimulus	A chronic inflammatory response to an antigenic stimulus. A chronic inflammatory response persists indefinitely during days, weeks, or months in the life of an individual.
0	3	1	neutrophil mediated immunity	Any process involved in the carrying out of an immune response by a neutrophil.
1	0	0	mast cell mediated immunity	Any process involved in the carrying out of an immune response by a mast cell.
1	2	0	humoral immune response mediated by circulating immunoglobulin	An immune response dependent upon secreted immunoglobulin. An example of this process is found in Mus musculus.
0	1	1	T cell mediated immunity	Any process involved in the carrying out of an immune response by a T cell.
1	1	1	T cell antigen processing and presentation	The process in which a T cell expresses antigen (peptide or lipid) on its cell surface in association with an MHC protein complex.
1	4	1	germinal center formation	The process in which germinal centers form. A germinal center is a specialized microenvironment formed when activated B cells enter lymphoid follicles. Germinal centers are the foci for B cell proliferation and somatic hypermutation.
0	1	1	myeloid dendritic cell antigen processing and presentation	The process in which a myeloid dendritic cell expresses antigen (peptide or lipid) on its cell surface in association with an MHC protein complex.
3	6	5	antigen processing and presentation of peptide antigen via MHC class I	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen on its cell surface in association with an MHC class I protein complex. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
1	0	0	antigen processing and presentation of endogenous peptide antigen via MHC class Ib	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of endogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class Ib protein complex. The peptide is typically a fragment of a larger endogenous protein which has been degraded within the cell. Class Ib here refers to non-classical class I molecules, such as those of the HLA-E gene family.
15	15	16	antigen processing and presentation of exogenous peptide antigen via MHC class I, TAP-dependent	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of exogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class I protein complex following intracellular transport via a TAP (transporter associated with antigen processing) pathway. The peptide is typically a fragment of a larger exogenous protein which has been degraded within the cell and is dependent on TAP transport from the cytosol to ER for association with the MHC class I molecule. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
2	2	2	antigen processing and presentation of exogenous peptide antigen via MHC class I, TAP-independent	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of exogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class I protein complex following intracellular transport via a pathway not requiring TAP (transporter associated with antigen processing). The peptide is typically a fragment of a larger exogenous protein which has been degraded within the cell. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
0	0	1	antigen processing and presentation of exogenous protein antigen via MHC class Ib, TAP-dependent	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of exogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class Ib protein complex following intracellular transport via a TAP (transporter associated with antigen processing) pathway. The peptide is typically a fragment of a larger exogenous protein which has been degraded within the cell and is dependent on TAP transport from the cytosol to ER for association with the MHC class Ib molecule. Class Ib here refers to non-classical class I molecules, such as those of the HLA-E gene family.
0	0	1	antigen processing and presentation of endogenous peptide antigen via MHC class I via ER pathway, TAP-dependent	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of endogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class I protein complex following intracellular transport via a TAP-dependent ER pathway. The peptide is typically a fragment of a larger endogenous protein which has been degraded within the cell and becomes associated with the MHC class I molecule in the ER following TAP-dependent transport from the cytosol. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
0	2	1	antigen processing and presentation of endogenous peptide antigen via MHC class I via ER pathway, TAP-independent	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of endogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class I protein complex following intracellular transport via a TAP-independent ER pathway. The peptide is typically a fragment of a larger endogenous protein which has been degraded within the cell and becomes associated with the MHC class I molecule in the ER following transport from the cytosol via a TAP-independent pathway. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
1	0	0	antigen processing and presentation of endogenous peptide antigen via MHC class Ib via ER pathway, TAP-dependent	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of endogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class Ib protein complex following intracellular transport via a TAP (transporter associated with antigen processing) pathway. The peptide is typically a fragment of a larger endogenous protein which has been degraded within the cell and is dependent on TAP transport from the cytosol to ER for association with the MHC class Ib molecule. Class Ib here refers to non-classical class I molecules, such as those of the HLA-E gene family.
0	0	1	antigen processing and presentation of endogenous peptide antigen via MHC class II	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of endogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class II protein complex. The peptide antigen is typically, but not always, processed from a whole protein.
1	0	0	antigen processing and presentation of peptide antigen via MHC class II	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen on its cell surface in association with an MHC class II protein complex. The peptide antigen is typically, but not always, processed from a whole protein.
0	0	1	peptide antigen assembly with MHC class I protein complex	The binding of a peptide to the antigen binding groove of an MHC class I protein complex. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
0	0	1	peptide antigen assembly with MHC class II protein complex	The binding of a peptide to the antigen binding groove of an MHC class II protein complex.
1	0	0	tolerance induction	A process that directly activates any of the steps required for tolerance, a physiologic state in which the immune system does not react destructively against the components of an organism that harbors it or against antigens that are introduced to it.
0	0	1	tolerance induction to self antigen	Tolerance induction directed at self antigens.
1	0	0	natural killer cell tolerance induction	Tolerance induction of natural killer cells.
1	0	0	leukocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized hemopoietic precursor cell acquires the specialized features of a leukocyte. A leukocyte is an achromatic cell of the myeloid or lymphoid lineages capable of ameboid movement, found in blood or other tissue.
0	1	0	leukocyte migration involved in immune response	The movement of a leukocyte within or between different tissues and organs of the body as part of an immune response.
1	4	1	leukocyte migration involved in inflammatory response	The movement of a leukocyte within or between different tissues and organs of the body contributing to an inflammatory response.
0	3	1	acute inflammatory response	Inflammation which comprises a rapid, short-lived, relatively uniform response to acute injury or antigenic challenge and is characterized by accumulations of fluid, plasma proteins, and granulocytic leukocytes. An acute inflammatory response occurs within a matter of minutes or hours, and either resolves within a few days or becomes a chronic inflammatory response.
0	0	1	production of molecular mediator involved in inflammatory response	The synthesis or release of any molecular mediator of the inflammatory response following an inflammatory stimulus, resulting in an increase in its intracellular or extracellular levels.
0	1	0	respiratory burst involved in inflammatory response	A phase of elevated metabolic activity, during which oxygen consumption increases following a stimulus as part of an inflammatory response; this leads to the production, by an NADH dependent system, of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), superoxide anions and hydroxyl radicals, resulting in an increase in their intracellular or extracellular levels.
1	0	0	Factor XII activation	Any process that activates Factor XII (Hageman factor). Factor XII is a protein synthesized by the liver that circulates in an inactive form until it encounters collagen or basement membrane or activated platelets (as occurs at the site of endothelial injury). Factor XII then undergoes a conformational change (becoming factor XIIa), exposing an active serine center that can subsequently cleave protein substrates and activate a variety of mediator systems. Factor XII is a participant in the clotting cascade as well as the kinin cascade.
0	3	1	chronic inflammatory response	Inflammation of prolonged duration (weeks or months) in which active inflammation, tissue destruction, and attempts at repair are proceeding simultaneously. Although it may follow acute inflammation, chronic inflammation frequently begins insidiously, as a low-grade, smoldering, often asymptomatic response.
1	2	1	monocyte chemotaxis	The movement of a monocyte in response to an external stimulus.
1	0	2	mast cell chemotaxis	The movement of a mast cell in response to an external stimulus.
0	0	2	histamine secretion by mast cell	The regulated release of histamine by a mast cell or group of mast cells.
0	1	0	serotonin secretion by platelet	The regulated release of serotonin by a platelet or group of platelets.
0	0	1	somatic diversification of immune receptors via somatic mutation	The process in which immune receptor genes are diversified through somatic mutation.
0	1	0	myeloid leukocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized myeloid precursor cell acquires the specialized features of any cell of the myeloid leukocyte lineage.
24	21	30	platelet degranulation	The regulated exocytosis of secretory granules containing preformed mediators such as histamine and serotonin by a platelet.
1	0	0	regulation of antigen processing and presentation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of antigen processing and presentation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of antigen processing and presentation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of antigen processing and presentation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of antigen processing and presentation of peptide or polysaccharide antigen via MHC class II	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of antigen processing and presentation of antigen (peptide or polysaccharide) via MHC class II.
1	0	0	positive regulation of antigen processing and presentation of peptide antigen via MHC class II	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of antigen processing and presentation of peptide antigen via MHC class II.
0	1	0	negative regulation of dendritic cell antigen processing and presentation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of dendritic cell antigen processing and presentation.
0	1	0	regulation of T cell antigen processing and presentation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of T cell antigen processing and presentation.
0	3	2	regulation of germinal center formation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of germinal center formation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of germinal center formation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of germinal center formation.
0	1	1	regulation of immunoglobulin production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of immunoglobulin production.
1	1	0	negative regulation of immunoglobulin production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of immunoglobulin production.
5	3	3	positive regulation of immunoglobulin production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of immunoglobulin production.
0	0	1	regulation of tolerance induction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of tolerance induction.
1	0	0	positive regulation of tolerance induction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of tolerance induction.
1	0	0	positive regulation of tolerance induction to self antigen	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of tolerance induction to self antigen.
1	0	0	regulation of tolerance induction dependent upon immune response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of tolerance induction dependent upon immune response.
1	0	0	positive regulation of B cell tolerance induction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of B cell tolerance induction.
2	0	0	positive regulation of T cell tolerance induction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of T cell tolerance induction.
0	1	0	regulation of T cell anergy	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of T cell anergy.
2	0	0	positive regulation of T cell anergy	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of T cell anergy.
2	1	0	negative regulation of acute inflammatory response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of an acute inflammatory response.
1	2	0	positive regulation of acute inflammatory response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of an acute inflammatory response.
0	1	0	negative regulation of chronic inflammatory response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of a chronic inflammatory response.
0	1	0	respiratory burst involved in defense response	A phase of elevated metabolic activity, during which oxygen consumption increases made as part of a defense response ; this leads to the production, by an NADH dependent system, of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), superoxide anions and hydroxyl radicals.
0	3	1	regulation of immune system process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of an immune system process.
1	0	0	negative regulation of immune system process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of an immune system process.
0	0	2	regulation of leukocyte migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of leukocyte migration.
0	1	0	negative regulation of leukocyte migration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of leukocyte migration.
2	1	0	positive regulation of leukocyte migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of leukocyte migration.
1	2	1	positive regulation of leukocyte chemotaxis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of leukocyte chemotaxis.
2	1	0	positive regulation of cellular extravasation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of cellular extravasation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of T cell mediated immunity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of T cell mediated immunity.
1	1	1	negative regulation of cytokine production involved in immune response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of cytokine production contributing to an immune response.
2	1	2	positive regulation of cytokine production involved in immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of cytokine production that contributes to an immune response.
1	0	0	negative regulation of T cell cytokine production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of T cell cytokine production.
1	1	2	positive regulation of T cell cytokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of T cell cytokine production.
2	0	0	positive regulation of natural killer cell cytokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of natural killer cell cytokine production.
1	0	0	negative regulation of dendritic cell cytokine production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of dendritic cell cytokine production.
2	0	0	positive regulation of dendritic cell cytokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of dendritic cell cytokine production.
1	0	2	positive regulation of myeloid dendritic cell cytokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of myeloid dendritic cell cytokine production.
0	2	5	cytoplasmic pattern recognition receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a cytoplasmic pattern recognition receptor (PRR) binding to one of its physiological ligands. PRRs bind pathogen-associated molecular pattern (PAMPs), structures conserved among microbial species.
2	4	6	MyD88-dependent toll-like receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to a toll-like receptor where the MyD88 adaptor molecule mediates transduction of the signal. Toll-like receptors directly bind pattern motifs from a variety of microbial sources to initiate innate immune response.
3	4	4	MyD88-independent toll-like receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to a toll-like receptor not relying on the MyD88 adaptor molecule. Toll-like receptors directly bind pattern motifs from a variety of microbial sources to initiate innate immune response.
0	1	0	innate immune response-activating signal transduction	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a pathogen or microbial effector binding to a plant 'resistance-gene' receptor to activate a plant immune response, usually plant-type hypersensitive response.
1	1	1	negative regulation of myeloid leukocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of myeloid leukocyte differentiation.
1	0	0	immune response-regulating signaling pathway	The cascade of processes by which a signal interacts with a receptor, causing a change in the level or activity of a second messenger or other downstream target, and ultimately leading to the activation, perpetuation, or inhibition of an immune response.
1	0	0	immune response-inhibiting signal transduction	The cascade of processes by which a signal interacts with a receptor, causing a change in the level or activity of a second messenger or other downstream target, and ultimately leading to inhibition of an immune response.
2	0	0	immune response-inhibiting cell surface receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a receptor on the surface of the target cell capable of inhibiting an immune response.
1	0	1	immune response-regulating cell surface receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a receptor on the surface of the target cell capable of activating, perpetuating, or inhibiting an immune response.
3	0	1	Fc receptor mediated inhibitory signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the binding of the Fc portion of an immunoglobulin by an Fc receptor capable of inhibiting an immune effector process contributing to an immune response. The Fc portion of an immunoglobulin is its C-terminal constant region.
0	1	0	positive regulation of peptide secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of peptide secretion.
0	1	0	biosynthetic process of antibacterial peptides active against Gram-negative bacteria	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of an antibacterial peptide with activity against Gram-negative bacteria.
0	1	0	regulation of adaptive immune response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of an adaptive immune response.
2	0	0	negative regulation of adaptive immune response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of an adaptive immune response.
2	4	0	positive regulation of adaptive immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of an adaptive immune response.
1	0	0	negative regulation of T-helper 1 type immune response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of a T-helper 1 type immune response.
0	1	1	positive regulation of T-helper 1 type immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of a T-helper 1 type immune response.
0	0	1	regulation of T cell mediated immune response to tumor cell	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of a T cell mediated immune response to tumor cell.
1	1	2	positive regulation of T cell mediated immune response to tumor cell	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of a T cell mediated immune response to tumor cell.
1	0	0	positive regulation of tolerance induction to tumor cell	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of tolerance induction to tumor cell.
2	0	0	negative regulation of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity directed against tumor cell target	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity directed against tumor cell target.
1	1	0	positive regulation of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity directed against tumor cell target	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity directed against tumor cell target.
21	15	20	negative regulation of inflammatory response to antigenic stimulus	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of an inflammatory response to an antigenic stimulus.
1	1	0	positive regulation of inflammatory response to antigenic stimulus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of an inflammatory response to an antigenic stimulus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of acute inflammatory response to antigenic stimulus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of an acute inflammatory response to an antigenic stimulus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of immunoglobulin mediated immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of an immunoglobulin mediated immune response.
0	0	1	regulation of B cell apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of B cell apoptotic process.
2	1	2	negative regulation of B cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of B cell apoptotic process.
1	0	0	positive regulation of B cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of B cell apoptotic process.
0	1	0	negative regulation of mature B cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of mature B cell apoptotic process.
1	0	0	negative regulation of humoral immune response mediated by circulating immunoglobulin	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of a humoral immune response mediated by circulating immunoglobulin.
0	0	2	positive regulation of humoral immune response mediated by circulating immunoglobulin	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of a humoral immune response mediated by circulating immunoglobulin.
1	0	0	tRNA wobble base 5-methoxycarbonylmethyl-2-thiouridinylation	The process whereby a wobble base uridine residue in a tRNA is modified to 5-methoxycarbonylmethyl-2-thiouridine.
5	8	12	response to ischemia	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a inadequate blood supply.
0	1	3	desmosome organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a desmosome. A desmosome is a patch-like intercellular junction found in vertebrate tissues, consisting of parallel zones of two cell membranes, separated by an space of 25-35 nm, and having dense fibrillar plaques in the subjacent cytoplasm.
1	0	0	tRNA N1-guanine methylation	The process whereby a guanine in tRNA is methylated at position N1 of the guanine.
1	0	0	tRNA N2-guanine methylation	The process whereby a guanine in a tRNA is methylated at the N2 position of guanine.
0	1	1	cyclin K-CDK12 complex	A protein complex consisting of cyclin Kand cyclin-dependent kinase 12 (CDK12). Cyclins are characterized by periodicity in protein abundance throughout the cell cycle. Cyclin-dependent kinases represent a family of serine/threonine protein kinases that become active upon binding to a cyclin regulatory partner.
0	1	1	cyclin K-CDK13 complex	A protein complex consisting of cyclin Kand cyclin-dependent kinase 13 (CDK13). Cyclins are characterized by periodicity in protein abundance throughout the cell cycle. Cyclin-dependent kinases represent a family of serine/threonine protein kinases that become active upon binding to a cyclin regulatory partner.
1	0	0	ceramide phosphoethanolamine synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CDP-ethanolamine + a ceramide = CMP + a ceramide phosphoethanolamine.
1	0	2	developmental process involved in reproduction	A developmental process in which a progressive change in the state of some part of an organism specifically contributes to its ability to form offspring.
5	8	3	heart morphogenesis	The developmental process in which the heart is generated and organized. The heart is a hollow, muscular organ, which, by contracting rhythmically, keeps up the circulation of the blood.
3	1	6	skeletal muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within skeletal muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. In the skeletal muscle, the muscle contraction takes advantage of an ordered sarcomeric structure and in most cases it is under voluntary control.
0	0	1	involuntary skeletal muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within involuntary skeletal muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. Involuntary skeletal muscle is skeletal muscle that is not under conscious control.
2	1	1	renal system process	A organ system process carried out by any of the organs or tissues of the renal system. The renal system maintains fluid balance, and contributes to electrolyte balance, acid/base balance, and disposal of nitrogenous waste products. In humans, the renal system comprises a pair of kidneys, a pair of ureters, urinary bladder, urethra, sphincter muscle and associated blood vessels; in other species, the renal system may comprise related structures (e.g., nephrocytes and malpighian tubules in Drosophila).
0	2	2	heart process	A circulatory system process carried out by the heart. The heart is a hollow, muscular organ, which, by contracting rhythmically, keeps up the circulation of the blood. The heart is a hollow, muscular organ, which, by contracting rhythmically, keeps up the circulation of the blood.
2	1	2	respiratory system process	A process carried out by the organs or tissues of the respiratory system. The respiratory system is an organ system responsible for respiratory gaseous exchange.
1	0	0	regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure by atrial natriuretic peptide	The regulation of blood pressure mediated by the signaling molecule atrial natriuretic peptide.
1	0	0	angiotensin-mediated drinking behavior	The drinking behavior that is mediated by the action of angiotensin in the brain. Angiotensin stimulates the brain centers that control thirst.
0	1	1	regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle contraction	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular smooth muscle contraction.
0	0	1	regulation of the force of heart contraction by chemical signal	The regulation of the force of heart muscle contraction mediated by chemical signaling, hormonal, autocrine or paracrine.
1	0	0	regulation of heart rate by chemical signal	The regulation of the rate of heart contraction mediated by chemical signaling, hormonal, autocrine or paracrine.
0	0	1	regulation of heart rate by hormone	The process in which the hormones modulates the rate of heart muscle contraction. A hormone is one of a group of substances formed in very small amounts in one specialized organ or group of cells and carried (sometimes in the bloodstream) to another organ or group of cells, in the same organism, upon which they have a specific regulatory action.
1	0	0	positive regulation of heart rate by epinephrine	The process in which the secretion of epinephrine into the bloodstream or released from nerve endings increases the rate of heart muscle contraction.
0	1	0	acetylcholine-mediated vasodilation involved in regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure	The process in which acetylcholine signaling causes vasodilation, resulting in a change in blood pressure.
1	2	1	regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure	The process that modulates the force with which blood travels through the systemic arterial circulatory system. The process is controlled by a balance of processes that increase pressure and decrease pressure.
1	0	0	regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure by renin-angiotensin	The process in which renin-angiotensin modulates the force with which blood passes through the circulatory system.
2	0	0	positive regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure	The process that increases the force with which blood travels through the systemic arterial circulatory system.
2	1	1	negative regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure	The process that reduces the force with which blood travels through the systemic arterial circulatory system.
6	8	7	renal water homeostasis	Renal process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of water in the body.
4	1	1	glomerular filtration	The process in which plasma is filtered through the glomerular membrane which consists of capillary endothelial cells, the basement membrane, and epithelial cells. The glomerular filtrate is the same as plasma except it has no significant amount of protein.
1	0	1	renal sodium ion transport	The directed movement of sodium ions (Na+) by the renal system.
2	0	0	renal water transport	The directed movement of water (H2O) by the renal system.
0	1	0	regulation of systemic arterial blood pressure by endothelin	The process in which endothelin modulates the force with which blood passes through the circulatory system. Endothelin is a hormone that is released by the endothelium, and it is a vasoconstrictor.
0	0	1	positive regulation of glomerular filtration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glomerular filtration. Glomerular filtration is the processs whereby blood is filtered by the glomerulus into the renal tubule.
1	0	0	negative regulation of glomerular filtration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glomerular filtration. Glomerular filtration is the processs whereby blood is filtered by the glomerulus into the renal tubule.
0	1	0	negative regulation of the force of heart contraction by chemical signal	Any process which decreases the force of heart muscle contraction mediated by chemical signaling, hormonal, autocrine or paracrine.
0	0	1	regulation of vasoconstriction by circulating norepinephrine	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of reductions in the diameter of blood vessels as a result of secretion of norepinephrine into the bloodstream.
0	1	0	detection of nodal flow	The series of events by which an endogenous stimulus is received by a cilium on a cell and converted to a molecular signal contributing to left/right asymmetry.
0	0	1	mesodermal-endodermal cell signaling	Any process that mediates the transfer of information from mesodermal cells to endodermal cells.
0	1	0	primary heart field specification	The process that results in the delineation of a specific region of the lateral mesoderm into the area which will form the primary beating heart tube. In mammals the primary heart field gives rise to the left ventricle.
0	2	1	secondary heart field specification	The process that results in the delineation of a specific region of the lateral mesoderm into the area which will form the majority of the mesodermal component of the right ventricle, arterial pole (outflow tract) and venous pole (inflow tract).
1	0	2	embryonic heart tube morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the embryonic heart tube are generated and organized. The embryonic heart tube is an epithelial tube that will give rise to the mature heart.
3	3	1	outflow tract septum morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the outflow tract septum are generated and organized. The outflow tract septum is a partition in the outflow tract.
1	1	0	membranous septum morphogenesis	The process in which the membranous septum is generated and organized. The membranous septum is the upper part of ventricular septum.
1	0	0	muscular septum morphogenesis	The process in which the muscular septum is generated and organized. The muscular septum is the lower part of the ventricular septum.
7	5	1	outflow tract morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the outflow tract are generated and organized. The outflow tract is the portion of the heart through which blood flows into the arteries.
0	1	1	endocardium development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the endocardium over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The endocardium is an anatomical structure comprised of an endothelium and an extracellular matrix that forms the innermost layer of tissue of the heart, and lines the heart chambers.
0	0	1	endothelium development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an endothelium over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Endothelium refers to the layer of cells lining blood vessels, lymphatics, the heart, and serous cavities, and is derived from bone marrow or mesoderm. Corneal endothelium is a special case, derived from neural crest cells.
3	0	1	cardiac conduction system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cardiac conduction system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The cardiac conduction system consists of specialized cardiomyocytes that regulate the frequency of heart beat.
1	1	0	atrioventricular node development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the atrioventricular (AV) node over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The AV node is part of the cardiac conduction system that controls the timing of ventricle contraction by receiving electrical signals from the sinoatrial (SA) node and relaying them to the His-Purkinje system.
0	1	0	Purkinje myocyte development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a Purkinje myocyte over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The Purkinje myocyte (also known as cardiac Purkinje fiber) is part of the cardiac conduction system that receives signals from the bundle of His and innervates the ventricular cardiac muscle.
0	1	0	atrioventricular bundle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized structural and/or functional features of a cell of the atrioventricular bundle. These cells are specialized cardiomyocytes that transmit signals from the AV node to the cardiac Purkinje fibers.
2	0	2	heart valve development	The progression of a heart valve over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A heart valve is a structure that restricts the flow of blood to different regions of the heart and forms from an endocardial cushion.
0	0	1	atrioventricular valve development	The progression of the atrioventricular valve over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	aortic valve development	The progression of the aortic valve over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	pulmonary valve development	The progression of the pulmonary valve over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	1	0	heart valve morphogenesis	The process in which the structure of a heart valve is generated and organized.
2	3	1	aortic valve morphogenesis	The process in which the structure of the aortic valve is generated and organized.
3	0	0	atrioventricular valve morphogenesis	The process in which the structure of the atrioventricular valve is generated and organized.
1	1	0	mitral valve morphogenesis	The process in which the structure of the mitral valve is generated and organized.
0	2	0	pulmonary valve morphogenesis	The process in which the structure of the pulmonary valve is generated and organized.
0	1	0	sinoatrial valve morphogenesis	The process in which the structure of the sinoatrial valve is generated and organized.
1	1	0	tricuspid valve morphogenesis	The process in which the structure of the tricuspid valve is generated and organized.
1	0	0	heart valve formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of a heart valve from unspecified parts. This process begins with the specific processes that contribute to the appearance of the discrete structure and ends when the structural rudiment is recognizable.
1	0	0	mitral valve formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of the mitral valve from unspecified parts. This process begins with the specific processes that contribute to the appearance of the discrete structure and ends when the structural rudiment is recognizable.
1	0	0	tricuspid valve formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of the tricuspid valve from unspecified parts. This process begins with the specific processes that contribute to the appearance of the discrete structure and ends when the structural rudiment is recognizable.
1	1	0	endocardial cushion development	The progression of a cardiac cushion over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure. The endocardial cushion is a specialized region of mesenchymal cells that will give rise to the heart septa and valves.
1	0	0	epithelial to mesenchymal transition involved in endocardial cushion formation	A transition where a cardiac epithelial cell loses apical/basolateral polarity, severs intercellular adhesive junctions, degrades basement membrane components and becomes a migratory mesenchymal cell that will contribute to the formation of the endocardial cushion.
4	0	0	endocardial cushion morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the endocardial cushion is generated and organized. The endocardial cushion is a specialized region of mesenchymal cells that will give rise to the heart septa and valves.
0	1	0	cardiac chamber development	The progression of a cardiac chamber over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A cardiac chamber is an enclosed cavity within the heart.
2	0	0	cardiac ventricle morphogenesis	The process in which the cardiac ventricle is generated and organized. A cardiac ventricle receives blood from a cardiac atrium and pumps it out of the heart.
1	1	0	cardiac atrium morphogenesis	The process in which the cardiac atrium is generated and organized. A cardiac atrium receives blood from a vein and pumps it to a cardiac ventricle.
1	1	0	cardiac ventricle formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of a cardiac ventricle from unspecified parts. A cardiac ventricle receives blood from a cardiac atrium and pumps it out of the heart.
1	0	1	cardiac left ventricle morphogenesis	The process in which the left cardiac ventricle is generated and organized.
1	1	0	cardiac right ventricle morphogenesis	The process in which the right cardiac ventricle is generated and organized.
0	0	1	left ventricular cardiac muscle tissue morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of left cardiac ventricle muscle are generated and organized.
1	1	1	ventricular trabecula myocardium morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the trabecular cardiac ventricle muscle are generated and organized.
1	0	2	ventricular compact myocardium morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the compact cardiac ventricle muscle are generated and organized.
0	1	0	right ventricular compact myocardium morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the right ventricular compact myocardium are generated and organized.
0	1	0	atrial cardiac muscle tissue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of cardiac muscle of the atrium over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	ventricular cardiac muscle tissue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of ventricular cardiac muscle over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	cardiac ventricle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a cardiac ventricle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A cardiac ventricle receives blood from a cardiac atrium and pumps it out of the heart.
0	1	0	post-embryonic cardiac muscle cell growth involved in heart morphogenesis	The growth of a cardiac muscle cell during the postembryonic period that contributes to the shaping of the heart.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cell proliferation involved in heart valve morphogenesis	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of cell proliferation that contributes to the shaping of a heart valve.
1	0	5	regulation of membrane depolarization	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of membrane depolarization. Membrane depolarization is the process in which membrane potential changes in the depolarizing direction from the resting potential, usually from negative to positive.
1	0	0	regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter involved in myocardial precursor cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter that contributes to the differentiation of a myocardial precursor cell.
0	1	1	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter involved in myocardial precursor cell differentiation	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter that contributes to the differentiation of a myocardial precursor cell.
1	0	0	regulation of secondary heart field cardioblast proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cardioblast proliferation in the second heart field. A cardioblast is a cardiac precursor cell. It is a cell that has been committed to a cardiac fate, but will undergo more cell division rather than terminally differentiating. The secondary heart field is the region of the heart that will form the majority of the mesodermal component of the right ventricle, the arterial pole (outflow tract) and the venous pole (inflow tract).
1	2	1	endocardial cushion formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of an endocardial cushion. The endocardial cushion is a specialized region of mesenchymal cells that will give rise to the heart septa and valves.
1	0	0	cell migration involved in endocardial cushion formation	The orderly movement of a cell from one site to another that will contribute to the formation of an endocardial cushion. The endocardial cushion is a specialized region of mesenchymal cells that will give rise to the heart septa and valves.
1	0	0	endocardial cushion fusion	The cell-cell adhesion process of mesenchymal cardiac cushion cells that contributes to the process of cushion shaping.
0	0	1	cardiac septum development	The progression of a cardiac septum over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure.
4	1	4	ventricular septum development	The progression of the ventricular septum over time from its formation to the mature structure.
2	0	1	atrial septum development	The progression of the atrial septum over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure.
1	1	0	atrial septum primum morphogenesis	The process in which anatomical structure of an atrial septum primum is generated and organized.
0	1	0	atrial septum secundum morphogenesis	The process in which anatomical structure of an atrial septum secundum is generated and organized.
1	1	3	cardiac muscle hypertrophy	The enlargement or overgrowth of all or part of the heart muscle due to an increase in size of cardiac muscle cells without cell division.
0	1	1	type B pancreatic cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a type B pancreatic cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A type B pancreatic cell is a cell located towards center of the islets of Langerhans that secretes insulin.
0	1	0	regulation of extracellular matrix constituent secretion	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the controlled release of molecules that form the extracellular matrix, including carbohydrates and glycoproteins by a cell or a group of cells.
1	1	0	positive regulation of extracellular matrix constituent secretion	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the controlled release of molecules that form the extracellular matrix, including carbohydrates and glycoproteins by a cell or a group of cells.
1	0	1	amino acid transmembrane transport	The process in which an amino acid is transported across a membrane.
3	1	3	keratinocyte development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a keratinocyte over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	1	0	mesenchymal to epithelial transition involved in metanephros morphogenesis	A transition where a mesenchymal cell establishes apical/basolateral polarity,forms intercellular adhesive junctions, synthesizes basement membrane components and becomes an epithelial cell that will contribute to the shaping of the metanephros.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mesenchymal to epithelial transition involved in metanephros morphogenesis	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of the transition where a mesenchymal cell establishes apical/basolateral polarity,forms intercellular adhesive junctions, synthesizes basement membrane components and becomes an epithelial cell that will contribute to the shaping of the metanephros.
4	0	1	cilium movement	The directed, self-propelled movement of a cilium.
0	1	0	proepicardium development	The progression of the proepicardium from its formation to the mature structure. The proepicardium is an outpouching of the septum transversum.
0	1	0	pericardium morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the pericardium is generated and organized.
1	0	0	proepicardium cell migration involved in pericardium morphogenesis	The coordinated movement of a mesenchymal proepicardial cell to the surface of the developing heart.
2	0	0	epithelial cilium movement involved in extracellular fluid movement	The directed, self-propelled movement of cilia of epithelial cells. Depending on the type of cell, there may be one or many cilia per cell. This movement is usually coordinated between many epithelial cells, and serves to move extracellular fluid.
1	0	0	noradrenergic neuron differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an noradrenergic neuron, a neuron that secretes noradrenaline.
0	1	1	brainstem development	The progression of the brainstem from its formation to the mature structure. The brainstem is the part of the brain that connects the brain with the spinal cord.
0	1	0	lamellipodium assembly involved in ameboidal cell migration	Formation of a lamellipodium, a thin sheetlike extension of the surface of a migrating cell that contributes to the directed self propelled movement of a cell.
0	2	0	establishment of cell polarity involved in ameboidal cell migration	The specification and formation of anisotropic intracellular organization that contributes to the self-propelled directed movement of an ameboid cell.
1	1	0	cell-matrix adhesion involved in ameboidal cell migration	The binding of a cell to the extracellular matrix that contributes to the directed movement of an ameboid cell.
0	0	3	dynamin family protein polymerization involved in mitochondrial fission	The process of creating dynamin protein family polymers, compounds composed of a large number of dynamin family monomers around a lipid tube of a dividing mitochondrion. Dynamin polymers form around lipid tubes and contribute to membrane fission.
0	0	3	sphingosine-1-phosphate receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the sphingolipid sphingosine-1-phosphate (S1P) binding to a receptor on the surface of the cell, and which proceeds with the activated receptor transmitting the signal by promoting the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha-subunit of an associated heterotrimeric G-protein complex. The pathway ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
4	3	1	epithelial cell morphogenesis	The change in form that occurs when an epithelial cell progresses from its initial formation to its mature state.
0	0	1	planar cell polarity pathway involved in axis elongation	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where activated receptors signal to modulate cytoskeletal elements and control cell polarity that contributes to axis elongation.
1	0	0	optic vesicle morphogenesis	The developmental process pertaining to the formation and shaping of the optic vesicle. This process begins with the specific processes that contribute to the appearance of the vesicle and ends when the vesicle has evaginated. The optic vesicle is the evagination of neurectoderm that precedes formation of the optic cup.
0	0	1	retinal pigment epithelium development	The progression of the retinal pigment epithelium over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure. The retinal pigment epithelium is the melanin-containing layer of cells between the retina and the choroid that absorbs scattered and reflected light and removes waste products produced by the photoreceptor cells.
2	4	4	neural retina development	The progression of the neural retina over time from its initial formation to the mature structure. The neural retina is the part of the retina that contains neurons and photoreceptor cells.
1	0	0	optic cup structural organization	The process that contributes to creating the structural organization of the optic cup. This process pertains to the physical shaping of the rudimentary structure.
1	2	0	chondrocyte differentiation involved in endochondral bone morphogenesis	The process in which a chondroblast acquires specialized structural and/or functional features of a chondrocyte that will contribute to the development of a bone. A chondrocyte is a polymorphic cell that forms cartilage.
2	0	0	chondrocyte hypertrophy	The growth of a chondrocyte, where growth contributes to the progression of the chondrocyte over time.
0	1	0	growth plate cartilage chondrocyte differentiation	The process in which a chondroblast acquires specialized structural and/or functional features of a chondrocyte that will contribute to the growth of a bone. A chondrocyte is a polymorphic cell that forms cartilage.
2	0	0	growth plate cartilage chondrocyte growth	The growth of a growth plate cartilage chondrocyte, where growth contributes to the progression of the chondrocyte over time from one condition to another.
1	0	0	growth plate cartilage chondrocyte development	The progression of a growth plate cartilage chondrocyte over time from after its fate commitment to the mature cell.
0	1	1	chondrocyte development involved in endochondral bone morphogenesis	The progression of a chondrocyte over time from after its commitment to its mature state where the chondrocyte will contribute to the shaping of an endochondral bone.
15	16	14	nucleic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any nucleic acid.
125	173	113	DNA binding	Any molecular function by which a gene product interacts selectively and non-covalently with DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid).
7	19	7	DNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; this reaction drives the unwinding of the DNA helix.
0	3	5	minor groove of adenine-thymine-rich DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the structure formed by the minor groove of adenine-thymine-rich DNA regions. Examples of proteins having this function are AT-rich interaction domain (ARID)-containing proteins.
1	0	0	bent DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA in a bent conformation.
73	82	69	chromatin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with chromatin, the network of fibers of DNA, protein, and sometimes RNA, that make up the chromosomes of the eukaryotic nucleus during interphase.
9	12	12	damaged DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with damaged DNA.
3	4	5	DNA replication origin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the DNA replication origin, a unique DNA sequence of a replicon at which DNA replication is initiated and proceeds bidirectionally or unidirectionally.
0	0	1	DNA clamp loader activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, to drive the opening of the ring structure of the PCNA complex, or any of the related sliding clamp complexes, and their closing around the DNA duplex.
9	14	26	double-stranded DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded DNA.
3	0	2	double-stranded telomeric DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded telomere-associated DNA.
1	0	0	left-handed Z-DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA in the Z form, i.e. a left-handed helix in which the phosphate backbone zigzags.
2	0	1	satellite DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with satellite DNA, the many tandem repeats (identical or related) of a short basic repeating unit; many have a base composition or other property different from the genome average that allows them to be separated from the bulk (main band) genomic DNA.
11	19	22	single-stranded DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with single-stranded DNA.
63	50	17	DNA-binding transcription factor activity	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific double-stranded genomic DNA sequence (sometimes referred to as a motif) within the regulatory region of a gene to modulate transcription. Regulatory regions include promoters (proximal and distal) and enhancers. Genes are transcriptional units, and include bacterial operons.
2	0	1	steroid hormone receptor activity	Combining with a steroid hormone and transmitting the signal within the cell to initiate a change in cell activity or function.
3	1	0	transcription elongation regulator activity	A molecular function that regulates transcriptional elongation by enabling the transition from transcription initiation to elongation or by altering the elongation properties of the enzyme during the elongation phase of transcription.
22	29	22	transcription coregulator activity	A protein or a member of a complex that interacts specifically and non-covalently with a DNA-bound DNA-binding transcription factor to either activate or repress the transcription of specific genes. Coregulators often act by altering chromatin structure and modifications. For example, one class of transcription coregulators modifies chromatin structure through covalent modification of histones. A second ATP-dependent class modifies the conformation of chromatin. A third class modulates interactions of DNA-binding transcription factor with other transcription coregulators.
41	48	44	transcription coactivator activity	A protein or a member of a complex that interacts specifically and non-covalently with a DNA-bound DNA-binding transcription factor to activate the transcription of specific genes. Coactivators often act by altering chromatin structure and modifications. For example, one class of transcription coregulators modifies chromatin structure through covalent modification of histones. A second ATP-dependent class modifies the conformation of chromatin. Another type of coregulator activity is the bridging of a DNA-binding transcription factor to the basal transcription machinery. The Mediator complex, which bridges transcription factors and RNA polymerase, is also a transcription coactivator.
32	43	35	transcription corepressor activity	A protein or a member of a complex that interacts specifically and non-covalently with a DNA-bound DNA-binding transcription factor to repress the transcription of specific genes. Corepressors often act by altering chromatin structure and modifications. For example, one class of transcription coregulators modifies chromatin structure through covalent modification of histones. A second ATP-dependent class modifies the conformation of chromatin. A third class occludes DNA-binding transcription factor protein-protein interaction domains. A fourth class of corepressors prevents interactions of DNA bound DNA-binding transcription factor with coactivators.
0	0	2	telomerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: deoxynucleoside triphosphate + DNA(n) = diphosphate + DNA(n+1). Catalyzes extension of the 3'- end of a DNA strand by one deoxynucleotide at a time using an internal RNA template that encodes the telomeric repeat sequence.
172	317	362	RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA molecule or a portion thereof.
7	20	12	RNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; this reaction drives the unwinding of an RNA helix.
10	14	21	double-stranded RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded RNA.
0	0	1	double-stranded RNA adenosine deaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: adenosine + H2O = inosine + NH3, in a double-stranded RNA molecule.
4	11	7	single-stranded RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with single-stranded RNA.
26	41	55	mRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with messenger RNA (mRNA), an intermediate molecule between DNA and protein. mRNA includes UTR and coding sequences, but does not contain introns.
7	15	19	mRNA 3'-UTR binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the 3' untranslated region of an mRNA molecule.
20	27	28	structural constituent of ribosome	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of the ribosome.
5	18	10	translation initiation factor activity	Functions in the initiation of ribosome-mediated translation of mRNA into a polypeptide.
2	4	8	translation elongation factor activity	Functions in chain elongation during polypeptide synthesis at the ribosome.
0	0	1	translation release factor activity	Involved in catalyzing the release of a nascent polypeptide chain from a ribosome.
7	7	4	peptidyl-prolyl cis-trans isomerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: peptidyl-proline (omega=180) = peptidyl-proline (omega=0).
4	4	1	protein disulfide isomerase activity	Catalysis of the rearrangement of both intrachain and interchain disulfide bonds in proteins.
5	8	5	motor activity	Catalysis of the generation of force resulting either in movement along a microfilament or microtubule, or in torque resulting in membrane scission, coupled to the hydrolysis of a nucleoside triphosphate.
10	12	6	microtubule motor activity	Catalysis of movement along a microtubule, coupled to the hydrolysis of a nucleoside triphosphate (usually ATP).
36	58	89	actin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with monomeric or multimeric forms of actin, including actin filaments.
4	9	5	actin monomer binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with monomeric actin, also known as G-actin.
0	0	1	lysozyme activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of the beta-(1->4) linkages between N-acetylmuramic acid and N-acetyl-D-glucosamine residues in a peptidoglycan.
0	0	1	protein-glutamine gamma-glutamyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein glutamine + alkylamine = protein N5-alkylglutamine + NH3. This reaction is the formation of the N6-(L-isoglutamyl)-L-lysine isopeptide, resulting in cross-linking polypeptide chains; the gamma-carboxamide groups of peptidyl-glutamine residues act as acyl donors, and the 6-amino-groups of peptidyl-lysine residues act as acceptors, to give intra- and intermolecular N6-(5-glutamyl)lysine cross-links.
11	4	13	antigen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an antigen, any substance which is capable of inducing a specific immune response and of reacting with the products of that response, the specific antibody or specifically sensitized T-lymphocytes, or both. Binding may counteract the biological activity of the antigen.
4	1	1	catalytic activity	Catalysis of a biochemical reaction at physiological temperatures. In biologically catalyzed reactions, the reactants are known as substrates, and the catalysts are naturally occurring macromolecular substances known as enzymes. Enzymes possess specific binding sites for substrates, and are usually composed wholly or largely of protein, but RNA that has catalytic activity (ribozyme) is often also regarded as enzymatic.
0	0	1	alpha-ketoacid dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction involving an alpha-ketoacid.
0	1	0	beta-N-acetylglucosaminylglycopeptide beta-1,4-galactosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-galactose + N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminylglycopeptide = UDP + beta-D-galactosyl-(1->4)-N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminylglycopeptide.
0	1	0	beta-galactoside (CMP) alpha-2,3-sialyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CMP-N-acetylneuraminate + beta-D-galactosyl-(1->3)-N-acetyl-alpha-D-galactosaminyl-R = CMP + alpha-N-acetylneuraminyl-(2->3)-beta-D-galactosyl-(1->3)-N-acetyl-alpha-D-galactosaminyl-R.
1	2	0	1-acylglycerol-3-phosphate O-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + 1-acyl-sn-glycerol-3-phosphate = CoA + 1,2-diacyl-sn-glycerol-3-phosphate.
1	0	0	1-pyrroline-5-carboxylate dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-pyrroline-5-carboxylate + NAD+ + H2O = L-glutamate + NADH + H(+).
0	0	1	1-alkyl-2-acetylglycerophosphocholine esterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-acetyl-1-alkyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + H2O = 1-alkyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + acetate.
1	0	0	2-hydroxyacylsphingosine 1-beta-galactosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-galactose + 2-(2-hydroxyacyl)sphingosine = UDP + 1-(beta-D-galactosyl)-2-(2-hydroxyacyl)sphingosine.
0	1	3	3-hydroxyacyl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (S)-3-hydroxyacyl-CoA + NAD+ = 3-oxoacyl-CoA + NADH + H(+).
0	1	0	3-hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (R)-3-hydroxybutanoate + NAD(+) = acetoacetate + H(+) + NADH.
0	0	1	3-methyl-2-oxobutanoate dehydrogenase (2-methylpropanoyl-transferring) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-methyl-2-oxobutanoate + lipoamide = S-(2-methylpropanoyl)dihydrolipoamide + CO2.
1	0	0	4-hydroxyphenylpyruvate dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 4-hydroxyphenylpyruvate + O2 = homogentisate + CO2.
1	1	1	6-phosphofructokinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + D-fructose-6-phosphate = ADP + D-fructose 1,6-bisphosphate.
0	1	0	6-phosphofructo-2-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: beta-D-fructose 6-phosphate + ATP = beta-D-fructose 2,6-bisphosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
0	1	0	6-pyruvoyltetrahydropterin synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 7,8-dihydroneopterin 3'-triphosphate = 6-pyruvoyl-5,6,7,8-tetrahydropterin + H(+) + triphosphate.
2	1	0	AMP deaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: AMP + H2O = IMP + NH3.
1	0	0	ATP adenylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ADP + ATP = phosphate + P(1),P(4)-bis(5'-adenosyl)tetraphosphate.
0	0	1	ATP citrate synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + ADP + H(+) + oxaloacetate + phosphate = ATP + citrate + CoA.
0	0	1	CDP-diacylglycerol-serine O-phosphatidyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CDP-diacylglycerol + L-serine = CMP + O-sn-phosphatidyl-L-serine.
0	0	1	CTP synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + UTP + NH3 = ADP + phosphate + CTP.
0	1	1	DNA (cytosine-5-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + DNA containing cytosine = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + DNA containing 5-methylcytosine.
1	1	1	DNA-directed DNA polymerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: deoxynucleoside triphosphate + DNA(n) = diphosphate + DNA(n+1); the synthesis of DNA from deoxyribonucleotide triphosphates in the presence of a DNA template and a 3'hydroxyl group.
4	5	1	DNA-directed 5'-3' RNA polymerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nucleoside triphosphate + RNA(n) = diphosphate + RNA(n+1). Utilizes a DNA template, i.e. the catalysis of DNA-template-directed extension of the 3'-end of an RNA strand by one nucleotide at a time. Can initiate a chain 'de novo'.
2	1	3	DNA-(apurinic or apyrimidinic site) endonuclease activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of the C-O-P bond in the AP site created when DNA glycosylase removes a damaged base, involved in the DNA base excision repair pathway (BER).
0	1	0	methylated-DNA-[protein]-cysteine S-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: DNA (containing 6-O-methylguanine) + (protein)-L-cysteine = DNA (without 6-O-methylguanine) + protein S-methyl-L-cysteine.
0	0	2	DNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the formation of a phosphodiester bond between the 3'-hydroxyl group at the end of one DNA chain and the 5'-phosphate group at the end of another. This reaction requires an energy source such as ATP or NAD+.
0	0	2	DNA ligase (ATP) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + deoxyribonucleotide(n) + deoxyribonucleotide(m) = AMP + diphosphate + deoxyribonucleotide(n+m).
0	0	2	DNA topoisomerase type II (double strand cut, ATP-hydrolyzing) activity	Catalysis of a DNA topological transformation by transiently cleaving a pair of complementary DNA strands to form a gate through which a second double-stranded DNA segment is passed, after which the severed strands in the first DNA segment are rejoined; product release is coupled to ATP binding and hydrolysis; changes the linking number in multiples of 2.
0	1	0	GMP synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + XMP + NH4(+) = AMP + diphosphate + GMP + 2H(+).
0	1	0	GMP synthase (glutamine-hydrolyzing) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + XMP + L-glutamine + H2O = AMP + diphosphate + GMP + L-glutamate + 2H(+).
29	36	51	GTPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: GTP + H2O = GDP + phosphate.
4	4	3	obsolete small monomeric GTPase activity	OBSOLETE. Catalysis of the reaction: GTP + H2O = GDP + phosphate. Small monomeric enzymes with a molecular mass of 21 kDa that are distantly related to the alpha-subunit of heterotrimeric G-protein GTPase. They are involved in cell-growth regulation (RAS subfamily), membrane vesicle traffic and uncoating (RAB and ARF subfamilies), nuclear protein import (RAN subfamily) and organization of the cytoskeleton (Rho and Rac subfamilies).
0	1	0	IMP cyclohydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: IMP + H2O = 5-formamido-1-(5-phosphoribosyl)imidazole-4-carboxamide.
0	1	0	IMP dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: inosine 5'-phosphate + NAD+ + H2O = xanthosine 5'-phosphate + NADH + H+.
0	1	0	N-acetyllactosamine synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-galactose + N-acetyl-D-glucosamine = UDP + N-acetyllactosamine.
7	4	1	NAD+ ADP-ribosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD+ + (ADP-D-ribosyl)(n)-acceptor = nicotinamide + (ADP-D-ribosyl)(n+1)-acceptor.
4	2	2	NAD+ kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + NAD(+) = ADP + 2 H(+) + NADP(+).
0	0	1	NADH dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADH + H+ + acceptor = NAD+ + reduced acceptor.
1	1	0	NAD(P)H dehydrogenase (quinone) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)H + H+ + a quinone = NAD(P)+ + a hydroquinone.
1	1	0	NAD(P)+-protein-arginine ADP-ribosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)+ + L-arginine = nicotinamide + N2-(ADP-D-ribosyl)-L-arginine.
0	2	0	NADPH:quinone reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADPH + H+ + quinone = NADP+ + semiquinone.
0	1	0	RNA-3'-phosphate cyclase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + RNA 3'-terminal-phosphate = AMP + diphosphate + RNA terminal-2',3'-cyclic-phosphate.
0	0	1	RNA-directed 5'-3' RNA polymerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nucleoside triphosphate + RNA(n) = diphosphate + RNA(n+1); uses an RNA template, i.e. the catalysis of RNA-template-directed extension of the 3'-end of an RNA strand by one nucleotide at a time.
1	0	0	UDP-N-acetylglucosamine diphosphorylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosamine 1-phosphate + UTP = diphosphate + UDP-N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosamine.
0	0	1	UDP-glucose 6-dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H(2)O + 2 NAD(+) + UDP-alpha-D-glucose = 3 H(+) + 2 NADH + UDP-alpha-D-glucuronate.
0	0	1	UTP:glucose-1-phosphate uridylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: alpha-D-glucose 1-phosphate + UTP = diphosphate + UDP-D-glucose.
1	0	0	acetolactate synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 pyruvate = 2-acetolactate + CO2.
0	3	2	acetyl-CoA C-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 acetyl-CoA = CoA + acetoacetyl-CoA.
0	0	1	acetyl-CoA hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + H(2)O = acetate + CoA + H(+).
0	1	1	acetate-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + acetate + CoA = AMP + diphosphate + acetyl-CoA.
0	2	1	acetyl-CoA C-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + acetyl-CoA = CoA + 3-oxoacyl-CoA.
0	0	1	acetyl-CoA carboxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + acetyl-CoA + HCO3- = ADP + phosphate + malonyl-CoA.
1	0	0	acid phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an orthophosphoric monoester + H2O = an alcohol + phosphate, with an acid pH optimum.
0	1	1	aconitate hydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: citrate = isocitrate. The reaction occurs in two steps: (1) citrate = cis-aconitate + H2O, (2) cis-aconitate + H2O = isocitrate. This reaction is the interconversion of citrate and isocitrate via the labile, enzyme-bound intermediate cis-aconitate. Water is removed from one part of the citrate molecule and added back to a different atom to form isocitrate.
1	0	2	acyl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + acceptor = 2,3-dehydroacyl-CoA + reduced acceptor.
1	0	0	acyl-CoA oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + O2 = trans-2,3-dehydroacyl-CoA + hydrogen peroxide.
0	1	0	adenine phosphoribosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: AMP + diphosphate = adenine + 5-phospho-alpha-D-ribose 1-diphosphate.
1	0	0	adenosylhomocysteinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + H2O = adenosine + L-homocysteine.
0	2	0	adenylate cyclase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP = 3',5'-cyclic AMP + diphosphate.
0	1	0	adenylate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + AMP = 2 ADP.
1	0	0	adenylosuccinate synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-aspartate + GTP + IMP = N(6)-(1,2-dicarboxyethyl)-AMP + GDP + 3 H(+) + phosphate.
1	1	0	adenylylsulfate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + adenylylsulfate = ADP + 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate.
0	1	0	L-alanine:2-oxoglutarate aminotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-oxoglutarate + L-alanine = L-glutamate + pyruvate.
0	2	1	alcohol dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an alcohol + NAD+ = an aldehyde or ketone + NADH + H+.
1	2	3	alcohol dehydrogenase activity, zinc-dependent	Catalysis of the reaction: an alcohol + NAD+ = an aldehyde or ketone + NADH + H+, requiring the presence of zinc.
1	1	0	alcohol sulfotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate + an alcohol = adenosine 3',5'-bisphosphate + an alkyl sulfate.
1	0	0	3-chloroallyl aldehyde dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-chloroallyl aldehyde + H2O = 2 H+ + 2 e- + 3-chloroacrylic acid.
2	2	1	aldehyde dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an aldehyde + NAD+ + H2O = an acid + NADH + H+.
0	1	0	aldehyde dehydrogenase [NAD(P)+] activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an aldehyde + NAD(P)+ + H2O = an acid + NAD(P)H + H+.
1	0	0	aldehyde oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an aldehyde + H2O + O2 = a carboxylic acid + hydrogen peroxide.
6	3	0	alditol:NADP+ 1-oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an alditol + NADP+ = an aldose + NADPH + H+.
4	2	0	aldo-keto reductase (NADP) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an alcohol + NADP+ = an aldehyde or a ketone + NADPH + H+.
3	0	0	alkaline phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an orthophosphoric monoester + H2O = an alcohol + phosphate, with an alkaline pH optimum.
1	0	0	aminoacyl-tRNA hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-substituted aminoacyl-tRNA + H2O = N-substituted amino acid + tRNA.
2	1	0	aminoacylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an N-acyl-L-amino acid + H2O = a carboxylate + an L-amino acid.
1	0	0	arginase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-arginine + H2O = L-ornithine + urea.
0	2	0	aryl sulfotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate + a phenol = adenosine 3',5'-bisphosphate + an aryl sulfate.
1	0	0	arylesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a phenyl acetate + H2O = a phenol + acetate.
1	0	0	arylsulfatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a phenol sulfate + H2O = a phenol + sulfate.
0	2	0	L-aspartate:2-oxoglutarate aminotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-aspartate + 2-oxoglutarate = oxaloacetate + L-glutamate.
0	0	1	aspartate carbamoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-aspartate + carbamoyl phosphate = N-carbamoyl-L-aspartate + H(+) + phosphate.
2	0	0	biliverdin reductase (NAD(P)+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: bilirubin + NAD(P)+ = biliverdin + NAD(P)H + H+.
0	1	0	bis(5'-nucleosyl)-tetraphosphatase (asymmetrical) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: P(1),P(4)-bis(5'-nucleosyl)tetraphosphate + H2O = NTP + NMP. Acts on bis(5'-guanosyl)-, bis(5'-xanthosyl)-, bis(5'-adenosyl)- and bis(5'-uridyl)-tetraphosphate.
0	0	3	bisphosphoglycerate mutase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-phospho-D-glyceroyl phosphate = 2,3-bisphospho-D-glycerate.
0	0	1	bisphosphoglycerate 2-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2,3-bisphospho-D-glycerate + H(2)O = 3-phospho-D-glycerate + phosphate.
0	1	1	butyryl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: butanoyl-CoA + electron-transfer flavoprotein = 2-butenoyl-CoA + reduced electron-transfer flavoprotein.
0	0	1	carbamoyl-phosphate synthase (ammonia) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 ATP + CO(2) + H(2)O + NH(4)(+) = 2 ADP + carbamoyl phosphate + 5 H(+) + phosphate.
0	0	2	carbamoyl-phosphate synthase (glutamine-hydrolyzing) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 ATP + L-glutamine + CO2 + H2O = 2 ADP + phosphate + glutamate + carbamoyl phosphate.
3	0	0	carbonate dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2CO3 = CO2 + H2O.
1	2	0	carbonyl reductase (NADPH) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: R-CHOH-R' + NADP+ = R-CO-R' + NADPH + H+.
1	0	0	catalase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 hydrogen peroxide = O2 + 2 H2O.
0	1	1	choline-phosphate cytidylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CTP + choline phosphate = diphosphate + CDP-choline.
0	2	3	creatine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + creatine = N-phosphocreatine + ADP + 2 H(+).
0	0	1	2',3'-cyclic-nucleotide 3'-phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nucleoside 2',3'-cyclic phosphate + H2O = nucleoside 2'-phosphate.
0	3	3	3',5'-cyclic-nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nucleoside 3',5'-cyclic phosphate + H2O = nucleoside 5'-phosphate.
0	3	3	3',5'-cyclic-AMP phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: adenosine 3',5'-cyclic phosphate + H2O = adenosine 5'-phosphate.
0	0	1	calmodulin-dependent cyclic-nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nucleoside 3',5'-cyclic phosphate + H2O = nucleoside 5'-phosphate; catalytic activity is regulated by calmodulin.
0	2	0	cGMP-inhibited cyclic-nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nucleoside 3',5'-cyclic phosphate + H2O = nucleoside 5'-phosphate; catalytic activity is decreased in the presence of cGMP.
2	0	0	cystathionine beta-synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-serine + L-homocysteine = cystathionine + H2O.
0	3	0	cytochrome-b5 reductase activity, acting on NAD(P)H	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)H + H+ + 2 ferricytochrome b(5) = NAD(P)+ + 2 ferrocytochrome b(5).
2	1	0	cytochrome-c oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 4 ferrocytochrome c + O2 + 4 H+ = 4 ferricytochrome c + 2 H2O.
1	0	0	glycogen debranching enzyme activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of branch points in branched glycogen polymers.
1	0	0	4-alpha-glucanotransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a segment of a (1->4)-alpha-D-glucan to a new 4-position in an acceptor, which may be glucose or (1->4)-alpha-D-glucan.
1	0	0	amylo-alpha-1,6-glucosidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of (1->6)-alpha-D-glucosidic branch linkages in glycogen phosphorylase limit dextrin. Limit dextrin is the highly branched core that remains after exhaustive treatment of glycogen with glycogen phosphorylase. It is formed because these enzymes cannot hydrolyze the (1->6) glycosidic linkages present.
0	1	0	deoxyadenosine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2'-deoxyadenosine + ATP = ADP + dAMP + 2 H(+).
0	1	0	deoxycytidine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NTP + deoxycytidine = NDP + CMP.
0	1	0	deoxyguanosine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2'-deoxyguanosine + ATP = ADP + dGMP + 2 H(+).
4	0	1	diacylglycerol kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NTP + 1,2-diacylglycerol = NDP + 1,2-diacylglycerol-3-phosphate.
1	0	0		
0	0	1	dihydrolipoyllysine-residue succinyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: succinyl-CoA + dihydrolipoamide = CoA + S-succinyldihydrolipoamide.
0	0	1	dihydroorotase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (S)-dihydroorotate + H(2)O = N-carbamoyl-L-aspartate + H(+).
0	0	1	6,7-dihydropteridine reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP+ + 5,6,7,8-tetrahydropteridine = NADPH + H+ + 6,7-dihydropteridine.
0	0	1	dihydropyrimidinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5,6-dihydrouracil + H2O = 3-ureidopropionate.
1	1	0	dodecenoyl-CoA delta-isomerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-cis-dodecenoyl-CoA = 2-trans-dodecenoyl-CoA.
1	0	0	dolichyl-phosphate-mannose-protein mannosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dolichyl phosphate D-mannose + protein = dolichyl phosphate + O-D-mannosylprotein.
0	1	0	dUTP diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dUTP + H2O = dUMP + diphosphate.
1	0	0	electron-transferring-flavoprotein dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: reduced ETF + ubiquinone = ETF + ubiquinol.
16	11	8	endopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal, alpha-peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain.
6	3	0	aminopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of N-terminal amino acid residues from in a polypeptide chain.
3	1	0	carboxypeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of the terminal or penultimate peptide bond at the C-terminal end of a peptide or polypeptide.
5	1	2	metallocarboxypeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of C-terminal amino acid residues from a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which water acts as a nucleophile, one or two metal ions hold the water molecule in place, and charged amino acid side chains are ligands for the metal ions.
1	0	1	serine-type carboxypeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a peptide bond not more than three residues from the C-terminus of a polypeptide chain by a catalytic mechanism that involves a catalytic triad consisting of a serine nucleophile that is activated by a proton relay involving an acidic residue (e.g. aspartate or glutamate) and a basic residue (usually histidine).
3	3	1	aspartic-type endopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal, alpha-peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which a water molecule bound by the side chains of aspartic residues at the active center acts as a nucleophile.
11	10	12	cysteine-type endopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal, alpha-peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile.
1	2	0	calcium-dependent cysteine-type endopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of nonterminal peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism using a cysteine residue at the enzyme active center, and requiring the presence of calcium.
6	6	2	metalloendopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal, alpha-peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which water acts as a nucleophile, one or two metal ions hold the water molecule in place, and charged amino acid side chains are ligands for the metal ions.
17	13	3	serine-type endopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal, alpha-peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a catalytic mechanism that involves a catalytic triad consisting of a serine nucleophile that is activated by a proton relay involving an acidic residue (e.g. aspartate or glutamate) and a basic residue (usually histidine).
3	2	4	threonine-type endopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which the hydroxyl group of a threonine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile.
2	1	2	enoyl-CoA hydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (3S)-3-hydroxyacyl-CoA = trans-2-enoyl-CoA + H2O.
1	1	0	epoxide hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an epoxide + H2O = a glycol.
2	0	0	estradiol 17-beta-dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: estradiol-17-beta + NADP+ = estrone + NADPH + H+.
1	0	2	exopolyphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: polyphosphate(n) + H2O = polyphosphate(n-1) + phosphate.
0	0	1	[acyl-carrier-protein] S-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + [acyl-carrier protein] = CoA + acetyl-[acyl-carrier protein].
0	0	1	[acyl-carrier-protein] S-malonyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: malonyl-CoA + [acyl-carrier protein] = CoA + malonyl-[acyl-carrier protein].
0	0	1	3-oxoacyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + malonyl-[acyl-carrier protein] = 3-oxoacyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + CO2 + [acyl-carrier protein].
0	0	1	3-oxoacyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] reductase (NADPH) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (3R)-3-hydroxyacyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + NADP+ = 3-oxoacyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + NADPH + H+.
0	0	1	3-hydroxypalmitoyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (3R)-3-hydroxypalmitoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] = 2-hexadecenoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + H2O.
0	0	1	oleoyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: oleoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + H2O = [acyl-carrier protein] + oleate.
1	3	0	fatty-acyl-CoA synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + n malonyl-CoA + 2n NADH + 2n NADPH + 4n H+ = a long-chain acyl-CoA + n CoA + n CO2 + 2n NAD+ + 2n NADP+.
0	0	2	ferroxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 4 Fe2+ + 4 H+ + O2 = 4 Fe3+ + 2 H2O.
0	1	0	ferredoxin-NADP+ reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: reduced ferredoxin + NADP+ = oxidized ferredoxin + NADPH + H+.
0	1	0	ferrochelatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protoheme = Fe(2+) + protoporphyrin IX.
0	1	0	formate-tetrahydrofolate ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + formate + tetrahydrofolate = ADP + phosphate + 10-formyltetrahydrofolate.
0	1	1	fructose-2,6-bisphosphate 2-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-fructose 2,6-bisphosphate + H2O = D-fructose-6-phosphate + phosphate.
0	0	3	fructose-bisphosphate aldolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-fructose 1,6-bisphosphate = glycerone phosphate + D-glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate.
1	0	0	fumarate hydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (S)-malate = fumarate + H(2)O.
0	0	1	glucokinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + D-glucose = ADP + D-glucose-6-phosphate.
0	0	1	glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-glucose 6-phosphate + NADP+ = D-glucono-1,5-lactone 6-phosphate + NADPH + H+.
0	1	0	glucose-6-phosphate isomerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-glucose 6-phosphate = D-fructose 6-phosphate.
0	2	0	glutamate dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-glutamate + H2O + NAD+ = 2-oxoglutarate + NH3 + NADH + H+.
0	2	0	glutamate dehydrogenase [NAD(P)+] activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-glutamate + H2O + NAD(P)+ = 2-oxoglutarate + NH3 + NAD(P)H + H+.
0	2	0	glutamate dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-glutamate + H2O + NADP+ = 2-oxoglutarate + NH3 + NADPH + H+.
1	0	0	glutaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-glutamine + H2O = L-glutamate + NH3.
0	1	1	glutamine-fructose-6-phosphate transaminase (isomerizing) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: beta-D-fructose 6-phosphate + L-glutamine = D-glucosamine 6-phosphate + L-glutamate.
0	1	0	glutathione-disulfide reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 glutathione + NADP+ = glutathione disulfide + NADPH + H+.
0	0	1	glutathione synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-gamma-glutamyl-L-cysteine + ATP + glycine = ADP + glutathione + 2 H(+) + phosphate.
2	2	2	glutathione transferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: R-X + glutathione = H-X + R-S-glutathione. R may be an aliphatic, aromatic or heterocyclic group; X may be a sulfate, nitrile or halide group.
0	0	1	glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (NAD+) (phosphorylating) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate + phosphate + NAD+ = 3-phospho-D-glyceroyl phosphate + NADH + H+.
1	1	0	glycerol-3-phosphate O-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + sn-glycerol 3-phosphate = CoA + 1-acyl-sn-glycerol 3-phosphate.
0	0	1	glycerone kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + glycerone = ADP + glycerone phosphate + 2 H(+).
0	1	0	glycine hydroxymethyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5,10-methylenetetrahydrofolate + glycine + H2O = tetrahydrofolate + L-serine.
1	1	0	glycogen (starch) synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-glucose + (1,4)-alpha-D-glucosyl(n) = UDP + (1,4)-alpha-D-glucosyl(n+1).
1	0	0	glycolipid mannosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an alpha-D-mannosyl residue from GDP-mannose into lipid-linked oligosaccharide, forming an alpha-D-mannosyl-D-mannose linkage.
0	0	1	glycylpeptide N-tetradecanoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: tetradecanoyl-CoA + glycyl-peptide = CoA + N-tetradecanoylglycyl-peptide.
0	0	1	guanylate cyclase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: GTP = 3',5'-cyclic GMP + diphosphate.
2	0	4	guanylate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + GMP = ADP + GDP.
5	9	8	helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, to drive the unwinding of a DNA or RNA helix.
0	1	0	heme oxygenase (decyclizing) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: heme + 3 donor-H2 + 3 O2 = biliverdin + Fe2+ + CO + 3 acceptor + 3 H2O.
0	0	1	hexokinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + D-hexose = ADP + D-hexose 6-phosphate.
0	0	1	histidine ammonia-lyase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-histidine = urocanate + NH3.
4	6	5	histone acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + histone = CoA + acetyl-histone.
1	6	4	histone deacetylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: histone N6-acetyl-L-lysine + H2O = histone L-lysine + acetate. This reaction represents the removal of an acetyl group from a histone, a class of proteins complexed to DNA in chromatin and chromosomes.
0	0	1	hyalurononglucosaminidase activity	Catalysis of the random hydrolysis of (1->4) linkages between N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosamine and D-glucuronate residues in hyaluronate.
0	1	0	hydroxymethylglutaryl-CoA lyase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (S)-3-hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl-CoA = acetoacetate + acetyl-CoA.
0	2	0	hydroxymethylglutaryl-CoA synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetoacetyl-CoA + acetyl-CoA + H(2)O = (S)-3-hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl-CoA + CoA + H(+).
1	0	1	inorganic diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: diphosphate + H(2)O = H(+) + 2 phosphate.
0	0	4	1-phosphatidylinositol 4-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol + ATP = 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 4-phosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
4	5	3	phosphatidylinositol phospholipase C activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 4,5-bisphosphate + H(2)O = 1,2-diacylglycerol + 1D-myo-inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate + H(+).
3	5	2	phosphatidylinositol-3-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3-phosphate + H2O = 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol + phosphate.
2	0	3	phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 5-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 4,5-bisphosphate + H(2)O = 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 4-phosphate + phosphate.
2	0	1	inositol-polyphosphate 5-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: D-myo-inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate + H2O = myo-inositol 1,4-bisphosphate + phosphate, and 1D-myo-inositol 1,3,4,5-tetrakisphosphate + H2O = 1D-myo-inositol 1,3,4-trisphosphate + phosphate.
1	0	0	isocitrate dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: isocitrate + NADP+ = 2-oxoglutarate + CO2 + NADPH + H+.
1	0	4	L-lactate dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (S)-lactate + NAD+ = pyruvate + NADH + H+.
0	1	0	lactose synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-galactose + D-glucose = UDP + lactose.
1	0	0	lactoylglutathione lyase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (R)-S-lactoylglutathione = glutathione + methylglyoxal.
1	0	0	leukotriene-A4 hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H(2)O + leukotriene A(4) = leukotriene B(4).
1	0	0	leukotriene-C4 synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: leukotriene C(4) = glutathione + leukotriene A(4).
0	1	1	long-chain-acyl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + ETF = 2,3-dehydroacyl-CoA + reduced ETF.
3	0	2	long-chain fatty acid-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a long-chain fatty acid + CoA = AMP + diphosphate + an acyl-CoA; a long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
1	2	1	lysine N-acetyltransferase activity, acting on acetyl phosphate as donor	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl phosphate + L-lysine = phosphate + N6-acetyl-L-lysine.
0	0	1	malic enzyme activity	Catalysis of the oxidative decarboxylation of malate with the concomitant production of pyruvate.
0	1	0	methionine adenosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-methionine + H2O = phosphate + diphosphate + S-adenosyl-L-methionine.
0	0	1	mRNA (nucleoside-2'-O-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + m7G(5')pppR-RNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + m7G(5')pppRm-RNA. R may be guanosine or adenosine.
0	1	0	methylcrotonoyl-CoA carboxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-methylbut-2-enoyl-CoA + ATP + bicarbonate = trans-3-methylglutaconyl-CoA + ADP + 2 H(+) + phosphate.
0	1	0	methylenetetrahydrofolate dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5,10-methylenetetrahydrofolate + NADP(+) = 5,10-methenyltetrahydrofolate + NADPH.
0	1	0	methylmalonate-semialdehyde dehydrogenase (acylating) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-methyl-3-oxopropanoate + CoA + NAD+ = propanoyl-CoA + CO2 + NADH + H+.
0	1	0	methylmalonyl-CoA mutase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (R)-methylmalonyl-CoA = succinyl-CoA.
1	1	0	monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the incorporation of one atom from molecular oxygen into a compound and the reduction of the other atom of oxygen to water.
1	0	0	kynurenine 3-monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-kynurenine + H(+) + NADPH + O(2) = 3-hydroxy-L-kynurenine + H(2)O + NADP(+).
1	0	0	phenylalanine 4-monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-phenylalanine + tetrahydrobiopterin + O2 = L-tyrosine + 4-alpha-hydroxytetrahydrobiopterin.
1	0	0	steroid 17-alpha-monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a steroid + AH2 + O2 = a 17a-hydroxysteroid + A + H2O.
0	1	0	tyrosine 3-monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-tyrosine + tetrahydrobiopterin + O2 = 3,4-dihydroxy-L-phenylalanine + 4-alpha-hydroxytetrahydrobiopterin + H2O.
0	0	1	nicotinate-nucleotide diphosphorylase (carboxylating) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CO(2) + diphosphate + nicotinate D-ribonucleotide = 5-phospho-alpha-D-ribose 1-diphosphate + 2 H(+) + quinolinate.
0	2	0	nicotinate-nucleotide adenylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + nicotinate ribonucleotide = diphosphate + deamido-NAD+.
0	0	1	nicotinate phosphoribosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: diphosphate + nicotinate D-ribonucleotide = 5-phospho-alpha-D-ribose 1-diphosphate + H(+) + nicotinate.
1	0	0	nitric-oxide synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-arginine + n NADPH + n H+ + m O2 = citrulline + nitric oxide + n NADP+.
1	1	4	nuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within nucleic acids.
4	5	5	endonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within nucleic acids by creating internal breaks.
2	1	2	endodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within deoxyribonucleic acid by creating internal breaks.
2	5	1	endoribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within ribonucleic acid by creating internal breaks.
1	1	0	ribonuclease A activity	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of RNA to 3'-phosphomononucleotides and 3'-phosphooligonucleotides ending in C-P or U-P with 2',3'-cyclic phosphate intermediates.
4	1	0	RNA-DNA hybrid ribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of RNA in RNA-DNA hybrids to 5'-phosphomonoesters.
1	1	0	ribonuclease III activity	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of RNA with 5'-phosphomonoesters and 3'-OH termini; makes two staggered cuts in both strands of dsRNA, leaving a 3' overhang of 2 nt.
0	1	2	ribonuclease P activity	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of RNA, removing 5' extra nucleotides from tRNA precursor.
5	2	1	exonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within nucleic acids by removing nucleotide residues from the 3' or 5' end.
2	0	0	phosphodiesterase I activity	Catalysis of the sequential hydrolytic removal of 5'-nucleotides from the 3'-hydroxy termini of 3'-hydroxy-terminated oligonucleotides.
1	0	0	deoxyribonuclease I activity	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of DNA to 5'-phosphodinucleotide and 5'-phosphooligonucleotide end products.
1	0	0	exoribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 5' or 3' terminus of an RNA molecule.
0	0	1	5'-3' exoribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 5' terminus of an RNA molecule.
1	2	1	poly(A)-specific ribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the exonucleolytic cleavage of poly(A) to 5'-AMP.
1	0	0	deoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within deoxyribonucleic acid.
3	3	2	ribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of phosphodiester bonds in chains of RNA.
0	1	0	tRNA-specific ribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of phosphodiester bonds in tRNA molecules.
1	3	0	nucleoside diphosphate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + nucleoside diphosphate = ADP + nucleoside triphosphate.
1	0	0	nucleotide diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a dinucleotide + H2O = 2 mononucleotides.
2	1	0	hydrolase activity, hydrolyzing O-glycosyl compounds	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of any O-glycosyl bond.
0	2	0	alpha-amylase activity	Catalysis of the endohydrolysis of (1->4)-alpha-D-glucosidic linkages in polysaccharides containing three or more alpha-(1->4)-linked D-glucose units.
1	0	0	alpha-1,4-glucosidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of terminal, non-reducing alpha-(1->4)-linked alpha-D-glucose residues with release of alpha-D-glucose.
1	0	0	oligo-1,6-glucosidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of (1->6)-alpha-D-glucosidic linkages in some oligosaccharides produced from starch and glycogen by alpha-amylase, and in isomaltose. Releases a free alpha-D-glucose.
1	0	0	sucrose alpha-glucosidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: sucrose + H2O = alpha-D-glucose + beta-D-fructose.
1	0	0	oligosaccharyl transferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a oligosaccharyl group to an acceptor molecule, typically another carbohydrate or a lipid.
0	0	1	dolichyl-diphosphooligosaccharide-protein glycotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dolichyl diphosphooligosaccharide + protein L-asparagine = dolichyl diphosphate + a glycoprotein with the oligosaccharide chain attached by glycosylamine linkage to protein L-asparagine.
1	0	0	dolichyl-phosphate beta-glucosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-glucose + dolichyl phosphate = UDP + dolichyl beta-D-glucosyl phosphate.
1	0	0	ornithine carbamoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: carbamoyl phosphate + L-ornithine = phosphate + L-citrulline.
0	1	0	orotate phosphoribosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: orotidine 5'-phosphate + diphosphate = orotate + 5-phospho-alpha-D-ribose 1-diphosphate.
0	1	0	orotidine-5'-phosphate decarboxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H(+) + orotidine 5'-phosphate = CO(2) + UMP.
0	0	1	pantothenate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + pantothenate = ADP + D-4'-phosphopantothenate.
1	2	0	peptide alpha-N-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + peptide = CoA + N-alpha-acetylpeptide. This reaction is the acetylation of the N-terminal amino acid residue of a peptide or protein.
0	0	1	peptide-aspartate beta-dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: peptide L-aspartate + 2-oxoglutarate + O2 = peptide 3-hydroxy-L-aspartate + succinate + CO2.
4	1	2	peroxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: donor + hydrogen peroxide = oxidized donor + 2 H2O.
3	1	2	glutathione peroxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 glutathione + hydrogen peroxide = oxidized glutathione + 2 H2O.
0	0	1	phosphatidate cytidylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CTP + phosphatidate = diphosphate + CDP-diacylglycerol.
0	1	0	phosphatidylserine decarboxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H(+) + phosphatidyl-L-serine = CO(2) + phosphatidylethanolamine.
0	0	1	phosphoacetylglucosamine mutase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosamine 1-phosphate = N-acetyl-D-glucosamine 6-phosphate.
1	0	0	phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: source of phosphate + oxaloacetate = phosphoenolpyruvate + CO2 + other reaction products.
1	0	0	phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase (GTP) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: GTP + oxaloacetate = GDP + phosphoenolpyruvate + CO2.
0	1	2	phosphoglucomutase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: alpha-D-glucose 1-phosphate = alpha-D-glucose 6-phosphate.
0	1	0	phosphogluconate dehydrogenase (decarboxylating) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 6-phospho-D-gluconate + NADP+ = D-ribulose 5-phosphate + CO2 + NADPH + H+.
0	0	1	phosphoglycerate dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-phosphoglycerate + NAD+ = 3-phosphohydroxypyruvate + NADH + H+.
0	1	1	phosphoglycerate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-phospho-D-glycerate + ATP = 3-phospho-D-glyceroyl phosphate + ADP + H(+).
0	0	3	phosphoglycerate mutase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-phospho-D-glycerate = 3-phospho-D-glycerate.
3	1	1	phospholipase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a glycerophospholipid.
1	2	1	lysophospholipase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-lysophosphatidylcholine + H2O = glycerophosphocholine + a carboxylate.
0	2	2	phospholipase A2 activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phosphatidylcholine + H2O = 1-acylglycerophosphocholine + a carboxylate.
0	3	0	phospholipase C activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a phospholipid + H2O = 1,2-diacylglycerol + a phosphatidate.
1	1	1	phospholipase D activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a phosphatidylcholine + H2O = choline + a phosphatidate.
0	0	3	phosphopyruvate hydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-phospho-D-glycerate = phosphoenolpyruvate + H2O.
0	0	1	phosphoribosylamine-glycine ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5-phospho-D-ribosylamine + ATP + glycine = N(1)-(5-phospho-D-ribosyl)glycinamide + ADP + 2 H(+) + phosphate.
0	0	1	phosphoribosylaminoimidazole carboxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5-amino-1-(5-phospho-D-ribosyl)imidazole-4-carboxylate + 2 H(+) = 5-amino-1-(5-phospho-D-ribosyl)imidazole + CO(2).
0	0	1	phosphoribosylaminoimidazolesuccinocarboxamide synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5-amino-1-(5-phospho-D-ribosyl)imidazole-4-carboxylate + L-aspartate + ATP = (2S)-2-[5-amino-1-(5-phospho-beta-D-ribosyl)imidazole-4-carboxamido]succinate + ADP + 2 H(+) + phosphate.
0	0	1	phosphoribosylformylglycinamidine cyclo-ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-(formamido)-N(1)-(5-phospho-D-ribosyl)acetamidine + ATP = 5-amino-1-(5-phospho-D-ribosyl)imidazole + ADP + 2 H(+) + phosphate.
0	1	0	phosphoribosylaminoimidazolecarboxamide formyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 10-formyltetrahydrofolate + 5'-phosphoribosyl-5-amino-4-imidazolecarboxamide = tetrahydrofolate + 5'-phosphoribosyl-5-formamido-4-imidazolecarboxamide.
0	0	1	phosphoribosylglycinamide formyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 10-formyltetrahydrofolate + N1-(5-phospho-D-ribosyl)glycinamide = tetrahydrofolate + N2-formyl-N1-(5-phospho-D-ribosyl)glycinamide.
1	0	0	1,4-alpha-oligoglucan phosphorylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1,4-alpha-D-glucosyl(n) + phosphate = 1,4-alpha-D-glucosyl(n-1) + alpha-D-glucose 1-phosphate. The name should be qualified in each instance by adding the name of the natural substrate, e.g. maltodextrin phosphorylase, starch phosphorylase, glycogen phosphorylase.
0	0	1	O-phospho-L-serine:2-oxoglutarate aminotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: O-phospho-L-serine + 2-oxoglutarate = 3-phosphonooxypyruvate + L-glutamate.
1	1	0	poly(ADP-ribose) glycohydrolase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of poly(ADP-ribose) at glycosidic (1''-2') linkage of ribose-ribose bond to produce free ADP-ribose.
0	1	1	polynucleotide adenylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the template-independent extension of the 3'- end of an RNA or DNA strand by addition of one adenosine molecule at a time. Cannot initiate a chain 'de novo'. The primer, depending on the source of the enzyme, may be an RNA or DNA fragment, or oligo(A) bearing a 3'-OH terminal group.
2	1	0	polypeptide N-acetylgalactosaminyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-N-acetyl-D-galactosamine + polypeptide = UDP + N-acetyl-D-galactosaminyl-polypeptide. This reaction is the modification of serine or threonine residues in polypeptide chains by the transfer of a N-acetylgalactose from UDP-N-acetylgalactose to the hydroxyl group of the amino acid; it is the first step in O-glycan biosynthesis.
0	0	1	porphobilinogen synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 5-aminolevulinate = 2 H(2)O + H(+) + porphobilinogen.
0	1	0	procollagen-proline 4-dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: procollagen L-proline + 2-oxoglutarate + O2 = procollagen trans-4-hydroxy-L-proline + succinate + CO2.
1	0	0	prenyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a prenyl group from one compound (donor) to another (acceptor).
0	1	0	protein farnesyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: farnesyl diphosphate + protein-cysteine = S-farnesyl protein + diphosphate.
0	1	0	protein geranylgeranyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the covalent addition of a geranylgeranyl (20-carbon isoprenoid) group via thioether linkages to a cysteine residue at or near the C terminus of a protein.
0	1	0	CAAX-protein geranylgeranyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: geranylgeranyl diphosphate + protein-cysteine = S-geranylgeranyl-protein + diphosphate. This reaction is the formation of a thioether linkage between the C-1 atom of the geranylgeranyl group and a cysteine residue fourth from the C-terminus of the protein. The protein substrates have the C-terminal sequence CA1A2X, where the terminal residue, X, is preferably leucine and A2 should not be aromatic. Known substrates include most g-subunits of heterotrimeric G proteins and Ras-related GTPases such as members of the Ras and Rac/Rho families.
0	1	0	Rab geranylgeranyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 geranylgeranyl diphosphate + protein-cysteine = 2 S-geranylgeranyl-protein + 2 diphosphate. This reaction is the formation of two thioether linkages between the C-1 atom of the geranylgeranyl groups and two cysteine residues within the terminal sequence motifs XXCC, XCXC or CCXX. Known substrates include Ras-related GTPases of a single family and the Rab family.
1	0	0	prostaglandin-D synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: prostaglandin H(2) = prostaglandin D(2).
25	52	45	protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the phosphorylation of an amino acid residue in a protein, usually according to the reaction: a protein + ATP = a phosphoprotein + ADP.
0	1	0	protein histidine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + protein L-histidine = ADP + protein phospho-L-histidine.
45	79	73	protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: ATP + protein serine = ADP + protein serine phosphate, and ATP + protein threonine = ADP + protein threonine phosphate.
2	0	0	transmembrane receptor protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Combining with a signal and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity by catalysis of the reaction: ATP protein serine = ADP + protein serine phosphate, and ATP + protein threonine = ADP + protein threonine phosphate.
0	0	1	3-phosphoinositide-dependent protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires the presence of a phosphatidylinositol-3-phosphate.
0	1	1	DNA-dependent protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires the presence of DNA.
2	1	3	AMP-activated protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires the presence of AMP.
1	6	5	calmodulin-dependent protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: ATP + a protein serine = ADP + protein serine phosphate; and ATP + a protein threonine = ADP + protein threonine phosphate. These reactions require the presence of calcium-bound calmodulin.
0	1	0	elongation factor-2 kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + [elongation factor 2] = ADP + [elongation factor 2] phosphate.
0	0	1	myosin light chain kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + myosin-light-chain = ADP + myosin-light-chain phosphate.
0	0	1	phosphorylase kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 4 ATP + 2 phosphorylase b = 4 ADP + phosphorylase a.
0	1	4	cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires the presence of cAMP.
1	1	0	cGMP-dependent protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires the presence of cGMP.
2	4	9	cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: ATP + protein serine = ADP + protein serine phosphate, and ATP + protein threonine = ADP + protein threonine phosphate. This reaction requires the binding of a regulatory cyclin subunit and full activity requires stimulatory phosphorylation by a CDK-activating kinase (CAK).
0	2	0	eukaryotic translation initiation factor 2alpha kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + [eukaryotic translation initiation factor 2 alpha subunit] = ADP + [eukaryotic translation initiation factor 2 alpha subunit] phosphate.
1	3	9	protein kinase C activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires diacylglycerol.
2	2	11	calcium-dependent protein kinase C activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires diacylglycerol and calcium.
0	0	2	calcium-independent protein kinase C activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires diacylglycerol but not calcium.
2	1	0	G protein-coupled receptor kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + G protein-coupled receptor = ADP + G protein-coupled receptor phosphate.
0	1	0	NF-kappaB-inducing kinase activity	Catalysis of the phosphorylation of the alpha or beta subunit of the inhibitor of kappaB kinase complex (IKK).
3	0	0	JUN kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: JUN + ATP = JUN phosphate + ADP. This reaction is the phosphorylation and activation of members of the JUN family, a gene family that encodes nuclear transcription factors.
0	3	0	JUN kinase kinase kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: JNKK + ATP = JNKK phosphate + ADP. This reaction is the phosphorylation and activation of JUN kinase kinases (JNKKs).
6	3	2	MAP kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein + ATP = protein phosphate + ADP. This reaction is the phosphorylation of proteins. Mitogen-activated protein kinase; a family of protein kinases that perform a crucial step in relaying signals from the plasma membrane to the nucleus. They are activated by a wide range of proliferation- or differentiation-inducing signals; activation is strong with agonists such as polypeptide growth factors and tumor-promoting phorbol esters, but weak (in most cell backgrounds) by stress stimuli.
3	3	6	MAP kinase kinase activity	Catalysis of the concomitant phosphorylation of threonine (T) and tyrosine (Y) residues in a Thr-Glu-Tyr (TEY) thiolester sequence in a MAP kinase (MAPK) substrate.
1	8	5	MAP kinase kinase kinase activity	Catalysis of the phosphorylation and activation of a MAP kinase kinase; each MAP kinase kinase can be phosphorylated by any of several MAP kinase kinase kinases.
1	2	3	ribosomal protein S6 kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ribosomal protein S6 + ATP = ribosomal protein S6 phosphate + ATP.
8	5	8	protein serine/threonine/tyrosine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: ATP + a protein serine = ADP + protein serine phosphate; ATP + a protein threonine = ADP + protein threonine phosphate; and ATP + a protein tyrosine = ADP + protein tyrosine phosphate.
17	21	6	protein tyrosine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein tyrosine = ADP + protein tyrosine phosphate.
29	25	11	transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine kinase activity	Combining with a signal and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity by catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein-L-tyrosine = ADP + a protein-L-tyrosine phosphate.
8	18	4	non-membrane spanning protein tyrosine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + protein L-tyrosine = ADP + protein L-tyrosine phosphate by a non-membrane spanning protein.
0	1	0	protein-L-isoaspartate (D-aspartate) O-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + protein L-beta-aspartate = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + protein L-beta-aspartate methyl ester.
3	5	7	phosphoprotein phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a phosphoprotein + H2O = a protein + phosphate. Together with protein kinases, these enzymes control the state of phosphorylation of cell proteins and thereby provide an important mechanism for regulating cellular activity.
9	4	5	protein serine/threonine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein serine phosphate + H2O = protein serine + phosphate, and protein threonine phosphate + H2O = protein threonine + phosphate.
0	0	1	calcium-dependent protein serine/threonine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: protein serine phosphate + H2O = protein serine + phosphate; and protein threonine phosphate + H2O = protein threonine + phosphate. These reactions require the presence of calcium ions.
19	16	11	protein tyrosine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein tyrosine phosphate + H2O = protein tyrosine + phosphate.
2	2	1	non-membrane spanning protein tyrosine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: non-membrane spanning protein tyrosine phosphate + H2O = non-membrane spanning protein tyrosine + phosphate.
1	0	0	pyridoxamine-phosphate oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: pyridoxamine 5'-phosphate + H2O + O2 = pyridoxal 5'-phosphate + NH3 + hydrogen peroxide.
0	2	0	pyrroline-5-carboxylate reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-proline + NADP+ = 1-pyrroline-5-carboxylate + NADPH + H+.
0	0	2	pyruvate dehydrogenase (acetyl-transferring) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: pyruvate + lipoamide = S-acetyldihydrolipoamide + CO2.
0	0	1	pyruvate dehydrogenase (acetyl-transferring) kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + pyruvate dehydrogenase (acetyl-transferring) = ADP + pyruvate dehydrogenase (acetyl-transferring) phosphate.
0	1	0	dihydrolipoyllysine-residue acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + dihydrolipoamide = CoA + S-acetyldihydrolipoamide.
0	0	1	pyruvate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: = ADP + H(+) + phosphoenolpyruvate => ATP + pyruvate.
2	2	3	retinol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: retinol + NAD+ = retinal + NADH + H+.
0	0	1	ribonucleoside-diphosphate reductase activity, thioredoxin disulfide as acceptor	Catalysis of the reaction: 2'-deoxyribonucleoside diphosphate + thioredoxin disulfide + H2O = ribonucleoside diphosphate + thioredoxin. Thioredoxin disulfide is the oxidized form of thioredoxin.
0	3	2	ribose phosphate diphosphokinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-ribose 5-phosphate + ATP = 5-phospho-alpha-D-ribose 1-diphosphate + AMP + 2 H(+).
1	0	0	ribose-5-phosphate isomerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-ribose 5-phosphate = D-ribulose 5-phosphate.
1	0	0	sepiapterin reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 7,8-dihydrobiopterin + NADP+ = sepiapterin + NADPH + H+.
0	0	1	serine-pyruvate transaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-serine + pyruvate = 3-hydroxypyruvate + L-alanine.
0	1	1	sphingomyelin phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H(2)O + sphingomyelin = ceramide + choline phosphate + H(+).
0	1	0	stearoyl-CoA 9-desaturase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: stearoyl-CoA + 2 ferrocytochrome b5 + O2 + 2 H+ = oleoyl-CoA + 2 ferricytochrome b5 + H2O.
0	0	1	steroid delta-isomerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a 3-oxo-delta(5)-steroid = a 3-oxo-delta(4)-steroid.
0	2	0	sterol esterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a steryl ester + H2O = a sterol + a fatty acid.
1	0	0	sterol O-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + a sterol = CoA + a sterol ester.
1	0	0	steryl-sulfatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-beta-hydroxyandrost-5-en-17-one 3-sulfate + H2O = 3-beta-hydroxyandrost-5-en-17-one + sulfate.
1	1	1	succinate-CoA ligase (ADP-forming) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + succinate + CoA = ADP + succinyl-CoA + phosphate.
1	1	1	succinate-CoA ligase (GDP-forming) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: GTP + succinate + CoA = GDP + succinyl-CoA + phosphate.
1	1	0	sulfate adenylyltransferase (ATP) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + sulfate = diphosphate + adenylylsulfate.
1	2	0	superoxide dismutase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 superoxide + 2 H+ = O2 + hydrogen peroxide.
2	1	0	thioredoxin-disulfide reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP(+) + thioredoxin = H(+) + NADPH + thioredoxin disulfide.
0	2	0	thiosulfate sulfurtransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: hydrogen cyanide + thiosulfate = H(+) + sulfite + thiocyanate.
0	1	0	thymidine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + thymidine = ADP + thymidine 5'-phosphate.
0	0	1	sedoheptulose-7-phosphate:D-glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate glyceronetransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: sedoheptulose 7-phosphate + D-glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate = D-erythrose 4-phosphate + D-fructose 6-phosphate.
1	0	1	transketolase activity	Catalysis of the reversible transfer of a 2-carbon ketol group (CH2OH-CO-) from a ketose phosphate donor to an aldose phosphate acceptor.
0	0	1	transposase activity	Catalysis of the transposition of transposable elements or transposons. Transposases are involved in recombination required for transposition and are site-specific for the transposon/transposable element.
3	3	0	triglyceride lipase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: triacylglycerol + H2O = diacylglycerol + a carboxylate.
0	0	1	triose-phosphate isomerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate = glycerone phosphate.
1	0	0	tRNA (guanine-N2-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA containing guanine = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing N2-methylguanine.
1	0	0	alanine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-alanine + tRNA(Ala) = AMP + diphosphate + L-alanyl-tRNA(Ala).
0	1	0	arginine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-arginine + tRNA(Arg) = AMP + diphosphate + L-arginyl-tRNA(Arg).
1	1	0	aspartate-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-aspartate + tRNA(Asp) = AMP + diphosphate + L-aspartyl-tRNA(Asp).
0	1	0	cysteine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-cysteine + tRNA(Cys) = AMP + diphosphate + L-cysteinyl-tRNA(Cys).
0	0	1	glutamate-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-glutamate + tRNA(Glu) = AMP + diphosphate + L-glutamyl-tRNA(Glu).
1	0	0	glutamine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-glutamine + tRNA(Gln) = AMP + diphosphate + L-glutaminyl-tRNA(Gln).
0	1	0	glycine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + glycine + tRNA(Gly) = AMP + diphosphate + glycyl-tRNA(Gly).
0	1	0	histidine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-histidine + tRNA(His) = AMP + diphosphate + L-histidyl-tRNA(His).
0	2	0	isoleucine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-isoleucine + ATP + tRNA(Ile) = L-isoleucyl-tRNA(Ile) + AMP + diphosphate + 2 H(+).
1	0	0	leucine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-leucine + ATP + tRNA(Leu) = AMP + diphosphate + 2 H(+) + Leu-tRNA(Leu).
1	0	0	lysine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-lysine + tRNA(Lys) = AMP + diphosphate + L-lysyl-tRNA(Lys).
1	0	0	methionine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-methionine + tRNA(Met) = AMP + diphosphate + L-methionyl-tRNA(Met).
0	2	0	phenylalanine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-phenylalanine + tRNA(Phe) = AMP + diphosphate + L-phenylalanyl-tRNA(Phe).
0	0	1	proline-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-proline + tRNA(Pro) = AMP + diphosphate + L-prolyl-tRNA(Pro).
1	0	0	serine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-serine + tRNA(Ser) = AMP + diphosphate + L-seryl-tRNA(Ser).
0	1	0	threonine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-threonine + tRNA(Thr) = AMP + diphosphate + L-threonyl-tRNA(Thr).
1	0	0	tryptophan-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + L-tryptophan + tRNA(Trp) = AMP + diphosphate + L-tryptophanyl-tRNA(Trp).
1	0	0	valine-tRNA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-valine + ATP + tRNA(Val) = L-valyl-tRNA(Val) + AMP + diphosphate + 2 H(+).
0	1	1	ubiquitin activating enzyme activity	Catalysis of the reaction: E1 + ubiquitin + ATP--> E1-ubiquitin + AMP + PPi, where the E1-ubiquitin linkage is a thioester bond between the C-terminal glycine of Ub and a sulfhydryl side group of an E1 cysteine residue. This is the first step in a cascade of reactions in which ubiquitin is ultimately added to a protein substrate.
20	28	16	ubiquitin-protein transferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of ubiquitin from one protein to another via the reaction X-Ub + Y --> Y-Ub + X, where both X-Ub and Y-Ub are covalent linkages.
13	15	17	thiol-dependent ubiquitin-specific protease activity	Catalysis of the thiol-dependent hydrolysis of a peptide bond formed by the C-terminal glycine of ubiquitin and another protein.
1	1	0	uracil DNA N-glycosylase activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of the N-C1' glycosidic bond between the damaged DNA base and the deoxyribose sugar, releasing a free base and leaving an apyrimidinic (AP) site. Enzymes with this activity recognize and remove uracil bases in DNA that result from the deamination of cytosine or the misincorporation of dUTP opposite an adenine.
1	0	1	uridine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + uridine = ADP + UMP.
1	0	0	xylulokinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-xylulose + ATP = D-xylulose 5-phosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
6	4	9	enzyme inhibitor activity	Binds to and stops, prevents or reduces the activity of an enzyme.
0	1	2	phospholipase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a phospholipase, an enzyme that catalyzes of the hydrolysis of a phospholipid.
5	3	7	protein kinase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a protein kinase, an enzyme which phosphorylates a protein.
3	1	1	cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase.
2	1	2	cAMP-dependent protein kinase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a cAMP-dependent protein kinase.
3	8	8	protein phosphatase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a protein phosphatase, an enzyme that hydrolyzes phosphate groups from phosphorylated proteins.
3	1	3	protein serine/threonine phosphatase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a serine/threonine protein phosphatase, an enzyme that catalyzes the reaction: protein serine/threonine phosphate + H2O = protein serine/threonine + phosphate.
5	6	8	endopeptidase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of an endopeptidase, any enzyme that hydrolyzes nonterminal peptide bonds in polypeptides.
12	10	6	serine-type endopeptidase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of serine-type endopeptidases, enzymes that catalyze the hydrolysis of nonterminal peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain; a serine residue (and a histidine residue) are at the active center of the enzyme.
2	1	6	cysteine-type endopeptidase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a cysteine-type endopeptidase, any enzyme that hydrolyzes peptide bonds in polypeptides by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile.
2	1	0	complement receptor activity	Combining with any component or product of the complement cascade and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	complement component C3a receptor activity	Combining with the C3a product of the complement cascade and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	complement component C3b receptor activity	Combining with the C3b product of the complement cascade and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	0	complement component C5a receptor activity	Combining with the C5a product of the complement cascade and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
6	3	0	nuclear receptor activity	Combining with a signal and transmitting the signal to the transcriptional machinery by interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific double-stranded genomic DNA sequence in order to modulate transcription by RNA polymerase II.
0	1	0	glucocorticoid receptor activity	Combining with a glucocorticoid and transmitting the signal within the cell trigger a change in cell activity or function.
12	8	5	transmembrane signaling receptor activity	Combining with an extracellular or intracellular signal and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity or state as part of signal transduction.
3	2	0	cytokine receptor activity	Combining with a cytokine and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	0	ciliary neurotrophic factor receptor activity	Combining with ciliary neurotrophic factor (CNTF) and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	0	type I interferon receptor activity	Combining with a type I interferon and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity. Type I interferons include the interferon-alpha, beta, delta, epsilon, zeta, kappa, tau, and omega gene families.
0	1	0	interleukin-1 receptor activity	Combining with interleukin-1 to initiate a change in cell activity. Interleukin-1 is produced mainly by activated macrophages and is involved in the inflammatory response.
0	0	1	interleukin-4 receptor activity	Combining with interleukin-4 and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	interleukin-10 receptor activity	Combining with interleukin-10 and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	0	interleukin-11 receptor activity	Combining with interleukin-11 and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
30	10	7	G protein-coupled receptor activity	Combining with an extracellular signal and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating an associated G-protein; promotes the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha subunit of a heterotrimeric G-protein complex.
1	0	0	alpha1-adrenergic receptor activity	Combining with epinephrine or norepinephrine to initiate a change in cell activity via activation of a G protein, with pharmacological characteristics of alpha1-adrenergic receptors; the activity involves transmitting the signal to the Gq alpha subunit of a heterotrimeric G protein.
1	0	0	alpha2-adrenergic receptor activity	Combining with epinephrine or norepinephrine to initiate a change in cell activity via activation of a G protein, with pharmacological characteristics of alpha2-adrenergic receptors; the activity involves transmitting the signal to the Gi alpha subunit of a heterotrimeric G protein.
0	1	0	angiotensin type II receptor activity	An angiotensin receptor activity that acts via Gi protein coupling and cGMP (NO) generation, and may also act via additional signaling mechanisms.
1	0	0	bradykinin receptor activity	Combining with bradykinin to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	1	0	chemokine receptor activity	Combining with a chemokine, and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity. Chemokines are a family of small chemotactic cytokines; their name is derived from their ability to induce directed chemotaxis in nearby responsive cells. All chemokines possess a number of conserved cysteine residues involved in intramolecular disulfide bond formation. Some chemokines are considered pro-inflammatory and can be induced during an immune response to recruit cells of the immune system to a site of infection, while others are considered homeostatic and are involved in controlling the migration of cells during normal processes of tissue maintenance or development. Chemokines are found in all vertebrates, some viruses and some bacteria.
1	0	0	prostaglandin receptor activity	Combining with a prostaglandin (PG) to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	thromboxane A2 receptor activity	Combining with thromboxane A2 (TXA(2)) and transmitting the signal across the membrane to activate an associated G-protein.
1	0	0	endothelin receptor activity	Combining with endothelin and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating an associated G-protein; promotes the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha subunit of a heterotrimeric G-protein complex.
0	1	0	luteinizing hormone receptor activity	Combining with luteinizing hormone (also called lutropin) to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	0	1	G protein-coupled GABA receptor activity	Combining with the amino acid gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA, 4-aminobutyrate) and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating an associated G-protein; promotes the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha subunit of a heterotrimeric G-protein complex.
1	1	0	histamine receptor activity	Combining with histamine to initiate a change in cell activity. Histamine is a physiologically active amine, found in plant and animal tissue and released from mast cells as part of an allergic reaction in humans.
1	1	0	ionotropic glutamate receptor activity	Catalysis of the transmembrane transfer of an ion by a channel that opens when glutamate has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
0	1	1	NMDA glutamate receptor activity	An cation channel that opens in response to binding by extracellular glutmate, but only if glycine is also bound and the membrane is depolarized.  Voltage gating is indirect, due to ejection of bound magnesium from the pore at permissive voltages.
1	0	0	leukotriene receptor activity	Combining with a leukotriene to initiate a change in cell activity. Leukotrienes are pharmacologically active substances with a set of three conjugated double bonds; some contain a peptide group based on cysteine.
2	0	0	melanocortin receptor activity	Combining with melanocortin to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	melanocyte-stimulating hormone receptor activity	Combining with melanocyte-stimulating hormone to initiate a change in cell activity.
4	0	1	olfactory receptor activity	Combining with an odorant and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity in response to detection of smell.
0	0	1	opioid receptor activity	Combining with an opioid (any narcotic derived from or resembling opium), and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating an associated G-protein.
2	2	0	G protein-coupled serotonin receptor activity	Combining with the biogenic amine serotonin and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating an associated G-protein. Serotonin (5-hydroxytryptamine) is a neurotransmitter and hormone found in vertebrates and invertebrates.
1	0	0	vasopressin receptor activity	Combining with vasopressin to initiate a change in cell activity.
5	2	3	transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine phosphatase activity	Combining with a signal and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity by catalysis of the reaction: protein tyrosine phosphate + H2O = protein tyrosine + phosphate.
3	1	0	ephrin receptor activity	Combining with an ephrin to initiate a change in cell activity.
4	0	0	GPI-linked ephrin receptor activity	Combining with a GPI-anchored ephrin to initiate a change in cell activity.
5	3	0	transmembrane-ephrin receptor activity	Combining with a transmembrane ephrin to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	0	1	epidermal growth factor-activated receptor activity	Combining with an epidermal growth factor and transmitting the signal across the plasma membrane to initiate a change in cell activity.
2	0	0	fibroblast growth factor-activated receptor activity	Combining with a fibroblast growth factor and transmitting the signal across the plasma membrane to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	0	hepatocyte growth factor-activated receptor activity	Combining with hepatocyte growth factor and transmitting the signal across the plasma membrane to initiate a change in cell activity.
2	0	0	insulin-activated receptor activity	Combining with insulin and transmitting the signal across the plasma membrane to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	1	insulin-like growth factor-activated receptor activity	Combining with insulin-like growth factor and transmitting the signal across the plasma membrane to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	0	1	macrophage colony-stimulating factor receptor activity	Combining with macrophage colony-stimulating factor (M-CSF) and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity by catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein-L-tyrosine = ADP + a protein-L-tyrosine phosphate.
1	0	0	stem cell factor receptor activity	Combining with stem cell factor (SCF) and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity by catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein-L-tyrosine = ADP + a protein-L-tyrosine phosphate. Stem cell factor is a cytokine that stimulates mast cell growth and differentiation.
3	1	1	transforming growth factor beta-activated receptor activity	Combining with a transforming growth factor beta (TGFbeta) and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity by catalysis of the reaction: ATP protein serine = ADP + protein serine phosphate, and ATP + protein threonine = ADP + protein threonine phosphate.
1	0	0	transforming growth factor beta receptor activity, type II	Combining with transforming growth factor beta to initiate a change in cell activity; upon ligand binding, binds to and catalyzes the phosphorylation of a type I TGF-beta receptor.
0	0	1	neurotrophin receptor activity	Combining with a neurotrophin, any of a family of growth factors that prevent apoptosis in neurons and promote nerve growth, and transmitting the signal to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	0	tumor necrosis factor-activated receptor activity	Combining with tumor necrosis factor, a proinflammatory cytokine produced by monocytes and macrophages, to initiate a change in cell function.
0	1	0	death receptor activity	Combining with an extracellular messenger (called a death ligand), and transmitting the signal from one side of the plasma membrane to the other to initiate apoptotic or necrotic cell death.
3	0	0	low-density lipoprotein particle receptor activity	Combining with a low-density lipoprotein particle and delivering the low-density lipoprotein particle into the cell via endocytosis.
0	0	1	netrin receptor activity	Combining with a netrin signal and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
9	5	1	scavenger receptor activity	Combining with any modified low-density lipoprotein (LDL) or other polyanionic ligand and delivering the ligand into the cell via endocytosis. Ligands include acetylated and oxidized LDL, Gram-positive and Gram-negative bacteria, apoptotic cells, amyloid-beta fibrils, and advanced glycation end products (AGEs).
1	0	2	signal recognition particle binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the signal recognition particle.
0	1	0	signal sequence binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a signal sequence, a specific peptide sequence found on protein precursors or mature proteins that dictates where the mature protein is localized.
0	2	3	nuclear export signal receptor activity	Combining with a nuclear export signal (NES) on a cargo to be transported, to mediate transport of a the cargo through the nuclear pore, from the nuclear lumen to the cytoplasm. The cargo can be either a RNA or a protein.
0	0	1	peroxisome matrix targeting signal-1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type 1 peroxisome targeting signal, a tripeptide with the consensus sequence (S/A/C)-(K/R/H)-L.
1	0	1	laminin receptor activity	Combining with a laminin, a glycoprotein that constitutes the majority of proteins in the basement membrane, to initiate a change in cell activity.
3	3	1	transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine kinase adaptor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that brings together a transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine kinase and one or more other molecules, permitting them to function in a coordinated way.
1	1	6	MAP-kinase scaffold activity	The binding activity of a molecule that functions as a physical support for the assembly of a multiprotein mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) complex. Binds multiple kinases of the MAPKKK cascade, and also upstream signaling proteins, permitting those molecules to function in a coordinated way. Bringing together multiple enzymes and their substrates enables the signal to be transduced quickly and efficiently.
4	12	21	protein kinase C binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with protein kinase C.
31	54	35	guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity	Stimulates the exchange of guanyl nucleotides associated with a GTPase. Under normal cellular physiological conditions, the concentration of GTP is higher than that of GDP, favoring the replacement of GDP by GTP in association with the GTPase.
1	3	3	GDP-dissociation inhibitor activity	Prevents the dissociation of GDP from a GTPase, thereby preventing GTP from binding.
1	0	1	Rab GDP-dissociation inhibitor activity	Prevents the dissociation of GDP from the small GTPase Rab, thereby preventing GTP from binding.
0	2	0	Rho GDP-dissociation inhibitor activity	Prevents the dissociation of GDP from the small GTPase Rho, thereby preventing GTP from binding.
2	3	2	GTPase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of any enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis of GTP to GDP and orthophosphate.
39	56	59	GTPase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a GTPase, an enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis of GTP.
24	33	38	signaling receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with one or more specific sites on a receptor molecule, a macromolecule that undergoes combination with a hormone, neurotransmitter, drug or intracellular messenger to initiate a change in cell function.
2	0	0	fibroblast growth factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the fibroblast growth factor receptor (FGFR).
1	1	1	frizzled binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a frizzled (fz) receptor.
2	2	3	Notch binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the Notch (N) protein, a surface receptor.
0	0	1	patched binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the patched (ptc) protein, a receptor for hedgehog proteins.
2	0	0	type II transforming growth factor beta receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type II transforming growth factor beta receptor.
3	3	1	death receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any member of the death receptor (DR) family. The DR family falls within the tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily and is characterized by a cytoplasmic region of ~80 residues termed the death domain (DD).
1	0	0	scavenger receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with scavenger receptors, a family of proteins that are expressed on myeloid cells and are involved in the uptake of effete cellular components and foreign particles.
8	4	6	cytokine activity	The activity of a soluble extracellular gene product that interacts with a receptor to effect a change in the activity of the receptor to control the survival, growth, differentiation and effector function of tissues and cells.
0	1	0	ciliary neurotrophic factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the ciliary neurotrophic factor receptor.
2	0	0	growth hormone receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the growth hormone receptor.
1	0	0	interleukin-4 receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the interleukin-4 receptor.
0	1	0	interleukin-5 receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the interleukin-5 receptor.
1	3	0	interleukin-6 receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the interleukin-6 receptor.
2	0	0	interleukin-12 receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the interleukin-12 receptor.
1	0	0	leukemia inhibitory factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the leukemia inhibitory factor receptor.
1	1	0	interleukin-1 receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the interleukin-1 receptor.
0	1	0	interleukin-1, type II receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a Type II interleukin-1 receptor.
1	0	0	interleukin-1 receptor antagonist activity	Blocks the binding of interleukin-1 to the interleukin-1 receptor complex.
5	6	5	epidermal growth factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the epidermal growth factor receptor.
2	7	8	insulin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the insulin receptor.
1	4	4	insulin-like growth factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the insulin-like growth factor receptor.
2	1	1	transforming growth factor beta receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the transforming growth factor beta receptor.
2	0	2	platelet-derived growth factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the platelet-derived growth factor receptor.
3	1	1	tumor necrosis factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the tumor necrosis factor receptor.
1	2	0	neurotrophin TRKA receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the neurotrophin TRKA receptor.
0	1	0	vascular endothelial growth factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any vascular endothelial growth factor receptor.
1	2	0	stem cell factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the stem cell factor receptor (SCFR), a type III transmembrane kinase receptor.
0	1	1	ErbB-2 class receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the protein-tyrosine kinase receptor Neu/ErbB-2/HER2.
20	33	21	integrin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an integrin.
3	3	3	hormone activity	The action characteristic of a hormone, any substance formed in very small amounts in one specialized organ or group of cells and carried (sometimes in the bloodstream) to another organ or group of cells in the same organism, upon which it has a specific regulatory action. The term was originally applied to agents with a stimulatory physiological action in vertebrate animals (as opposed to a chalone, which has a depressant action). Usage is now extended to regulatory compounds in lower animals and plants, and to synthetic substances having comparable effects; all bind receptors and trigger some biological process.
0	0	2	neuropeptide hormone activity	The action characteristic of a neuropeptide hormone, any peptide hormone that acts in the central nervous system. A neuropeptide is any of several types of molecules found in brain tissue, composed of short chains of amino acids; they include endorphins, enkephalins, vasopressin, and others. They are often localized in axon terminals at synapses and are classified as putative neurotransmitters, although some are also hormones.
17	15	51	structural molecule activity	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a complex or its assembly within or outside a cell.
9	13	57	structural constituent of cytoskeleton	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a cytoskeletal structure.
15	20	11	extracellular matrix structural constituent	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of the extracellular matrix.
1	2	2	structural constituent of eye lens	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of the lens of an eye.
3	1	4	transporter activity	Enables the directed movement of substances (such as macromolecules, small molecules, ions) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells.
2	0	0	ion channel activity	Enables the facilitated diffusion of an ion (by an energy-independent process) by passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism. May be either selective (it enables passage of a specific ion only) or non-selective (it enables passage of two or more ions of same charge but different size).
2	0	1	ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a channel that opens when a ryanodine class ligand has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
1	0	1	inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate-sensitive calcium-release channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a channel that opens when inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate (IP3) has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
0	0	1	intracellular cyclic nucleotide activated cation channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a cation by a channel that opens when intracellular cyclic nucleotide has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
1	0	0	intracellular cGMP-activated cation channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a cation by a channel that opens when intracellular cGMP has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
0	0	1	volume-sensitive anion channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of an anion by a volume-sensitive channel. An anion is a negatively charged ion. A volume-sensitive channel is a channel that responds to changes in the volume of a cell.
1	0	0	calcium activated cation channel activity	Enables the calcium concentration-regulatable energy-independent passage of cations across a lipid bilayer down a concentration gradient.
1	1	1	intracellular calcium activated chloride channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of chloride by a channel that opens in response to stimulus by a calcium ion or ions. Transport by a channel involves catalysis of facilitated diffusion of a solute (by an energy-independent process) involving passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel, without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism.
1	1	1	gap junction channel activity	A wide pore channel activity that enables a direct cytoplasmic connection from one cell to an adjacent cell. The gap junction can pass large solutes as well as electrical signals between cells. Gap junctions consist of two gap junction hemi-channels, or connexons, one contributed by each membrane through which the gap junction passes.
2	3	2	voltage-gated ion channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of an ion by a voltage-gated channel. An ion is an atom or group of atoms carrying an electric charge by virtue of having gained or lost one or more electrons. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
3	2	5	voltage-gated calcium channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a voltage-gated channel. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
1	2	5	calcium channel regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a calcium channel.
1	1	0	voltage-gated chloride channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a chloride ion by a voltage-gated channel. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
1	1	1	voltage-gated sodium channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a sodium ion by a voltage-gated channel. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
3	2	5	voltage-gated potassium channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a potassium ion by a voltage-gated channel. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
2	0	4	delayed rectifier potassium channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a potassium ion by a delayed rectifying voltage-gated channel. A delayed rectifying current-voltage relation is one where channel activation kinetics are time-dependent, and inactivation is slow.
1	0	0	anion channel activity	Enables the energy-independent passage of anions across a lipid bilayer down a concentration gradient.
5	8	3	chloride channel activity	Enables the facilitated diffusion of a chloride (by an energy-independent process) involving passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism.
2	3	1	cation channel activity	Enables the energy-independent passage of cations across a lipid bilayer down a concentration gradient.
3	4	5	calcium channel activity	Enables the facilitated diffusion of a calcium ion (by an energy-independent process) involving passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism.
1	1	1	potassium channel activity	Enables the facilitated diffusion of a potassium ion (by an energy-independent process) involving passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism.
1	0	0	sodium channel activity	Enables the facilitated diffusion of a sodium ion (by an energy-independent process) involving passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism.
0	0	1	amino acid:sodium symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: amino acid(out) + Na+(out) = amino acid(in) + Na+(in).
1	0	0	L-histidine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-histidine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-histidine is 2-amino-3-(1H-imidazol-4-yl)propanoic acid.
0	0	1	neutral amino acid:sodium symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: neutral amino acid(out) + Na+(out) = neutral amino acid(in) + Na+(in).
0	1	0	proline:sodium symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: proline(out) + Na+(out) = proline(in) + Na+(in).
4	0	1	L-glutamate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-glutamate from one side of a membrane to the other. L-glutamate is the anion of 2-aminopentanedioic acid.
1	0	1	high-affinity glutamate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of glutamate from one side of a membrane to the other. In high-affinity transport the transporter is able to bind the solute even if it is only present at very low concentrations.
1	1	1	inorganic phosphate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a inorganic phosphate from one side of a membrane to the other, up its concentration gradient. The transporter binds the solute and undergoes a series of conformational changes. Transport works equally well in either direction and is driven by a chemiosmotic source of energy. Secondary active transporters include symporters and antiporters.
0	1	0	high-affinity inorganic phosphate:sodium symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: HPO42-(out) + Na+(out) = HPO42-(in) + Na+(in). In high-affinity transport the transporter is able to bind the solute even if it is only present at very low concentrations.
3	0	1	lipid transporter activity	Enables the directed movement of lipids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells.
5	1	0	long-chain fatty acid transporter activity	Enables the transfer of long-chain fatty acids from one side of a membrane to the other. A long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
2	1	0	neurotransmitter transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the directed movement of a neurotransmitter into, out of or within a cell, or between cells. Neurotransmitters are any chemical substance that is capable of transmitting (or inhibiting the transmission of) a nerve impulse from a neuron to another cell.
0	1	0	nucleoside transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a nucleoside, a nucleobase linked to either beta-D-ribofuranose (ribonucleoside) or 2-deoxy-beta-D-ribofuranose, (a deoxyribonucleotide) from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	3	4	oxygen carrier activity	Binding to oxygen and delivering it to an acceptor molecule or a specific location.
0	1	0	purine nucleobase transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of purine nucleobases, one of the two classes of nitrogen-containing ring compounds found in DNA and RNA, from one side of a membrane to the other.
2	0	0	ATP transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of ATP, adenosine triphosphate, from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	1	0	glucose transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of the hexose monosaccharide glucose from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	0	1	myo-inositol transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of myo-inositol from one side of a membrane to the other. Myo-inositol is 1,2,3,4,5/4,6-cyclohexanehexol, a growth factor for animals and microorganisms.
0	0	1	myo-inositol:proton symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: myo-inositol(out) + H+(out) = myo-inositol(in) + H+(in).
2	0	0	water transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of water (H2O) from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	copper ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of copper (Cu) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	1	iron ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of iron (Fe) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	manganese ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of manganese (Mn) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	2	0	zinc ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of zinc (Zn) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	1	4	calcium transmembrane transporter activity, phosphorylative mechanism	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + Ca2+(cis) = ADP + phosphate + Ca2+(trans).
1	0	5	sodium:potassium-exchanging ATPase activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + Na+(in) + K+(out) = ADP + phosphate + Na+(out) + K+(in).
0	1	0	nucleoside:sodium symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: nucleoside(out) + Na+(out) = nucleoside(in) + Na+(in).
0	1	1	calcium:sodium antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Ca2+(in) + Na+(out) = Ca2+(out) + Na+(in).
1	1	1	sodium:phosphate symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Na+(out) + phosphate(out) = Na+(in) + phosphate(in).
2	1	5	inorganic anion exchanger activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: inorganic anion A(out) + inorganic anion B(in) = inorganic anion A(in) + inorganic anion B(out).
0	0	4	ATP:ADP antiporter activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP(out) + ADP(in) = ATP(in) + ADP(out).
1	0	0	pyruvate secondary active transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of pyruvate from one side of a membrane to the other, up its concentration gradient. The transporter binds the solute and undergoes a series of conformational changes. Transport works equally well in either direction and is driven by a chemiosmotic source of energy. Secondary active transporters include symporters and antiporters.
1	0	0	soluble NSF attachment protein activity	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with both N-ethylmaleimide-sensitive fusion protein (NSF) and a cis-SNARE complex (i.e. a SNARE complex in which all proteins are associated with the same membrane) and increasing the ATPase activity of NSF, thereby allowing ATP hydrolysis by NSF to disassemble the cis-SNARE complex.
6	7	7	SNAP receptor activity	Acting as a marker to identify a membrane and interacting selectively with one or more SNAREs on another membrane to mediate membrane fusion.
1	1	3	steroid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a steroid, any of a large group of substances that have in common a ring system based on 1,2-cyclopentanoperhydrophenanthrene.
0	0	1	androgen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any androgen, male sex hormones.
1	1	0	vitamin D binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with vitamin D, any of a group of related, fat-soluble compounds that are derived from delta-5,7 steroids and play a central role in calcium metabolism. Specific forms of vitamin D include calciferol (ergocalciferol; vitamin D2) and cholecalciferol (calciol; vitamin D3).
2	0	0	retinoid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with retinoids, any member of a class of isoprenoids that contain or are derived from four prenyl groups linked head-to-tail. Retinoids include retinol and retinal and structurally similar natural derivatives or synthetic compounds, but need not have vitamin A activity.
0	1	0	all-trans retinal binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with all-trans retinal, a compound that plays an important role in the visual process in most vertebrates. All-trans retinal (trans r., visual yellow) results from the bleaching of rhodopsin by light, in which the 11-cis form is converted to the all-trans form. Retinal is one of the forms of vitamin A.
8	4	2	fatty acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with fatty acids, aliphatic monocarboxylic acids liberated from naturally occurring fats and oils by hydrolysis.
9	6	5	iron ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with iron (Fe) ions.
1	4	3	copper ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with copper (Cu) ions.
79	63	82	calcium ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with calcium ions (Ca2+).
0	1	6	detection of calcium ion	The series of events in which a calcium ion stimulus is received by a cell and converted into a molecular signal.
23	20	66	calmodulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with calmodulin, a calcium-binding protein with many roles, both in the calcium-bound and calcium-free states.
9	10	8	collagen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with collagen, a group of fibrous proteins of very high tensile strength that form the main component of connective tissue in animals. Collagen is highly enriched in glycine (some regions are 33% glycine) and proline, occurring predominantly as 3-hydroxyproline (about 20%).
0	1	0	cytoskeletal regulatory protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein involved in modulating the reorganization of the cytoskeleton.
3	2	1	insulin-like growth factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an insulin-like growth factor, any member of a group of polypeptides that are structurally homologous to insulin and share many of its biological activities, but are immunologically distinct from it.
0	2	7	lamin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with lamin; any of a group of intermediate-filament proteins that form the fibrous matrix on the inner surface of the nuclear envelope.
0	3	6	profilin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with profilin, an actin-binding protein that forms a complex with G-actin and prevents it from polymerizing to form F-actin.
3	1	2	tropomyosin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with tropomyosin, a protein associated with actin filaments both in cytoplasm and, in association with troponin, in the thin filament of striated muscle.
188	276	246	ATP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ATP, adenosine 5'-triphosphate, a universally important coenzyme and enzyme regulator.
39	50	55	GTP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with GTP, guanosine triphosphate.
0	4	0	FK506 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the 23-membered macrolide lactone FK506.
1	0	0	galactose binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the aldohexose galactose (galacto-hexose), a common constituent of many oligo- and polysaccharides.
0	1	2	glucose binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the D- or L-enantiomer of glucose.
0	2	1	mannose binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with mannose, a monosaccharide hexose, stereoisomeric with glucose, that occurs naturally only in polymerized forms called mannans.
5	1	1	glycosaminoglycan binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any glycan (polysaccharide) containing a substantial proportion of aminomonosaccharide residues.
1	1	3	hyaluronic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with hyaluronic acid, a polymer composed of repeating dimeric units of glucuronic acid and N-acetyl glucosamine.
0	0	1	folic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with folic acid, pteroylglutamic acid. Folic acid is widely distributed as a member of the vitamin B complex and is essential for the synthesis of purine and pyrimidines.
16	17	22	phospholipid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phospholipids, a class of lipids containing phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester.
3	6	15	calcium-dependent phospholipid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phospholipids, a class of lipids containing phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester, in the presence of calcium.
2	1	5	1-phosphatidylinositol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol, any glycophospholipid with its sn-glycerol 3-phosphate residue is esterified to the 1-hydroxyl group of 1D-myo-inositol.
4	12	21	phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate, a derivative of phosphatidylinositol in which the inositol ring is phosphorylated at the 4' and 5' positions.
3	10	6	phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5-trisphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5-trisphosphate, a derivative of phosphatidylinositol in which the inositol ring is phosphorylated at the 3', 4' and 5' positions.
1	0	0	phospholipid transporter activity	Enables the directed movement of phospholipids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells. Phospholipids are a class of lipids containing phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester.
2	0	0	odorant binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an odorant, any substance capable of stimulating the sense of smell.
187	148	152	extracellular region	The space external to the outermost structure of a cell. For cells without external protective or external encapsulating structures this refers to space outside of the plasma membrane. This term covers the host cell environment outside an intracellular parasite.
1	1	4	fibrinogen complex	A highly soluble, elongated protein complex found in blood plasma and involved in clot formation. It is converted into fibrin monomer by the action of thrombin. In the mouse, fibrinogen is a hexamer, 46 nm long and 9 nm maximal diameter, containing two sets of nonidentical chains (alpha, beta, and gamma) linked together by disulfide bonds.
3	2	0	membrane attack complex	A protein complex produced by sequentially activated components of the complement cascade inserted into a target cell membrane and forming a pore leading to cell lysis via ion and water flow.
7	5	0	collagen trimer	A protein complex consisting of three collagen chains assembled into a left-handed triple helix. These trimers typically assemble into higher order structures.
0	1	0	fibrillar collagen trimer	Any triple helical collagen trimer that forms fibrils.
0	0	2	collagen type I trimer	A collagen trimer containing alpha(I) chains. The most common form of type I collagen is a heterotrimer containing two alpha1(I) chains and one alpha2(I) chain; homotrimers containing three alpha1(I) chains are also found. Type I collagen triple helices associate to form banded fibrils.
0	1	0	collagen type II trimer	A collagen homotrimer of alpha1(II) chains; type II collagen triple helices associate to form fibrils.
0	0	1	collagen type III trimer	A collagen homotrimer of alpha1(III) chains; type III collagen triple helices associate to form fibrils.
1	4	0	collagen type IV trimer	A collagen heterotrimer containing type IV alpha chains; [alpha1(IV)]2alpha2(IV) trimers are commonly observed, although more type IV alpha chains exist and may be present in type IV trimers; type IV collagen triple helices associate to form 3 dimensional nets within basement membranes.
0	1	0	collagen type V trimer	A collagen heterotrimer containing type V alpha chains; [alpha1(V)]2alpha2(V) and alpha1(V)alpha2(V)alpha3(V) trimers have been observed; type V collagen triple helices associate to form fibrils.
0	2	1	collagen type VI trimer	A collagen heterotrimer containing type VI alpha chains in alpha1(VI)alpha2(VI)alpha3(VI) trimers; type VI collagen triple helices associate to form beaded fibrils.
1	0	0	collagen type XII trimer	A collagen homotrimer of alpha1(XII) chains; type XII collagen triple helices may link sheet-forming or fibrillar collagens to other structures.
1	0	0	collagen type XIV trimer	A collagen homotrimer of alpha1(XIV) chains; type XIV collagen triple helices may link sheet-forming or fibrillar collagens to other structures.
0	1	0	collagen type XVI trimer	A collagen trimer containing alpha(XVI) chains; type XVI trimers can associate with microfibrils.
1	0	0	complement component C1 complex	A protein complex composed of six subunits of C1q, each formed of the three homologous polypeptide chains C1QA, C1QB, and C1QB, and tetramer of two C1QR and two C1QS polypeptide chains.
11	14	10	basement membrane	A collagen-containing extracellular matrix consisting of a thin layer of dense material found in various animal tissues interposed between the cells and the adjacent connective tissue. It consists of the basal lamina plus an associated layer of reticulin fibers.
1	1	0	laminin-1 complex	A laminin complex composed of alpha1, beta1 and gamma1 polypeptide chains.
1	0	0	laminin-2 complex	A laminin complex composed of alpha2, beta1 and gamma1 polypeptide chains.
0	1	0	laminin-3 complex	A laminin complex composed of alpha1, beta2 and gamma1 polypeptide chains.
0	1	0	laminin-5 complex	A laminin complex composed of alpha3, beta3 and gamma2 polypeptide chains.
1	1	1	interstitial matrix	A type of extracellular matrix found in interstitial connective tissue, characterized by the presence of fibronectins, proteoglycans, and types I, III, V, VI, VII and XII collagens.
172	128	148	extracellular space	That part of a multicellular organism outside the cells proper, usually taken to be outside the plasma membranes, and occupied by fluid.
0	3	1	intracellular anatomical structure	A component of a cell contained within (but not including) the plasma membrane. In eukaryotes it includes the nucleus and cytoplasm.
667	794	699	nucleus	A membrane-bounded organelle of eukaryotic cells in which chromosomes are housed and replicated. In most cells, the nucleus contains all of the cell's chromosomes except the organellar chromosomes, and is the site of RNA synthesis and processing. In some species, or in specialized cell types, RNA metabolism or DNA replication may be absent.
10	36	38	nuclear envelope	The double lipid bilayer enclosing the nucleus and separating its contents from the rest of the cytoplasm; includes the intermembrane space, a gap of width 20-40 nm (also called the perinuclear space).
4	5	13	nuclear inner membrane	The inner, i.e. lumen-facing, lipid bilayer of the nuclear envelope.
0	1	2	lamin filament	Any of a group of intermediate-filament proteins that form the fibrous matrix on the inner surface of the nuclear envelope. They are classified as lamins A, B and C.
0	3	2	integral component of nuclear inner membrane	The component of the nuclear inner membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
3	5	5	nuclear outer membrane	The outer, i.e. cytoplasm-facing, lipid bilayer of the nuclear envelope; continuous with the endoplasmic reticulum of the cell and sometimes studded with ribosomes.
0	1	2	nuclear envelope lumen	The region between the two lipid bilayers of the nuclear envelope; 20-40 nm wide.
0	2	2	annulate lamellae	Stacks of endoplasmic reticulum (ER) membranes containing a high density of nuclear pores, thought to form from excess nuclear membrane components, that have been described in a number of different cells. Annulate lamellar membranes are continuous with and embedded within the ER.
5	20	19	nuclear pore	Any of the numerous similar discrete openings in the nuclear envelope of a eukaryotic cell, where the inner and outer nuclear membranes are joined.
2	1	3	nuclear lamina	The fibrous, electron-dense layer lying on the nucleoplasmic side of the inner membrane of a cell nucleus, composed of lamin filaments. The polypeptides of the lamina are thought to be concerned in the dissolution of the nuclear envelope and its re-formation during mitosis. The lamina is composed of lamin A and lamin C filaments cross-linked into an orthogonal lattice, which is attached via lamin B to the inner nuclear membrane through interactions with a lamin B receptor, an IFAP, in the membrane.
520	708	553	nucleoplasm	That part of the nuclear content other than the chromosomes or the nucleolus.
0	1	1	nucleolar ribonuclease P complex	A ribonuclease P complex located in the nucleolus of a eukaryotic cell, where it catalyzes the 5' endonucleolytic cleavage of precursor tRNAs to yield mature tRNAs. Eukaryotic nucleolar ribonuclease P complexes generally contain a single RNA molecule that is necessary but not sufficient for catalysis, and several protein molecules.
2	8	2	replication fork	The Y-shaped region of a replicating DNA molecule, resulting from the separation of the DNA strands and in which the synthesis of new strands takes place. Also includes associated protein complexes.
0	1	2	alpha DNA polymerase:primase complex	A complex of four polypeptides, comprising large and small DNA polymerase alpha subunits and two primase subunits, which are capable of catalyzing the synthesis of an RNA primer on the lagging strand of replicating DNA and the subsequent synthesis of a smal stretch of DNA. The smaller of the two primase subunits alone can catalyze oligoribonucleotide synthesis.
1	1	0	DNA replication factor A complex	A conserved heterotrimeric complex that binds nonspecifically to single-stranded DNA and is required for multiple processes in eukaryotic DNA metabolism, including DNA replication, DNA repair, and recombination. In all eukaryotic organisms examined the complex is composed of subunits of approximately 70, 30, and 14 kDa.
0	0	1	DNA replication factor C complex	A complex that loads the DNA polymerase processivity factor proliferating cell nuclear antigen (PCNA) onto DNA, thereby permitting processive DNA synthesis catalyzed by DNA polymerase. In eukaryotes the complex consists of five polypeptides.
0	3	2	nuclear origin of replication recognition complex	A multisubunit complex that is located at the replication origins of a chromosome in the nucleus.
1	1	1	RNA polymerase II, core complex	RNA polymerase II, one of three nuclear DNA-directed RNA polymerases found in all eukaryotes, is a multisubunit complex; typically it produces mRNAs, snoRNAs, and some of the snRNAs. Two large subunits comprise the most conserved portion including the catalytic site and share similarity with other eukaryotic and bacterial multisubunit RNA polymerases. The largest subunit of RNA polymerase II contains an essential carboxyl-terminal domain (CTD) composed of a variable number of heptapeptide repeats (YSPTSPS). The remainder of the complex is composed of smaller subunits (generally ten or more), some of which are also found in RNA polymerases I and III. Although the core is competent to mediate ribonucleic acid synthesis, it requires additional factors to select the appropriate template.
2	1	0	RNA polymerase III complex	RNA polymerase III, one of three nuclear DNA-directed RNA polymerases found in all eukaryotes, is a multisubunit complex; typically it produces 5S rRNA, tRNAs and some of the small nuclear RNAs. Two large subunits comprise the most conserved portion including the catalytic site and share similarity with other eukaryotic and bacterial multisubunit RNA polymerases. The remainder of the complex is composed of smaller subunits (generally ten or more), some of which are also found in RNA polymerase I and others of which are also found in RNA polymerases I and II. Although the core is competent to mediate ribonucleic acid synthesis, it requires additional factors to select the appropriate template.
18	28	17	transcription regulator complex	A protein complex that is capable of associating with DNA by direct binding, or via other DNA-binding proteins or complexes, and regulating transcription.
3	4	2	transcription factor TFIID complex	A complex composed of TATA binding protein (TBP) and TBP associated factors (TAFs); the total mass is typically about 800 kDa. Most of the TAFs are conserved across species. In TATA-containing promoters for RNA polymerase II (Pol II), TFIID is believed to recognize at least two distinct elements, the TATA element and a downstream promoter element. TFIID is also involved in recognition of TATA-less Pol II promoters. Binding of TFIID to DNA is necessary but not sufficient for transcription initiation from most RNA polymerase II promoters.
2	3	0	Ada2/Gcn5/Ada3 transcription activator complex	A multiprotein complex that possesses histone acetyltransferase and is involved in regulation of transcription. Contains either GCN5 or PCAF in a mutually exclusive manner. The budding yeast complex includes Gcn5p, two proteins of the Ada family, and two TBP-associate proteins (TAFs); analogous complexes in other species have analogous compositions, and usually contain homologs of the yeast proteins. Both ATAC- or SAGA (see GO:0000124, SAGA complex) are involved in the acetylation of histone H3K9 and K14 residues.
0	1	0	transcription factor TFIIF complex	A general transcription initiation factor which in humans consists of a heterodimer of an alpha and a beta subunit. Helps recruit RNA polymerase II to the initiation complex and promotes translation elongation.
0	0	1	transcription factor TFIIH holo complex	A complex that is capable of kinase activity directed towards the C-terminal Domain (CTD) of the largest subunit of RNA polymerase II and is essential for initiation at RNA polymerase II promoters in vitro. It is composed of  the core TFIIH complex and the TFIIK complex.
2	3	3	chromatin silencing complex	Any protein complex that mediates changes in chromatin structure that result in transcriptional silencing.
2	1	1	anaphase-promoting complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex that degrades mitotic cyclins and anaphase inhibitory protein, thereby triggering sister chromatid separation and exit from mitosis. Substrate recognition by APC occurs through degradation signals, the most common of which is termed the Dbox degradation motif, originally discovered in cyclin B.
11	18	27	spliceosomal complex	Any of a series of ribonucleoprotein complexes that contain snRNA(s) and small nuclear ribonucleoproteins (snRNPs), and are formed sequentially during the spliceosomal splicing of one or more substrate RNAs, and which also contain the RNA substrate(s) from the initial target RNAs of splicing, the splicing intermediate RNA(s), to the final RNA products. During cis-splicing, the initial target RNA is a single, contiguous RNA transcript, whether mRNA, snoRNA, etc., and the released products are a spliced RNA and an excised intron, generally as a lariat structure. During trans-splicing, there are two initial substrate RNAs, the spliced leader RNA and a pre-mRNA.
3	1	3	U5 snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains small nuclear RNA U5.
0	0	1	U7 snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains the U7 snRNA and is required for the 3'-end processing of replication-dependent histone pre-mRNAs.
0	4	4	U2-type spliceosomal complex	Any spliceosomal complex that forms during the splicing of a messenger RNA primary transcript to excise an intron that has canonical consensus sequences near the 5' and 3' ends.
2	2	4	U1 snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains small nuclear RNA U1.
1	5	4	U2 snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains small nuclear RNA U2.
1	1	1	U4 snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains small nuclear RNA U4.
2	4	4	U12-type spliceosomal complex	Any spliceosomal complex that forms during the splicing of a messenger RNA primary transcript to excise an intron; the series of U12-type spliceosomal complexes is involved in the splicing of the majority of introns that contain atypical AT-AC terminal dinucleotides, as well as other non-canonical introns. The entire splice site signal, not just the terminal dinucleotides, is involved in determining which spliceosome utilizes the site.
0	1	0	U4atac snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains small nuclear RNA U4atac.
25	48	32	chromosome	A structure composed of a very long molecule of DNA and associated proteins (e.g. histones) that carries hereditary information.
1	3	5	telomerase holoenzyme complex	Telomerase is a ribonucleoprotein enzyme complex, with a minimal catalytic core composed of a catalytic reverse transcriptase subunit and an RNA subunit that provides the template for telomeric DNA addition. In vivo, the holoenzyme complex often contains additional subunits.
3	5	8	pericentric heterochromatin	Heterochromatin that is located adjacent to the CENP-A rich centromere 'central core' and characterized by the modified histone H3K9me3.
0	4	1	perichromatin fibrils	Structures of variable diameter visible in the nucleoplasm by electron microscopy, mainly observed near the border of condensed chromatin. The fibrils are enriched in RNA, and are believed to be sites of pre-mRNA splicing and polyadenylylation representing the in situ form of nascent transcripts.
118	162	137	nucleolus	A small, dense body one or more of which are present in the nucleus of eukaryotic cells. It is rich in RNA and protein, is not bounded by a limiting membrane, and is not seen during mitosis. Its prime function is the transcription of the nucleolar DNA into 45S ribosomal-precursor RNA, the processing of this RNA into 5.8S, 18S, and 28S components of ribosomal RNA, and the association of these components with 5S RNA and proteins synthesized outside the nucleolus. This association results in the formation of ribonucleoprotein precursors; these pass into the cytoplasm and mature into the 40S and 60S subunits of the ribosome.
1	1	2	small nucleolar ribonucleoprotein complex	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains an RNA molecule of the small nucleolar RNA (snoRNA) family and associated proteins. Most are involved in a step of processing of rRNA: cleavage, 2'-O-methylation, or pseudouridylation. The majority, though not all, fall into one of two classes, box C/D type or box H/ACA type.
0	4	0	RNA polymerase I complex	RNA polymerase I, one of three nuclear DNA-directed RNA polymerases found in all eukaryotes, is a multisubunit complex; typically it produces rRNAs. Two large subunits comprise the most conserved portion including the catalytic site and share similarity with other eukaryotic and bacterial multisubunit RNA polymerases. The remainder of the complex is composed of smaller subunits (generally ten or more), some of which are also found in RNA polymerase III and others of which are also found in RNA polymerases II and III. Although the core is competent to mediate ribonucleic acid synthesis, it requires additional factors to select the appropriate template.
566	699	690	cytoplasm	All of the contents of a cell excluding the plasma membrane and nucleus, but including other subcellular structures.
125	136	136	mitochondrion	A semiautonomous, self replicating organelle that occurs in varying numbers, shapes, and sizes in the cytoplasm of virtually all eukaryotic cells. It is notably the site of tissue respiration.
1	1	0	mitochondrial envelope	The double lipid bilayer enclosing the mitochondrion and separating its contents from the cell cytoplasm; includes the intermembrane space.
25	20	30	mitochondrial outer membrane	The outer, i.e. cytoplasm-facing, lipid bilayer of the mitochondrial envelope.
0	1	1	mitochondrial outer membrane translocase complex	A large complex of the mitochondrial outer membrane that mediates transport of proteins into all mitochondrial compartments.
34	15	27	mitochondrial inner membrane	The inner, i.e. lumen-facing, lipid bilayer of the mitochondrial envelope. It is highly folded to form cristae.
1	0	1	TIM23 mitochondrial import inner membrane translocase complex	The protein transport machinery of the mitochondrial inner membrane that typically transports proteins that possess a matrix-targeting N-terminal presequence. The TIM23 complex contains three essential Tim proteins: Tim17 and Tim23 are thought to build a preprotein translocation channel while Tim44 interacts transiently with the matrix heat-shock protein Hsp70 to form an ATP-driven import motor.
0	0	1	mitochondrial respirasome	The protein complexes that form the mitochondrial electron transport system (the respiratory chain), associated with the inner mitochondrial membrane. The respiratory chain complexes transfer electrons from an electron donor to an electron acceptor and are associated with a proton pump to create a transmembrane electrochemical gradient.
2	1	0	mitochondrial respiratory chain complex I	A protein complex located in the mitochondrial inner membrane that forms part of the mitochondrial respiratory chain. It contains about 25 different polypeptide subunits, including NADH dehydrogenase (ubiquinone), flavin mononucleotide and several different iron-sulfur clusters containing non-heme iron. The iron undergoes oxidation-reduction between Fe(II) and Fe(III), and catalyzes proton translocation linked to the oxidation of NADH by ubiquinone.
0	0	1	mitochondrial respiratory chain complex II, succinate dehydrogenase complex (ubiquinone)	A protein complex located in the mitochondrial inner membrane that forms part of the mitochondrial respiratory chain. Contains the four polypeptide subunits of succinate dehydrogenase, flavin-adenine dinucleotide and iron-sulfur. Catalyzes the oxidation of succinate by ubiquinone. Connects the TCA cycle with the respiratory chain.
5	0	1	mitochondrial respiratory chain complex III	A protein complex located in the mitochondrial inner membrane that forms part of the mitochondrial respiratory chain. Contains about 10 polypeptide subunits including four redox centers: cytochrome b/b6, cytochrome c1 and an 2Fe-2S cluster. Catalyzes the oxidation of ubiquinol by oxidized cytochrome c1.
3	0	0	mitochondrial respiratory chain complex IV	A protein complex located in the mitochondrial inner membrane that forms part of the mitochondrial respiratory chain. Contains the 13 polypeptide subunits of cytochrome c oxidase, including cytochrome a and cytochrome a3. Catalyzes the oxidation of reduced cytochrome c by dioxygen (O2).
4	0	3	mitochondrial proton-transporting ATP synthase complex	A proton-transporting ATP synthase complex found in the mitochondrial membrane.
0	0	1	mitochondrial proton-transporting ATP synthase, catalytic core	The hexamer, comprising three alpha and three beta subunits, that possesses the catalytic activity of the mitochondrial hydrogen-transporting ATP synthase.
1	0	4	mitochondrial permeability transition pore complex	A protein complex that connects the inner and outer membranes of animal mitochondria and acts as a pore that can open transiently to allow free diffusion of solutes between the mitochondrial matrix and the cytosol. The pore complex is formed of the voltage-dependent anion channel (VDAC), the adenine nucleotide translocase (ANT) and cyclophilin-D (CyP-D).
8	7	6	mitochondrial intermembrane space	The region between the inner and outer lipid bilayers of the mitochondrial envelope.
43	48	28	mitochondrial matrix	The gel-like material, with considerable fine structure, that lies in the matrix space, or lumen, of a mitochondrion. It contains the enzymes of the tricarboxylic acid cycle and, in some organisms, the enzymes concerned with fatty acid oxidation.
1	0	0	mitochondrial ribosome	A ribosome found in the mitochondrion of a eukaryotic cell; contains a characteristic set of proteins distinct from those of cytosolic ribosomes.
3	0	0	mitochondrial large ribosomal subunit	The larger of the two subunits of a mitochondrial ribosome. Two sites on the ribosomal large subunit are involved in translation: the aminoacyl site (A site) and peptidyl site (P site).
1	2	1	mitochondrial small ribosomal subunit	The smaller of the two subunits of a mitochondrial ribosome.
32	38	24	lysosome	A small lytic vacuole that has cell cycle-independent morphology and is found in most animal cells and that contains a variety of hydrolases, most of which have their maximal activities in the pH range 5-6. The contained enzymes display latency if properly isolated. About 40 different lysosomal hydrolases are known and lysosomes have a great variety of morphologies and functions.
43	46	28	lysosomal membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the lysosome and separating its contents from the cell cytoplasm.
1	0	0	secondary lysosome	Vacuole formed by the fusion of a lysosome with an organelle (autosome) or with a primary phagosome.
42	41	43	endosome	A vacuole to which materials ingested by endocytosis are delivered.
42	44	40	early endosome	A membrane-bounded organelle that receives incoming material from primary endocytic vesicles that have been generated by clathrin-dependent and clathrin-independent endocytosis; vesicles fuse with the early endosome to deliver cargo for sorting into recycling or degradation pathways.
16	24	24	late endosome	A prelysosomal endocytic organelle differentiated from early endosomes by lower lumenal pH and different protein composition. Late endosomes are more spherical than early endosomes and are mostly juxtanuclear, being concentrated near the microtubule organizing center.
6	8	4	multivesicular body	A type of endosome in which regions of the limiting endosomal membrane invaginate to form internal vesicles; membrane proteins that enter the internal vesicles are sequestered from the cytoplasm.
2	1	0	vacuole	A closed structure, found only in eukaryotic cells, that is completely surrounded by unit membrane and contains liquid material. Cells contain one or several vacuoles, that may have different functions from each other. Vacuoles have a diverse array of functions. They can act as a storage organelle for nutrients or waste products, as a degradative compartment, as a cost-effective way of increasing cell size, and as a homeostatic regulator controlling both turgor pressure and pH of the cytosol.
4	1	1	vacuolar membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the vacuole and separating its contents from the cytoplasm of the cell.
7	10	7	autophagosome	A double-membrane-bounded compartment that engulfs endogenous cellular material as well as invading microorganisms to target them to the lytic vacuole/lysosome for degradation as part of macroautophagy.
11	9	10	peroxisome	A small organelle enclosed by a single membrane, and found in most eukaryotic cells. Contains peroxidases and other enzymes involved in a variety of metabolic processes including free radical detoxification, lipid catabolism and biosynthesis, and hydrogen peroxide metabolism.
3	6	9	peroxisomal membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a peroxisome.
9	4	4	peroxisomal matrix	The volume contained within the membranes of a peroxisome; in many cells the matrix contains a crystalloid core largely composed of urate oxidase.
106	108	107	endoplasmic reticulum	The irregular network of unit membranes, visible only by electron microscopy, that occurs in the cytoplasm of many eukaryotic cells. The membranes form a complex meshwork of tubular channels, which are often expanded into slitlike cavities called cisternae. The ER takes two forms, rough (or granular), with ribosomes adhering to the outer surface, and smooth (with no ribosomes attached).
0	1	0	Sec61 translocon complex	A translocon complex that contains a core heterotrimer of conserved alpha, beta and gamma subunits, and may contain additional proteins (translocon-associated proteins or TRAPs); in budding yeast the core proteins are Sec61p, Sbh1p, and Sss1p. The Sec61 translocon complex functions in cotranslational and posttranslational translocation events.
1	1	2	signal recognition particle, endoplasmic reticulum targeting	A ribonucleoprotein particle of 325 kDa composed of a 7S (300 nucleotide) RNA molecule and a complex of six different polypeptides. This binds both to the N-terminal signal peptide for proteins destined for the endoplasmic reticulum as they emerge from the large ribosomal subunit and also to the ribosome. This binding arrests further translation thereby preventing the proteins from being released into the cytosol. The SRP-ribosome complex then diffuses to the endoplasmic reticulum where it is bound to the signal recognition particle receptor, which allows resumption of protein synthesis and facilitates the passage of the growing polypeptide chain through the translocon. Through a process involving GTP hydrolysis, the SRP-SRP receptor complex dissociates and SRP returns to the cytosol. Of the six polypeptides of SRP the 54 kDa subunit (SRP54) is the central player. It contains an N-terminal GTPase domain and a C-terminal domain that binds directly to the signal peptide and the SRP RNA. Examples of this component are found in Mus musculus, Saccharomyces cerevisiae and Arabidopsis thaliana.
37	47	41	endoplasmic reticulum lumen	The volume enclosed by the membranes of the endoplasmic reticulum.
101	93	81	endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the endoplasmic reticulum.
4	5	5	smooth endoplasmic reticulum	The smooth endoplasmic reticulum (smooth ER or SER) has no ribosomes attached to it. The smooth ER is the recipient of the proteins synthesized in the rough ER. Those proteins to be exported are passed to the Golgi complex, the resident proteins are returned to the rough ER and the lysosomal proteins after phosphorylation of their mannose residues are passed to the lysosomes. Glycosylation of the glycoproteins also continues. The smooth ER is the site of synthesis of lipids, including the phospholipids. The membranes of the smooth ER also contain enzymes that catalyze a series of reactions to detoxify both lipid-soluble drugs and harmful products of metabolism. Large quantities of certain compounds such as phenobarbital cause an increase in the amount of the smooth ER.
10	11	4	rough endoplasmic reticulum	The rough (or granular) endoplasmic reticulum (ER) has ribosomes adhering to the outer surface; the ribosomes are the site of translation of the mRNA for those proteins which are either to be retained within the cisternae (ER-resident proteins), the proteins of the lysosomes, or the proteins destined for export from the cell. Glycoproteins undergo their initial glycosylation within the cisternae.
12	15	10	endoplasmic reticulum-Golgi intermediate compartment	A complex system of membrane-bounded compartments located between endoplasmic reticulum (ER) and the Golgi complex, with a distinctive membrane protein composition; involved in ER-to-Golgi  and Golgi-to-ER transport.
135	120	129	Golgi apparatus	A membrane-bound cytoplasmic organelle of the endomembrane system that further processes the core oligosaccharides (e.g. N-glycans) added to proteins in the endoplasmic reticulum and packages them into membrane-bound vesicles. The Golgi apparatus operates at the intersection of the secretory, lysosomal, and endocytic pathways.
6	5	4	Golgi stack	The set of thin, flattened membrane-bounded compartments, called cisternae, that form the central portion of the Golgi complex. The stack usually comprises cis, medial, and trans cisternae; the cis- and trans-Golgi networks are not considered part of the stack.
13	10	2	Golgi lumen	The volume enclosed by the membranes of any cisterna or subcompartment of the Golgi apparatus, including the cis- and trans-Golgi networks.
1	0	2	Golgi medial cisterna	The middle Golgi cisterna (or cisternae).
2	2	5	Golgi-associated vesicle	Any vesicle associated with the Golgi complex and involved in mediating transport within the Golgi or between the Golgi and other parts of the cell.
4	10	5	cis-Golgi network	The network of interconnected tubular and cisternal structures located at the convex side of the Golgi apparatus, which abuts the endoplasmic reticulum.
19	28	29	trans-Golgi network	The network of interconnected tubular and cisternal structures located within the Golgi apparatus on the side distal to the endoplasmic reticulum, from which secretory vesicles emerge. The trans-Golgi network is important in the later stages of protein secretion where it is thought to play a key role in the sorting and targeting of secreted proteins to the correct destination.
9	18	11	lipid droplet	An intracellular non-membrane-bounded organelle comprising a matrix of coalesced lipids surrounded by a phospholipid monolayer. May include associated proteins.
69	96	84	centrosome	A structure comprised of a core structure (in most organisms, a pair of centrioles) and peripheral material from which a microtubule-based structure, such as a spindle apparatus, is organized. Centrosomes occur close to the nucleus during interphase in many eukaryotic cells, though in animal cells it changes continually during the cell-division cycle.
22	20	18	centriole	A cellular organelle, found close to the nucleus in many eukaryotic cells, consisting of a small cylinder with microtubular walls, 300-500 nm long and 150-250 nm in diameter. It contains nine short, parallel, peripheral microtubular fibrils, each fibril consisting of one complete microtubule fused to two incomplete microtubules. Cells usually have two centrioles, lying at right angles to each other. At division, each pair of centrioles generates another pair and the twin pairs form the pole of the mitotic spindle.
18	29	27	microtubule organizing center	An intracellular structure that can catalyze gamma-tubulin-dependent microtubule nucleation and that can anchor microtubules by interacting with their minus ends, plus ends or sides.
18	23	31	spindle	The array of microtubules and associated molecules that forms between opposite poles of a eukaryotic cell during mitosis or meiosis and serves to move the duplicated chromosomes apart.
0	1	2	actomyosin contractile ring	A cytoskeletal structure composed of actin filaments and myosin that forms beneath the plasma membrane of many cells, including animal cells and yeast cells, in a plane perpendicular to the axis of the spindle, i.e. the cell division plane.  In animal cells, the contractile ring is located at the cleavage furrow. In budding fungal cells, e.g. mitotic S. cerevisiae cells, the contractile ring forms at the mother-bud neck before mitosis.
0	1	1	polar microtubule	Any of the spindle microtubules that come from each pole and overlap at the spindle midzone. This interdigitating structure consisting of antiparallel microtubules is responsible for pushing the poles of the spindle apart.
0	1	2	kinetochore microtubule	Any of the spindle microtubules that attach to the kinetochores of chromosomes by their plus ends, and maneuver the chromosomes during mitotic or meiotic chromosome segregation.
700	936	856	cytosol	The part of the cytoplasm that does not contain organelles but which does contain other particulate matter, such as protein complexes.
2	4	3	chaperonin-containing T-complex	A multisubunit ring-shaped complex that mediates protein folding in the cytosol without a cofactor.
0	4	3	hemoglobin complex	An iron-containing, oxygen carrying complex. In vertebrates it is made up of two pairs of associated globin polypeptide chains, each chain carrying a noncovalently bound heme prosthetic group.
3	4	6	heterotrimeric G-protein complex	Any of a family of heterotrimeric GTP-binding and hydrolyzing proteins; they belong to a superfamily of GTPases that includes monomeric proteins such as EF-Tu and RAS. Heterotrimeric G-proteins consist of three subunits; the alpha subunit contains the guanine nucleotide binding site and possesses GTPase activity; the beta and gamma subunits are tightly associated and function as a beta-gamma heterodimer; extrinsic plasma membrane proteins (cytoplasmic face) that function as a complex to transduce signals from G protein-coupled receptors to an effector protein.
1	0	2	proteasome regulatory particle	A multisubunit complex, which caps one or both ends of the proteasome core complex. This complex recognizes and unfolds ubiquitinated proteins, and translocates them to the proteasome core complex.
6	3	8	proteasome core complex	A multisubunit barrel shaped endoprotease complex, which is the core of the proteasome complex.
12	9	7	ribosome	An intracellular organelle, about 200 A in diameter, consisting of RNA and protein. It is the site of protein biosynthesis resulting from translation of messenger RNA (mRNA). It consists of two subunits, one large and one small, each containing only protein and RNA. Both the ribosome and its subunits are characterized by their sedimentation coefficients, expressed in Svedberg units (symbol: S). Hence, the prokaryotic ribosome (70S) comprises a large (50S) subunit and a small (30S) subunit, while the eukaryotic ribosome (80S) comprises a large (60S) subunit and a small (40S) subunit. Two sites on the ribosomal large subunit are involved in translation, namely the aminoacyl site (A site) and peptidyl site (P site). Ribosomes from prokaryotes, eukaryotes, mitochondria, and chloroplasts have characteristically distinct ribosomal proteins.
3	9	11	polysome	A multiribosomal structure representing a linear array of ribosomes held together by messenger RNA. They represent the active complexes in cellular protein synthesis and are able to incorporate amino acids into polypeptides both in vivo and in vitro.
2	4	0	mRNA cap binding complex	Any protein complex that binds to an mRNA cap at any time in the lifetime of the mRNA.
1	0	0	nuclear cap binding complex	A conserved heterodimeric protein complex that binds to the 5' terminal cap structure m7G(5')ppp(5')N of nascent eukaryotic RNA polymerase II transcripts such as pre-mRNA and U snRNA. The consists of proteins known as CBP20 and CBP80, binds to cap structures in the nucleus, and is involved in pre-mRNA splicing, 3'-end formation, and RNA nuclear export.
2	3	4	mRNA cleavage and polyadenylation specificity factor complex	A multisubunit complex that binds to the canonical AAUAAA hexamer and to U-rich upstream sequence elements on the pre-mRNA, thereby stimulating the otherwise weakly active and nonspecific polymerase to elongate efficiently RNAs containing a poly(A) signal.
1	1	3	mRNA cleavage factor complex	Any macromolecular complex involved in cleavage or polyadenylation of mRNA molecules.
0	3	1	eukaryotic translation initiation factor 2 complex	Complex of three heterogeneous polypeptide chains, that form a ternary complex with initiator methionyl-tRNA and GTP. This ternary complex binds to free 40S subunit, which subsequently binds the 5' end of mRNA.
0	2	0	eukaryotic translation initiation factor 2B complex	A multisubunit guanine nucleotide exchange factor which catalyzes the exchange of GDP bound to initiation factor eIF2 for GTP, generating active eIF2-GTP. In humans, it is composed of five subunits, alpha, beta, delta, gamma and epsilon.
4	4	3	eukaryotic translation initiation factor 3 complex	A complex of several polypeptides that plays at least two important roles in protein synthesis: First, eIF3 binds to the 40S ribosome and facilitates loading of the Met-tRNA/eIF2.GTP ternary complex to form the 43S preinitiation complex. Subsequently, eIF3 apparently assists eIF4 in recruiting mRNAs to the 43S complex. The eIF3 complex contains five conserved core subunits, and may contain several additional proteins; the non-core subunits are thought to mediate association of the complex with specific sets of mRNAs.
0	1	3	eukaryotic translation elongation factor 1 complex	A multisubunit nucleotide exchange complex that binds GTP and aminoacyl-tRNAs, and catalyzes their codon-dependent placement at the A-site of the ribosome. In humans, the complex is composed of four subunits, alpha, beta, delta and gamma.
2	2	0	nascent polypeptide-associated complex	A heterodimeric protein complex that can reversibly bind to ribosomes, and is located in direct proximity to newly synthesized polypeptide chains as they emerge from the ribosome.
55	75	104	cytoskeleton	Any of the various filamentous elements that form the internal framework of cells, and typically remain after treatment of the cells with mild detergent to remove membrane constituents and soluble components of the cytoplasm. The term embraces intermediate filaments, microfilaments, microtubules, the microtrabecular lattice, and other structures characterized by a polymeric filamentous nature and long-range order within the cell. The various elements of the cytoskeleton not only serve in the maintenance of cellular shape but also have roles in other cellular functions, including cellular movement, cell division, endocytosis, and movement of organelles.
2	0	0	axonemal dynein complex	A dynein complex found in eukaryotic cilia and flagella; the motor domain heads interact with adjacent microtubules to generate a sliding force which is converted to a bending motion.
5	1	8	muscle myosin complex	A filament of myosin found in a muscle cell of any type.
1	0	0	troponin complex	A complex of accessory proteins (typically troponin T, troponin I and troponin C) found associated with actin in muscle thin filaments; involved in calcium regulation of muscle contraction.
2	1	0	muscle thin filament tropomyosin	A form of the tropomyosin dimer found associated with actin and the troponin complex in muscle thin filaments.
1	0	0	striated muscle myosin thick filament	Bipolar filaments formed of polymers of a muscle-specific myosin II isoform, found in the middle of sarcomeres in myofibrils.
2	0	3	striated muscle thin filament	Filaments formed of actin and associated proteins; attached to Z discs at either end of sarcomeres in myofibrils.
1	0	9	cytoplasmic dynein complex	Any dynein complex with a homodimeric dynein heavy chain core that catalyzes movement along a microtubule. Cytoplasmic dynein complexes participate in many cytoplasmic transport activities in eukaryotes, such as mRNA localization, intermediate filament transport, nuclear envelope breakdown, apoptosis, transport of centrosomal proteins, mitotic spindle assembly, virus transport, kinetochore functions, and movement of signaling and spindle checkpoint proteins. Some complexes participate in intraflagellar transport. Subunits associated with the dynein heavy chain mediate association between dynein heavy chain and cargoes, and may include light chains and light intermediate chains.
1	0	6	dynactin complex	A 20S multiprotein assembly of total mass about 1.2 MDa that activates dynein-based activity in vivo. A large structural component of the complex is an actin-like 40 nm filament composed of actin-related protein, to which other components attach.
9	14	6	kinesin complex	Any complex that includes a dimer of molecules from the kinesin superfamily, a group of related proteins that contain an extended region of predicted alpha-helical coiled coil in the main chain that likely produces dimerization. The native complexes of several kinesin family members have also been shown to contain additional peptides, often designated light chains as all of the noncatalytic subunits that are currently known are smaller than the chain that contains the motor unit. Kinesin complexes generally possess a force-generating enzymatic activity, or motor, which converts the free energy of the gamma phosphate bond of ATP into mechanical work.
34	55	74	microtubule	Any of the long, generally straight, hollow tubes of internal diameter 12-15 nm and external diameter 24 nm found in a wide variety of eukaryotic cells; each consists (usually) of 13 protofilaments of polymeric tubulin, staggered in such a manner that the tubulin monomers are arranged in a helical pattern on the microtubular surface, and with the alpha/beta axes of the tubulin subunits parallel to the long axis of the tubule; exist in equilibrium with pool of tubulin monomers and can be rapidly assembled or disassembled in response to physiological stimuli; concerned with force generation, e.g. in the spindle.
1	8	10	microtubule associated complex	Any multimeric complex connected to a microtubule.
1	4	10	spindle microtubule	Any microtubule that is part of a mitotic or meiotic spindle; anchored at one spindle pole.
0	0	1	axonemal microtubule	A microtubule in the axoneme of a eukaryotic cilium or flagellum; an axoneme contains nine modified doublet microtubules, which may or may not surround a pair of single microtubules.
0	0	1	nuclear microtubule	Any microtubule in the nucleus of a cell.
7	8	7	cytoplasmic microtubule	Any microtubule in the cytoplasm of a cell.
9	11	26	intermediate filament	A cytoskeletal structure that forms a distinct elongated structure, characteristically 10 nm in diameter, that occurs in the cytoplasm of eukaryotic cells. Intermediate filaments form a fibrous system, composed of chemically heterogeneous subunits and involved in mechanically integrating the various components of the cytoplasmic space. Intermediate filaments may be divided into five chemically distinct classes: Type I, acidic keratins; Type II, basic keratins; Type III, including desmin, vimentin and others; Type IV, neurofilaments and related filaments; and Type V, lamins.
0	1	4	neurofilament	A type of intermediate filament found in the core of neuronal axons. Neurofilaments are heteropolymers composed of three type IV polypeptides: NF-L, NF-M, and NF-H (for low, middle, and high molecular weight). Neurofilaments are responsible for the radial growth of an axon and determine axonal diameter.
11	16	19	actin filament	A filamentous structure formed of a two-stranded helical polymer of the protein actin and associated proteins. Actin filaments are a major component of the contractile apparatus of skeletal muscle and the microfilaments of the cytoskeleton of eukaryotic cells. The filaments, comprising polymerized globular actin molecules, appear as flexible structures with a diameter of 5-9 nm. They are organized into a variety of linear bundles, two-dimensional networks, and three dimensional gels. In the cytoskeleton they are most highly concentrated in the cortex of the cell just beneath the plasma membrane.
1	5	2	Arp2/3 protein complex	A stable protein complex that contains two actin-related proteins, Arp2 and Arp3, and five novel proteins (ARPC1-5), and functions in the nucleation of branched actin filaments.
474	420	506	plasma membrane	The membrane surrounding a cell that separates the cell from its external environment. It consists of a phospholipid bilayer and associated proteins.
147	71	71	integral component of plasma membrane	The component of the plasma membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
1	0	5	sodium:potassium-exchanging ATPase complex	Sodium:potassium-exchanging ATPases are tetrameric proteins, consisting of two large alpha subunits and two smaller beta subunits. The alpha subunits bear the active site and penetrate the membrane, while the beta subunits carry oligosaccharide groups and face the cell exterior.
1	0	7	voltage-gated calcium channel complex	A protein complex that forms a transmembrane channel through which calcium ions may pass in response to changes in membrane potential.
0	0	1	acetylcholine-gated channel complex	A homo- or hetero-pentameric protein complex that forms a transmembrane channel through which ions may pass in response to acetylcholine binding.
0	1	0	interleukin-5 receptor complex	A protein complex that binds interleukin-3; comprises an alpha and a beta subunit. The alpha chain is specific to the interleukin-5 receptor, whereas the beta chain is shared with the receptors for granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor and interleukin-3.
0	2	0	interleukin-6 receptor complex	A hexameric protein complex consisting of two molecules each of interleukin-6, interleukin-6 receptor alpha chain, and gp-130.
2	0	1	insulin receptor complex	A disulfide-bonded, heterotetrameric receptor complex. The alpha chains are entirely extracellular, while each beta chain has one transmembrane domain. The ligand binds to the alpha subunit extracellular domain and the kinase is associated with the beta subunit intracellular domain.
0	1	0	oncostatin-M receptor complex	A heterodimeric receptor for the cytokine oncostatin-M (OSM). In humans the receptor complex is made up of the gene products gp130 and OSMR-beta.
10	13	12	caveola	A membrane raft that forms small pit, depression, or invagination that communicates with the outside of a cell and extends inward, indenting the cytoplasm and the cell membrane. Examples include flask-shaped invaginations of the plasma membrane in adipocytes associated with caveolin proteins, and minute pits or incuppings of the cell membrane formed during pinocytosis.  Caveolae may be pinched off to form free vesicles within the cytoplasm.
16	11	11	microvillus	Thin cylindrical membrane-covered projections on the surface of an animal cell containing a core bundle of actin filaments. Present in especially large numbers on the absorptive surface of intestinal cells.
9	9	12	brush border	The dense covering of microvilli on the apical surface of a epithelial cells in tissues such as the intestine, kidney, and choroid plexus; the microvilli aid absorption by increasing the surface area of the cell.
12	10	18	clathrin-coated pit	A part of the endomembrane system in the form of an invagination of a membrane upon which a clathrin coat forms, and that can be converted by vesicle budding into a clathrin-coated vesicle. Coated pits form on the plasma membrane, where they are involved in receptor-mediated selective transport of many proteins and other macromolecules across the cell membrane, in the trans-Golgi network, and on some endosomes.
30	31	42	cell-cell junction	A cell junction that forms a connection between two or more cells in a multicellular organism; excludes direct cytoplasmic intercellular bridges, such as ring canals in insects.
16	28	54	adherens junction	A cell-cell junction composed of the epithelial cadherin-catenin complex. The epithelial cadherins, or E-cadherins, of each interacting cell extend through the plasma membrane into the extracellular space and bind to each other. The E-cadherins bind to catenins on the cytoplasmic side of the membrane, where the E-cadherin-catenin complex binds to cytoskeletal components and regulatory and signaling molecules.
0	0	1	spot adherens junction	A small cell-cell adherens junction assembled during the cellularization stage of insect embyrogenesis; spot adherens junctions later fuse to form the zonula adherens.
0	2	7	zonula adherens	A cell-cell adherens junction which forms a continuous belt near the apex of epithelial cells.
0	0	6	fascia adherens	A cell-cell junction that contains the transmembrane protein N-cadherin, which interacts with identical molecules from neighbouring cells to form a tight mechanical intercellular link; forms a large portion of the intercalated disc, the structure at which myofibrils terminate in cardiomyocytes.
2	0	4	gap junction	A cell-cell junction composed of pannexins or innexins and connexins, two different families of channel-forming proteins.
1	1	1	connexin complex	An assembly of six molecules of connexin, made in the Golgi apparatus and subsequently transported to the plasma membrane, where docking of two connexons on apposed plasma membranes across the extracellular space forms a gap junction.
17	24	19	bicellular tight junction	An occluding cell-cell junction that is composed of a branching network of sealing strands that completely encircles the apical end of each cell in an epithelial sheet; the outer leaflets of the two interacting plasma membranes are seen to be tightly apposed where sealing strands are present. Each sealing strand is composed of a long row of transmembrane adhesion proteins embedded in each of the two interacting plasma membranes.
52	82	150	focal adhesion	A cell-substrate junction that anchors the cell to the extracellular matrix and that forms a point of termination of actin filaments. In insects focal adhesion has also been referred to as hemi-adherens junction (HAJ).
22	21	8	cilium	A specialized eukaryotic organelle that consists of a filiform extrusion of the cell surface and of some cytoplasmic parts. Each cilium is largely bounded by an extrusion of the cytoplasmic (plasma) membrane, and contains a regular longitudinal array of microtubules, anchored to a basal body.
17	7	7	axoneme	The bundle of microtubules and associated proteins that forms the core of cilia (also called flagella) in eukaryotic cells and is responsible for their movements.
22	22	42	cell cortex	The region of a cell that lies just beneath the plasma membrane and often, but not always, contains a network of actin filaments and associated proteins.
1	2	5	septin ring	A tight ring-shaped structure that forms in the division plane at the site of cytokinesis; composed of members of the conserved family of filament-forming proteins called septins as well as septin-associated proteins. This type of septin structure is observed at the bud neck of budding fungal cells, at the site of cell division in animal cells, at the junction between the mother cell and a pseudohyphal projection, and also within hyphae of filamentous fungi at sites where a septum will form.
3	2	2	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex	A protein complex capable of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase activity and containing subunits of any phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K) enzyme. These complexes are divided in three classes (called I, II and III) that differ for their presence across taxonomic groups and for the type of their constituents. Catalytic subunits of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase enzymes are present in all 3 classes; regulatory subunits of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase enzymes are present in classes I and III; adaptor proteins have been observed in class II complexes and may be present in other classes too.
0	1	1	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex, class IA	A class I phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex that possesses 1-phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate 3-kinase activity; comprises a catalytic class IA phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K) subunit and an associated SH2 domain-containing regulatory subunit that is a member of a family of related proteins often called p85 proteins. Through the interaction with the SH2-containing adaptor subunits, Class IA PI3K catalytic subunits are linked to tyrosine kinase signaling pathways.
2	0	1	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex, class IB	A class I phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex that possesses 1-phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate 3-kinase activity; comprises a catalytic class IB phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K) subunit and an associated regulatory subunit that is larger than, and unrelated to, the p85 proteins present in class IA complexes. Class IB PI3Ks are stimulated by G-proteins and do not interact with the SH2-domain containing adaptors that bind to Class IA PI3Ks.
1	1	1	6-phosphofructokinase complex	A protein complex that possesses 6-phosphofructokinase activity; homodimeric, homooctameric, and allosteric homotetrameric forms are known.
0	0	2	mitochondrial alpha-ketoglutarate dehydrogenase complex	Mitochondrial complex that possesses alpha-ketoglutarate dehydrogenase activity.
1	0	0	acetolactate synthase complex	A dimeric (a large and a small chain) or tetrameric (two large and two small chains) enzyme complex. Catalyzes the formation of acetolactate from pyruvate.
1	1	4	cAMP-dependent protein kinase complex	An enzyme complex, composed of regulatory and catalytic subunits, that catalyzes protein phosphorylation. Inactive forms of the enzyme have two regulatory chains and two catalytic chains; activation by cAMP produces two active catalytic monomers and a regulatory dimer.
0	1	0	CAAX-protein geranylgeranyltransferase complex	A heterodimeric enzyme, composed of an alpha and a beta subunit. Participates in the post-translational C-terminal modification of several small GTPases, allowing their targeting to the membrane.
0	0	4	calcium- and calmodulin-dependent protein kinase complex	An enzyme complex which in eukaryotes is composed of four different chains: alpha, beta, gamma, and delta. The different isoforms assemble into homo- or heteromultimeric holoenzymes composed of 8 to 12 subunits. Catalyzes the phosphorylation of proteins to O-phosphoproteins.
1	0	0	calcineurin complex	A heterodimeric calcium ion and calmodulin dependent protein phosphatase composed of catalytic and regulatory subunits; the regulatory subunit is very similar in sequence to calmodulin.
2	0	1	protein kinase CK2 complex	A protein complex that possesses protein serine/threonine kinase activity, and contains two catalytic alpha subunits and two regulatory beta subunits. Protein kinase CK2 complexes are found in nearly every subcellular compartment, and can phosphorylate many protein substrates in addition to casein.
1	1	0	DNA-dependent protein kinase-DNA ligase 4 complex	A large protein complex which is involved in the repair of DNA double-strand breaks and, in mammals, V(D)J recombination events. It consists of the DNA-dependent protein kinase catalytic subunit (DNA-PKcs), the DNA end-binding heterodimer Ku, the nuclear phosphoprotein XRCC4 or a homolog thereof, and DNA ligase IV.
0	0	2	phosphorylase kinase complex	An enzyme complex that catalyzes the phosphorylation of phosphorylase b to form phosphorylase a.
0	1	0	protein farnesyltransferase complex	A protein complex that possesses protein farnesyltransferase activity.
0	1	2	mitochondrial pyruvate dehydrogenase complex	Complex that carries out the oxidative decarboxylation of pyruvate to form acetyl-CoA in eukaryotes; includes subunits possessing three catalytic activities: pyruvate dehydrogenase (E1), dihydrolipoamide S-acetyltransferase (E2), and dihydrolipoamide dehydrogenase (E3). The This Eukaryotic form usually contains more subunits than its bacterial counterpart; for example, one known complex contains 30 E1 dimers, 60 E2 monomers, and 6 E3 dimers as well as a few copies of pyruvate dehydrogenase kinase and pyruvate dehydrogenase phosphatase.
8	11	10	carbohydrate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving carbohydrates, any of a group of organic compounds based of the general formula Cx(H2O)y. Includes the formation of carbohydrate derivatives by the addition of a carbohydrate residue to another molecule.
3	4	7	glycogen metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycogen, a polydisperse, highly branched glucan composed of chains of D-glucose residues in alpha-(1->4) glycosidic linkage, joined together by alpha-(1->6) glycosidic linkages.
2	3	4	glycogen biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycogen, a polydisperse, highly branched glucan composed of chains of D-glucose residues.
1	2	3	regulation of glycogen biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycogen.
3	1	5	glycogen catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glycogen, a polydisperse, highly branched glucan composed of chains of D-glucose residues.
0	1	2	regulation of glycogen catabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glycogen.
1	1	0	sucrose biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of sucrose, the disaccharide fructofuranosyl-glucopyranoside.
0	2	0	lactose biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of lactose, the disaccharide galactopyranosyl-glucose.
1	1	0	xylulose metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving xylulose, the ketopentose threo-2-pentulose.
1	0	0	xylulose catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of xylulose, the ketopentose threo-2-pentulose.
0	0	2	xylulose biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of xylulose, the ketopentose threo-2-pentulose.
1	2	3	fructose metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving fructose, the ketohexose arabino-2-hexulose. Fructose exists in a open chain form or as a ring compound. D-fructose is the sweetest of the sugars and is found free in a large number of fruits and honey.
2	3	4	fructose 6-phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving fructose 6-phosphate, also known as F6P. The D-enantiomer is an important intermediate in glycolysis, gluconeogenesis, and fructose metabolism.
0	1	1	fructose 2,6-bisphosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving fructose 2,6-bisphosphate. The D enantiomer is an important regulator of the glycolytic and gluconeogenic pathways. It inhibits fructose 1,6-bisphosphatase and activates phosphofructokinase.
5	9	10	glucose metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glucose, the aldohexose gluco-hexose. D-glucose is dextrorotatory and is sometimes known as dextrose; it is an important source of energy for living organisms and is found free as well as combined in homo- and hetero-oligosaccharides and polysaccharides.
1	2	0	glucose catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glucose, the aldohexose gluco-hexose.
0	0	1	UDP-glucose metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving UDP-glucose, uridinediphosphoglucose, a substance composed of glucose in glycosidic linkage with uridine diphosphate.
0	1	0	galactose metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving galactose, the aldohexose galacto-hexose. D-galactose is widely distributed in combined form in plants, animals and microorganisms as a constituent of oligo- and polysaccharides; it also occurs in galactolipids and as its glucoside in lactose and melibiose.
0	0	1	mannose metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving mannose, the aldohexose manno-hexose, the C-2 epimer of glucose. The D-(+)-form is widely distributed in mannans and hemicelluloses and is of major importance in the core oligosaccharide of N-linked oligosaccharides of glycoproteins.
1	0	0	D-ribose metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving D-ribose (ribo-pentose). As beta-D-ribofuranose, D-ribose forms the glycose group of all ribonucleosides, ribonucleotides and ribonucleic acids, and also of ribose phosphates, various glycosides, some coenzymes and some forms of vitamin B12.
0	3	2	5-phosphoribose 1-diphosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of 5-phosphoribose 1-diphosphate, also known as 5-phosphoribosyl-1-pyrophosphate.
0	1	3	inositol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving inositol, 1,2,3,4,5,6-cyclohexanehexol, a growth factor for animals and microorganisms.
0	0	1	inositol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of inositol, 1,2,3,4,5,6-cyclohexanehexol, a growth factor for animals and microorganisms.
4	2	1	glycosaminoglycan biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycosaminoglycans, any of a group of polysaccharides that contain amino sugars.
3	2	0	glycosaminoglycan catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glycosaminoglycans, any one of a group of polysaccharides that contain amino sugars.
0	1	0	proteoglycan metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving proteoglycans, any glycoprotein in which the carbohydrate units are glycosaminoglycans.
0	0	1	glucosamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glucosamine (2-amino-2-deoxyglucopyranose), an aminodeoxysugar that occurs in combined form in chitin.
1	0	2	N-acetylglucosamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving N-acetylglucosamine. The D isomer is a common structural unit of glycoproteins in plants, bacteria and animals; it is often the terminal sugar of an oligosaccharide group of a glycoprotein.
0	1	1	UDP-N-acetylglucosamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving UDP-N-acetylglucosamine, a substance composed of N-acetylglucosamine, a common structural unit of oligosaccharides, in glycosidic linkage with uridine diphosphate.
2	1	3	UDP-N-acetylglucosamine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of UDP-N-acetylglucosamine, a substance composed of N-acetylglucosamine, a common structural unit of oligosaccharides, in glycosidic linkage with uridine diphosphate.
1	0	1	N-acetylmannosamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving N-acetylmannosamine, the acetylated derivative of mannosamine, 2-amino-2-deoxymannose.
0	1	0	N-acetylneuraminate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving N-acetylneuraminate, the anion of 5-(acetylamino)-3,5-dideoxy-D-glycero-D-galacto-non-3-ulosonic acid.
0	0	1	CMP-N-acetylneuraminate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of CMP-N-acetylneuraminate, a substance composed of 5-(acetylamino)-3,5-dideoxy-D-glycero-D-galacto-non-3-ulosonic acid in glycosidic linkage with cytidine monophosphate.
0	1	0	sorbitol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of sorbitol (D-glucitol), one of the ten stereoisomeric hexitols. It can be derived from glucose by reduction of the aldehyde group.
0	0	2	UDP-glucuronate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of UDP-glucuronate, a substance composed of glucuronic acid in glycosidic linkage with uridine diphosphate.
0	2	1	alcohol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving alcohols, any of a class of compounds containing one or more hydroxyl groups attached to a saturated carbon atom.
0	4	0	ethanol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of ethanol, CH3-CH2-OH, a colorless, water-miscible, flammable liquid produced by alcoholic fermentation.
1	3	5	ethanol oxidation	An ethanol metabolic process in which ethanol is converted to acetyl-CoA via acetaldehyde and acetate.
0	0	1	glycerol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycerol, 1,2,3-propanetriol, a sweet, hygroscopic, viscous liquid, widely distributed in nature as a constituent of many lipids.
1	1	0	glycerol-3-phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycerol-3-phosphate, a phosphoric monoester of glycerol.
2	2	1	cellular aldehyde metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving aldehydes, any organic compound with the formula R-CH=O, as carried out by individual cells.
3	1	0	organic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving organic acids, any acidic compound containing carbon in covalent linkage.
0	2	2	acetyl-CoA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving acetyl-CoA, a derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is acetylated; it is a metabolite derived from several pathways (e.g. glycolysis, fatty acid oxidation, amino-acid catabolism) and is further metabolized by the tricarboxylic acid cycle. It is a key intermediate in lipid and terpenoid biosynthesis.
0	2	1	acetyl-CoA biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of acetyl-CoA, a derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is acetylated.
0	1	2	acetyl-CoA biosynthetic process from pyruvate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of acetyl-CoA from pyruvate.
0	1	1	lactate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving lactate, the anion of lactic acid.
3	2	7	pyruvate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving pyruvate, 2-oxopropanoate.
6	4	7	generation of precursor metabolites and energy	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of precursor metabolites, substances from which energy is derived, and any process involved in the liberation of energy from these substances.
6	5	15	gluconeogenesis	The formation of glucose from noncarbohydrate precursors, such as pyruvate, amino acids and glycerol.
1	4	16	glycolytic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a carbohydrate into pyruvate, with the concomitant production of a small amount of ATP and the reduction of NAD(P) to NAD(P)H. Glycolysis begins with the metabolism of a carbohydrate to generate products that can enter the pathway and ends with the production of pyruvate. Pyruvate may be converted to acetyl-coenzyme A, ethanol, lactate, or other small molecules.
1	0	0	glyoxylate cycle	A modification of the TCA cycle occurring in some plants and microorganisms, in which isocitrate is cleaved to glyoxylate and succinate. Glyoxylate can then react with acetyl-CoA to form malate.
1	3	3	pentose-phosphate shunt	The metabolic process in which glucose-6-phosphate is oxidized to form carbon dioxide (CO2) and ribulose 5-phosphate, coupled to reduction of NADP+ to NADPH; ribulose 5-P then enters a series of reactions that can yield biosynthetic precursors (ribose-5-phosphate and erythrose-4-phosphate) and glycolytic intermediates (fructose-6-phosphate and glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate).
3	3	8	tricarboxylic acid cycle	A nearly universal metabolic pathway in which the acetyl group of acetyl coenzyme A is effectively oxidized to two CO2 and four pairs of electrons are transferred to coenzymes. The acetyl group combines with oxaloacetate to form citrate, which undergoes successive transformations to isocitrate, 2-oxoglutarate, succinyl-CoA, succinate, fumarate, malate, and oxaloacetate again, thus completing the cycle. In eukaryotes the tricarboxylic acid is confined to the mitochondria. See also glyoxylate cycle.
0	1	2	citrate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving citrate, 2-hydroxy-1,2,3-propanetricarboyxlate. Citrate is widely distributed in nature and is an important intermediate in the TCA cycle and the glyoxylate cycle.
1	0	0	isocitrate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving isocitrate, the anion of isocitric acid, 1-hydroxy-1,2,3-propanetricarboxylic acid. Isocitrate is an important intermediate in the TCA cycle and the glycoxylate cycle.
2	3	1	2-oxoglutarate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving oxoglutarate, the dianion of 2-oxoglutaric acid. It is a key constituent of the TCA cycle and a key intermediate in amino-acid metabolism.
0	1	2	succinyl-CoA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving succinyl-CoA, a compound composed of the monovalent acyl group 3-carboxypropanoyl, derived from succinic acid by loss of one OH group, linked to coenzyme A.
0	1	1	succinate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving succinate, also known as butanedioate or ethane dicarboxylate, the dianion of succinic acid. Succinate is an important intermediate in metabolism and a component of the TCA cycle.
1	0	0	fumarate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving fumarate, the anion of trans-1,2-ethenedicarboxylic acid, the diastereoisomer of maleate. It is a key intermediate in metabolism and is formed in the TCA cycle from succinate and converted into malate.
1	3	3	oxaloacetate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving oxaloacetate, the anion of oxobutanedioic acid, an important intermediate in metabolism, especially as a component of the TCA cycle.
1	0	2	malate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving malate, the anion of hydroxybutanedioic acid, a chiral hydroxydicarboxylic acid. The (+) enantiomer is an important intermediate in metabolism as a component of both the TCA cycle and the glyoxylate cycle.
2	13	14	regulation of glycolytic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of glycolysis.
1	2	1	regulation of gluconeogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gluconeogenesis, the formation of glucose from noncarbohydrate precursors, such as pyruvate, amino acids and glycerol.
0	4	1	energy reserve metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways by which a cell derives energy from stored compounds such as fats or glycogen.
0	1	0	glycerol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycerol, 1,2,3-propanetriol, a sweet, hygroscopic, viscous liquid, widely distributed in nature as a constituent of many lipids.
1	1	1	NADH oxidation	A metabolic process that results in the oxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide, NADH, to the oxidized form, NAD.
2	0	1	oxidative phosphorylation	The phosphorylation of ADP to ATP that accompanies the oxidation of a metabolite through the operation of the respiratory chain. Oxidation of compounds establishes a proton gradient across the membrane, providing the energy for ATP synthesis.
3	1	0	mitochondrial electron transport, NADH to ubiquinone	The transfer of electrons from NADH to ubiquinone that occurs during oxidative phosphorylation.
0	0	1	mitochondrial electron transport, succinate to ubiquinone	The transfer of electrons from succinate to ubiquinone that occurs during oxidative phosphorylation, mediated by the multisubunit enzyme known as complex II.
4	1	1	mitochondrial electron transport, ubiquinol to cytochrome c	The transfer of electrons from ubiquinol to cytochrome c that occurs during oxidative phosphorylation, mediated by the multisubunit enzyme known as complex III.
1	2	0	mitochondrial electron transport, cytochrome c to oxygen	The transfer of electrons from cytochrome c to oxygen that occurs during oxidative phosphorylation, mediated by the multisubunit enzyme known as complex IV.
0	1	0	ferredoxin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ferredoxin, any simple, nonenzymatic iron-sulfur protein that is characterized by having equal numbers of atoms of iron and labile sulfur. Iron and sulfur atoms are present in one or two clusters of two or four atoms of each.
3	6	5	nucleobase-containing compound metabolic process	Any cellular metabolic process involving nucleobases, nucleosides, nucleotides and nucleic acids.
0	2	0	purine nucleobase metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving purine nucleobases, one of the two classes of nitrogen-containing ring compounds found in DNA and RNA, which include adenine and guanine.
0	3	3	purine nucleotide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a purine nucleotide, a compound consisting of nucleoside (a purine base linked to a deoxyribose or ribose sugar) esterified with a phosphate group at either the 3' or 5'-hydroxyl group of the sugar.
0	2	0	nucleoside diphosphate phosphorylation	The process of introducing a phosphate group into a nucleoside diphosphate to produce a nucleoside triphosphate.
0	1	0	purine ribonucleoside salvage	Any process which produces a purine nucleoside from derivatives of it, without de novo synthesis.
1	1	0	AMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of AMP, adenosine monophosphate.
0	1	0	adenine salvage	Any process that generates adenine, 6-aminopurine, from derivatives of it without de novo synthesis.
0	2	0	cAMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of the nucleotide cAMP (cyclic AMP, adenosine 3',5'-cyclophosphate).
1	1	0	ADP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ADP, adenosine 5'-diphosphate.
0	2	0	GMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of GMP, guanosine monophosphate.
0	0	1	cGMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cyclic GMP, guanosine 3',5'-phosphate.
1	3	0	GTP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of GTP, guanosine triphosphate.
2	1	0	IMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of IMP, inosine monophosphate.
0	1	2	'de novo' IMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of IMP, inosine monophosphate, by the stepwise assembly of a purine ring on ribose 5-phosphate.
0	1	0	ITP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of ITP, inosine (5'-)triphosphate.
2	1	1	purine nucleotide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a purine nucleotide, a compound consisting of nucleoside (a purine base linked to a deoxyribose or ribose sugar) esterified with a phosphate group at either the 3' or 5'-hydroxyl group of the sugar.
1	0	0	AMP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of AMP, adenosine monophosphate.
0	1	2	cAMP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the nucleotide cAMP (cyclic AMP, adenosine 3',5'-cyclophosphate).
0	0	1	dGTP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of dGTP, guanosine triphosphate.
1	0	0	pyrimidine nucleobase metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving pyrimidine nucleobases, 1,3-diazine, organic nitrogenous bases.
0	2	2	'de novo' pyrimidine nucleobase biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of pyrimidine nucleobases, 1,3-diazine, organic nitrogenous bases, beginning with the synthesis of a pyrimidine ring from simpler precursors.
0	1	0	thymine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of thymine, 5-methyluracil, one of the two major pyrimidine bases present (as thymidine) in DNA but not found in RNA other than (as ribothymidine) in transfer RNA, where it is a minor base.
0	1	0	5-methylcytosine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of 5-methylcytosine, a methylated base of DNA.
2	0	0	pyrimidine nucleoside metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any pyrimidine nucleoside, one of a family of organic molecules consisting of a pyrimidine base covalently bonded to ribose (a ribonucleoside) or deoxyribose (a deoxyribonucleoside).
0	1	0	pyrimidine nucleotide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a pyrimidine nucleotide, a compound consisting of nucleoside (a pyrimidine base linked to a deoxyribose or ribose sugar) esterified with a phosphate group at either the 3' or 5'-hydroxyl group of the sugar.
0	1	0	pyrimidine nucleotide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a pyrimidine nucleotide, a compound consisting of nucleoside (a pyrimidine base linked to a deoxyribose or ribose sugar) esterified with a phosphate group at either the 3' or 5'-hydroxyl group of the sugar.
0	1	0	UMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of UMP, uridine monophosphate.
0	1	0	dUMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of dUMP, deoxyuridine monophosphate (2'-deoxyuridine 5'-phosphate).
1	2	1	UTP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of UTP, uridine (5'-)triphosphate.
1	2	1	CTP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of CTP, cytidine 5'-triphosphate.
0	5	2	DNA metabolic process	Any cellular metabolic process involving deoxyribonucleic acid. This is one of the two main types of nucleic acid, consisting of a long, unbranched macromolecule formed from one, or more commonly, two, strands of linked deoxyribonucleotides.
18	37	19	DNA replication	The cellular metabolic process in which a cell duplicates one or more molecules of DNA. DNA replication begins when specific sequences, known as origins of replication, are recognized and bound by initiation proteins, and ends when the original DNA molecule has been completely duplicated and the copies topologically separated. The unit of replication usually corresponds to the genome of the cell, an organelle, or a virus. The template for replication can either be an existing DNA molecule or RNA.
0	4	3	DNA-dependent DNA replication	A DNA replication process that uses parental DNA as a template for the DNA-dependent DNA polymerases that synthesize the new strands.
2	0	0	mitochondrial DNA replication	The process in which new strands of DNA are synthesized in the mitochondrion.
0	1	3	DNA topological change	The process in which a transformation is induced in the topological structure of a double-stranded DNA helix, resulting in a change in linking number.
1	1	4	DNA ligation	The re-formation of a broken phosphodiester bond in the DNA backbone, carried out by DNA ligase.
1	2	2	pre-replicative complex assembly involved in nuclear cell cycle DNA replication	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the nuclear pre-replicative complex, a protein-DNA complex that forms at the eukaryotic DNA replication origin and is required for replication initiation.
3	6	3	DNA unwinding involved in DNA replication	The process in which interchain hydrogen bonds between two strands of DNA are broken or 'melted', generating unpaired template strands for DNA replication.
1	1	1	DNA replication, synthesis of RNA primer	The synthesis of a short RNA polymer, usually 4-15 nucleotides long, using one strand of unwound DNA as a template; the RNA then serves as a primer from which DNA polymerases extend synthesis.
5	9	6	DNA replication initiation	The process in which DNA-dependent DNA replication is started; this begins with the ATP dependent loading of an initiator complex onto the DNA, this is followed by DNA melting and helicase activity. In bacteria, the gene products that enable the helicase activity are loaded after the initial melting and in archaea and eukaryotes, the gene products that enable the helicase activity are inactive when they are loaded and subsequently activate.
1	2	2	DNA strand elongation involved in DNA replication	The process in which an existing DNA strand is extended by activities including the addition of nucleotides to the 3' end of the strand, complementary to an existing template, as part of DNA replication.
0	0	2	leading strand elongation	The process in which an existing DNA strand is extended continuously in a 5' to 3' direction by activities including the addition of nucleotides to the 3' end of the strand, complementary to an existing template, as part of DNA replication. Leading strand elongation proceeds in the same direction as the replication fork.
0	0	3	lagging strand elongation	The process in which an existing DNA strand is extended in a net 3' to 5' direction by activities including the addition of nucleotides to the 3' end of the strand, complementary to an existing template, as part of DNA replication. Lagging strand DNA elongation proceeds by discontinuous synthesis of short stretches of DNA, known as Okazaki fragments, from RNA primers; these fragments are then joined by DNA ligase. Although each segment of nascent DNA is synthesized in the 5' to 3' direction, the overall direction of lagging strand synthesis is 3' to 5', mirroring the progress of the replication fork.
0	8	4	regulation of DNA replication	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of DNA replication.
0	0	1	RNA-dependent DNA biosynthetic process	A DNA biosynthetic process that uses RNA as a template for RNA-dependent DNA polymerases (e.g. reverse transcriptase) that synthesize the new strand.
23	55	33	DNA repair	The process of restoring DNA after damage. Genomes are subject to damage by chemical and physical agents in the environment (e.g. UV and ionizing radiations, chemical mutagens, fungal and bacterial toxins, etc.) and by free radicals or alkylating agents endogenously generated in metabolism. DNA is also damaged because of errors during its replication. A variety of different DNA repair pathways have been reported that include direct reversal, base excision repair, nucleotide excision repair, photoreactivation, bypass, double-strand break repair pathway, and mismatch repair pathway.
0	3	0	regulation of DNA repair	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of DNA repair.
5	6	17	transcription-coupled nucleotide-excision repair	The nucleotide-excision repair process that carries out preferential repair of DNA lesions on the actively transcribed strand of the DNA duplex. In addition, the transcription-coupled nucleotide-excision repair pathway is required for the recognition and repair of a small subset of lesions that are not recognized by the global genome nucleotide excision repair pathway.
5	3	6	base-excision repair	In base excision repair, an altered base is removed by a DNA glycosylase enzyme, followed by excision of the resulting sugar phosphate. The small gap left in the DNA helix is filled in by the sequential action of DNA polymerase and DNA ligase.
0	1	1	base-excision repair, AP site formation	The formation of an AP site, a deoxyribose sugar with a missing base, by DNA glycosylase which recognizes an altered base in DNA and catalyzes its hydrolytic removal. This sugar phosphate is the substrate recognized by the AP endonuclease, which cuts the DNA phosphodiester backbone at the 5' side of the altered site to leave a gap which is subsequently repaired.
1	0	0	base-excision repair, base-free sugar-phosphate removal	Excision of the sugar phosphate residue at an AP site, i.e. a deoxyribose sugar with a missing base, by a phosphodiesterase enzyme.
5	6	6	base-excision repair, gap-filling	Repair of the damaged strand by the combined action of an apurinic endouclease that degrades a few bases on the damaged strand and a polymerase that synthesizes a 'patch' in the 5' to 3' direction, using the undamaged strand as a template.
0	0	2	base-excision repair, DNA ligation	The ligation by DNA ligase of DNA strands. Ligation occurs after polymerase action to fill the gap left by the action of endonucleases during base-excision repair.
3	5	3	nucleotide-excision repair	A DNA repair process in which a small region of the strand surrounding the damage is removed from the DNA helix as an oligonucleotide. The small gap left in the DNA helix is filled in by the sequential action of DNA polymerase and DNA ligase. Nucleotide excision repair recognizes a wide range of substrates, including damage caused by UV irradiation (pyrimidine dimers and 6-4 photoproducts) and chemicals (intrastrand cross-links and bulky adducts).
1	1	1	pyrimidine dimer repair	The repair of UV-induced T-T, C-T and C-C dimers.
3	4	2	nucleotide-excision repair, preincision complex stabilization	The stabilization of the multiprotein complex involved in damage recognition, DNA helix unwinding, and endonucleolytic cleavage at the site of DNA damage as well as the unwound DNA. The stabilization of the protein-DNA complex ensures proper positioning of the preincision complex before the phosphodiester backbone of the damaged strand is cleaved 3' and 5' of the site of DNA damage.
3	4	9	nucleotide-excision repair, preincision complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins on DNA to form the multiprotein complex involved in damage recognition, DNA helix unwinding, and endonucleolytic cleavage at the site of DNA damage. This assembly occurs before the phosphodiester backbone of the damaged strand is cleaved 3' and 5' of the site of DNA damage.
3	4	2	nucleotide-excision repair, DNA incision, 3'-to lesion	The endonucleolytic cleavage of the damaged strand of DNA 3' to the site of damage. The incision occurs at the junction of single-stranded DNA and double-stranded DNA that is formed when the DNA duplex is unwound. The incision precedes the incision formed 5' to the site of damage.
3	6	8	nucleotide-excision repair, DNA incision, 5'-to lesion	The endonucleolytic cleavage of the damaged strand of DNA 5' to the site of damage. The incision occurs at the junction of single-stranded DNA and double-stranded DNA that is formed when the DNA duplex is unwound. The incision follows the incision formed 3' to the site of damage.
1	2	9	nucleotide-excision repair, DNA gap filling	Repair of the gap in the DNA helix by DNA polymerase and DNA ligase after the portion of the strand containing the lesion has been removed by pyrimidine-dimer repair enzymes.
3	5	4	mismatch repair	A system for the correction of errors in which an incorrect base, which cannot form hydrogen bonds with the corresponding base in the parent strand, is incorporated into the daughter strand. The mismatch repair system promotes genomic fidelity by repairing base-base mismatches, insertion-deletion loops and heterologies generated during DNA replication and recombination.
0	3	0	postreplication repair	The conversion of DNA-damage induced single-stranded gaps into large molecular weight DNA after replication. Includes pathways that remove replication-blocking lesions in conjunction with DNA replication.
18	23	11	double-strand break repair	The repair of double-strand breaks in DNA via homologous and nonhomologous mechanisms to reform a continuous DNA helix.
10	12	10	double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining	The repair of a double-strand break in DNA in which the two broken ends are rejoined with little or no sequence complementarity. Information at the DNA ends may be lost due to the modification of broken DNA ends. This term covers instances of separate pathways, called classical (or canonical) and alternative nonhomologous end joining (C-NHEJ and A-NHEJ). These in turn may further branch into sub-pathways, but evidence is still unclear.
0	1	0	DNA modification	The covalent alteration of one or more nucleotide sites in DNA, resulting in a change in its properties.
3	7	5	DNA methylation	The covalent transfer of a methyl group to either N-6 of adenine or C-5 or N-4 of cytosine.
2	1	1	DNA dealkylation involved in DNA repair	The repair of alkylation damage, e.g. the removal of the alkyl group at the O6-position of guanine by O6-alkylguanine-DNA alkyltransferase (AGT).
2	4	1	apoptotic DNA fragmentation	The cleavage of DNA during apoptosis, which usually occurs in two stages: cleavage into fragments of about 50 kbp followed by cleavage between nucleosomes to yield 200 bp fragments.
6	15	9	DNA recombination	Any process in which a new genotype is formed by reassortment of genes resulting in gene combinations different from those that were present in the parents. In eukaryotes genetic recombination can occur by chromosome assortment, intrachromosomal recombination, or nonreciprocal interchromosomal recombination. Interchromosomal recombination occurs by crossing over. In bacteria it may occur by genetic transformation, conjugation, transduction, or F-duction.
1	2	0	DNA packaging	Any process in which DNA and associated proteins are formed into a compact, orderly structure.
18	29	21	chromatin organization	Any process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of the physical structure of eukaryotic chromatin.
1	1	3	chromatin assembly or disassembly	The formation or destruction of chromatin structures.
5	21	29	nucleosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a nucleosome, the beadlike structural units of eukaryotic chromatin composed of histones and DNA.
2	5	2	DNA replication-dependent nucleosome assembly	The formation of nucleosomes on newly replicated DNA, coupled to strand elongation.
4	5	2	DNA replication-independent nucleosome assembly	The formation of nucleosomes outside the context of DNA replication.
6	3	4	nucleosome disassembly	The controlled breakdown of nucleosomes, the beadlike structural units of eukaryotic chromatin composed of histones and DNA.
16	21	20	chromatin remodeling	Dynamic structural changes to eukaryotic chromatin occurring throughout the cell division cycle. These changes range from the local changes necessary for transcriptional regulation to global changes necessary for chromosome segregation.
12	5	5	chromatin silencing	Repression of transcription by altering the structure of chromatin, e.g. by conversion of large regions of DNA into an inaccessible state often called heterochromatin.
2	3	1	DNA methylation-dependent heterochromatin assembly	Repression of transcription by methylation of DNA, leading to the formation of heterochromatin.
1	2	2	chromatin silencing at telomere	Repression of transcription of telomeric DNA by altering the structure of chromatin.
1	4	2	regulation of gene expression by genetic imprinting	Heritable alterations in the activity of a gene that depend on whether it passed through the paternal or the maternal germline, but that are not encoded by DNA itself.
8	18	6	transcription, DNA-templated	The cellular synthesis of RNA on a template of DNA.
3	2	4	DNA-templated transcription, initiation	Any process involved in the assembly of the RNA polymerase preinitiation complex (PIC) at the core promoter region of a DNA template, resulting in the subsequent synthesis of RNA from that promoter. The initiation phase includes PIC assembly and the formation of the first few bonds in the RNA chain, including abortive initiation, which occurs when the first few nucleotides are repeatedly synthesized and then released. The initiation phase ends just before and does not include promoter clearance, or release, which is the transition between the initiation and elongation phases of transcription.
1	3	2	DNA-templated transcription, termination	The cellular process that completes DNA-templated transcription; the formation of phosphodiester bonds ceases, the RNA-DNA hybrid dissociates, and RNA polymerase releases the DNA.
58	70	45	regulation of transcription, DNA-templated	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular DNA-templated transcription.
162	155	80	regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase II	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription mediated by RNA polymerase II.
3	0	0	regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase III	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription mediated by RNA ploymerase III.
1	1	0	transcription by RNA polymerase I	The synthesis of RNA from a DNA template by RNA polymerase I (RNAP I), originating at an RNAP I promoter.
3	5	3	transcription initiation from RNA polymerase I promoter	Any process involved in the assembly of the RNA polymerase I preinitiation complex (PIC) at an RNA polymerase I promoter region of a DNA template, resulting in the subsequent synthesis of RNA from that promoter. The initiation phase includes PIC assembly and the formation of the first few bonds in the RNA chain, including abortive initiation, which occurs when the first few nucleotides are repeatedly synthesized and then released. Promoter clearance, or release, is the transition between the initiation and elongation phases of transcription.
1	0	0	transcription elongation from RNA polymerase I promoter	The extension of an RNA molecule after transcription initiation and promoter clearance at an RNA polymerase I specific promoter by the addition of ribonucleotides catalyzed by RNA polymerase I.
2	6	2	termination of RNA polymerase I transcription	The process in which the synthesis of an RNA molecule by RNA polymerase I using a DNA template is completed. RNAP I termination requires binding of a terminator protein so specific sequences downstream of the transcription unit.
28	47	37	rRNA processing	Any process involved in the conversion of a primary ribosomal RNA (rRNA) transcript into one or more mature rRNA molecules.
23	29	19	transcription by RNA polymerase II	The synthesis of RNA from a DNA template by RNA polymerase II (RNAP II), originating at an RNA polymerase II promoter. Includes transcription of messenger RNA (mRNA) and certain small nuclear RNAs (snRNAs).
13	12	14	transcription initiation from RNA polymerase II promoter	Any process involved in the assembly of the RNA polymerase II preinitiation complex (PIC) at an RNA polymerase II promoter region of a DNA template, resulting in the subsequent synthesis of RNA from that promoter. The initiation phase includes PIC assembly and the formation of the first few bonds in the RNA chain, including abortive initiation, which occurs when the first few nucleotides are repeatedly synthesized and then released. Promoter clearance, or release, is the transition between the initiation and elongation phases of transcription.
10	12	10	transcription elongation from RNA polymerase II promoter	The extension of an RNA molecule after transcription initiation and promoter clearance at an RNA polymerase II promoter by the addition of ribonucleotides catalyzed by RNA polymerase II.
3	7	7	termination of RNA polymerase II transcription	The process in which the synthesis of an RNA molecule by RNA polymerase II using a DNA template is completed.
2	2	5	7-methylguanosine mRNA capping	Addition of the 7-methylguanosine cap to the 5' end of a nascent messenger RNA transcript.
1	6	5	mRNA splice site selection	Selection of a splice site by components of the assembling spliceosome.
5	4	7	mRNA polyadenylation	The enzymatic addition of a sequence of 40-200 adenylyl residues at the 3' end of a eukaryotic mRNA primary transcript.
0	1	1	mRNA cleavage	Any process in which a pre-mRNA or mRNA molecule is cleaved at specific sites or in a regulated manner.
1	0	1	adenosine to inosine editing	The conversion of an adenosine residue to inosine in an RNA molecule by deamination.
1	3	4	transcription by RNA polymerase III	The synthesis of RNA from a DNA template by RNA polymerase III, originating at an RNAP III promoter.
0	1	2	transcription initiation from RNA polymerase III promoter	Any process involved in the assembly of the RNA polymerase III preinitiation complex (PIC) at an RNA polymerase III promoter region of a DNA template, resulting in the subsequent synthesis of RNA from that promoter. The initiation phase includes PIC assembly and the formation of the first few bonds in the RNA chain, including abortive initiation, which occurs when the first few nucleotides are repeatedly synthesized and then released. Promoter clearance, or release, is the transition between the initiation and elongation phases of transcription.
4	2	2	tRNA splicing, via endonucleolytic cleavage and ligation	Splicing of tRNA substrates via recognition of the folded RNA structure that brings the 5' and 3' splice sites into proximity and cleavage of the RNA at both the 3' and 5' splice sites by an endonucleolytic mechanism, followed by ligation of the exons.
1	1	0	mitochondrial transcription	The synthesis of RNA from a mitochondrial DNA template, usually by a specific mitochondrial RNA polymerase.
1	0	0	transcription initiation from mitochondrial promoter	A transcription initiation process that takes place at a promoter on the mitochondrial chromosome, and results in RNA synthesis by a mitochondrial RNA polymerase.
8	18	14	RNA processing	Any process involved in the conversion of one or more primary RNA transcripts into one or more mature RNA molecules.
12	24	44	mRNA processing	Any process involved in the conversion of a primary mRNA transcript into one or more mature mRNA(s) prior to translation into polypeptide.
0	2	0	mRNA 3'-end processing by stem-loop binding and cleavage	Any mRNA 3'-end processing that involves the binding to and cleavage of a stem-loop structure. For example, histone mRNAs contain a highly conserved stem-loop sequence at the 3' end of the mRNA with a 6 base pairs (bp) stem and a 4-nt loop. The mRNA is cleaved between these two elements, after the fourth or fifth nucleotide, which is typically an adenosine.
0	0	1	tRNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving tRNA, transfer RNA, a class of relatively small RNA molecules responsible for mediating the insertion of amino acids into the sequence of nascent polypeptide chains during protein synthesis. Transfer RNA is characterized by the presence of many unusual minor bases, the function of which has not been completely established.
5	2	3	tRNA modification	The covalent alteration of one or more nucleotides within a tRNA molecule to produce a tRNA molecule with a sequence that differs from that coded genetically.
2	6	4	RNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of RNA, ribonucleic acid, one of the two main type of nucleic acid, consisting of a long, unbranched macromolecule formed from ribonucleotides joined in 3',5'-phosphodiester linkage.
3	4	4	mRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of mRNA, messenger RNA, which is responsible for carrying the coded genetic 'message', transcribed from DNA, to sites of protein assembly at the ribosomes.
2	0	0	RNA localization	A process in which RNA is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location.
0	0	1	RNA import into nucleus	The import of RNA from the cytoplasm to the nucleus.
6	22	15	RNA export from nucleus	The directed movement of RNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
9	38	29	mRNA export from nucleus	The directed movement of mRNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
0	1	1	rRNA export from nucleus	The directed movement of rRNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm; the rRNA is usually in the form of ribonucleoproteins.
1	0	0	snRNA export from nucleus	The directed movement of snRNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
1	12	12	tRNA export from nucleus	The directed movement of tRNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
20	32	36	translation	The cellular metabolic process in which a protein is formed, using the sequence of a mature mRNA or circRNA molecule to specify the sequence of amino acids in a polypeptide chain. Translation is mediated by the ribosome, and begins with the formation of a ternary complex between aminoacylated initiator methionine tRNA, GTP, and initiation factor 2, which subsequently associates with the small subunit of the ribosome and an mRNA or circRNA. Translation ends with the release of a polypeptide chain from the ribosome.
16	35	34	translational initiation	The process preceding formation of the peptide bond between the first two amino acids of a protein. This includes the formation of a complex of the ribosome, mRNA or circRNA, and an initiation complex that contains the first aminoacyl-tRNA.
1	2	9	translational elongation	The successive addition of amino acid residues to a nascent polypeptide chain during protein biosynthesis.
1	1	1	translational termination	The process resulting in the release of a polypeptide chain from the ribosome, usually in response to a termination codon (UAA, UAG, or UGA in the universal genetic code).
6	19	9	regulation of translation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of proteins by the translation of mRNA or circRNA.
9	9	3	tRNA aminoacylation for protein translation	The synthesis of aminoacyl tRNA by the formation of an ester bond between the 3'-hydroxyl group of the most 3' adenosine of the tRNA and the alpha carboxylic acid  group of an amino acid, to be used in ribosome-mediated polypeptide synthesis.
1	0	0	alanyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling alanine to alanyl-tRNA, catalyzed by alanyl-tRNA synthetase. The alanyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetases. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 3'-OH group of an alanine accetping tRNA.
0	1	0	arginyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling arginine to arginyl-tRNA, catalyzed by arginyl-tRNA synthetase. The arginyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of an alanine accetping tRNA.  The  2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
0	1	0	aspartyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling aspartate to aspartyl-tRNA, catalyzed by aspartyl-tRNA synthetase. The aspartyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 3'-OH group of an aspartic acid  accetping tRNA.
0	1	0	cysteinyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling cysteine to cysteinyl-tRNA, catalyzed by cysteinyl-tRNA synthetase. A cysteinyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a cysteine-accetping tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
0	0	1	glutamyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling glutamate to glutamyl-tRNA, catalyzed by glutamyl-tRNA synthetase. The glutamyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a glutamic acid-accetping tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
1	0	0	glutaminyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling glutamine to glutaminyl-tRNA, catalyzed by glutaminyl-tRNA synthetase. The glutaminyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a glutamine-accetping tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
0	1	0	glycyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling glycine to glycyl-tRNA, catalyzed by glycyl-tRNA synthetase. The glycyll-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 3'-OH group of a glycine-accepting tRNA.
0	1	0	histidyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling histidine to histidyl-tRNA, catalyzed by histidyl-tRNA synthetase. The histidyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 3''-OH group of a histidine-accetping tRNA.
0	2	0	isoleucyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling isoleucine to isoleucyl-tRNA, catalyzed by isoleucyl-tRNA synthetase. The isoleucyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a isoleucine-accetping tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
1	0	0	leucyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling leucine to leucyl-tRNA, catalyzed by leucyl-tRNA synthetase. The leucyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a leucine-accetping tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
1	0	0	lysyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling lysine to lysyl-tRNA, catalyzed by lysyl-tRNA synthetase. The lysyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 3'-OH group of a lysine-accetping tRNA.
1	0	0	methionyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling methionine to methionyl-tRNA, catalyzed by methionyl-tRNA synthetase. The methionyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a methionine-accetping tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
0	1	0	phenylalanyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling phenylalanine to phenylalanyl-tRNA, catalyzed by phenylalanyl-tRNA synthetase. The phenylalanyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetase. However, unlike other class II enzymes, The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a phenylalanine-accepting tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
0	0	1	prolyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling proline to prolyl-tRNA, catalyzed by prolyl-tRNA synthetase. The prolyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 3'-OH group of a methionine-accetping tRNA.
1	0	0	seryl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling serine to seryl-tRNA, catalyzed by seryl-tRNA synthetase. The seryl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 3'-OH group of a serine-accetping tRNA.
0	1	0	threonyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling threonine to threonyl-tRNA, catalyzed by threonyl-tRNA synthetase. The threonyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-II synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 3'-OH group of a threonine-accetping tRNA.
1	0	0	tryptophanyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling tryptophan to tryptophanyl-tRNA, catalyzed by tryptophanyl-tRNA synthetase. The tryptophanyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a tryptophan-accetping tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
1	0	0	valyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling valine to valyl-tRNA, catalyzed by valyl-tRNA synthetase. The valyl-tRNA synthetase is a  class-I synthetase. The activated amino acid is transferred to the 2'-OH group of a valine-accetping tRNA. The 2'-O-aminoacyl-tRNA will ultimately migrate to the 3' position via transesterification.
3	7	7	regulation of translational initiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of translational initiation.
0	0	1	regulation of translational elongation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, extent or accuracy of translational elongation.
0	0	2	regulation of translational termination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of translational termination.
0	2	1	regulation of translational fidelity	Any process that modulates the ability of the translational apparatus to interpret the genetic code.
19	24	34	protein folding	The process of assisting in the covalent and noncovalent assembly of single chain polypeptides or multisubunit complexes into the correct tertiary structure.
0	0	1	'de novo' protein folding	The process of assisting in the folding of a nascent peptide chain into its correct tertiary structure.
4	14	7	cellular protein modification process	The covalent alteration of one or more amino acids occurring in proteins, peptides and nascent polypeptides (co-translational, post-translational modifications) occurring at the level of an individual cell. Includes the modification of charged tRNAs that are destined to occur in a protein (pre-translation modification).
1	0	0	signal peptide processing	The proteolytic removal of a signal peptide from a protein during or after transport to a specific location in the cell.
59	82	80	protein phosphorylation	The process of introducing a phosphate group on to a protein.
10	12	13	negative regulation of protein kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein kinase activity.
19	18	15	protein dephosphorylation	The process of removing one or more phosphoric residues from a protein.
5	4	2	protein ADP-ribosylation	The transfer, from NAD, of ADP-ribose to protein amino acids.
5	2	2	protein acetylation	The addition of an acetyl group to a protein amino acid. An acetyl group is CH3CO-, derived from acetic [ethanoic] acid.
1	2	0	N-terminal protein amino acid acetylation	The acetylation of the N-terminal amino acid of proteins.
1	1	2	internal protein amino acid acetylation	The addition of an acetyl group to a non-terminal amino acid in a protein.
2	4	5	protein deacetylation	The removal of an acetyl group from a protein amino acid. An acetyl group is CH3CO-, derived from acetic [ethanoic] acid.
3	2	2	protein methylation	The addition of a methyl group to a protein amino acid. A methyl group is derived from methane by the removal of a hydrogen atom.
0	3	3	protein demethylation	The removal of a methyl group, from a protein amino acid. A methyl group is derived from methane by the removal of a hydrogen atom.
5	3	0	protein glycosylation	A protein modification process that results in the addition of a carbohydrate or carbohydrate derivative unit to a protein amino acid, e.g. the addition of glycan chains to proteins.
2	4	3	protein N-linked glycosylation	A protein glycosylation process in which a carbohydrate or carbohydrate derivative unit is added to a protein via the N4 atom of peptidyl-asparagine, the omega-N of arginine, or the N1' atom peptidyl-tryptophan.
1	0	0	dolichol-linked oligosaccharide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of dolichol-linked oligosaccharide, usually by a stepwise addition of glycosyl chains to endoplasmic reticulum membrane-bound dolichol-P.
1	1	0	N-glycan processing	The conversion of N-linked glycan (N = nitrogen) structures from the initially transferred oligosaccharide to a mature form, by the actions of glycosidases and glycosyltransferases. The early processing steps are conserved and play roles in glycoprotein folding and trafficking.
3	2	2	protein O-linked glycosylation	A protein glycosylation process in which a carbohydrate or carbohydrate derivative unit is added to a protein via the hydroxyl group of peptidyl-serine, peptidyl-threonine, peptidyl-hydroxylysine, or peptidyl-hydroxyproline, or via the phenol group of peptidyl-tyrosine, forming an O-glycan.
2	2	0	protein lipidation	The covalent attachment of lipid groups to an amino acid in a protein.
1	0	1	N-terminal protein myristoylation	The covalent attachment of a myristoyl group to the N-terminal amino acid residue of a protein.
1	0	0	GPI anchor biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a glycosylphosphatidylinositol (GPI) anchor that attaches some membrane proteins to the lipid bilayer of the cell membrane. The phosphatidylinositol group is linked via the C-6 hydroxyl residue of inositol to a carbohydrate chain which is itself linked to the protein via an ethanolamine phosphate group, its amino group forming an amide linkage with the C-terminal carboxyl of the protein. Some GPI anchors have variants on this canonical linkage.
35	25	5	proteolysis	The hydrolysis of proteins into smaller polypeptides and/or amino acids by cleavage of their peptide bonds.
3	5	3	membrane protein ectodomain proteolysis	The proteolytic cleavage of transmembrane proteins and release of their ectodomain (extracellular domain).
25	33	28	ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of a ubiquitin group, or multiple ubiquitin groups, to the protein.
1	9	3	protein monoubiquitination	Addition of a single ubiquitin group to a protein.
0	1	1	protein quality control for misfolded or incompletely synthesized proteins	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of misfolded or attenuated proteins.
0	0	2	glycoprotein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glycoproteins, any protein that contains covalently bound glycose (i.e. monosaccharide) residues; the glycose occurs most commonly as oligosaccharide or fairly small polysaccharide but occasionally as monosaccharide.
0	1	1	protein deglycosylation	The removal of sugar residues from a glycosylated protein.
2	2	1	peptide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving peptides, compounds of two or more amino acids where the alpha carboxyl group of one is bound to the alpha amino group of another.
3	1	2	cellular amino acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving amino acids, carboxylic acids containing one or more amino groups, as carried out by individual cells.
8	9	10	regulation of cellular amino acid metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving amino acids.
2	0	0	arginine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving arginine, 2-amino-5-(carbamimidamido)pentanoic acid.
3	0	0	arginine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of arginine, 2-amino-5-(carbamimidamido)pentanoic acid.
0	1	0	asparagine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving asparagine, 2-amino-3-carbamoylpropanoic acid.
1	2	0	aspartate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving aspartate, the anion derived from aspartic acid, 2-aminobutanedioic acid.
0	2	0	aspartate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of aspartate, the anion derived from aspartic acid, 2-aminobutanedioic acid.
0	2	0	aspartate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of aspartate, the anion derived from aspartic acid, 2-aminobutanedioic acid.
2	0	0	cysteine biosynthetic process from serine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cysteine from other compounds, including serine.
0	3	0	glutamate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glutamate, the anion of 2-aminopentanedioic acid.
1	2	0	glutamate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glutamate, the anion of 2-aminopentanedioic acid.
0	2	0	glutamate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glutamate, the anion of 2-aminopentanedioic acid.
1	4	6	glutamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glutamine, 2-amino-4-carbamoylbutanoic acid.
1	0	0	glutamine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glutamine, 2-amino-4-carbamoylbutanoic acid.
0	2	2	glycine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycine, aminoethanoic acid.
0	0	2	histidine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of histidine, 2-amino-3-(1H-imidazol-4-yl)propanoic acid.
0	1	2	isoleucine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of isoleucine, (2R*,3R*)-2-amino-3-methylpentanoic acid.
0	3	1	leucine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of leucine, 2-amino-4-methylpentanoic acid.
0	0	1	lysine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of lysine, 2,6-diaminohexanoic acid.
1	1	0	S-adenosylmethionine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of S-adenosylmethionine, S-(5'-adenosyl)-L-methionine, an important intermediate in one-carbon metabolism.
1	0	1	L-phenylalanine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving L-phenylalanine, the L-enantiomer of 2-amino-3-phenylpropanoic acid, i.e. (2S)-2-amino-3-phenylpropanoic acid.
2	0	1	L-phenylalanine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phenylalanine, 2-amino-3-phenylpropanoic acid.
1	0	0	proline metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving proline (pyrrolidine-2-carboxylic acid), a chiral, cyclic, nonessential alpha-amino acid found in peptide linkage in proteins.
0	2	0	proline biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of proline (pyrrolidine-2-carboxylic acid), a chiral, cyclic, nonessential alpha-amino acid found in peptide linkage in proteins.
1	0	0	proline catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of proline (pyrrolidine-2-carboxylic acid), a chiral, cyclic, nonessential alpha-amino acid found in peptide linkage in proteins.
1	1	0	L-serine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving L-serine, the L-enantiomer of serine, i.e. (2S)-2-amino-3-hydroxypropanoic acid.
1	1	2	L-serine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of L-serine, the L-enantiomer of serine, i.e. (2S)-2-amino-3-hydroxypropanoic acid.
1	1	0	L-serine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of L-serine, the L-enantiomer of serine, i.e. (2S)-2-amino-3-hydroxypropanoic acid.
0	0	1	threonine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving threonine (2-amino-3-hydroxybutyric acid), a polar, uncharged, essential amino acid found in peptide linkage in proteins.
0	1	0	tryptophan metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving tryptophan, the chiral amino acid 2-amino-3-(1H-indol-3-yl)propanoic acid.
1	1	0	tryptophan catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of tryptophan, the chiral amino acid 2-amino-3-(1H-indol-3-yl)propanoic acid.
1	0	0	tyrosine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of tyrosine, an aromatic amino acid, 2-amino-3-(4-hydroxyphenyl)propanoic acid.
1	0	0	tyrosine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of tyrosine, an aromatic amino acid, 2-amino-3-(4-hydroxyphenyl)propanoic acid.
0	1	0	valine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving valine, 2-amino-3-methylbutanoic acid.
0	1	1	valine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of valine, 2-amino-3-methylbutanoic acid.
0	0	1	cellular biogenic amine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways occurring at the level of individual cells involving any of a group of naturally occurring, biologically active amines, such as norepinephrine, histamine, and serotonin, many of which act as neurotransmitters.
1	0	0	amino-acid betaine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any betaine, the N-trimethyl derivative of an amino acid.
1	0	0	amino-acid betaine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of any betaine, the N-trimethyl derivative of an amino acid.
1	0	0	melanin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving melanins, pigments largely of animal origin. High molecular weight polymers of indole quinone, they are irregular polymeric structures and are divided into three groups: allomelanins in the plant kingdom and eumelanins and phaeomelanins in the animal kingdom.
0	4	0	catecholamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any of a group of physiologically important biogenic amines that possess a catechol (3,4-dihydroxyphenyl) nucleus and are derivatives of 3,4-dihydroxyphenylethylamine.
0	1	0	dopamine biosynthetic process from tyrosine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of dopamine (3,4-dihydroxyphenylethylamine) from L-tyrosine, via the metabolic precursor 3,4-dihydroxy-L-phenylalanine (L-dopa). Dopamine is a catecholamine neurotransmitter and a metabolic precursor of norepinephrine and epinephrine.
3	0	1	thyroid hormone generation	The formation of either of the compounds secreted by the thyroid gland, mainly thyroxine and triiodothyronine. This is achieved by the iodination and joining of tyrosine molecules to form the precursor thyroglobin, proteolysis of this precursor gives rise to the thyroid hormones.
0	1	0	ornithine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ornithine, an amino acid only rarely found in proteins, but which is important in living organisms as an intermediate in the reactions of the urea cycle and in arginine biosynthesis.
1	0	0	ornithine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of ornithine, an amino acid only rarely found in proteins, but which is important in living organisms as an intermediate in the reactions of the urea cycle and in arginine biosynthesis.
1	2	3	creatine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving creatine (N-(aminoiminomethyl)-N-methylglycine), a compound synthesized from the amino acids arginine, glycine, and methionine that occurs in muscle.
1	0	1	creatine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of creatine, N-[amino(imino)methyl]-N-methylglycine. Creatine is formed by a process beginning with amidino group transfer from L-arginine to glycine to form guanidinoacetate, followed by methyl group transfer from S-adenosyl-L-methionine to guanidinoacetate; it is then is phosphorylated to form a pool that stores high energy phosphate for the replenishment of ATP during periods of high, or fluctuating energy demand. In animals, most creatine is transported to and used in muscle.
2	8	6	protein targeting	The process of targeting specific proteins to particular regions of the cell, typically membrane-bounded subcellular organelles. Usually requires an organelle specific protein sequence motif.
7	18	16	protein import into nucleus	The directed movement of a protein from the cytoplasm to the nucleus.
2	6	7	NLS-bearing protein import into nucleus	The directed movement of a protein bearing a nuclear localization signal (NLS) from the cytoplasm into the nucleus, across the nuclear envelope.
2	1	0	ribosomal protein import into nucleus	The directed movement of a ribosomal protein from the cytoplasm into the nucleus, across the nuclear membrane. At least some ribosomal proteins, including rpl12, uses the importin 11 pathway as a major route into the nucleus.
1	6	5	protein export from nucleus	The directed movement of a protein from the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
2	11	3	protein targeting to membrane	The process of directing proteins towards a membrane, usually using signals contained within the protein.
2	2	1	cotranslational protein targeting to membrane	The targeting of proteins to a membrane that occurs during translation. The transport of most secretory proteins, particularly those with more than 100 amino acids, into the endoplasmic reticulum lumen occurs in this manner, as does the import of some proteins into mitochondria.
13	25	28	SRP-dependent cotranslational protein targeting to membrane	The targeting of proteins to a membrane that occurs during translation and is dependent upon two key components, the signal-recognition particle (SRP) and the SRP receptor. SRP is a cytosolic particle that transiently binds to the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) signal sequence in a nascent protein, to the large ribosomal unit, and to the SRP receptor in the ER membrane.
0	3	0	SRP-dependent cotranslational protein targeting to membrane, translocation	The process during cotranslational membrane targeting wherein proteins move across a membrane. SRP and its receptor initiate the transfer of the nascent chain across the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) membrane; they then dissociate from the chain, which is transferred to a set of transmembrane proteins, collectively called the translocon. Once the nascent chain translocon complex is assembled, the elongating chain passes directly from the large ribosomal subunit into the centers of the translocon, a protein-lined channel within the membrane. The growing chain is never exposed to the cytosol and does not fold until it reaches the ER lumen.
0	1	0	SRP-dependent cotranslational protein targeting to membrane, signal sequence recognition	The process in which SRP binds to the signal peptide in a nascent protein, causing protein elongation to pause, during cotranslational membrane targeting.
1	2	2	posttranslational protein targeting to endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The targeting of proteins to a membrane that occurs after their translation. Some secretory proteins exhibit posttranslational transport into the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) lumen: they are synthesized in their entirety on free cytosolic ribosomes and then released into the cytosol, where they are bound by chaperones which keep them in an unfolded state, and subsequently are translocated across the ER membrane.
0	1	0	protein retention in ER lumen	The retention in the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) lumen of soluble resident proteins. Sorting receptors retrieve proteins with ER localization signals, such as KDEL and HDEL sequences or some transmembrane domains, that have escaped to the cis-Golgi network and return them to the ER. Abnormally folded proteins and unassembled subunits are also selectively retained in the ER.
1	7	2	protein targeting to lysosome	The process of directing proteins towards the lysosome using signals contained within the protein.
3	3	2	protein targeting to vacuole	The process of directing proteins towards the vacuole, usually using signals contained within the protein.
1	1	1	protein targeting to peroxisome	The process of directing proteins towards the peroxisome, usually using signals contained within the protein.
4	2	4	protein targeting to mitochondrion	The process of directing proteins towards and into the mitochondrion, usually mediated by mitochondrial proteins that recognize signals contained within the imported protein.
18	10	15	lipid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving lipids, compounds soluble in an organic solvent but not, or sparingly, in an aqueous solvent. Includes fatty acids; neutral fats, other fatty-acid esters, and soaps; long-chain (fatty) alcohols and waxes; sphingoids and other long-chain bases; glycolipids, phospholipids and sphingolipids; and carotenes, polyprenols, sterols, terpenes and other isoprenoids.
5	2	5	fatty acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving fatty acids, aliphatic monocarboxylic acids liberated from naturally occurring fats and oils by hydrolysis.
3	5	6	fatty acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a fatty acid, any of the aliphatic monocarboxylic acids that can be liberated by hydrolysis from naturally occurring fats and oils. Fatty acids are predominantly straight-chain acids of 4 to 24 carbon atoms, which may be saturated or unsaturated; branched fatty acids and hydroxy fatty acids also occur, and very long chain acids of over 30 carbons are found in waxes.
5	5	6	fatty acid beta-oxidation	A fatty acid oxidation process that results in the complete oxidation of a long-chain fatty acid. Fatty acid beta-oxidation begins with the addition of coenzyme A to a fatty acid, and occurs by successive cycles of reactions during each of which the fatty acid is shortened by a two-carbon fragment removed as acetyl coenzyme A; the cycle continues until only two or three carbons remain (as acetyl-CoA or propionyl-CoA respectively).
1	1	0	unsaturated fatty acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of an unsaturated fatty acid, any fatty acid containing one or more double bonds between carbon atoms.
3	5	0	acyl-CoA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving acyl-CoA, any derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is in thiolester linkage with an acyl group.
1	0	0	acylglycerol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving acylglycerol, any mono-, di- or triester of glycerol with (one or more) fatty acids.
0	0	1	monoacylglycerol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of monoacylglycerol, any ester of glycerol in which any one of its hydroxyl groups has been acylated with a fatty acid, the other being non-esterified.
7	1	3	triglyceride metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving triglyceride, any triester of glycerol. The three fatty acid residues may all be the same or differ in any permutation. Triglycerides are important components of plant oils, animal fats and animal plasma lipoproteins.
0	3	0	triglyceride mobilization	The release of triglycerides, any triester of glycerol, from storage within cells or tissues, making them available for metabolism.
5	2	2	phospholipid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phospholipids, any lipid containing phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester.
2	2	0	phosphatidylethanolamine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phosphatidylethanolamine, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which a phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of ethanolamine.
1	0	0	glycerophospholipid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycerophospholipids, any derivative of glycerophosphate that contains at least one O-acyl, O-alkyl, or O-alkenyl group attached to the glycerol residue.
1	1	0	diacylglycerol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of diacylglycerol, a glyceride in which any two of the R groups (positions not specified) are acyl groups while the remaining R group can be either H or an alkyl group.
7	4	3	phosphatidic acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phosphatidic acid, any derivative of glycerol phosphate in which both the remaining hydroxyl groups of the glycerol moiety are esterified with fatty acids.
2	0	1	phosphatidylglycerol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phosphatidylglycerols, any of a class of phospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of glycerol.
7	4	3	phosphatidylcholine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phosphatidylcholines, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of choline.
0	1	1	CDP-choline pathway	The phosphatidylcholine biosynthetic process that begins with the phosphorylation of choline and ends with the combination of CDP-choline with diacylglycerol to form phosphatidylcholine.
1	0	1	phosphatidylserine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phosphatidylserines, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of L-serine. They are important constituents of cell membranes.
1	1	1	phosphatidylserine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phosphatidylserines, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of L-serine.
2	0	0	phosphatidylserine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phosphatidylserines, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of L-serine.
18	19	11	phosphatidylinositol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phosphatidylinositol, any glycophospholipid in which the sn-glycerol 3-phosphate residue is esterified to the 1-hydroxyl group of 1D-myo-inositol.
0	2	1	platelet activating factor biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of platelet activating factor, 1-O-alkyl-2-acetyl-sn-glycerol 3-phosphocholine, where alkyl = hexadecyl or octadecyl. Platelet activating factor is an inflammatory mediator released from a variety of cells in response to various stimuli.
1	1	3	sphingolipid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving sphingolipids, any of a class of lipids containing the long-chain amine diol sphingosine or a closely related base (a sphingoid).
1	0	0	3-keto-sphinganine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving 3-keto-sphinganine, a derivative of sphinganine with a ketone group at C3. It is an intermediate in the synthesis of sphingosine.
0	0	1	sphinganine-1-phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving sphinganine-1-phosphate, the phosphorylated derivative of D-erythro-2-amino-1,3-octadecanediol.
0	0	1	sphinganine-1-phosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of sphinganine-1-phosphate, the phosphorylated derivative of D-erythro-2-amino-1,3-octadecanediol.
1	0	2	sphingosine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving sphingosine (sphing-4-enine), trans-D-erytho-2-amino-octadec-4-ene-1,3-diol, a long chain amino diol sphingoid base that occurs in most sphingolipids in animal tissues.
3	2	2	ceramide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ceramides, any N-acylated sphingoid.
1	0	0	glucosylceramide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glucosylceramides, any compound formed by the replacement of the glycosidic hydroxyl group of a cyclic form of glucose by a ceramide group.
1	0	0	galactosylceramide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of galactosylceramides, any compound formed by the replacement of the glycosidic hydroxyl group of a cyclic form of galactose by a ceramide group.
1	0	1	sphingomyelin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving sphingomyelin, N-acyl-4-sphingenyl-1-O-phosphorylcholine, any of a class of phospholipids in which the amino group of sphingosine is in amide linkage with one of several fatty acids, while the terminal hydroxyl group of sphingosine is esterified to phosphorylcholine.
0	1	1	sphingomyelin catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of sphingomyelin, N-acyl-4-sphingenyl-1-O-phosphorylcholine.
2	0	0	sphingomyelin biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of sphingomyelin, N-acyl-4-sphingenyl-1-O-phosphorylcholine.
5	2	3	glycosphingolipid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycosphingolipids, any compound with residues of sphingoid and at least one monosaccharide.
0	0	1	icosanoid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving icosanoids, any of a group of C20 polyunsaturated fatty acids.
1	3	1	leukotriene metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving leukotriene, a pharmacologically active substance derived from a polyunsaturated fatty acid, such as arachidonic acid.
8	2	1	prostaglandin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving prostaglandins, any of a group of biologically active metabolites which contain a cyclopentane ring due to the formation of a bond between two carbons of a fatty acid. They have a wide range of biological activities.
1	1	0	steroid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of steroids, compounds with a 1,2,cyclopentanoperhydrophenanthrene nucleus; includes de novo formation and steroid interconversion by modification.
3	8	4	cholesterol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones.
1	3	5	bile acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of bile acids, any of a group of steroid carboxylic acids occurring in bile.
2	2	0	C21-steroid hormone biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of C21-steroid hormones, steroid compounds containing 21 carbons which function as hormones.
1	0	1	androgen biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of androgens, C19 steroid hormones that can stimulate the development of male sexual characteristics.
2	0	0	estrogen biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of estrogens, C18 steroid hormones that can stimulate the development of female sexual characteristics. Also found in plants.
1	0	0	glucocorticoid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glucocorticoids, hormonal C21 corticosteroids synthesized from cholesterol.
1	0	0	steroid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of steroids, compounds with a 1,2,cyclopentanoperhydrophenanthrene nucleus.
1	1	1	cholesterol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones.
0	0	1	androgen catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of androgens, C19 steroid hormones that can stimulate the development of male sexual characteristics.
0	0	1	glucocorticoid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glucocorticoids, hormonal C21 corticosteroids synthesized from cholesterol.
1	0	0	isoprenoid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving isoprenoid compounds, isoprene (2-methylbuta-1,3-diene) or compounds containing or derived from linked isoprene (3-methyl-2-butenylene) residues.
1	0	0	eye pigment biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of eye pigments, any general or particular coloring matter in living organisms, found or utilized in the eye.
1	1	1	tetrahydrobiopterin biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of tetrahydrobiopterin, the reduced form of biopterin (2-amino-4-hydroxy-6-(1,2-dihydroxypropyl)-pteridine). It functions as a hydroxylation coenzyme, e.g. in the conversion of phenylalanine to tyrosine.
5	2	0	one-carbon metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving the transfer of one-carbon units in various oxidation states.
0	1	3	NADH metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide (NADH), a coenzyme present in most living cells and derived from the B vitamin nicotinic acid.
1	1	1	NADP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving nicotinamide-adenine dinucleotide phosphate, a coenzyme involved in many redox and biosynthetic reactions; metabolism may be of either the oxidized form, NADP, or the reduced form, NADPH.
0	0	1	NADPH regeneration	A metabolic process that generates a pool of NADPH by the reduction of NADP+.
1	2	0	NADP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nicotinamide-adenine dinucleotide phosphate, a coenzyme involved in many redox and biosynthetic reactions; biosynthesis may be of either the oxidized form, NADP, or the reduced form, NADPH.
4	1	0	ubiquinone biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ubiquinone, a lipid-soluble electron-transporting coenzyme.
9	3	6	glutathione metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glutathione, the tripeptide glutamylcysteinylglycine, which acts as a coenzyme for some enzymes and as an antioxidant in the protection of sulfhydryl groups in enzymes and other proteins; it has a specific role in the reduction of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2) and oxidized ascorbate, and it participates in the gamma-glutamyl cycle.
1	0	2	glutathione biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glutathione, the tripeptide glutamylcysteinylglycine, which acts as a coenzyme for some enzymes and as an antioxidant in the protection of sulfhydryl groups in enzymes and other proteins.
0	0	1	glutathione catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glutathione, the tripeptide glutamylcysteinylglycine, which acts as a coenzyme for some enzymes and as an antioxidant in the protection of sulfhydryl groups in enzymes and other proteins.
1	0	0	nucleoside phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any phosphorylated nucleoside.
5	0	6	ATP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ATP, adenosine 5'-triphosphate, a universally important coenzyme and enzyme regulator.
0	1	1	folic acid-containing compound metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a folic acid-containing compound, i.e. any of a group of heterocyclic compounds based on the pteroic acid skeleton conjugated with one or more L-glutamic acid or L-glutamate units.
0	1	0	biotin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving biotin, cis-tetrahydro-2-oxothieno(3,4-d)imidazoline-4-valeric acid; the (+) enantiomer is very widely distributed in cells and serves as a carrier in a number of enzymatic beta-carboxylation reactions.
1	0	0	riboflavin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving riboflavin (vitamin B2), the precursor for the coenzymes flavin mononucleotide (FMN) and flavin adenine dinucleotide (FAD).
1	0	0	thiamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving thiamine (vitamin B1), a water soluble vitamin present in fresh vegetables and meats, especially liver.
0	3	1	Mo-molybdopterin cofactor biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of the Mo-molybdopterin cofactor, essential for the catalytic activity of some enzymes. The cofactor consists of a mononuclear molybdenum (Mo) ion coordinated by one or two molybdopterin ligands.
1	0	0	porphyrin-containing compound metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any member of a large group of derivatives or analogs of porphyrin. Porphyrins consists of a ring of four pyrrole nuclei linked each to the next at their alpha positions through a methine group.
1	0	0	porphyrin-containing compound biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of any member of a large group of derivatives or analogs of porphyrin. Porphyrin consists of a ring of four pyrrole nuclei linked each to the next at their alpha positions through a methine group.
0	0	1	succinyl-CoA pathway	The chemical reactions that utilize succinyl-CoA in the synthesis of protoporphyrin IX.
0	1	1	protoporphyrinogen IX biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of protoporphyrinogen IX.
1	1	4	heme biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of heme, any compound of iron complexed in a porphyrin (tetrapyrrole) ring, from less complex precursors.
0	1	0	heme oxidation	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the loss of electrons from one or more atoms in heme.
2	1	3	phosphate-containing compound metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving the phosphate group, the anion or salt of any phosphoric acid.
1	0	2	polyphosphate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a polyphosphate, the anion or salt of polyphosphoric acid.
7	4	1	superoxide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving superoxide, the superoxide anion O2- (superoxide free radical), or any compound containing this species.
12	13	4	xenobiotic metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a xenobiotic compound, a compound foreign to living organisms. Used of chemical compounds, e.g. a xenobiotic chemical, such as a pesticide.
1	3	2	nitrogen compound metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving organic or inorganic compounds that contain nitrogen.
1	0	0	regulation of nitrogen utilization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of nitrogen utilization.
3	2	1	nitric oxide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nitric oxide, nitrogen monoxide (NO), a colorless gas only slightly soluble in water.
9	8	13	ion transport	The directed movement of charged atoms or small charged molecules into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	cation transport	The directed movement of cations, atoms or small molecules with a net positive charge, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	1	9	potassium ion transport	The directed movement of potassium ions (K+) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
7	0	6	sodium ion transport	The directed movement of sodium ions (Na+) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
8	9	10	calcium ion transport	The directed movement of calcium (Ca) ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	0	phosphate ion transport	The directed movement of phosphate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
3	0	4	anion transport	The directed movement of anions, atoms or small molecules with a net negative charge, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
6	6	6	chloride transport	The directed movement of chloride into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	2	1	copper ion transport	The directed movement of copper (Cu) ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	2	6	iron ion transport	The directed movement of iron (Fe) ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	zinc ion transport	The directed movement of zinc (Zn II) ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	0	1	water transport	The directed movement of water (H2O) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
7	2	13	neurotransmitter transport	The directed movement of a neurotransmitter into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Neurotransmitters are any chemical substance that is capable of transmitting (or inhibiting the transmission of) a nerve impulse from a neuron to another cell.
2	1	1	mitochondrial transport	Transport of substances into, out of or within a mitochondrion.
1	0	0	mitochondrial citrate transmembrane transport	The directed movement of citrate, 2-hydroxy-1,2,3-propanetricarboyxlate, into or out of a mitochondrial matrix.
1	0	0	mitochondrial pyruvate transmembrane transport	The process in which pyruvate is transported across a mitochondrial membrane, into or out of the mitochondrion.
2	0	3	mitochondrial calcium ion transmembrane transport	The process in which a calcium ion (Ca2+) is transported across a mitochondrial membrane, into or out of the mitochondrion.
3	0	2	carnitine shuttle	The transfer of acyl groups to and from acyl-CoA molecules to form O-acylcarnitine, which can exchange across the mitochondrial inner membrane with unacylated carnitine.
2	1	1	drug transmembrane transport	The process in which a drug is transported across a membrane.
0	2	0	extracellular transport	The transport of substances that occurs outside cells.
3	5	4	amino acid transport	The directed movement of amino acids, organic acids containing one or more amino substituents, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	1	glutamine transport	The directed movement of glutamine, 2-amino-4-carbamoylbutanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
8	3	6	lipid transport	The directed movement of lipids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Lipids are compounds soluble in an organic solvent but not, or sparingly, in an aqueous solvent.
0	0	2	cellular ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of ions at the level of a cell.
6	11	15	cellular calcium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of calcium ions at the level of a cell.
0	0	1	cellular metal ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of metal ions at the level of a cell.
1	2	0	cellular copper ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of copper ions at the level of a cell.
6	6	5	cellular iron ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of iron ions at the level of a cell.
0	0	1	intracellular sequestering of iron ion	The process of binding or confining iron ions in an intracellular area such that they are separated from other components of a biological system.
2	3	1	cellular zinc ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of zinc ions at the level of a cell.
3	0	8	cellular sodium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of sodium ions at the level of a cell.
2	3	5	cell volume homeostasis	Any process involved in maintaining the steady state of a cell's volume. The cell's volume refers to the three-dimensional space occupied by a cell.
3	0	1	regulation of pH	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal equilibrium of hydrogen ions, thereby modulating the internal pH, within an organism or cell.
34	48	43	intracellular protein transport	The directed movement of proteins in a cell, including the movement of proteins between specific compartments or structures within a cell, such as organelles of a eukaryotic cell.
10	17	22	exocytosis	A process of secretion by a cell that results in the release of intracellular molecules (e.g. hormones, matrix proteins) contained within a membrane-bounded vesicle. Exocytosis can occur either by full fusion, when the vesicle collapses into the plasma membrane, or by a kiss-and-run mechanism that involves the formation of a transient contact, a pore, between a granule (for exemple of chromaffin cells) and the plasma membrane. The latter process most of the time leads to only partial secretion of the granule content. Exocytosis begins with steps that prepare vesicles for fusion with the membrane (tethering and docking) and ends when molecules are secreted from the cell.
20	26	34	endoplasmic reticulum to Golgi vesicle-mediated transport	The directed movement of substances from the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) to the Golgi, mediated by COP II vesicles. Small COP II coated vesicles form from the ER and then fuse directly with the cis-Golgi. Larger structures are transported along microtubules to the cis-Golgi.
17	22	10	retrograde vesicle-mediated transport, Golgi to endoplasmic reticulum	The directed movement of substances from the Golgi back to the endoplasmic reticulum, mediated by vesicles bearing specific protein coats such as COPI or COG.
6	2	4	intra-Golgi vesicle-mediated transport	The directed movement of substances within the Golgi, mediated by small transport vesicles. These either fuse with the cis-Golgi or with each other to form the membrane stacks known as the cis-Golgi reticulum (network).
5	12	11	post-Golgi vesicle-mediated transport	The directed movement of substances from the Golgi to other parts of the cell, including organelles and the plasma membrane, mediated by small transport vesicles.
2	5	2	Golgi to plasma membrane transport	The directed movement of substances from the Golgi to the plasma membrane in transport vesicles that move from the trans-Golgi network to the plasma membrane, where they fuse and release their contents by exocytosis.
5	2	4	Golgi to endosome transport	The directed movement of substances from the Golgi to early sorting endosomes. Clathrin vesicles transport substances from the trans-Golgi to endosomes.
1	1	2	Golgi to vacuole transport	The directed movement of substances from the Golgi to the vacuole.
23	26	38	endocytosis	A vesicle-mediated transport process in which cells take up external materials or membrane constituents by the invagination of a small region of the plasma membrane to form a new membrane-bounded vesicle.
27	14	31	receptor-mediated endocytosis	An endocytosis process in which cell surface receptors ensure specificity of transport. A specific receptor on the cell surface binds tightly to the extracellular macromolecule (the ligand) that it recognizes; the plasma-membrane region containing the receptor-ligand complex then undergoes endocytosis, forming a transport vesicle containing the receptor-ligand complex and excluding most other plasma-membrane proteins. Receptor-mediated endocytosis generally occurs via clathrin-coated pits and vesicles.
2	6	3	vesicle budding from membrane	The evagination of a membrane, resulting in formation of a vesicle.
1	2	3	vesicle targeting	The process in which vesicles are directed to specific destination membranes. Targeting involves coordinated interactions among cytoskeletal elements (microtubules or actin filaments), motor proteins, molecules at the vesicle membrane and target membrane surfaces, and vesicle cargo.
6	4	6	vesicle docking involved in exocytosis	The initial attachment of a vesicle membrane to a target membrane, mediated by proteins protruding from the membrane of the vesicle and the target membrane, that contributes to exocytosis.
4	8	6	vesicle fusion	Fusion of the membrane of a transport vesicle with its target membrane.
1	1	1	pinocytosis	An endocytosis process that results in the uptake of liquid material by cells from their external environment; literally 'cell drinking'. Liquid is enclosed in vesicles, called pinosomes, formed by invagination of the plasma membrane.
14	8	4	phagocytosis	A vesicle-mediated transport process that results in the engulfment of external particulate material by phagocytes and their delivery to the lysosome. The particles are initially contained within phagocytic vacuoles (phagosomes), which then fuse with primary lysosomes to effect digestion of the particles.
4	3	13	phagocytosis, recognition	The initial step in phagocytosis involving adhesion to bacteria, immune complexes and other particulate matter, or an apoptotic cell and based on recognition of factors such as bacterial cell wall components, opsonins like complement and antibody or protein receptors and lipids like phosphatidyl serine, and leading to intracellular signaling in the phagocytosing cell.
10	8	18	phagocytosis, engulfment	The internalization of bacteria, immune complexes and other particulate matter or of an apoptotic cell by phagocytosis, including the membrane and cytoskeletal processes required, which involves one of three mechanisms: zippering of pseudopods around a target via repeated receptor-ligand interactions, sinking of the target directly into plasma membrane of the phagocytosing cell, or induced uptake via an enhanced membrane ruffling of the phagocytosing cell similar to macropinocytosis.
1	5	4	nucleocytoplasmic transport	The directed movement of molecules between the nucleus and the cytoplasm.
13	21	19	autophagy	The cellular catabolic process in which cells digest parts of their own cytoplasm; allows for both recycling of macromolecular constituents under conditions of cellular stress and remodeling the intracellular structure for cell differentiation.
64	79	75	apoptotic process	A programmed cell death process which begins when a cell receives an internal (e.g. DNA damage) or external signal (e.g. an extracellular death ligand), and proceeds through a series of biochemical events (signaling pathway phase) which trigger an execution phase. The execution phase is the last step of an apoptotic process, and is typically characterized by rounding-up of the cell, retraction of pseudopodes, reduction of cellular volume (pyknosis), chromatin condensation, nuclear fragmentation (karyorrhexis), plasma membrane blebbing and fragmentation of the cell into apoptotic bodies. When the execution phase is completed, the cell has died.
14	13	10	activation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic process	Any process that initiates the activity of the inactive enzyme cysteine-type endopeptidase in the context of an apoptotic process.
1	0	0	cellular component disassembly involved in execution phase of apoptosis	The breakdown of structures such as organelles, proteins, or other macromolecular structures during apoptosis.
0	1	2	activation-induced cell death of T cells	A T cell apoptotic process that occurs towards the end of the expansion phase following the initial activation of mature T cells by antigen and is triggered by T cell receptor stimulation and signals transmitted via various surface-expressed members of the TNF receptor family such as Fas ligand, Fas, and TNF and the p55 and p75 TNF receptors.
1	0	1	substrate-dependent cell migration	The orderly movement of a cell from one site to another along a substrate such as the extracellular matrix; the migrating cell forms a protrusion that attaches to the substrate.
0	3	2	substrate-dependent cell migration, cell extension	The formation of a cell surface protrusion, such as a lamellipodium or filopodium, at the leading edge of a migrating cell.
0	1	2	negative regulation of cell adhesion involved in substrate-bound cell migration	The disassembly of adhesions at the front and rear of a migrating cell. At the leading edge, adhesion disassembly accompanies the formation of new protrusions; at the cell rear, it promotes tail retraction.
11	8	6	chemotaxis	The directed movement of a motile cell or organism, or the directed growth of a cell guided by a specific chemical concentration gradient. Movement may be towards a higher concentration (positive chemotaxis) or towards a lower concentration (negative chemotaxis).
17	8	32	muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis.
2	3	2	regulation of muscle contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of muscle contraction.
2	2	3	smooth muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within smooth muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. Smooth muscle differs from striated muscle in the much higher actin/myosin ratio, the absence of conspicuous sarcomeres and the ability to contract to a much smaller fraction of its resting length.
4	0	2	regulation of smooth muscle contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle contraction.
1	1	6	striated muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within striated muscle tissue, resulting in the shortening of the muscle. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. Striated muscle is a type of muscle in which the repeating units (sarcomeres) of the contractile myofibrils are arranged in registry throughout the cell, resulting in transverse or oblique striations observable at the level of the light microscope.
1	1	2	regulation of striated muscle contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of striated muscle contraction.
11	4	3	defense response	Reactions, triggered in response to the presence of a foreign body or the occurrence of an injury, which result in restriction of damage to the organism attacked or prevention/recovery from the infection caused by the attack.
6	5	4	acute-phase response	An acute inflammatory response that involves non-antibody proteins whose concentrations in the plasma increase in response to infection or injury of homeothermic animals.
39	45	28	inflammatory response	The immediate defensive reaction (by vertebrate tissue) to infection or injury caused by chemical or physical agents. The process is characterized by local vasodilation, extravasation of plasma into intercellular spaces and accumulation of white blood cells and macrophages.
53	23	19	immune response	Any immune system process that functions in the calibrated response of an organism to a potential internal or invasive threat.
13	6	14	complement activation	Any process involved in the activation of any of the steps of the complement cascade, which allows for the direct killing of microbes, the disposal of immune complexes, and the regulation of other immune processes; the initial steps of complement activation involve one of three pathways, the classical pathway, the alternative pathway, and the lectin pathway, all of which lead to the terminal complement pathway.
5	1	3	complement activation, alternative pathway	Any process involved in the activation of any of the steps of the alternative pathway of the complement cascade which allows for the direct killing of microbes and the regulation of other immune processes.
16	8	17	complement activation, classical pathway	Any process involved in the activation of any of the steps of the classical pathway of the complement cascade which allows for the direct killing of microbes, the disposal of immune complexes, and the regulation of other immune processes.
3	11	1	humoral immune response	An immune response mediated through a body fluid.
8	8	2	cellular defense response	A defense response that is mediated by cells.
2	4	4	response to osmotic stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating an increase or decrease in the concentration of solutes outside the organism or cell.
1	0	1	hypotonic response	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of detection of, or exposure to, a hypotonic environment, i.e. an environment with a lower concentration of solutes than the organism or cell.
1	0	3	hyperosmotic response	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of detection of, or exposure to, a hyperosmotic environment, i.e. an environment with a higher concentration of solutes than the organism or cell.
40	51	39	cellular response to DNA damage stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating damage to its DNA from environmental insults or errors during metabolism.
2	3	2	DNA damage induced protein phosphorylation	The widespread phosphorylation of various molecules, triggering many downstream processes, that occurs in response to the detection of DNA damage.
13	13	7	DNA damage response, signal transduction by p53 class mediator resulting in cell cycle arrest	A cascade of processes induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53, or an equivalent protein, in response to the detection of DNA damage and resulting in the stopping or reduction in rate of the cell cycle.
5	6	1	DNA damage response, signal transduction by p53 class mediator resulting in transcription of p21 class mediator	A cascade of processes induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53, or an equivalent protein, resulting in the induction of the transcription of p21 (also known as WAF1, CIP1 and SDI1) or any equivalent protein, in response to the detection of DNA damage.
11	11	15	response to oxidative stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of oxidative stress, a state often resulting from exposure to high levels of reactive oxygen species, e.g. superoxide anions, hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), and hydroxyl radicals.
1	2	2	ER overload response	The series of molecular signals generated by the accumulation of normal or misfolded proteins in the endoplasmic reticulum and leading to activation of transcription by NF-kappaB.
0	0	1	ER-nucleus signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals that conveys information from the endoplasmic reticulum to the nucleus, usually resulting in a change in transcriptional regulation.
2	5	14	response to unfolded protein	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an unfolded protein stimulus.
0	0	1	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter involved in unfolded protein response	The activation of genes whose promoters contain a specific sequence elements such as the unfolded protein response element (UPRE; consensus CAGCGTG) or the ER stress-response element (ERSE; CCAAN(N)9CCACG), as a result of signaling via the unfolded protein response.
1	0	1	response to sterol depletion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating deprivation of sterols. Sterols are a group of steroids characterized by the presence of one or more hydroxyl groups and a hydrocarbon side-chain in the molecule.
2	2	2	organelle organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of an organelle within a cell. An organelle is an organized structure of distinctive morphology and function. Includes the nucleus, mitochondria, plastids, vacuoles, vesicles, ribosomes and the cytoskeleton. Excludes the plasma membrane.
4	6	5	nucleus organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the nucleus.
1	6	3	nuclear envelope organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the nuclear envelope.
1	4	2	nuclear pore organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the nuclear pore.
1	1	1	nucleolus organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the nucleolus.
2	6	10	telomere maintenance via telomerase	The maintenance of proper telomeric length by the addition of telomeric repeats by telomerase.
14	14	9	mitochondrion organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a mitochondrion; includes mitochondrial morphogenesis and distribution, and replication of the mitochondrial genome as well as synthesis of new mitochondrial components.
0	2	2	inner mitochondrial membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the mitochondrial inner membrane.
1	2	6	plasma membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the plasma membrane.
17	24	37	cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures.
25	24	25	actin filament organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising actin filaments. Includes processes that control the spatial distribution of actin filaments, such as organizing filaments into meshworks, bundles, or other structures, as by cross-linking.
1	2	6	microtubule-based process	Any cellular process that depends upon or alters the microtubule cytoskeleton, that part of the cytoskeleton comprising microtubules and their associated proteins.
12	17	10	microtubule-based movement	A microtubule-based process that results in the movement of organelles, other microtubules, or other cellular components.  Examples include motor-driven movement along microtubules and movement driven by polymerization or depolymerization of microtubules.
2	4	3	microtubule depolymerization	The removal of tubulin heterodimers from one or both ends of a microtubule.
4	2	4	microtubule nucleation	The process in which tubulin alpha-beta heterodimers begin aggregation to form an oligomeric tubulin structure (a microtubule seed). Microtubule nucleation is the initiating step in the formation of a microtubule in the absence of any existing microtubules ('de novo' microtubule formation).
0	1	1	tubulin complex assembly	The aggregation and bonding together of alpha- and beta-tubulin to form a tubulin heterodimer.
2	6	9	negative regulation of microtubule depolymerization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule depolymerization; prevention of depolymerization of a microtubule can result from binding by 'capping' at the plus end (e.g. by interaction with another cellular protein of structure) or by exposing microtubules to a stabilizing drug such as taxol.
0	0	1	cytoplasm organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the cytoplasm. The cytoplasm is all of the contents of a cell excluding the plasma membrane and nucleus, but including other subcellular structures.
5	7	6	endoplasmic reticulum organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the endoplasmic reticulum.
19	13	21	Golgi organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the Golgi apparatus.
1	2	1	peroxisome organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a peroxisome. A peroxisome is a small, membrane-bounded organelle that uses dioxygen (O2) to oxidize organic molecules.
4	4	8	endosome organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of endosomes.
0	1	0	vacuole organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a vacuole.
1	0	1	vacuolar transport	The directed movement of substances into, out of or within a vacuole.
1	1	2	vacuolar acidification	Any process that reduces the pH of the vacuole, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
6	8	3	lysosome organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a lysosome. A lysosome is a cytoplasmic, membrane-bounded organelle that is found in most animal cells and that contains a variety of hydrolases.
3	4	4	lysosomal transport	The directed movement of substances into, out of or within a lysosome.
2	2	0	lysosomal lumen acidification	Any process that reduces the pH of the lysosomal lumen, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
1	3	10	cell-cell junction assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a junction between cells.
0	0	3	cell-substrate junction assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a junction between a cell and its substrate.
26	48	36	cell cycle	The progression of biochemical and morphological phases and events that occur in a cell during successive cell replication or nuclear replication events. Canonically, the cell cycle comprises the replication and segregation of genetic material followed by the division of the cell, but in endocycles or syncytial cells nuclear replication or nuclear division may not be followed by cell division.
19	27	12	cell cycle arrest	A regulatory process that halts progression through the cell cycle during one of the normal phases (G1, S, G2, M).
4	4	1	spindle organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the spindle, the array of microtubules and associated molecules that forms between opposite poles of a eukaryotic cell during DNA segregation and serves to move the duplicated chromosomes apart.
14	30	31	mitotic spindle organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the microtubule spindle during a mitotic cell cycle.
0	0	1	spindle assembly involved in female meiosis	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the spindle during a meiotic cell cycle in females. An example of this is found in Drosophila melanogaster.
1	0	0	spindle assembly involved in female meiosis I	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the spindle during meiosis I of a meiotic cell cycle in females. An example of this is found in Drosophila melanogaster.
9	17	6	chromosome segregation	The process in which genetic material, in the form of chromosomes, is organized into specific structures and then physically separated and apportioned to two or more sets. In eukaryotes, chromosome segregation begins with the condensation of chromosomes, includes chromosome separation, and ends when chromosomes have completed movement to the spindle poles.
1	0	0	male meiosis chromosome segregation	The cell cycle process in which genetic material, in the form of chromosomes, is organized and then physically separated and apportioned to two or more sets during the meiotic cell cycle in a male.
5	6	1	sister chromatid cohesion	The cell cycle process in which the sister chromatids of a replicated chromosome become tethered to each other.
0	0	1	regulation of sister chromatid cohesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of sister chromatid cohesion.
1	5	4	mitotic sister chromatid cohesion	The cell cycle process in which the sister chromatids of a replicated chromosome are joined along the entire length of the chromosome, from their formation in S phase through metaphase during a mitotic cell cycle. This cohesion cycle is critical for high fidelity chromosome transmission.
4	9	7	mitotic chromosome condensation	The cell cycle process in which chromatin structure is compacted prior to and during mitosis in eukaryotic cells.
2	1	4	mitotic nuclear envelope disassembly	The mitotic cell cycle process in which the controlled partial or complete breakdown of the nuclear envelope during occurs during mitosis.
1	1	0	mitotic chromosome movement towards spindle pole	The cell cycle process in which the directed movement of chromosomes from the center of the spindle towards the spindle poles occurs. This mediates by the shortening of microtubules attached to the chromosomes, during mitosis.
9	10	6	mitotic metaphase plate congression	The cell cycle process in which chromosomes are aligned at the metaphase plate, a plane halfway between the poles of the mitotic spindle, during mitosis.
6	17	12	mitotic nuclear envelope reassembly	The mitotic cell cycle process involving ESCRTIII that results in reformation of the nuclear envelope after mitotic nuclear division. In organisms undergoing closed mitosis this involves resealing or 'repair' of the nuclear envelope in the nuclear bridge.
8	3	2	regulation of mitotic nuclear division	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mitosis.
1	1	0	traversing start control point of mitotic cell cycle	A cell cycle process by which a cell commits to entering S phase via a positive feedback mechanism between the regulation of transcription and G1 CDK activity.
2	1	1	metaphase/anaphase transition of mitotic cell cycle	The cell cycle process in which a cell progresses from metaphase to anaphase during mitosis, triggered by the activation of the anaphase promoting complex by Cdc20/Sleepy homolog which results in the degradation of Securin.
0	1	1	mitotic cell cycle checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that ensures accurate chromosome replication and segregation by preventing progression through a mitotic cell cycle until conditions are suitable for the cell to proceed to the next stage.
6	5	3	mitotic spindle assembly checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that delays the metaphase/anaphase transition of a mitotic nuclear division until the spindle is correctly assembled and chromosomes are attached to the spindle.
6	8	3	mitotic G2 DNA damage checkpoint	A mitotic cell cycle checkpoint that detects and negatively regulates progression through the G2/M transition of the cell cycle in response to DNA damage.
4	3	8	regulation of exit from mitosis	Any process involved in the progression from anaphase/telophase to G1 that is associated with a conversion from high to low mitotic CDK activity.
2	2	4	nuclear migration	The directed movement of the nucleus to a specific location within a cell.
6	8	6	centrosome cycle	The cell cycle process in which centrosome duplication and separation takes place. The centrosome cycle can operate with a considerable degree of independence from other processes of the cell cycle.
2	7	2	centriole replication	The cell cycle process in which a daughter centriole is formed perpendicular to an existing centriole. An immature centriole contains a ninefold radially symmetric array of single microtubules; mature centrioles consist of a radial array of nine microtubule triplets, doublets, or singlets depending upon the species and cell type. Duplicated centrioles also become the ciliary basal body in cells that form cilia during G0.
1	2	0	mitotic centrosome separation	Separation of duplicated centrosome components at the beginning of mitosis. The centriole pair within each centrosome becomes part of a separate microtubule organizing center that nucleates a radial array of microtubules called an aster. The two asters move to opposite sides of the nucleus to form the two poles of the mitotic spindle.
2	0	0	meiosis I	The first meiotic nuclear division in which homologous chromosomes are paired and segregated from each other, producing two haploid daughter nuclei.
1	3	0	homologous chromosome pairing at meiosis	The meiotic cell cycle process where side by side pairing and physical juxtaposition of homologous chromosomes is created during meiotic prophase. Homologous chromosome pairing begins when the chromosome arms begin to pair from the clustered telomeres and ends when synaptonemal complex or linear element assembly is complete.
2	2	1	synaptonemal complex assembly	The cell cycle process in which the synaptonemal complex is formed. This is a structure that holds paired chromosomes together during prophase I of meiosis and that promotes genetic recombination.
4	2	1	reciprocal meiotic recombination	The cell cycle process in which double strand breaks are formed and repaired through a single or double Holliday junction intermediate. This results in the equal exchange of genetic material between non-sister chromatids in a pair of homologous chromosomes. These reciprocal recombinant products ensure the proper segregation of homologous chromosomes during meiosis I and create genetic diversity.
2	2	2	male meiotic nuclear division	A cell cycle process by which the cell nucleus divides as part of a meiotic cell cycle in the male germline.
6	1	3	male meiosis I	A cell cycle process comprising the steps by which a cell progresses through male meiosis I, the first meiotic division in the male germline.
0	2	3	female meiotic nuclear division	A cell cycle process by which the cell nucleus divides as part of a meiotic cell cycle in the female germline.
1	1	1	female meiosis I	The cell cycle process in which the first meiotic division occurs in the female germline.
1	2	1	cell communication	Any process that mediates interactions between a cell and its surroundings. Encompasses interactions such as signaling or attachment between one cell and another cell, between a cell and an extracellular matrix, or between a cell and any other aspect of its environment.
63	45	51	cell adhesion	The attachment of a cell, either to another cell or to an underlying substrate such as the extracellular matrix, via cell adhesion molecules.
15	9	6	homophilic cell adhesion via plasma membrane adhesion molecules	The attachment of a plasma membrane adhesion molecule in one cell to an identical molecule in an adjacent cell.
8	2	2	heterophilic cell-cell adhesion via plasma membrane cell adhesion molecules	The attachment of an adhesion molecule in one cell to a nonidentical adhesion molecule in an adjacent cell.
0	0	4	neuron cell-cell adhesion	The attachment of a neuron to another cell via adhesion molecules.
4	7	4	leukocyte cell-cell adhesion	The attachment of a leukocyte to another cell via adhesion molecules.
11	15	14	cell-matrix adhesion	The binding of a cell to the extracellular matrix via adhesion molecules.
0	1	1	calcium-independent cell-matrix adhesion	The binding of a cell to the extracellular matrix via adhesion molecules that do not require the presence of calcium for the interaction.
8	9	5	negative regulation of cell adhesion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell adhesion.
4	10	13	establishment or maintenance of cell polarity	Any cellular process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of anisotropic intracellular organization or cell growth patterns.
132	107	131	signal transduction	The cellular process in which a signal is conveyed to trigger a change in the activity or state of a cell. Signal transduction begins with reception of a signal (e.g. a ligand binding to a receptor or receptor activation by a stimulus such as light), or for signal transduction in the absence of ligand, signal-withdrawal or the activity of a constitutively active receptor. Signal transduction ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. regulation of transcription or regulation of a metabolic process. Signal transduction covers signaling from receptors located on the surface of the cell and signaling via molecules located within the cell. For signaling between cells, signal transduction is restricted to events at and within the receiving cell.
24	22	10	cell surface receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by activation of a receptor on the surface of a cell. The pathway begins with binding of an extracellular ligand to a cell surface receptor, or for receptors that signal in the absence of a ligand, by ligand-withdrawal or the activity of a constitutively active receptor. The pathway ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
2	1	0	enzyme linked receptor protein signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a receptor on the surface of the target cell, where the receptor possesses catalytic activity or is closely associated with an enzyme such as a protein kinase, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
27	22	7	transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine kinase signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where the receptor possesses tyrosine kinase activity, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	4	2	signal complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a complex capable of relaying a signal within a cell.
9	17	8	epidermal growth factor receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a ligand to the tyrosine kinase receptor EGFR (ERBB1) on the surface of a cell. The pathway ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	0	1	epidermal growth factor catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of epidermal growth factor (EGF), following internalization of the receptor-bound ligand into the signal-receiving cell. Full breakdown of epidermal growth factor results in a ligand that is unable to bind and activate its receptor.
1	5	0	negative regulation of epidermal growth factor-activated receptor activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of EGF-activated receptor activity.
0	2	0	regulation of epidermal growth factor-activated receptor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of EGF-activated receptor activity.
3	2	0	transmembrane receptor protein serine/threonine kinase signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where the receptor possesses serine/threonine kinase activity, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
16	18	13	transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a transforming growth factor beta receptor on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	0	transforming growth factor beta receptor complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a ligand-bound type II transforming growth factor beta (TGF-beta) receptor dimer with a type I TGF-beta receptor dimer, following ligand binding, to form a heterotetrameric TGF-beta receptor complex.
1	0	1	common-partner SMAD protein phosphorylation	The process of introducing a phosphate group on to a common-partner SMAD protein. A common partner SMAD protein binds to pathway-restricted SMAD proteins forming a complex that translocates to the nucleus.
1	0	0	SMAD protein complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a protein complex that contains SMAD proteins.
1	1	0	transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine phosphatase signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where the receptor possesses protein tyrosine phosphatase activity, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
60	50	42	G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals that proceeds with an activated receptor promoting the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha-subunit of an associated heterotrimeric G-protein complex. The GTP-bound activated alpha-G-protein then dissociates from the beta- and gamma-subunits to further transmit the signal within the cell. The pathway begins with receptor-ligand interaction, or for basal GPCR signaling the pathway begins with the receptor activating its G protein in the absence of an agonist, and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.  The pathway can start from the plasma membrane, Golgi or nuclear membrane.
4	4	2	G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway, coupled to cyclic nucleotide second messenger	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation or inhibition of a nucleotide cyclase activity and a subsequent change in the concentration of a cyclic nucleotide.
4	4	3	adenylate cyclase-modulating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds through activation or inhibition of adenylyl cyclase activity and a subsequent change in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
9	9	2	adenylate cyclase-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds through activation of adenylyl cyclase activity and a subsequent increase in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
2	4	5	activation of adenylate cyclase activity	Any process that initiates the activity of the inactive enzyme adenylate cyclase.
1	3	2	adenylate cyclase-activating dopamine receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a dopamine receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation of adenylyl cyclase and a subsequent increase in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
2	7	6	adenylate cyclase-inhibiting G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds through inhibition of adenylyl cyclase activity and a subsequent decrease in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
1	1	3	negative regulation of adenylate cyclase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of adenylate cyclase activity.
0	1	1	adenylate cyclase-inhibiting dopamine receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a dopamine receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with inhibition of adenylyl cyclase and a subsequent decrease in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
1	0	0	adenylate cyclase-inhibiting G protein-coupled glutamate receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled glutamate receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with inhibition of adenylyl cyclase and a subsequent decrease in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
1	1	0	adenylate cyclase-inhibiting G protein-coupled acetylcholine receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled acetylcholine receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with inhibition of adenylyl cyclase and a subsequent decrease in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
1	0	0	adenylate cyclase-inhibiting serotonin receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a serotonin receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with inhibition of adenylyl cyclase and a subsequent decrease in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
0	1	0	G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway coupled to cGMP nucleotide second messenger	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled receptor binding to its physiological ligand, followed by activation of guanylyl cyclase (GC) activity and a subsequent increase in the concentration of cyclic GMP (cGMP).
7	5	2	phospholipase C-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation of phospholipase C (PLC) and a subsequent increase in the concentration of inositol trisphosphate (IP3) and diacylglycerol (DAG).
5	2	1	activation of phospholipase C activity	The initiation of the activity of the inactive enzyme phospolipase C as the result of a series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled receptor binding to its physiological ligand.
15	8	8	positive regulation of cytosolic calcium ion concentration	Any process that increases the concentration of calcium ions in the cytosol.
6	1	3	protein kinase C-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation of protein kinase C (PKC). PKC is activated by second messengers including diacylglycerol (DAG).
0	0	1	phospholipase C-activating G protein-coupled glutamate receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled glutamate receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation of phospholipase C (PLC) and a subsequent release of inositol trisphosphate (IP3) and diacylglycerol (DAG).
1	0	0	phospholipase C-activating G protein-coupled acetylcholine receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a G protein-coupled acetylcholine receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation of phospholipase C (PLC) and a subsequent release of inositol trisphosphate (IP3) and diacylglycerol (DAG).
3	2	3	dopamine receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a dopamine receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
2	2	3	G protein-coupled acetylcholine receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals initiated by an acetylcholine receptor on the surface of the target cell binding to one of its physiological ligands, and proceeding with the activated receptor promoting the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha-subunit of an associated heterotrimeric G-protein complex. The GTP-bound activated alpha-G-protein then dissociates from the beta- and gamma-subunits to further transmit the signal within the cell. The pathway begins with receptor-ligand interaction and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	4	gamma-aminobutyric acid signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated by the binding of gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA, 4-aminobutyrate), an amino acid which acts as a neurotransmitter in some organisms, to a cell surface receptor.
1	0	3	glutamate receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of glutamate to a glutamate receptor on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
2	1	1	G protein-coupled glutamate receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by glutamate binding to a glutamate receptor on the surface of the target cell, and proceeding with the activated receptor promoting the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha-subunit of an associated heterotrimeric G-protein complex. Ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	0	tachykinin receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a tachykinin, i.e. a short peptide with the terminal sequence (Phe-X-Gly-Leu-Met-NH2), binding to a cell surface receptor.
3	0	4	neuropeptide signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a peptide neurotransmitter binding to a cell surface receptor.
12	10	9	Notch signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to the receptor Notch on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	2	0	Notch receptor processing	The series of successive proteolytic cleavages of the Notch protein, which result in an active form of the receptor.
5	0	5	positive regulation of transcription of Notch receptor target	The activation of transcription of specific genes as a result of Notch signaling, mediated by the Notch intracellular domain.
3	6	7	Wnt signaling pathway, calcium modulating pathway	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where activated receptors leads to an increase in intracellular calcium and activation of protein kinase C (PKC).
6	3	2	smoothened signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of activation of the transmembrane protein Smoothened.
18	30	9	integrin-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of extracellular ligand to an integrin on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	1	osmosensory signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals initiated in response to osmotic change.
5	12	10	I-kappaB kinase/NF-kappaB signaling	The process in which a signal is passed on to downstream components within the cell through the I-kappaB-kinase (IKK)-dependent activation of NF-kappaB. The cascade begins with activation of a trimeric IKK complex (consisting of catalytic kinase subunits IKKalpha and/or IKKbeta, and the regulatory scaffold protein NEMO) and ends with the regulation of transcription of target genes by NF-kappaB. In a resting state, NF-kappaB dimers are bound to I-kappaB proteins, sequestering NF-kappaB in the cytoplasm. Phosphorylation of I-kappaB targets I-kappaB for ubiquitination and proteasomal degradation, thus releasing the NF-kappaB dimers, which can translocate to the nucleus to bind DNA and regulate transcription.
2	1	1	activation of NF-kappaB-inducing kinase activity	The stimulation of the activity of NF-kappaB-inducing kinase through phosphorylation at specific residues.
1	2	1	I-kappaB phosphorylation	The process of introducing a phosphate group into an inhibitor of kappa B (I-kappaB) protein. Phosphorylation of I-kappaB targets I-kappaB for ubiquitination and proteasomal degradation, thus releasing bound NF-kappaB dimers, which can translocate to the nucleus to bind DNA and regulate transcription.
1	1	1	cytoplasmic sequestering of NF-kappaB	The selective interaction of the transcription factor NF-kappaB with specific molecules in the cytoplasm, thereby inhibiting its translocation into the nucleus.
6	9	12	JNK cascade	An intracellular protein kinase cascade containing at least a JNK (a MAPK), a JNKK (a MAPKK) and a JUN3K (a MAP3K). The cascade can also contain an additional tier: the upstream MAP4K. The kinases in each tier phosphorylate and activate the kinases in the downstream tier to transmit a signal within a cell.
1	0	1	activation of JNKK activity	The initiation of the activity of the inactive enzyme JUN kinase kinase (JNKK) activity. JNKKs are involved in a signaling pathway that is primarily activated by cytokines and exposure to environmental stress.
4	11	11	activation of JUN kinase activity	The initiation of the activity of the inactive enzyme JUN kinase (JNK).
1	0	0	JUN phosphorylation	The process of introducing a phosphate group into a JUN protein.
7	4	2	receptor signaling pathway via JAK-STAT	Any process in which STAT proteins (Signal Transducers and Activators of Transcription) and JAK (Janus Activated Kinase) proteins convey a signal to trigger a change in the activity or state of a cell. The receptor signaling pathway via JAK-STAT begins with activation of a receptor and proceeeds through STAT protein activation by members of the JAK family of tyrosine kinases. STAT proteins dimerize and subsequently translocate to the nucleus. The pathway ends with regulation of target gene expression by STAT proteins.
4	0	0	tyrosine phosphorylation of STAT protein	The process of introducing a phosphate group to a tyrosine residue of a STAT (Signal Transducer and Activator of Transcription) protein.
3	1	1	nitric oxide mediated signal transduction	Any intracellular signal transduction in which the signal is passed on within the cell via nitric oxide (NO). Includes synthesis of nitric oxide, receptors/sensors for nitric oxide (such as soluble guanylyl cyclase/sGC) and downstream effectors that further transmit the signal within the cell. Nitric oxide transmits its downstream effects through either cyclic GMP (cGMP)-dependent or independent mechanisms.
13	19	19	small GTPase mediated signal transduction	Any series of molecular signals in which a small monomeric GTPase relays one or more of the signals.
11	17	14	Ras protein signal transduction	A series of molecular signals within the cell that are mediated by a member of the Ras superfamily of proteins switching to a GTP-bound active state.
4	15	13	Rho protein signal transduction	A series of molecular signals within the cell that are mediated by a member of the Rho family of proteins switching to a GTP-bound active state.
14	12	11	cell-cell signaling	Any process that mediates the transfer of information from one cell to another. This process includes signal transduction in the receiving cell and, where applicable, release of a ligand and any processes that actively facilitate its transport and presentation to the receiving cell.  Examples include signaling via soluble ligands, via cell adhesion molecules and via gap junctions.
14	11	43	chemical synaptic transmission	The vesicular release of classical neurotransmitter molecules from a presynapse, across a chemical synapse, the subsequent activation of neurotransmitter receptors at the postsynapse of a target cell (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell) and the effects of this activation on the postsynaptic membrane potential and ionic composition of the postsynaptic cytosol. This process encompasses both spontaneous and evoked release of neurotransmitter and all parts of synaptic vesicle exocytosis. Evoked transmission starts with the arrival of an action potential at the presynapse.
0	2	15	neurotransmitter secretion	The regulated release of neurotransmitter from the presynapse into the synaptic cleft via calcium-regulated exocytosis during synaptic transmission.
0	1	1	neuron-neuron synaptic transmission	The process of synaptic transmission from a neuron to another neuron across a synapse.
1	1	0	synaptic transmission, cholinergic	The vesicular release of acetylcholine from a presynapse, across a chemical synapse, the subsequent activation of dopamine receptors at the postsynapse of a target cell (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell) and the effects of this activation on the postsynaptic membrane potential and ionic composition of the postsynaptic cytosol. This process encompasses both spontaneous and evoked release of neurotransmitter and all parts of synaptic vesicle exocytosis. Evoked transmission starts with the arrival of an action potential at the presynapse.
0	4	4	neuromuscular synaptic transmission	The process of synaptic transmission from a neuron to a muscle, across a synapse.
59	38	28	multicellular organism development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of a multicellular organism over time from an initial condition (e.g. a zygote or a young adult) to a later condition (e.g. a multicellular animal or an aged adult).
1	5	0	gamete generation	The generation and maintenance of gametes in a multicellular organism. A gamete is a haploid reproductive cell.
4	2	1	germ cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an immature germ cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure (gamete). A germ cell is any reproductive cell in a multicellular organism.
49	34	44	spermatogenesis	The developmental process by which male germ line stem cells self renew or give rise to successive cell types resulting in the development of a spermatozoa.
0	2	0	spermatogonial cell division	The mitotic divisions of the primary spermatogonial cell (a primordial male germ cell) to form secondary spermatogonia (primary spermatocytes).
6	8	7	spermatid development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a spermatid over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
2	0	1	sperm axoneme assembly	The assembly and organization of the sperm flagellar axoneme, the bundle of microtubules and associated proteins that forms the core of the eukaryotic sperm flagellum, and is responsible for movement.
0	2	2	spermatid nucleus differentiation	The specialization of the spermatid nucleus during the development of a spermatid into a mature male gamete competent for fertilization.
1	0	0	spermatid nucleus elongation	The change in shape of the spermatid nucleus from a spherical structure to an elongated organelle, during the latter part of spermatid differentiation.
2	0	1	female gamete generation	Generation of the female gamete; specialised haploid cells produced by meiosis and along with a male gamete takes part in sexual reproduction.
1	2	0	vitellogenesis	The production of yolk. Yolk is a mixture of materials used for embryonic nutrition.
0	1	0	pole plasm assembly	Establishment of the specialized cytoplasm found at the poles of the egg. An example of this is found in Drosophila melanogaster.
8	4	2	single fertilization	The union of male and female gametes to form a zygote.
2	4	7	binding of sperm to zona pellucida	The process in which the sperm binds to the zona pellucida glycoprotein layer of the egg. The process begins with the attachment of the sperm plasma membrane to the zona pellucida and includes attachment of the acrosome inner membrane to the zona pellucida after the acrosomal reaction takes place.
2	0	0	acrosome reaction	The discharge, by sperm, of a single, anterior secretory granule following the sperm's attachment to the zona pellucida of the oocyte. The process begins with the fusion of the outer acrosomal membrane with the sperm plasma membrane and ends with the exocytosis of the acrosomal contents into the zona pellucida.
1	1	0	penetration of zona pellucida	The infiltration by sperm of the zona pellucida to reach the oocyte. The process involves digestive enzymes from a modified lysosome called the acrosome, situated at the head of the sperm.
1	0	0	fusion of sperm to egg plasma membrane involved in single fertilization	The binding and fusion of a sperm, with the plasma membrane of the oocyte as part of the process of single fertilization. In sperm with flagella, binding occurs at the posterior (post-acrosomal) region of the sperm head.
0	0	1	pronuclear fusion	The merging of two pronuclei in a fertilized egg to fuse and produce a single zygotic genome.
7	6	7	regulation of mitotic cell cycle	Any process that modulates the rate or extent of progress through the mitotic cell cycle.
0	0	1	thorax and anterior abdomen determination	Specification of the central (trunk) regions of the embryo by the gap genes; exemplified in insects by the actions of the Kruppel gene product.
7	1	0	determination of left/right symmetry	The establishment of an organism's body plan or part of an organism with respect to the left and right halves. The pattern can either be symmetric, such that the halves are mirror images, or asymmetric where the pattern deviates from this symmetry.
1	3	3	gastrulation	A complex and coordinated series of cellular movements that occurs at the end of cleavage during embryonic development of most animals. The details of gastrulation vary from species to species, but usually result in the formation of the three primary germ layers, ectoderm, mesoderm and endoderm.
1	0	0	segment specification	The process in which segments assume individual identities; exemplified in insects by the actions of the products of the homeotic genes.
2	3	1	pattern specification process	Any developmental process that results in the creation of defined areas or spaces within an organism to which cells respond and eventually are instructed to differentiate.
0	2	1	ectoderm development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the ectoderm over time, from its formation to the mature structure. In animal embryos, the ectoderm is the outer germ layer of the embryo, formed during gastrulation.
36	34	44	nervous system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of nervous tissue over time, from its formation to its mature state.
2	2	0	neuroblast proliferation	The expansion of a neuroblast population by cell division. A neuroblast is any cell that will divide and give rise to a neuron.
0	2	1	negative regulation of neuroblast proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the proliferation of neuroblasts.
6	10	21	axonogenesis	De novo generation of a long process of a neuron, including the terminal branched region. Refers to the morphogenesis or creation of shape or form of the developing axon, which carries efferent (outgoing) action potentials from the cell body towards target cells.
25	29	30	axon guidance	The chemotaxis process that directs the migration of an axon growth cone to a specific target site in response to a combination of attractive and repulsive cues.
0	0	1	axon target recognition	The process in which an axon recognizes and binds to a set of cells with which it may form stable connections.
3	0	3	axonal fasciculation	The collection of axons into a bundle of rods, known as a fascicle.
5	3	10	synapse assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a synapse.  This process ends when the synapse is mature (functional).
11	16	13	central nervous system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the central nervous system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The central nervous system is the core nervous system that serves an integrating and coordinating function. In vertebrates it consists of the brain and spinal cord. In those invertebrates with a central nervous system it typically consists of a brain, cerebral ganglia and a nerve cord.
2	0	0	ventral midline development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the ventral midline over time, from its formation to the mature structure. In protostomes (such as insects, snails and worms) as well as deuterostomes (vertebrates), the midline is an embryonic region that functions in patterning of the adjacent nervous tissue. The ventral midline in insects is a cell population extending along the ventral surface of the embryo and is the region from which cells detach to form the ventrally located nerve cords. In vertebrates, the midline is originally located dorsally. During development, it folds inwards and becomes the ventral part of the dorsally located neural tube and is then called the ventral midline, or floor plate.
21	41	29	brain development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the brain over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Brain development begins with patterning events in the neural tube and ends with the mature structure that is the center of thought and emotion. The brain is responsible for the coordination and control of bodily activities and the interpretation of information from the senses (sight, hearing, smell, etc.).
4	2	0	peripheral nervous system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the peripheral nervous system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The peripheral nervous system is one of the two major divisions of the nervous system. Nerves in the PNS connect the central nervous system (CNS) with sensory organs, other organs, muscles, blood vessels and glands.
3	0	0	sensory organ development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of sensory organs over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
2	0	0	hindgut morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the hindgut are generated and organized.
0	3	1	endoderm development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the endoderm over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The endoderm is the innermost germ layer that develops into the gastrointestinal tract, the lungs and associated tissues.
2	0	2	midgut development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the midgut over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The midgut is the middle part of the alimentary canal from the stomach, or entrance of the bile duct, to, or including, the large intestine.
1	0	0	posterior midgut development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the posterior midgut over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
2	4	0	mesoderm development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the mesoderm over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The mesoderm is the middle germ layer that develops into muscle, bone, cartilage, blood and connective tissue.
0	1	0	ectoderm and mesoderm interaction	A cell-cell signaling process occurring between the two gastrulation-generated layers of the ectoderm and the mesoderm.
25	30	22	heart development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the heart over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The heart is a hollow, muscular organ, which, by contracting rhythmically, keeps up the circulation of the blood.
1	2	3	adult heart development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the adult heart over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
6	16	10	muscle organ development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the muscle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The muscle is an organ consisting of a tissue made up of various elongated cells that are specialized to contract and thus to produce movement and mechanical work.
6	8	6	skeletal muscle tissue development	The developmental sequence of events leading to the formation of adult skeletal muscle tissue. The main events are: the fusion of myoblasts to form myotubes that increase in size by further fusion to them of myoblasts, the formation of myofibrils within their cytoplasm and the establishment of functional neuromuscular junctions with motor neurons. At this stage they can be regarded as mature muscle fibers.
1	3	4	myoblast fusion	A process in which non-proliferating myoblasts fuse to existing fibers or to myotubes to form new fibers. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
1	1	0	muscle cell fate determination	The cell fate determination process in which a cell becomes capable of differentiating autonomously into a muscle cell regardless of its environment; upon determination, the cell fate cannot be reversed.
0	0	1	visceral muscle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the visceral muscle over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	1	somatic muscle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the somatic muscle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Somatic muscles are striated muscle structures that connect to the exoskeleton or cuticle.
4	6	9	neuromuscular junction development	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a neuromuscular junction.
1	0	1	establishment of synaptic specificity at neuromuscular junction	The biological process in which a synapse between a motor neuron and a muscle is initially formed.
3	1	0	sex differentiation	The establishment of the sex of an organism by physical differentiation.
0	0	1	dosage compensation	Compensating for the variation in the unpaired sex chromosome:autosome chromosome ratios between sexes by activation or inactivation of genes on one or both of the sex chromosomes.
11	9	3	female pregnancy	The set of physiological processes that allow an embryo or foetus to develop within the body of a female animal. It covers the time from fertilization of a female ovum by a male spermatozoon until birth.
4	4	2	embryo implantation	Attachment of the blastocyst to the uterine lining.
0	1	0	parturition	The reproductive process in which the parent is separated from its offspring either by giving birth to live young or by laying eggs.
26	15	22	aging	A developmental process that is a deterioration and loss of function over time. Aging includes loss of functions such as resistance to disease, homeostasis, and fertility, as well as wear and tear. Aging includes cellular senescence, but is more inclusive. May precede death and may succeed developmental maturation (GO:0021700).
7	5	2	cell aging	An aging process that has as participant a cell after a cell has stopped dividing. Cell aging may occur when a cell has temporarily stopped dividing through cell cycle arrest (GO:0007050) or when a cell has permanently stopped dividing, in which case it is undergoing cellular senescence (GO:0090398). May precede cell death (GO:0008219) and succeed cell maturation (GO:0048469).
10	5	8	response to nutrient	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nutrient stimulus.
5	0	1	respiratory gaseous exchange by respiratory system	The process of gaseous exchange between an organism and its environment. In plants, microorganisms, and many small animals, air or water makes direct contact with the organism's cells or tissue fluids, and the processes of diffusion supply the organism with dioxygen (O2) and remove carbon dioxide (CO2). In larger animals the efficiency of gaseous exchange is improved by specialized respiratory organs, such as lungs and gills, which are ventilated by breathing mechanisms.
3	3	1	digestion	The whole of the physical, chemical, and biochemical processes carried out by multicellular organisms to break down ingested nutrients into components that may be easily absorbed and directed into metabolism.
5	1	1	excretion	The elimination by an organism of the waste products that arise as a result of metabolic activity. These products include water, carbon dioxide (CO2), and nitrogenous compounds.
4	5	6	lactation	The regulated release of milk from the mammary glands and the period of time that a mother lactates to feed her young.
21	30	31	blood coagulation	The sequential process in which the multiple coagulation factors of the blood interact, ultimately resulting in the formation of an insoluble fibrin clot; it may be divided into three stages: stage 1, the formation of intrinsic and extrinsic prothrombin converting principle; stage 2, the formation of thrombin; stage 3, the formation of stable fibrin polymers.
2	3	3	blood coagulation, intrinsic pathway	A protein activation cascade that contributes to blood coagulation and consists of the interactions among high molecular weight kininogen, prekallikrein, and factor XII that lead to the activation of clotting factor X.
1	3	0	hemostasis	The stopping of bleeding (loss of body fluid) or the arrest of the circulation to an organ or part.
1	0	0	sensory perception	The series of events required for an organism to receive a sensory stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. This is a neurological process.
17	15	6	visual perception	The series of events required for an organism to receive a visual stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. Visual stimuli are detected in the form of photons and are processed to form an image.
1	0	0	phototransduction	The sequence of reactions within a cell required to convert absorbed photons into a molecular signal.
22	9	8	sensory perception of sound	The series of events required for an organism to receive an auditory stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. Sonic stimuli are detected in the form of vibrations and are processed to form a sound.
0	2	0	sensory perception of chemical stimulus	The series of events required for an organism to receive a sensory chemical stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. This is a neurological process.
1	2	2	sensory perception of smell	The series of events required for an organism to receive an olfactory stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. Olfaction involves the detection of chemical composition of an organism's ambient medium by chemoreceptors. This is a neurological process.
5	4	11	learning or memory	The acquisition and processing of information and/or the storage and retrieval of this information over time.
4	8	16	learning	Any process in an organism in which a relatively long-lasting adaptive behavioral change occurs as the result of experience.
6	8	14	memory	The activities involved in the mental information processing system that receives (registers), modifies, stores, and retrieves informational stimuli. The main stages involved in the formation and retrieval of memory are encoding (processing of received information by acquisition), storage (building a permanent record of received information as a result of consolidation) and retrieval (calling back the stored information and use it in a suitable way to execute a given task).
2	0	0	short-term memory	The memory process that deals with the storage, retrieval and modification of information received a short time (up to about 30 minutes) ago. This type of memory is typically dependent on direct, transient effects of second messenger activation.
3	3	2	long-term memory	The memory process that deals with the storage, retrieval and modification of information a long time (typically weeks, months or years) after receiving that information. This type of memory is typically dependent on gene transcription regulated by second messenger activation.
0	1	0	mating behavior	The behavioral interactions between organisms for the purpose of mating, or sexual reproduction resulting in the formation of zygotes.
0	0	1	negative regulation of female receptivity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the receptiveness of a female to male advances.
13	5	9	circadian rhythm	Any biological process in an organism that recurs with a regularity of approximately 24 hours.
1	1	0	grooming behavior	The specific behavior of an organism relating to grooming, cleaning and brushing to remove dirt and parasites.
5	3	8	locomotory behavior	The specific movement from place to place of an organism in response to external or internal stimuli. Locomotion of a whole organism in a manner dependent upon some combination of that organism's internal state and external conditions.
2	2	2	adult walking behavior	The behavior of an adult relating to the progression of that organism along the ground by the process of lifting and setting down each leg.
1	1	1	feeding behavior	Behavior associated with the intake of food.
0	1	1	chemosensory behavior	Behavior that is dependent upon the sensation of chemicals.
0	1	0	mechanosensory behavior	Behavior that is dependent upon the sensation of a mechanical stimulus.
1	3	0	chemokine activity	The function of a family of small chemotactic cytokines; their name is derived from their ability to induce directed chemotaxis in nearby responsive cells. All chemokines possess a number of conserved cysteine residues involved in intramolecular disulfide bond formation. Some chemokines are considered pro-inflammatory and can be induced during an immune response to recruit cells of the immune system to a site of infection, while others are considered homeostatic and are involved in controlling the migration of cells during normal processes of tissue maintenance or development. Chemokines are found in all vertebrates, some viruses and some bacteria.
15	16	12	beta-catenin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the beta subunit of the catenin complex.
3	6	2	blood circulation	The flow of blood through the body of an animal, enabling the transport of nutrients to the tissues and the removal of waste products.
3	1	5	regulation of heart contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of heart contraction. Heart contraction is the process in which the heart decreases in volume in a characteristic way to propel blood through the body.
33	57	47	microtubule binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with microtubules, filaments composed of tubulin monomers.
12	13	37	synaptic vesicle	A secretory organelle, typically 50 nm in diameter, of presynaptic nerve terminals; accumulates in high concentrations of neurotransmitters and secretes these into the synaptic cleft by fusion with the 'active zone' of the presynaptic plasma membrane.
23	39	49	protein C-terminus binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein C-terminus, the end of any peptide chain at which the 1-carboxyl function of a constituent amino acid is not attached in peptide linkage to another amino-acid residue.
8	6	0	transcription elongation factor complex	Any protein complex that interacts with RNA polymerase II to increase (positive transcription elongation factor) or reduce (negative transcription elongation factor) the rate of transcription elongation.
0	2	2	cyclin/CDK positive transcription elongation factor complex	A transcription elongation factor complex that facilitates the transition from abortive to productive elongation by phosphorylating the CTD domain of the large subunit of DNA-directed RNA polymerase II, holoenzyme. Contains a cyclin and a cyclin-dependent protein kinase catalytic subunit.
2	0	1	monocarboxylic acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of monocarboxylic acids from one side of a membrane to the other. A monocarboxylic acid is an organic acid with one COOH group.
3	3	2	tRNA processing	The process in which a pre-tRNA molecule is converted to a mature tRNA, ready for addition of an aminoacyl group.
0	1	2	high-density lipoprotein particle binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with high-density lipoprotein particle, a lipoprotein particle with a high density (typically 1.063-1.21 g/ml) and a diameter of 5-10 nm that contains APOAs and may contain APOCs and APOE.
1	1	1	cell recognition	The process in which a cell in an organism interprets its surroundings.
1	1	0	neuron recognition	The process in which a neuronal cell in a multicellular organism interprets its surroundings.
0	0	1	intracellular ferritin complex	A ferritin complex located in the cell. Intracellular ferritin complexes contain 24 subunits, in a mixture of L (light) chains and H (heavy) chains.
3	3	2	motor neuron axon guidance	The process in which the migration of an axon growth cone of a motor neuron is directed to a specific target site in response to a combination of attractive and repulsive cues.
2	1	0	axon guidance receptor activity	Combining with an extracellular messenger and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to results in a change in cellular activity involved in axon guidance.
5	12	9	enzyme activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of an enzyme.
1	1	3	mitochondrial fusion	Merging of two or more mitochondria within a cell to form a single compartment.
0	1	0	eye pigment granule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of intracellular pigment storage granules in the eye.
0	1	0	Toll signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to the receptor Toll on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	1	regulation of actin polymerization or depolymerization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly or disassembly of actin filaments by the addition or removal of actin monomers from a filament.
2	0	1	glutamate receptor activity	Combining with glutamate and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	0	1	guanylate cyclase complex, soluble	Complex that possesses guanylate cyclase activity and is not bound to a membrane.
3	1	9	voltage-gated potassium channel complex	A protein complex that forms a transmembrane channel through which potassium ions may cross a cell membrane in response to changes in membrane potential.
0	0	1	translation termination factor activity	Functions in the termination of translation.
2	1	0	N-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an acetyl group to a nitrogen atom on the acceptor molecule.
2	0	0	phosphoric diester hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a phosphodiester to give a phosphomonoester and a free hydroxyl group.
10	7	2	growth factor activity	The function that stimulates a cell to grow or proliferate. Most growth factors have other actions besides the induction of cell growth or proliferation.
0	2	1	axo-dendritic transport	The directed movement of organelles or molecules along microtubules in neuron projections.
3	4	5	anterograde axonal transport	The directed movement of organelles or molecules along microtubules from the cell body toward the cell periphery in nerve cell axons.
1	1	3	retrograde axonal transport	The directed movement of organelles or molecules along microtubules from the cell periphery toward the cell body in nerve cell axons.
1	1	5	spectrin	Membrane associated dimeric protein (240 and 220 kDa) of erythrocytes. Forms a complex with ankyrin, actin and probably other components of the membrane cytoskeleton, so that there is a mesh of proteins underlying the plasma membrane, potentially restricting the lateral mobility of integral proteins.
5	10	18	cytoskeletal protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein component of any cytoskeleton (actin, microtubule, or intermediate filament cytoskeleton).
0	6	8	cytoskeletal anchor activity	The binding activity of a protein that brings together a cytoskeletal protein (either a microtubule or actin filament, spindle pole body, or protein directly bound to them) and one or more other molecules, permitting them to function in a coordinated way.
5	3	6	DNA-dependent ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; this reaction requires the presence of single- or double-stranded DNA, and it drives another reaction.
2	4	1	5S rRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with 5S ribosomal RNA, the smallest RNA constituent of a ribosome.
23	25	17	protein localization	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location.
1	1	0	alcohol dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an alcohol + NADP+ = an aldehyde + NADPH + H+.
1	0	0	nicotinamide N-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine(1+) + nicotinamide = 1-methylnicotinamide + S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine.
1	2	0	sphinganine-1-phosphate aldolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: sphinganine 1-phosphate = phosphoethanolamine + palmitaldehyde.
1	0	0	N-acetyllactosaminide alpha-2,3-sialyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CMP-N-acetylneuraminate + beta-D-galactosyl-1,4-N-acetyl-D-glucosaminyl-glycoprotein = CMP + alpha-N-acetylneuraminyl-2,3-beta-D-galactosyl-1,4-N-acetyl-D-glucosaminyl-glycoprotein.
0	1	0	thiopurine S-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + a thiopurine = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + a thiopurine S-methylether.
1	0	0	ceramide glucosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-glucose + N-acylsphingosine = UDP + D-glucosyl-N-acylsphingosine.
3	0	1	ubiquinol-cytochrome-c reductase activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: CoQH2 + 2 ferricytochrome c = CoQ + 2 ferrocytochrome c + 2 H+.
28	56	40	transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a transcription factor, a protein required to initiate or regulate transcription.
3	6	6	translation factor activity, RNA binding	Functions during translation by interacting selectively and non-covalently with RNA during polypeptide synthesis at the ribosome.
2	1	0	NADH dehydrogenase (ubiquinone) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADH + ubiquinone + 5 H(+)(in) <=> NAD(+) + ubiquinol + 4 H(+)(out).
6	4	1	protein tyrosine/serine/threonine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: protein serine + H2O = protein serine + phosphate; protein threonine phosphate + H2O = protein threonine + phosphate; and protein tyrosine phosphate + H2O = protein tyrosine + phosphate.
2	8	4	nuclear localization sequence binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a nuclear localization sequence, a specific peptide sequence that acts as a signal to localize the protein within the nucleus.
2	3	1	cAMP response element binding protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a cAMP response element binding protein (a CREB protein).
1	0	1	oxysterol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with oxysterol, an oxidized form of cholesterol.
2	5	6	poly(A) binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of adenylyl residues in an RNA molecule, such as the poly(A) tail, a sequence of adenylyl residues at the 3' end of eukaryotic mRNA.
0	1	1	drug binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a drug, any naturally occurring or synthetic substance, other than a nutrient, that, when administered or applied to an organism, affects the structure or functioning of the organism; in particular, any such substance used in the diagnosis, prevention, or treatment of disease.
2	3	0	sulfotransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a sulfate group from 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate to the hydroxyl group of an acceptor, producing the sulfated derivative and 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphate.
0	8	6	actin polymerization or depolymerization	Assembly or disassembly of actin filaments by the addition or removal of actin monomers from a filament.
4	3	3	negative regulation of DNA replication	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA replication.
8	3	7	protein phosphatase 1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the enzyme protein phosphatase 1.
0	1	0	protein tyrosine phosphatase activator activity	Increases the activity of a phosphatase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the removal of a phosphate group from a tyrosyl phenolic group of a protein.
8	5	1	methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group to an acceptor molecule.
1	1	0	N-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group to the nitrogen atom of an acceptor molecule.
0	1	3	O-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group to the oxygen atom of an acceptor molecule.
1	2	1	RNA methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group from a donor to a nucleoside residue in an RNA molecule.
2	1	0	tRNA methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group from a donor to a nucleoside residue in a tRNA molecule.
0	1	0	tRNA (guanine-N7-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing N7-methylguanine.
0	0	1	succinate dehydrogenase (ubiquinone) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: succinate + ubiquinone = fumarate + ubiquinol.
0	2	8	adenylate cyclase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the enzyme adenylate cyclase.
1	3	2	COP9 signalosome	A protein complex that catalyzes the deneddylation of proteins, including the cullin component of SCF ubiquitin E3 ligase; deneddylation increases the activity of cullin family ubiquitin ligases. The signalosome is involved in many regulatory process, including some which control development, in many species; also regulates photomorphogenesis in plants; in many species its subunits are highly similar to those of the proteasome.
2	0	0	glycogen phosphorylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: glycogen + phosphate = maltodextrin + alpha-D-glucose 1-phosphate.
0	2	1	RNA-dependent ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; this reaction requires the presence of RNA, and it drives another reaction.
0	0	2	poly-pyrimidine tract binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any stretch of pyrimidines (cytosine or uracil) in an RNA molecule.
0	1	3	eukaryotic initiation factor 4E binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with eukaryotic initiation factor 4E, a polypeptide factor involved in the initiation of ribosome-mediated translation.
4	0	0	metalloendopeptidase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of metalloendopeptidases, enzymes that catalyze the hydrolysis of nonterminal peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain and contain a chelated metal ion at their active sites which is essential to their catalytic activity.
4	2	1	phosphatidate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a 1,2-diacylglycerol 3-phosphate + H2O = a 1,2-diacyl-sn-glycerol + phosphate.
1	4	2	ferrous iron binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ferrous iron, Fe(II).
0	1	2	ferric iron binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ferric iron, Fe(III).
0	0	2	ion channel inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents, or reduces the activity of an ion channel.
14	17	10	heparin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with heparin, any member of a group of glycosaminoglycans found mainly as an intracellular component of mast cells and which consist predominantly of alternating alpha-(1->4)-linked D-galactose and N-acetyl-D-glucosamine-6-sulfate residues.
8	3	0	steroid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving steroids, compounds with a 1,2,cyclopentanoperhydrophenanthrene nucleus.
13	11	3	cholesterol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones. It is a component of the plasma membrane lipid bilayer and of plasma lipoproteins and can be found in all animal tissues.
1	1	0	bile acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving bile acids, any of a group of steroid carboxylic acids occurring in bile, where they are present as the sodium salts of their amides with glycine or taurine.
0	0	1	C21-steroid hormone metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving C21-steroid hormones, steroid compounds containing 21 carbons which function as hormones.
3	1	2	androgen metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving androgens, C19 steroid hormones that can stimulate the development of male sexual characteristics.
2	2	2	estrogen metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving estrogens, C18 steroid hormones that can stimulate the development of female sexual characteristics. Also found in plants.
0	1	1	glucocorticoid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glucocorticoids, hormonal C21 corticosteroids synthesized from cholesterol. Glucocorticoids act primarily on carbohydrate and protein metabolism, and have anti-inflammatory effects.
8	7	11	regulation of blood pressure	Any process that modulates the force with which blood travels through the circulatory system. The process is controlled by a balance of processes that increase pressure and decrease pressure.
2	7	6	cell death	Any biological process that results in permanent cessation of all vital functions of a cell. A cell should be considered dead when any one of the following molecular or morphological criteria is met: (1) the cell has lost the integrity of its plasma membrane; (2) the cell, including its nucleus, has undergone complete fragmentation into discrete bodies (frequently referred to as apoptotic bodies). The cell corpse (or its fragments) may be engulfed by an adjacent cell in vivo, but engulfment of whole cells should not be considered a strict criteria to define cell death as, under some circumstances, live engulfed cells can be released from phagosomes (see PMID:18045538).
7	3	9	opsonization	The process in which a microorganism (or other particulate material) is rendered more susceptible to phagocytosis by coating with an opsonin, a blood serum protein such as a complement component or antibody.
12	5	6	peptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a peptide bond. A peptide bond is a covalent bond formed when the carbon atom from the carboxyl group of one amino acid shares electrons with the nitrogen atom from the amino group of a second amino acid.
6	3	2	cysteine-type peptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile.
3	1	0	metalloexopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a peptide bond not more than three residues from the N- or C-terminus of a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which water acts as a nucleophile, one or two metal ions hold the water molecule in place, and charged amino acid side chains are ligands for the metal ions.
7	1	1	serine-type peptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a catalytic mechanism that involves a catalytic triad consisting of a serine nucleophile that is activated by a proton relay involving an acidic residue (e.g. aspartate or glutamate) and a basic residue (usually histidine).
10	7	0	metallopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of peptide bonds by a mechanism in which water acts as a nucleophile, one or two metal ions hold the water molecule in place, and charged amino acid side chains are ligands for the metal ions.
1	1	0	exopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a peptide bond not more than three residues from the N- or C-terminus of a polypeptide chain, in a reaction that requires a free N-terminal amino group, C-terminal carboxyl group or both.
2	0	0	dipeptidyl-peptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of N-terminal dipeptides from a polypeptide chain.
1	0	0	tripeptidyl-peptidase activity	Catalysis of the release of an N-terminal tripeptide from a polypeptide.
1	0	0	peptidyl-dipeptidase activity	Catalysis of the release of C-terminal dipeptides from a polypeptide chain.
1	1	1	omega peptidase activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of non-standard peptide bonds releasing substituted amino acids such as pyroglutamate or cleave isopeptide bonds, such as many deubiquitinating enzymes.
0	0	1	1-alkyl-2-acetylglycerophosphocholine esterase complex	An enzyme complex composed of two catalytic alpha subunits, which form a catalytic dimer, and a non-catalytic, regulatory beta subunit; the catalytic dimer may be an alpha1/alpha1 or alpha2/alpha2 homodimer, or an alpha1/alpha2 heterodimer. Modulates the action of platelet-activating factor (PAF).
1	2	1	oligosaccharyltransferase complex	A protein complex that is found in the endoplasmic reticulum membrane of eukaryotes and transfers lipid-linked oligosaccharide precursor to asparagine residues on nascent proteins. In yeast, the complex includes at least nine different subunits, whereas in mammalian cells at least three different forms of the complex have been detected.
0	0	1	tRNA-specific adenosine deaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: adenosine + H2O = inosine + NH3, in a tRNA molecule.
1	0	0	5'-nucleotidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a 5'-ribonucleotide + H2O = a ribonucleoside + phosphate.
1	0	0	pyrimidine-specific mismatch base pair DNA N-glycosylase activity	Catalysis of the removal of mismatched pyrimidine bases in DNA. Enzymes with this activity recognize and remove pyrimidines present in mismatches by cleaving the N-C1' glycosidic bond between the target damaged DNA base and the deoxyribose sugar. The reaction releases a free base and leaves an apyrimidinic (AP) site.
0	1	0	Mo-molybdopterin cofactor sulfurase activity	Catalysis of the sulfurylation of the desulfo form of molybdenum cofactor (MoCo), a cofactor required for the activity of some enzymes, such as aldehyde oxidase.
1	4	8	poly(U) RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of uracil residues in an RNA molecule.
97	99	72	zinc ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with zinc (Zn) ions.
2	1	0	secondary active sulfate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the secondary active transfer of sulfate from one side of a membrane to the other. Secondary active transport is the transfer of a solute across a membrane, up its concentration gradient. The transporter binds the solute and undergoes a series of conformational changes. Transport works equally well in either direction and is driven by a chemiosmotic source of energy. Secondary active transporters include symporters and antiporters.
2	2	0	sulfate transport	The directed movement of sulfate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	calcium, potassium:sodium antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Ca2+(in) + K+(in) + Na+(out) = Ca2+(out) + K+(out) + Na+(in).
1	1	0	gamma-tubulin ring complex	A multiprotein complex composed of gamma-tubulin and other non-tubulin proteins that forms a flexible open ring structure thought to be the unit of nucleation at the minus end of a microtubule.
1	0	1	gamma-tubulin small complex	A complex usually comprising two gamma-tubulin molecules and two conserved non-tubulin proteins. Some gamma-tubulin small complexes are thought to be the repeating unit making up the core of the gamma-tubulin ring complex.
2	1	0	protein methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group (CH3-) to a protein.
5	4	5	regulation of G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway.
1	3	1	cohesin complex	A protein complex that is required for sister chromatid cohesion in eukaryotes. The cohesin complex forms a molecular ring complex, and is composed of structural maintenance of chromosomes (SMC) and kleisin proteins. For example, in yeast, the complex is composed of the SMC proteins Smc1p and Smc3p, and the kleisin protein Scc1p. In vertebrates, the complex is composed of the SMC1 (SMC1A or SMC1B) and SMC3 heterodimer attached via their hinge domains to a kleisin (RAD21, REC8 or RAD21L) which links them, and one STAG protein (STAG1, STAG2 or STAG3).
20	20	21	cell population proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population.
60	62	43	positive regulation of cell population proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of cell proliferation.
56	52	42	negative regulation of cell population proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of cell proliferation.
12	19	9	insulin receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the insulin receptor binding to insulin.
0	3	0	protein serine/threonine phosphatase complex	A complex, normally consisting of a catalytic and a regulatory subunit, which catalyzes the removal of a phosphate group from a serine or threonine residue of a protein.
17	20	12	lipid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a lipid.
0	2	5	F-actin capping protein complex	A heterodimer consisting of alpha and beta subunits that binds to and caps the barbed ends of actin filaments, thereby regulating the polymerization of actin monomers but not severing actin filaments.
0	2	0	3'-5'-exodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 3' terminus of a DNA molecule.
1	0	0	single-stranded DNA exodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 5' or 3' terminus of a single-stranded DNA molecule.
0	2	0	intracellular mRNA localization	Any process in which mRNA is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location within the cell.
1	3	3	DNA binding, bending	The activity of binding selectively and non-covalently to and distorting the original structure of DNA, typically a straight helix, into a bend, or increasing the bend if the original structure was intrinsically bent due to its sequence.
6	5	1	integrin complex	A protein complex that is composed of one alpha subunit and one beta subunit, both of which are members of the integrin superfamily of cell adhesion receptors; the complex spans the plasma membrane and binds to extracellular matrix ligands, cell-surface ligands, and soluble ligands.
2	2	4	associative learning	Learning by associating a stimulus (the cause) with a particular outcome (the effect).
11	5	16	structural constituent of muscle	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a muscle fiber.
0	1	2	voltage-gated anion channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of an anion by a voltage-gated channel. An anion is a negatively charged ion. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
2	0	0	double-stranded DNA exodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 5' or 3' terminus of a double-stranded DNA molecule.
1	0	0	double-stranded DNA 3'-5' exodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 3' terminus of a double-stranded DNA molecule.
1	1	2	7S RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with 7S RNA, the RNA component of the signal recognition particle (SRP).
2	1	1	protein transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a protein from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	cation transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of cation from one side of a membrane to the other.
4	8	2	methyl-CpG binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a methylated cytosine/guanine dinucleotide.
2	0	3	protein tyrosine/threonine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: protein threonine phosphate + H2O = protein threonine + phosphate; and protein tyrosine phosphate + H2O = protein tyrosine + phosphate.
1	0	3	high voltage-gated calcium channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a high voltage-gated channel. A high voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on high voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
5	12	4	endosome to lysosome transport	The directed movement of substances from endosomes to lysosomes.
1	1	2	histone mRNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving an mRNA encoding a histone.
1	3	4	determination of adult lifespan	The control of viability and duration in the adult phase of the life-cycle.
0	0	2	adult feeding behavior	Feeding behavior in a fully developed and mature organism.
4	3	7	adult locomotory behavior	Locomotory behavior in a fully developed and mature organism.
1	0	1	glial cell migration	The orderly movement of a glial cell, non-neuronal cells that provide support and nutrition, maintain homeostasis, form myelin, and participate in signal transmission in the nervous system.
1	2	1	MAP kinase kinase kinase kinase activity	Catalysis of the phosphorylation of serine and threonine residues in a mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase kinase (MAPKKK), resulting in activation of MAPKKK. MAPKKK signaling pathways relay, amplify and integrate signals from the plasma membrane to the nucleus in response to a diverse range of extracellular stimuli.
0	1	6	RNA polymerase II CTD heptapeptide repeat kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + (DNA-directed RNA polymerase II) = ADP + phospho-(DNA-directed RNA polymerase II); phosphorylation occurs on residues in the carboxy-terminal domain (CTD) repeats.
1	1	0	germ cell migration	The orderly movement of a cell specialized to produce haploid gametes through the embryo from its site of production to the place where the gonads will form.
1	3	0	asymmetric cell division	The asymmetric division of cells to produce two daughter cells with different developmental potentials. It is of fundamental significance for the generation of cell diversity.
25	22	36	regulation of cell shape	Any process that modulates the surface configuration of a cell.
5	2	7	regulation of cell size	Any process that modulates the size of a cell.
1	0	3	axon ensheathment	Any process in which the axon of a neuron is insulated, and that insulation maintained, thereby preventing dispersion of the electrical signal.
1	0	0	sialyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of sialic acid to an acceptor molecule, typically the terminal portions of the sialylated glycolipids (gangliosides) or to the N- or O-linked sugar chains of glycoproteins.
2	1	1	O-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an acyl group to an oxygen atom on the acceptor molecule.
1	0	0	acetylglucosaminyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an N-acetylglucosaminyl residue from UDP-N-acetyl-glucosamine to a sugar.
1	0	0	acetylgalactosaminyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an N-acetylgalactosaminyl residue from UDP-N-acetyl-galactosamine to an oligosaccharide.
0	1	0	galactosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a galactosyl group to an acceptor molecule, typically another carbohydrate or a lipid.
0	3	2	thioredoxin peroxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: thioredoxin + hydrogen peroxide = thioredoxin disulfide + H2O.
17	33	40	RNA splicing	The process of removing sections of the primary RNA transcript to remove sequences not present in the mature form of the RNA and joining the remaining sections to form the mature form of the RNA.
3	1	1	mechanosensitive ion channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of an ion by a channel that opens in response to a mechanical stress.
0	1	0	IkappaB kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + IkappaB protein = ADP + IkappaB phosphoprotein.
1	1	1	IkappaB kinase complex	A trimeric protein complex that phosphorylates inhibitory-kappaB (I-kappaB) proteins. The complex is composed of two kinase subunits (alpha and beta) and a regulatory gamma subunit (also called NEMO). In a resting state, NF-kappaB dimers are bound to inhibitory IKB proteins, sequestering NF-kappaB in the cytoplasm. Phosphorylation of I-kappaB targets I-kappaB for ubiquitination and proteasomal degradation, thus releasing the NF-kappaB dimers, which can translocate to the nucleus to bind DNA and regulate transcription.
1	0	0	coumarin 7-hydroxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: coumarin + O2 + NADPH + H+ = hydroxycoumarin + H2O + NADP+.
0	1	0	testosterone 16-alpha-hydroxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: testosterone + donor-H2 + O2 = 16-alpha-hydroxytestosterone + H2O.
3	1	0	arachidonic acid epoxygenase activity	Catalysis of an NADPH- and oxygen-dependent reaction that converts arachidonic acid to a cis-epoxyeicosatrienoic acid.
3	1	0	steroid hydroxylase activity	Catalysis of the formation of a hydroxyl group on a steroid by incorporation of oxygen from O2.
1	0	0	arachidonic acid 14,15-epoxygenase activity	Catalysis of an NADPH- and oxygen-dependent reaction that converts arachidonic acid to cis-14,15-epoxyeicosatrienoic acid.
1	0	0	arachidonic acid 11,12-epoxygenase activity	Catalysis of an NADPH- and oxygen-dependent reaction that converts arachidonic acid to cis-11,12-epoxyeicosatrienoic acid.
2	0	1	gonad development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the gonad over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The gonad is an animal organ that produces gametes; in some species it also produces hormones.
2	5	0	3'-5' exonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within nucleic acids by removing nucleotide residues from the 3' end.
3	2	1	5'-3' exonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within nucleic acids by removing nucleotide residues from the 5' end.
0	1	0	RNA polymerase II CTD heptapeptide repeat phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phospho-(DNA-directed RNA polymerase II) + H2O = (DNA-directed RNA polymerase II) + phosphate.
1	0	2	protein kinase C inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of protein kinase C, an enzyme which phosphorylates a protein.
0	0	1	ribonuclease inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a ribonuclease, any enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis of phosphodiester bonds in chains of RNA.
1	1	3	phosphatidylethanolamine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylethanolamine, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which a phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of ethanolamine.
2	0	1	selenium binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with selenium (Se).
0	1	0	vitamin E binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with vitamin E, tocopherol, which includes a series of eight structurally similar compounds. Alpha-tocopherol is the most active form in humans and is a powerful biological antioxidant.
0	2	3	JUN kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with JUN kinase, an enzyme that catalyzes the phosphorylation and activation of members of the JUN family.
0	1	0	inositol-1,4,5-trisphosphate 3-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1D-myo-inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate + ATP = 1D-myo-inositol 1,3,4,5-tetrakisphosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
0	0	1	alanine-glyoxylate transaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-alanine + glyoxylate = pyruvate + glycine.
1	0	0	histone-arginine N-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + (histone)-arginine = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + (histone)-N-methyl-arginine.
0	1	0	isovaleryl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-methylbutanoyl-CoA + ETF = 3-methylbut-2-enoyl-CoA + reduced ETF.
3	0	0	palmitoyl-(protein) hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: palmitoyl-protein + H2O = palmitate + protein.
1	0	0	procollagen-lysine 5-dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: procollagen L-lysine + 2-oxoglutarate + O2 = procollagen 5-hydroxy-L-lysine + succinate + CO2.
0	1	0	pyridoxal kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + pyridoxal = ADP + pyridoxal 5'-phosphate.
0	0	1	sphinganine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + sphinganine = ADP + sphinganine 1-phosphate.
0	0	1	transaminase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an amino group to an acceptor, usually a 2-oxo acid.
1	0	0	sulfuric ester hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: RSO-R' + H2O = RSOOH + R'H. This reaction is the hydrolysis of any sulfuric ester bond, any ester formed from sulfuric acid, O=SO(OH)2.
1	0	0	UDP-galactose:glucosylceramide beta-1,4-galactosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-D-galactose + a glucosylceramide = a lactosylceramide + uridine-5'-diphosphate. The glucosylceramide has sphinganine as the long chain base.
0	3	4	translation activator activity	Any of a group of soluble proteins functioning in the activation of ribosome-mediated translation of mRNA into a polypeptide.
1	0	0	sucrose:proton symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: sucrose(out) + H+(out) = sucrose(in) + H+(in).
0	0	2	anion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a negatively charged ion from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	1	2	sodium:bicarbonate symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Na+(out) + HCO3-(out) = Na+(in) + HCO3-(in).
1	0	1	sodium:potassium:chloride symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Na+(out) + K+(out) + Cl-(out) = Na+(in) + K+(in) + Cl-(in).
2	1	0	organic anion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of organic anions from one side of a membrane to the other. Organic anions are atoms or small molecules with a negative charge which contain carbon in covalent linkage.
1	2	2	ammonium transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of ammonium from one side of a membrane to the other. Ammonium is the cation NH4+ which is formed from N2 by root-nodule bacteria in leguminous plants and is an excretory product in ammonotelic animals.
3	1	0	phosphatidylcholine transporter activity	Enables the directed movement of phosphatidylcholine into, out of or within a cell, or between cells. Phosphatidylcholine refers to a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of choline.
2	1	2	phosphatidylinositol transfer activity	Removes phosphatidylinositol from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle.
1	0	0	taste receptor activity	Combining with soluble compounds to initiate a change in cell activity. These receptors are responsible for the sense of taste.
2	1	1	G protein-coupled peptide receptor activity	Combining with a peptide and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating an associated G-protein; promotes the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha subunit of a heterotrimeric G-protein complex.
1	0	0	N-acetyllactosaminide beta-1,3-N-acetylglucosaminyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-N-acetyl-D-glucosamine + beta-D-galactosyl-1,4-N-acetyl-D-glucosaminyl-R = UDP + N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminyl-1,3-beta-D-galactosyl-1,4-N-acetyl-D-glucosaminyl-R.
0	2	0	proteasome activator complex	A multisubunit complex that activates the hydrolysis of small nonubiquitinated peptides by binding to the proteasome core complex.
0	2	2	proteasome regulatory particle, base subcomplex	The subcomplex of the proteasome regulatory particle that directly associates with the proteasome core complex.
2	2	0	proteasome regulatory particle, lid subcomplex	The subcomplex of the proteasome regulatory particle that forms the peripheral lid, which is added on top of the base subcomplex.
2	7	5	visual learning	Any process in an organism in which a change in behavior of an individual occurs in response to repeated exposure to a visual cue.
9	10	8	fibroblast growth factor receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a fibroblast growth factor receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
10	8	7	epidermis development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the epidermis over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The epidermis is the outer epithelial layer of an animal, it may be a single layer that produces an extracellular material (e.g. the cuticle of arthropods) or a complex stratified squamous epithelium, as in the case of many vertebrate species.
1	0	1	JUN kinase kinase activity	Catalysis of the phosphorylation of tyrosine and threonine residues in a c-Jun NH2-terminal kinase (JNK), a member of a subgroup of mitogen-activated protein kinases (MAPKs), which signal in response to cytokines and exposure to environmental stress. JUN kinase kinase (JNKK) is a dual-specificity protein kinase kinase and requires activation by a serine/threonine kinase JUN kinase kinase kinase.
1	1	1	proton-exporting ATPase activity, phosphorylative mechanism	Enables the transfer of protons from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + H+(in) -> ADP + phosphate + H+(out). These transporters use a phosphorylative mechanism, which have a phosphorylated intermediate state during the ion transport cycle.
3	3	0	ATPase-coupled xenobiotic transmembrane transporter activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O + xenobiotic(in) = ADP + phosphate + xenobiotic(out).
2	1	1	microtubule-severing ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate. Catalysis of the severing of a microtubule at a specific spot along its length, coupled to the hydrolysis of ATP.
3	2	1	ATP-dependent microtubule motor activity, minus-end-directed	Catalysis of movement along a microtubule toward the minus end, coupled to the hydrolysis of ATP.
3	5	2	ATP-dependent microtubule motor activity, plus-end-directed	Catalysis of movement along a microtubule toward the plus end, coupled to the hydrolysis of ATP.
8	13	4	male gonad development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the male gonad over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	2	1	female gonad development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the female gonad over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
3	1	2	regulation of smoothened signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of smoothened signaling.
2	4	0	regulation of Notch signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the Notch signaling pathway.
0	1	1	anterior/posterior axis specification, embryo	The specification of the anterior/posterior axis of the embryo by the products of genes expressed maternally and genes expressed in the zygote.
0	0	2	calcium-dependent protein serine/threonine phosphatase regulator activity	Modulation of the activity of the enzyme calcium-dependent protein serine/threonine phosphatase.
1	1	2	cAMP-dependent protein kinase regulator activity	Modulation of the activity of the enzyme cAMP-dependent protein kinase.
1	0	0	phosphorylase kinase regulator activity	Modulation of the activity of the enzyme phosphorylase kinase.
2	3	1	attachment of spindle microtubules to kinetochore	The process in which spindle microtubules become physically associated with the proteins making up the kinetochore complex.
0	1	0	alkylglycerone-phosphate synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-acyl-glycerone 3-phosphate + a long-chain alcohol = 1-alkyl-glycerone 3-phosphate + a long-chain acid anion.
2	3	3	lipid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of lipids, compounds soluble in an organic solvent but not, or sparingly, in an aqueous solvent.
1	1	1	ether lipid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ether lipids, lipids that contain (normally) one lipid alcohol in ether linkage to one of the carbon atoms (normally C-1) of glycerol.
1	0	1	pyridoxine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of pyridoxine, 2-methyl-3-hydroxy-4,5-bis(hydroxymethyl)pyridine, one of the vitamin B6 compounds.
0	1	0	epsilon DNA polymerase complex	A heterotetrameric DNA polymerase complex that catalyzes processive DNA synthesis in the absence of PCNA, but is further stimulated in the presence of PCNA. The complex contains a large catalytic subunit and three small subunits, and is best characterized in Saccharomyces, in which the subunits are named Pol2p, Dpb2p, Dpb3p, and Dpb4p. Some evidence suggests that DNA polymerase epsilon is the leading strand polymerase; it is also involved in nucleotide-excision repair and mismatch repair.
0	1	1	CHRAC	An ISWI complex that contains an ATPase subunit of the ISWI family (SNF2H in mammals, Isw2 in S. cerevisiae), an ACF1 homolog, and additional small histone fold subunits (generally two of these, but Xenopus has only one and some additional non-conserved subunits). CHRAC plays roles in the regulation of RNA polymerase II transcription and in DNA replication and repair.
5	4	2	extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway via death domain receptors	A series of molecular signals in which a signal is conveyed from the cell surface to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway starts with a ligand binding to a death domain receptor on the cell surface, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
0	1	0	granzyme-mediated apoptotic signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals induced by granzymes which triggers the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway starts with reception of a granzyme signal, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered. Granzymes are serine proteases that are secreted by cytotoxic T cells and natural killer cells to induce apoptosis in target cells.
1	0	1	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to osmotic stress	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway is induced in response to changes in intracellular ion homeostasis, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
7	10	3	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway is induced by the detection of DNA damage, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
3	3	2	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to oxidative stress	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway is induced in response to oxidative stress, a state often resulting from exposure to high levels of reactive oxygen species, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
2	1	0	activation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic process by cytochrome c	Any process that initiates the activity of the inactive enzyme cysteine-type endopeptidase in the context of an apoptotic process and is mediated by cytochrome c.
2	1	3	apoptotic mitochondrial changes	The morphological and physiological alterations undergone by mitochondria during apoptosis.
0	1	2	carbohydrate transport	The directed movement of carbohydrate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Carbohydrates are any of a group of organic compounds based of the general formula Cx(H2O)y.
1	0	1	rRNA methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group from S-adenosyl-L-methionine to a nucleoside residue in an rRNA molecule.
0	1	0	rRNA (uridine-2'-O-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + rRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + rRNA containing 2'-O-methyluridine.
1	0	0	cellular amino acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of amino acids, organic acids containing one or more amino substituents.
4	0	1	phospholipid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phospholipids, any lipid containing phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester.
3	2	2	cysteine-type endopeptidase activator activity involved in apoptotic process	Increases the rate of proteolysis catalyzed by a cysteine-type endopeptidase involved in the apoptotic process.
0	0	1	(3R)-hydroxymyristoyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (3R)-3-hydroxytetradecanoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] = tetradecenoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + H2O.
0	0	1	3-hydroxydecanoyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (3R)-3-hydroxydecanoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] = 2,3-decenoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] or 3,4-decenoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + H2O.
0	0	1	cholate 7-alpha-dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: cholate + NAD(+) = 3alpha,12alpha-dihydroxy-7-oxo-5beta-cholanate + H(+) + NADH.
0	1	0	L-allo-threonine aldolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-allo-threonine = glycine + acetaldehyde.
0	2	0	N-acetylmuramoyl-L-alanine amidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of the link between N-acetylmuramoyl residues and L-amino acid residues in certain bacterial cell-wall glycopeptides.
0	1	0	NADPH dehydrogenase (quinone) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADPH + H+ + a quinone = NADP+ + a quinol.
2	1	2	S-adenosylmethionine-dependent methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group from S-adenosyl-L-methionine to a substrate.
0	1	0	acetate CoA-transferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + acetate = a fatty acid anion + acetyl-CoA.
0	0	1	N-acylneuraminate cytidylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CTP + N-acylneuraminate = diphosphate + CMP-N-acylneuraminate.
0	1	0	alkyl hydroperoxide reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: octane hydroperoxide + NADH + H+ = H2O + NAD+ + 1-octanol.
0	0	1	dGTPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dGTP + H(2)O = 2'-deoxyguanosine + 2 H(+) + triphosphate.
0	2	0	exodeoxyribonuclease III activity	Catalysis of the degradation of double-stranded DNA. It acts progressively in a 3' to 5' direction, releasing 5'-phosphomononucleotides.
0	0	1	fructokinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + D-fructose = ADP + D-fructose 6-phosphate.
1	0	0	glycerophosphodiester phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a glycerophosphodiester + H2O = an alcohol + sn-glycerol 3-phosphate.
0	0	1	potassium:proton exchanging ATPase activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + H+(in) + K+(out) = ADP + phosphate + H+(out) + K+(in).
0	0	1	methylglyoxal synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: glycerone phosphate = methylglyoxal + phosphate.
0	1	1	inositol monophosphate 1-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: myo-inositol 1-phosphate + H2O = myo-inositol + phosphate.
0	0	1	nitrate reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nitrite + acceptor = nitrate + reduced acceptor.
1	0	0	phosphoglycolate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-phosphoglycolate + H(2)O = glycolate + phosphate.
0	1	0	phosphopentomutase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-ribose 1-phosphate = D-ribose 5-phosphate.
1	0	0	selenocysteine lyase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-selenocysteine + reduced acceptor = hydrogen selenide + L-alanine + acceptor.
0	1	1	DNA-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group to a DNA molecule.
1	0	0	tRNA (guanine-N1-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing N1-methylguanine.
0	1	0	tRNA (guanosine-2'-O-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing 2'-O-methylguanosine.
1	0	0	thymidine phosphorylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: thymidine + phosphate = thymine + 2-deoxy-D-ribose 1-phosphate.
3	2	4	dosage compensation by inactivation of X chromosome	Compensating for the two-fold variation in X-chromosome:autosome ratios between sexes by a global inactivation of all, or most of, the genes on one of the X-chromosomes in the XX sex.
0	2	1	pentose-phosphate shunt, oxidative branch	The branch of the pentose-phosphate shunt which involves the oxidation of glucose 6-P and produces ribulose 5-P, reduced NADP+ and carbon dioxide (CO2).
1	0	2	pentose-phosphate shunt, non-oxidative branch	The branch of the pentose-phosphate shunt which does not involve oxidation reactions. It comprises a series of sugar phosphate interconversions, starting with ribulose 5-P and producing fructose 6-P and glyceraldehyde 3-P.
12	7	4	electron transfer activity	Any molecular entity that serves as an electron acceptor and electron donor in an electron transport chain. An electron transport chain is a process in which a series of electron carriers operate together to transfer electrons from donors to any of several different terminal electron acceptors to generate a transmembrane electrochemical gradient.
0	1	0	biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of substances; typically the energy-requiring part of metabolism in which simpler substances are transformed into more complex ones.
4	1	4	aerobic respiration	The enzymatic release of energy from inorganic and organic compounds (especially carbohydrates and fats) which requires oxygen as the terminal electron acceptor.
2	3	0	fatty acid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a fatty acid, any of the aliphatic monocarboxylic acids that can be liberated by hydrolysis from naturally occurring fats and oils. Fatty acids are predominantly straight-chain acids of 4 to 24 carbon atoms, which may be saturated or unsaturated; branched fatty acids and hydroxy fatty acids also occur, and very long chain acids of over 30 carbons are found in waxes.
0	0	1	cellular amino acid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of amino acids, organic acids containing one or more amino substituents.
1	4	0	glutamine family amino acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving amino acids of the glutamine family, comprising arginine, glutamate, glutamine and proline.
0	2	0	aspartate family amino acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving amino acids of the aspartate family, comprising asparagine, aspartate, lysine, methionine and threonine.
0	1	0	pyruvate family amino acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any amino acid that requires pyruvate for its synthesis, e.g. alanine.
1	4	3	branched-chain amino acid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of amino acids containing a branched carbon skeleton, comprising isoleucine, leucine and valine.
1	0	0	isoleucine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of isoleucine, (2R*,3R*)-2-amino-3-methylpentanoic acid.
1	0	0	valine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of valine, 2-amino-3-methylbutanoic acid.
1	0	1	glycoprotein metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycoproteins, any protein that contains covalently bound glycose (i.e. monosaccharide) residues; the glycose occurs most commonly as oligosaccharide or fairly small polysaccharide but occasionally as monosaccharide.
0	1	0	glycoprotein biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycoproteins, any protein that contains covalently bound glycose (i.e. monosaccharide) residues; the glycose occurs most commonly as oligosaccharide or fairly small polysaccharide but occasionally as monosaccharide.
0	2	1	purine nucleobase biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of purine nucleobases, one of the two classes of nitrogen-containing ring compounds found in DNA and RNA, which include adenine and guanine.
0	4	2	nucleoside metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a nucleoside, a nucleobase linked to either beta-D-ribofuranose (a ribonucleoside) or 2-deoxy-beta-D-ribofuranose, (a deoxyribonucleoside), e.g. adenosine, guanosine, inosine, cytidine, uridine and deoxyadenosine, deoxyguanosine, deoxycytidine and thymidine (= deoxythymidine).
2	0	1	nucleotide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a nucleotide, a nucleoside that is esterified with (ortho)phosphate or an oligophosphate at any hydroxyl group on the glycose moiety; may be mono-, di- or triphosphate; this definition includes cyclic nucleotides (nucleoside cyclic phosphates).
1	2	0	nucleoside triphosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a nucleoside triphosphate, a compound consisting of a nucleobase linked to a deoxyribose or ribose sugar esterified with triphosphate on the sugar.
1	1	0	nucleoside triphosphate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a nucleoside triphosphate, a compound consisting of a nucleobase linked to a deoxyribose or ribose sugar esterified with triphosphate on the sugar.
0	0	1	purine ribonucleotide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a purine ribonucleotide, a compound consisting of ribonucleoside (a purine base linked to a ribose sugar) esterified with a phosphate group at either the 3' or 5'-hydroxyl group of the sugar.
0	2	0	ribonucleoside monophosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a ribonucleoside monophosphate, a compound consisting of a nucleobase linked to a ribose sugar esterified with phosphate on the sugar.
0	0	1	deoxyribonucleoside monophosphate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a deoxyribonucleoside monophosphate, a compound consisting of a nucleobase linked to a deoxyribose sugar esterified with phosphate on the sugar.
0	1	0	nucleotide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nucleotides, any nucleoside that is esterified with (ortho)phosphate or an oligophosphate at any hydroxyl group on the glycose moiety; may be mono-, di- or triphosphate; this definition includes cyclic-nucleotides (nucleoside cyclic phosphates).
1	3	2	purine ribonucleoside monophosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of purine ribonucleoside monophosphate, a compound consisting of a purine base linked to a ribose sugar esterified with phosphate on the sugar.
1	0	0	ribonucleoside diphosphate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a ribonucleoside diphosphate, a compound consisting of a nucleobase linked to a ribose sugar esterified with diphosphate on the sugar.
0	1	0	deoxyribonucleoside triphosphate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a deoxyribonucleoside triphosphate, a compound consisting of a nucleobase linked to a deoxyribose sugar esterified with triphosphate on the sugar.
0	0	1	cyclic nucleotide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a cyclic nucleotide, a nucleotide in which the phosphate group is in diester linkage to two positions on the sugar residue.
0	1	0	nucleotide-sugar metabolic process	The cellular chemical reactions and pathways involving nucleotide-sugars, any nucleotide-carbohydrate in which the distal phosphoric residue of a nucleoside 5'-diphosphate is in glycosidic linkage with a monosaccharide or monosaccharide derivative.
1	0	0	menaquinone biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of any of the menaquinones. Structurally, menaquinones consist of a methylated naphthoquinone ring structure and side chains composed of a variable number of unsaturated isoprenoid residues. Menaquinones that have vitamin K activity and are known as vitamin K2.
3	6	0	cobalamin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving cobalamin (vitamin B12), a water-soluble vitamin characterized by possession of a corrin nucleus containing a cobalt atom.
1	0	0	glycolipid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycolipid, a class of 1,2-di-O-acylglycerols joined at oxygen 3 by a glycosidic linkage to a carbohydrate part (usually a mono-, di- or tri-saccharide).
0	2	0	peptidoglycan catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of peptidoglycans, any of a class of glycoconjugates found in bacterial cell walls.
0	1	0	10-formyltetrahydrofolate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of 10-formyltetrahydrofolate, the formylated derivative of tetrahydrofolate.
0	0	1	deoxyribonucleotide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a deoxyribonucleotide, a compound consisting of deoxyribonucleoside (a base linked to a deoxyribose sugar) esterified with a phosphate group at either the 3' or 5'-hydroxyl group of the sugar.
0	0	1	deoxyribonucleotide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a deoxyribonucleotide, a compound consisting of deoxyribonucleoside (a base linked to a deoxyribose sugar) esterified with a phosphate group at either the 3' or 5'-hydroxyl group of the sugar.
1	0	0	response to temperature stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a temperature stimulus.
8	14	8	cellular response to starvation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of deprivation of nourishment.
1	0	1	response to pH	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a pH stimulus. pH is a measure of the acidity or basicity of an aqueous solution.
1	0	0	nucleoid	The region of a virus, bacterial cell, mitochondrion or chloroplast to which the nucleic acid is confined.
1	1	3	mRNA transcription	The cellular synthesis of messenger RNA (mRNA) from a DNA template.
2	5	3	rRNA transcription	The synthesis of ribosomal RNA (rRNA), any RNA that forms part of the ribosomal structure, from a DNA template.
0	0	2	tRNA transcription	The synthesis of transfer RNA (tRNA) from a DNA template.
8	7	7	protein secretion	The controlled release of proteins from a cell.
0	1	0	amine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any organic compound that is weakly basic in character and contains an amino or a substituted amino group. Amines are called primary, secondary, or tertiary according to whether one, two, or three carbon atoms are attached to the nitrogen atom.
0	1	0	amine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of any organic compound that is weakly basic in character and contains an amino or a substituted amino group. Amines are called primary, secondary, or tertiary according to whether one, two, or three carbon atoms are attached to the nitrogen atom.
1	1	0	oligosaccharide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of oligosaccharides, molecules with between two and (about) 20 monosaccharide residues connected by glycosidic linkages.
2	3	3	response to radiation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an electromagnetic radiation stimulus. Electromagnetic radiation is a propagating wave in space with electric and magnetic components. These components oscillate at right angles to each other and to the direction of propagation.
0	1	0	phenylalanine-tRNA ligase complex	An enzyme complex that catalyzes the ligation of phenylalanine to tRNA(Phe), forming L-phenylalanyl-tRNA(Phe).
0	0	1	DNA topoisomerase type II (double strand cut, ATP-hydrolyzing) complex	Complex that possesses DNA topoisomerase II (double strand cut, ATP-hydrolyzing) activity.
0	1	0	glycerol-3-phosphate dehydrogenase complex	An enzyme complex that catalyzes the dehydrogenation of sn-glycerol 3-phosphate to form glycerone phosphate.
1	0	0	succinate-CoA ligase complex (ADP-forming)	A heterodimeric enzyme complex, composed of an alpha and beta chain, most usually found in (but not limited to) bacteria. Functions in the TCA cycle, hydrolyzing succinyl-CoA into succinate and CoA, thereby forming ATP.
1	3	0	four-way junction helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, where this reaction drives the unwinding of the DNA helix of DNA containing four-way junctions, including Holliday junctions.
1	1	1	rRNA (cytosine-C5-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group from S-adenosyl-L-methionine to cytosine to form 5-methylcytosine in small subunit ribosomal RNA.
2	0	0	translational attenuation	Translational attenuation is a regulatory mechanism analogous to ribosome-mediated transcriptional attenuation. The system requires the presence of a short ORF, called a leader peptide, encoded in the mRNA upstream of the ribosome-binding site and start codon of the gene whose translation is to be regulated. Certain conditions, such as presence of the antibiotic tetracycline in bacteria or amino acid starvation, may cause slowing or stalling of the ribosome translating the leader peptide. The stalled ribosome masks a region of the mRNA and affects which of two alternative mRNA folded structures will form, therefore controlling whether or not a ribosome will bind and initiate translation of the downstream gene. Translational attenuation is analogous to ribosome-mediated transcriptional attenuation, in which mRNA remodeling caused by ribosome stalling regulates transcriptional termination rather than translational initiation.
2	0	1	phospholipid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phospholipids, any lipid containing phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester.
8	4	7	response to heat	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a heat stimulus, a temperature stimulus above the optimal temperature for that organism.
2	3	5	response to cold	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cold stimulus, a temperature stimulus below the optimal temperature for that organism.
1	0	3	response to xenobiotic stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a xenobiotic compound stimulus. Xenobiotic compounds are compounds foreign to living organisms.
7	9	5	response to UV	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an ultraviolet radiation (UV light) stimulus. Ultraviolet radiation is electromagnetic radiation with a wavelength in the range of 10 to 380 nanometers.
1	3	0	response to water deprivation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a water deprivation stimulus, prolonged deprivation of water.
1	4	1	response to light stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a light stimulus, electromagnetic radiation of wavelengths classified as infrared, visible or ultraviolet light.
0	3	0	NAD biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide, a coenzyme present in most living cells and derived from the B vitamin nicotinic acid; biosynthesis may be of either the oxidized form, NAD, or the reduced form, NADH.
0	0	1	glyoxylate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glyoxylate, the anion of glyoxylic acid, HOC-COOH.
1	1	0	methylglyoxal metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving methylglyoxal, CH3-CO-CHO, the aldehyde of pyruvic acid.
0	1	0	cyanate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of cyanate, NCO-, the anion of cyanic acid.
0	1	0	pyridoxal 5'-phosphate salvage	Any process that generates pyridoxal 5'-phosphate, the active form of vitamin B6, from derivatives of it without de novo synthesis.
0	0	1	gamma-aminobutyric acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA, 4-aminobutyrate), an amino acid which acts as a neurotransmitter in some organisms.
0	0	1	RNA modification	The covalent alteration of one or more nucleotides within an RNA molecule to produce an RNA molecule with a sequence that differs from that coded genetically.
0	1	0	7-methylguanosine RNA capping	The sequence of enzymatic reactions by which the 5' cap structure, an inverted 7-methylguanosine linked via a 5'-5' triphosphate bridge (m7G(5')ppp(5')X) to the first transcribed residue, is added to a nascent transcript.
2	4	3	fertilization	The union of gametes of opposite sexes during the process of sexual reproduction to form a zygote. It involves the fusion of the gametic nuclei (karyogamy) and cytoplasm (plasmogamy).
1	0	0	detection of abiotic stimulus	The series of events in which an (non-living) abiotic stimulus is received by a cell and converted into a molecular signal.
3	0	0	detection of virus	The series of events in which a stimulus from a virus is received and converted into a molecular signal.
2	0	0	response to symbiotic bacterium	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus from a symbiotic bacterium, a bacterium living in close physical association with another organism.
4	11	6	response to wounding	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating damage to the organism.
8	11	6	response to mechanical stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a mechanical stimulus.
14	16	15	response to virus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus from a virus.
12	10	8	response to bacterium	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus from a bacterium.
1	1	0	response to fungus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus from a fungus.
1	1	2	response to gravity	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a gravitational stimulus.
0	1	0	cold acclimation	Any process that increases freezing tolerance of an organism in response to low, nonfreezing temperatures.
2	1	1	response to herbicide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a herbicide stimulus. Herbicides are chemicals used to kill or control the growth of plants.
5	9	13	response to toxic substance	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a toxic stimulus.
1	0	0	response to light intensity	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a light intensity stimulus.
0	1	0	response to low light intensity stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a low light intensity stimulus. Low light intensity is defined as a level of electromagnetic radiation at or below 0.1 micromols/m2.
1	0	0	photoperiodism	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of detection of, or exposure to, a period of light or dark of a given length, measured relative to a particular duration known as the 'critical day length'. The critical day length varies between species.
4	0	1	UV protection	Any process in which an organism or cell protects itself from ultraviolet radiation (UV), which may also result in resistance to repeated exposure to UV.
2	2	1	response to salt stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating an increase or decrease in the concentration of salt (particularly but not exclusively sodium and chloride ions) in the environment.
22	12	8	anatomical structure morphogenesis	The process in which anatomical structures are generated and organized. Morphogenesis pertains to the creation of form.
6	3	4	response to hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hormone stimulus.
1	5	2	response to carbohydrate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a carbohydrate stimulus.
1	0	0	response to sucrose	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a sucrose stimulus.
8	9	5	response to glucose	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glucose stimulus.
0	0	1	response to fructose	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fructose stimulus.
5	3	0	hormone-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals mediated by the detection of a hormone.
8	11	5	post-embryonic development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the organism over time, from the completion of embryonic development to the mature structure. See embryonic development.
0	3	1	embryo development ending in birth or egg hatching	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an embryo over time, from zygote formation until the end of the embryonic life stage. The end of the embryonic life stage is organism-specific and may be somewhat arbitrary; for mammals it is usually considered to be birth, for insects the hatching of the first instar larva from the eggshell.
2	0	0	coumarin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving coumarins, compounds derived from the phenylacrylic skeleton of cinnamic acids.
0	1	0	flavonoid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving flavonoids, a group of water-soluble phenolic derivatives containing a flavan skeleton including flavones, flavonols and flavanoids, and anthocyanins.
1	2	0	abscission	The controlled shedding of a body part.
3	0	0	embryonic pattern specification	The process that results in the patterns of cell differentiation that will arise in an embryo.
10	20	6	animal organ morphogenesis	Morphogenesis of an animal organ. An organ is defined as a tissue or set of tissues that work together to perform a specific function or functions. Morphogenesis is the process in which anatomical structures are generated and organized. Organs are commonly observed as visibly distinct structures, but may also exist as loosely associated clusters of cells that work together to perform a specific function or functions.
2	6	0	tissue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a tissue over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	negative regulation of biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of substances.
38	27	27	external side of plasma membrane	The leaflet of the plasma membrane that faces away from the cytoplasm and any proteins embedded or anchored in it or attached to its surface.
13	5	14	cytoplasmic side of plasma membrane	The leaflet the plasma membrane that faces the cytoplasm and any proteins embedded or anchored in it or attached to its surface.
1	0	0	auditory receptor cell fate commitment	The process in which the cellular identity of auditory hair cells is acquired and determined.
2	1	2	epidermal cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an epidermal cell, any of the cells making up the epidermis.
1	0	0	sterol delta7 reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5-dehydroepisterol = 24-methylenecholesterol.
1	0	0	fatty acid elongase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: fatty acid (C-16 or longer) + 2-C = fatty acid (C-16 or longer + 2-C).
6	13	9	basal plasma membrane	The region of the plasma membrane located at the basal end of the cell. Often used in reference to animal polarized epithelial membranes, where the basal membrane is the part attached to the extracellular matrix, or in plant cells, where the basal membrane is defined with respect to the zygotic axis.
0	4	1	calcium-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: ATP + a protein serine = ADP + protein serine phosphate; and ATP + a protein threonine = ADP + protein threonine phosphate. These reactions are dependent on the presence of calcium ions.
4	0	0	anterior/posterior axis specification	The establishment, maintenance and elaboration of the anterior/posterior axis. The anterior-posterior axis is defined by a line that runs from the head or mouth of an organism to the tail or opposite end of the organism.
0	1	0	dorsal/ventral axis specification	The establishment, maintenance and elaboration of the dorsal/ventral axis. The dorsal/ventral axis is defined by a line that runs orthogonal to both the anterior/posterior and left/right axes. The dorsal end is defined by the upper or back side of an organism. The ventral end is defined by the lower or front side of an organism.
13	6	0	anterior/posterior pattern specification	The regionalization process in which specific areas of cell differentiation are determined along the anterior-posterior axis. The anterior-posterior axis is defined by a line that runs from the head or mouth of an organism to the tail or opposite end of the organism.
3	1	0	dorsal/ventral pattern formation	The regionalization process in which the areas along the dorsal/ventral axis are established that will lead to differences in cell differentiation. The dorsal/ventral axis is defined by a line that runs orthogonal to both the anterior/posterior and left/right axes. The dorsal end is defined by the upper or back side of an organism. The ventral end is defined by the lower or front side of an organism.
3	3	0	proximal/distal pattern formation	The regionalization process in which specific areas of cell differentiation are determined along a proximal/distal axis. The proximal/distal axis is defined by a line that runs from main body (proximal end) of an organism outward (distal end).
4	3	5	regulation of signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction.
2	0	1	positive regulation of signal transduction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction.
6	4	3	negative regulation of signal transduction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction.
2	0	1	pseudouridine synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: RNA uridine = RNA pseudouridine. Conversion of uridine in an RNA molecule to pseudouridine by rotation of the C1'-N-1 glycosidic bond of uridine in RNA to a C1'-C5.
70	62	62	cell surface	The external part of the cell wall and/or plasma membrane.
0	0	2	cellular process	Any process that is carried out at the cellular level, but not necessarily restricted to a single cell. For example, cell communication occurs among more than one cell, but occurs at the cellular level.
1	0	1	response to extracellular stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an extracellular stimulus.
2	0	1	cellular water homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of water within a cell.
0	0	2	glial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a glial cell.
28	26	27	endosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding an endosome.
0	3	2	meiotic chromosome condensation	Compaction of chromatin structure prior to meiosis in eukaryotic cells.
8	2	4	response to organic substance	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an organic substance stimulus.
0	1	4	response to inorganic substance	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an inorganic substance stimulus.
0	0	4	response to metal ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a metal ion stimulus.
1	1	1	response to iron ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an iron ion stimulus.
0	1	1	response to iron(III) ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an iron(III) ion stimulus.
1	3	0	response to manganese ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a manganese ion stimulus.
4	5	3	response to zinc ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a zinc ion stimulus.
0	0	2	response to aluminum ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an aluminum ion stimulus.
1	0	0	response to mycotoxin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a mycotoxin stimulus. A mycotoxin is a toxic chemical substance produced by fungi.
0	1	0	phenylacetate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phenylacetate.
1	0	0	proline catabolic process to glutamate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of proline into other compounds, including glutamate.
0	2	0	farnesyl diphosphate biosynthetic process, mevalonate pathway	The pathway that converts acetate, in the form of acetyl-CoA, to farnesyl diphosphate (FPP) through a series of mevalonate intermediates. Farnesyl diphosphate is an important substrate for other essential pathways, such as biosynthesis of sterols.
0	2	0	specification of animal organ position	The regionalization process in which information that determines the correct position at which animal organ primordia are formed is generated and perceived resulting in correct positioning of the new animal organ.
6	2	1	response to X-ray	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of X-ray radiation. An X-ray is a form of electromagnetic radiation with a wavelength in the range of 10 nanometers to 100 picometers (corresponding to frequencies in the range 30 PHz to 3 EHz).
1	0	0	body morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the soma are generated and organized.
2	0	0	embryonic body morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the embryonic soma are generated and organized.
2	0	0	FMN binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with flavin mono nucleotide. Flavin mono nucleotide (FMN) is the coenzyme or the prosthetic group of various flavoprotein oxidoreductase enzymes.
1	0	0	response to ozone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a ozone stimulus.
5	8	7	response to ionizing radiation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a ionizing radiation stimulus. Ionizing radiation is radiation with sufficient energy to remove electrons from atoms and may arise from spontaneous decay of unstable isotopes, resulting in alpha and beta particles and gamma rays. Ionizing radiation also includes X-rays.
2	3	1	maintenance of DNA methylation	Any process involved in maintaining the methylation state of a nucleotide sequence.
3	0	1	response to UV-B	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a UV-B radiation stimulus. UV-B radiation (UV-B light) spans the wavelengths 280 to 315 nm.
3	2	1	response to UV-C	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a UV-C radiation stimulus. UV-C radiation (UV-C light) spans the wavelengths 100 to 280 nm.
1	1	1	response to lithium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lithium (Li+) ion stimulus.
0	0	1	vascular transport	The directed movement of substances, into, out of or within a cell, either in a vascular tissue or in the vascular membrane.
2	2	2	response to organonitrogen compound	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an organonitrogen stimulus. An organonitrogen compound is formally a compound containing at least one carbon-nitrogen bond.
2	0	0	establishment or maintenance of transmembrane electrochemical gradient	The directed movement of ions to establish or maintain an electrochemical gradient across a membrane by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	1	endomembrane system organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the endomembrane system.
0	3	1	multicellular organism aging	An aging process that has as participant a whole multicellular organism. Multicellular organism aging includes loss of functions such as resistance to disease, homeostasis, and fertility, as well as wear and tear. Multicellular organisms aging includes processes like cellular senescence and organ senescence, but is more inclusive. May precede death (GO:0016265) of an organism and may succeed developmental maturation (GO:0021700).
0	0	1	SCF complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the SKP1-Cullin/Cdc53-F-box protein ubiquitin ligase (SCF) complex.
0	0	1	response to vitamin B1	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin B1 stimulus.
2	2	1	response to selenium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus from selenium ion.
0	2	0	detoxification of copper ion	Any process that reduces or removes the toxicity of copper ion. These include transport of copper away from sensitive areas and to compartments or complexes whose purpose is sequestration of copper ion.
1	3	3	response to lead ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lead ion stimulus.
0	1	2	regulation of hydrogen peroxide metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving hydrogen peroxide.
0	1	0	detoxification of zinc ion	Any process that reduces or removes the toxicity of zinc ion. These include transport of zinc away from sensitive areas and to compartments or complexes whose purpose is sequestration of zinc ion.
4	1	5	phosphatidylinositol-5-phosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol-5-phosphate, a derivative of phosphatidylinositol in which the inositol ring is phosphorylated at the 5' position.
1	2	1	membrane invagination	The infolding of a membrane.
5	7	3	response to gamma radiation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a gamma radiation stimulus. Gamma radiation is a form of electromagnetic radiation (EMR) or light emission of a specific frequency produced from sub-atomic particle interaction, such as electron-positron annihilation and radioactive decay. Gamma rays are generally characterized as EMR having the highest frequency and energy, and also the shortest wavelength, within the electromagnetic radiation spectrum.
3	3	1	chromocenter	A region in which centric, heterochromatic portions from more than one chromosomes form a compact structure.
1	1	2	double-stranded methylated DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded methylated DNA. Methylation of cytosine or adenine in DNA is an important mechanism for establishing stable heritable epigenetic marks.
0	0	1	COP9 signalosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a COP9 signalosome.
16	16	21	regulation of G2/M transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any signalling pathway that modulates the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G2 phase to M phase of the mitotic cell cycle.
1	4	3	histone monoubiquitination	The modification of histones by addition of a single ubiquitin group.
1	1	0	fatty acid omega-oxidation	A fatty acid oxidation process in which the methyl group at the end of the fatty acid molecule (the omega carbon) is first oxidized to a hydroxyl group, then to an oxo group, and finally to a carboxyl group. The long chain dicarboxylates derived from omega-oxidation then enter the beta-oxidation pathway for further degradation.
2	1	1	response to acidic pH	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a pH stimulus with pH < 7. pH is a measure of the acidity or basicity of an aqueous solution.
3	4	1	centriole-centriole cohesion	The cell cycle process in which the two centrioles within a centrosome remain tightly paired.
1	4	3	exit from mitosis	The cell cycle transition where a cell leaves M phase and enters a new G1 phase. M phase is the part of the mitotic cell cycle during which mitosis and cytokinesis take place.
3	0	2	positive regulation of heart rate	Any process that activates or increases the frequency or rate of heart contraction.
1	0	0	nerve growth factor receptor activity	Combining with nerve growth factor (NGF), to prevent apoptosis in neurons and promote nerve growth, or to initiate a change in cell activity.
2	0	1	negative regulation of peptidase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of peptidase activity, the hydrolysis of peptide bonds within proteins.
5	2	0	gene expression	The process in which a gene's sequence is converted into a mature gene product or products (proteins or RNA). This includes the production of an RNA transcript as well as any processing to produce a mature RNA product or an mRNA or circRNA (for protein-coding genes) and the translation of that mRNA or circRNA into protein. Protein maturation is included when required to form an active form of a product from an inactive precursor form.
20	27	23	regulation of gene expression	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gene expression. Gene expression is the process in which a gene's coding sequence is converted into a mature gene product or products (proteins or RNA). This includes the production of an RNA transcript as well as any processing to produce a mature RNA product or an mRNA or circRNA (for protein-coding genes) and the translation of that mRNA or circRNA into protein. Protein maturation is included when required to form an active form of a product from an inactive precursor form.
1	0	2	regulation of signaling receptor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a signaling receptor activity. Receptor activity is when a molecule combines with an extracellular or intracellular messenger to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	3	2	regulation of gastrulation	Any process that modulates the rate or extent of gastrulation. Gastrulation is the complex and coordinated series of cellular movements that occurs at the end of cleavage during embryonic development of most animals.
1	0	0	response to sulfur dioxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a sulfur dioxide (SO2) stimulus.
0	1	0	epidermal cell division	Any process resulting in the physical partitioning and separation of an epidermal cell, any of the cells making up the epidermis, into daughter cells.
2	1	0	regulation of epidermal cell division	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the physical partitioning and separation of an epidermal cell into daughter cells. An epidermal cell is any of the cells that make up the epidermis.
1	1	1	H3 histone acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + histone H3 = CoA + acetyl-histone H3.
2	1	1	H4 histone acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + histone H4 = CoA + acetyl-histone H4.
8	17	26	cytoplasmic stress granule	A dense aggregation in the cytosol composed of proteins and RNAs that appear when the cell is under stress.
3	3	2	proteasomal protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds that is mediated by the proteasome.
7	3	7	proteasomal ubiquitin-independent protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds that is mediated by the proteasome but do not involve ubiquitin.
0	4	0	RNA secondary structure unwinding	The process in which a secondary structure of RNA are broken or 'melted'.
8	14	9	regulation of autophagy	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of autophagy. Autophagy is the process in which cells digest parts of their own cytoplasm.
5	9	7	negative regulation of autophagy	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of autophagy. Autophagy is the process in which cells digest parts of their own cytoplasm.
10	11	11	positive regulation of autophagy	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of autophagy. Autophagy is the process in which cells digest parts of their own cytoplasm.
0	1	0	polyamine homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of a polyamine.
1	1	1	positive regulation of phospholipase activity	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipase activity, the hydrolysis of a phospholipid.
0	0	1	telomerase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a telomerase. Telomerase catalyzes the reaction: deoxynucleoside triphosphate + DNA(n) = diphosphate + DNA(n+1). Catalyzes extension of the 3'- end of a DNA strand by one deoxynucleotide at a time using an internal RNA template that encodes the telomeric repeat sequence.
0	0	1	regulation of calcium ion transport into cytosol	Any process that modulates the rate of the directed movement of calcium ions into the cytosol of a cell. The cytosol is that part of the cytoplasm that does not contain membranous or particulate subcellular components.
1	0	0	negative regulation of calcium ion transport into cytosol	Any process that decreases the rate of the directed movement of calcium ions into the cytosol of a cell. The cytosol is that part of the cytoplasm that does not contain membranous or particulate subcellular components.
1	0	2	positive regulation of calcium ion transport into cytosol	Any process that increases the rate of the directed movement of calcium ions into the cytosol of a cell. The cytosol is that part of the cytoplasm that does not contain membranous or particulate subcellular components.
1	0	2	negative regulation of transposition, RNA-mediated	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of RNA-mediated transposition. RNA-mediated transposition is a type of transpositional recombination which occurs via an RNA intermediate.
2	0	0	negative regulation of transposition	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of transposition. Transposition results in the movement of discrete segments of DNA between nonhomologous sites.
0	1	0	positive regulation of activation of Janus kinase activity	Any process that increases the frequency or rate of activation of JAK (Janus Activated Kinase) protein. The activation of JAK protein is the process of introducing a phosphate group to a tyrosine residue of a JAK (Janus Activated Kinase) protein, thereby activating it.
1	2	0	regulation of platelet activation	Any process that modulates the rate or frequency of platelet activation. Platelet activation is a series of progressive, overlapping events triggered by exposure of the platelets to subendothelial tissue.
1	1	0	negative regulation of platelet activation	Any process that decreases the rate or frequency of platelet activation. Platelet activation is a series of progressive, overlapping events triggered by exposure of the platelets to subendothelial tissue.
0	1	0	positive regulation of macromolecule biosynthetic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a macromolecule, any molecule of high relative molecular mass, the structure of which essentially comprises the multiple repetition of units derived, actually or conceptually, from molecules of low relative molecular mass.
1	0	0	regulation of glycoprotein biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycoproteins, any protein that contains covalently bound glycose (i.e. monosaccharide) residues; the glycose occurs most commonly as oligosaccharide or fairly small polysaccharide but occasionally as monosaccharide.
2	2	2	regulation of cell cycle process	Any process that modulates a cellular process that is involved in the progression of biochemical and morphological phases and events that occur in a cell during successive cell replication or nuclear replication events.
0	0	1	regulation of cellular ketone metabolic process	Any process that modulates the chemical reactions and pathways involving any of a class of organic compounds that contain the carbonyl group, CO, and in which the carbonyl group is bonded only to carbon atoms. The general formula for a ketone is RCOR, where R and R are alkyl or aryl groups.
2	5	3	regulation of double-strand break repair via homologous recombination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the error-free repair of a double-strand break in DNA in which the broken DNA molecule is repaired using homologous sequences.
0	1	2	positive regulation of nuclear cell cycle DNA replication	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of The DNA-dependent DNA replication that occurs in the nucleus of eukaryotic organisms as part of the cell cycle.
1	0	1	positive regulation of platelet activation	Any process that increases the rate or frequency of platelet activation. Platelet activation is a series of progressive, overlapping events triggered by exposure of the platelets to subendothelial tissue.
1	2	0	vascular endothelial growth factor production	The appearance of vascular endothelial growth factor production due to biosynthesis or secretion following a cellular stimulus, resulting in an increase in its intracellular or extracellular levels.
0	1	1	regulation of vascular endothelial growth factor production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of production of vascular endothelial growth factor.
3	6	1	positive regulation of vascular endothelial growth factor production	Any process that increases or activates the frequency, rate, or extent of production of vascular endothelial growth factor.
1	0	0	glutamine secretion	The controlled release of glutamine by a cell.
3	4	4	miRNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving miRNA, microRNA, a class of single-stranded RNA molecules of about 21-23 nucleotides in length, which regulates gene expression.
0	0	4	miRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of miRNA, microRNA, a class of single-stranded RNA molecules of about 21-23 nucleotides in length, which regulates gene expression.
2	4	3	regulation of lamellipodium assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the formation of a lamellipodium, a thin sheetlike extension of the surface of a migrating cell.
3	11	7	positive regulation of lamellipodium assembly	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the formation of a lamellipodium, a thin sheetlike extension of the surface of a migrating cell.
1	0	0	negative regulation of lamellipodium assembly	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of the formation of a lamellipodium, a thin sheetlike extension of the surface of a migrating cell.
1	1	0	regulation of endothelial cell migration	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the orderly movement of an endothelial cell into the extracellular matrix to form an endothelium.
5	14	8	positive regulation of endothelial cell migration	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the orderly movement of an endothelial cell into the extracellular matrix to form an endothelium.
6	2	2	negative regulation of endothelial cell migration	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the orderly movement of an endothelial cell into the extracellular matrix to form an endothelium.
0	0	2	regulation of cytoplasmic mRNA processing body assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and RNA molecules to form a cytoplasmic mRNA processing body.
1	3	0	positive regulation of cytoplasmic mRNA processing body assembly	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and RNA molecules to form a cytoplasmic mRNA processing body.
4	2	8	posttranscriptional regulation of gene expression	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gene expression after the production of an RNA transcript.
0	0	1	regulation of mRNA stability involved in response to stress	Any process that modulates the propensity of mRNA molecules to degradation that is part of a change in state or activity of a cell as a result of an exogenous disturbance.
1	0	0	regulation of cardiac muscle hypertrophy	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the enlargement or overgrowth of all or part of the heart due to an increase in size (not length) of individual cardiac muscle fibers, without cell division.
1	6	4	positive regulation of cardiac muscle hypertrophy	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the enlargement or overgrowth of all or part of the heart due to an increase in size (not length) of individual cardiac muscle fibers, without cell division.
5	0	0	negative regulation of Schwann cell proliferation	Any process that decreases the frequency or extent of the multiplication or reproduction of Schwann cells, resulting in the expansion of their population. Schwann cells are a type of glial cell in the peripheral nervous system.
54	46	50	positive regulation of gene expression	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of gene expression. Gene expression is the process in which a gene's coding sequence is converted into a mature gene product or products (proteins or RNA). This includes the production of an RNA transcript as well as any processing to produce a mature RNA product or an mRNA or circRNA (for protein-coding genes) and the translation of that mRNA or circRNA into protein. Protein maturation is included when required to form an active form of a product from an inactive precursor form.
31	35	26	negative regulation of gene expression	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of gene expression. Gene expression is the process in which a gene's coding sequence is converted into a mature gene product or products (proteins or RNA). This includes the production of an RNA transcript as well as any processing to produce a mature RNA product or an mRNA or circRNA (for protein-coding genes) and the translation of that mRNA or circRNA into protein. Protein maturation is included when required to form an active form of a product from an inactive precursor form.
2	0	2	epithelial cell migration	The orderly movement of an epithelial cell from one site to another, often during the development of a multicellular organism.
1	2	2	regulation of epithelial cell migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell migration.
4	1	1	negative regulation of epithelial cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell migration.
9	7	6	positive regulation of epithelial cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell migration.
0	1	3	negative regulation of mitochondrial fusion	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of merging of two or more mitochondria within a cell to form a single compartment.
1	1	1	positive regulation of organelle organization	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of an organelle.
2	0	1	negative regulation of platelet-derived growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the platelet-derived growth factor receptor signaling pathway.
0	0	1	cell communication by chemical coupling	The process that mediates signaling interactions between one cell and another cell by the transfer of small, water-soluble molecules or metabolites between their adjacent cytoplasms via intercellular protein channels.
0	0	2	cell communication by electrical coupling	The process that mediates signaling interactions between one cell and another cell by transfer of current between their adjacent cytoplasms via intercellular protein channels.
0	0	3	regulation of cell communication by electrical coupling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell communication via electrical coupling. Cell communication via electrical coupling is the process that mediates signaling interactions between one cell and another cell by transfer of current between their adjacent cytoplasms via intercellular protein channels.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cell communication by electrical coupling	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell communication via electrical coupling. Cell communication via electrical coupling is the process that mediates signaling interactions between one cell and another cell by transfer of current between their adjacent cytoplasms via intercellular protein channels.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cell communication by chemical coupling	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell communication via chemical coupling. Cell communication by chemical coupling is the process that mediates signaling interactions between one cell and another cell by the transfer of small, water-soluble molecules or metabolites between their adjacent cytoplasms via intercellular protein channels.
0	2	0	negative regulation of muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that decreases the rate or frequency of muscle cell apoptotic process, a form of programmed cell death induced by external or internal signals that trigger the activity of proteolytic caspases whose actions dismantle a muscle cell and result in its death.
0	0	2	cardiac muscle cell apoptotic process	A form of programmed cell death induced by external or internal signals that trigger the activity of proteolytic caspases, whose actions dismantle a cardiac muscle cell and result in its death. Cardiac muscle cells are striated muscle cells that are responsible for heart contraction.
1	0	1	negative regulation of striated muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that decreases the rate or extent of striated muscle cell apoptotic process, a form of programmed cell death induced by external or internal signals that trigger the activity of proteolytic caspases whose actions dismantle a striated muscle cell and result in its death.
0	3	4	positive regulation of cardiac muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that increases the rate or extent of cardiac cell apoptotic process, a form of programmed cell death induced by external or internal signals that trigger the activity of proteolytic caspases whose actions dismantle a cardiac muscle cell and result in its death.
3	2	3	negative regulation of cardiac muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that decreases the rate or extent of cardiac cell apoptotic process, a form of programmed cell death induced by external or internal signals that trigger the activity of proteolytic caspases whose actions dismantle a cardiac muscle cell and result in its death.
0	2	0	ectodermal cell differentiation	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and/or functional features of an ectodermal cell. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
2	3	1	epithelial structure maintenance	A tissue homeostatic process required for the maintenance of epithelial structure.
1	1	0	positive regulation of alkaline phosphatase activity	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of alkaline phosphatase activity, the catalysis of the reaction: an orthophosphoric monoester + H2O = an alcohol + phosphate, with an alkaline pH optimum.
0	3	0	acetyltransferase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of an acetyltransferase, an enzyme which catalyzes the transfer of an acetyl group to an acceptor molecule.
1	0	0	negative regulation of norepinephrine secretion	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of norepinephrine.
0	0	2	positive regulation of norepinephrine secretion	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of norepinephrine.
0	1	0	meiotic DNA double-strand break processing involved in reciprocal meiotic recombination	The cell cycle process in which the 5' to 3' exonucleolytic resection of the DNA at the site of the break to form a 3' single-strand DNA overhang occurs resulting in double strand break formation and repair through a double Holliday junction intermediate.
0	1	0	ganglioside biosynthetic process via lactosylceramide	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of gangliosides that begins with the formation of lactosylceramides, Gal-beta-(1->4)-Glc-beta-(1->1') ceramides, any compound formed by the replacement of the glycosidic C1 hydroxyl group of lactose by a ceramide group.
0	1	0	regulation of collagen catabolic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of collagen catabolism. Collagen catabolism is the proteolytic chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of collagen in the extracellular matrix.
2	1	0	regulation of extracellular matrix disassembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of extracellular matrix disassembly. Extracellular matrix disassembly is a process that results in the breakdown of the extracellular matrix.
2	4	3	regulation of epithelial to mesenchymal transition	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of epithelial to mesenchymal transition. Epithelial to mesenchymal transition where an epithelial cell loses apical/basolateral polarity, severs intercellular adhesive junctions, degrades basement membrane components and becomes a migratory mesenchymal cell.
4	8	7	positive regulation of epithelial to mesenchymal transition	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of epithelial to mesenchymal transition. Epithelial to mesenchymal transition is where an epithelial cell loses apical/basolateral polarity, severs intercellular adhesive junctions, degrades basement membrane components and becomes a migratory mesenchymal cell.
5	4	0	negative regulation of epithelial to mesenchymal transition	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of epithelial to mesenchymal transition. Epithelial to mesenchymal transition where an epithelial cell loses apical/basolateral polarity, severs intercellular adhesive junctions, degrades basement membrane components and becomes a migratory mesenchymal cell.
1	0	0	regulation of definitive erythrocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of definitive erythrocyte differentiation. Definitive erythrocyte differentiation occurs as part of the process of definitive hemopoiesis.
1	0	0	regulation of primitive erythrocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of primitive erythrocyte differentiation. Primitive erythrocyte differentiation occurs as part of the process of primitive hemopoiesis.
0	1	0	negative regulation of hydrogen peroxide metabolic process	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving hydrogen peroxide.
1	1	0	positive regulation of hydrogen peroxide biosynthetic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of hydrogen peroxide biosynthesis. The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), a potentially harmful byproduct of aerobic cellular respiration which can cause damage to DNA.
0	1	0	negative regulation of hydrogen peroxide biosynthetic process	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of hydrogen peroxide biosynthesis. The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), a potentially harmful byproduct of aerobic cellular respiration which can cause damage to DNA.
0	0	2	negative regulation of protein glutathionylation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of protein glutathionylation. Protein glutathionylation is the protein modification process in which a glutathione molecule is added to a protein amino acid through a disulfide linkage.
1	0	1	positive regulation of transcription via serum response element binding	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the specifically regulated synthesis of RNA from DNA encoding a specific set of genes as a result of a transcription factor interacting with a serum response element (SRE). A serum response element is a short sequence with dyad symmetry found in the promoters of some of the cellular immediate-early genes, regulated by serum.
0	0	1	serum response element binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the serum response element (SRE), a short sequence with dyad symmetry found in the promoters of some of the cellular immediate-early genes, regulated by serum.
3	1	7	protein kinase A signaling	A series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase A, which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
1	3	5	regulation of protein kinase A signaling	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of protein kinase A signaling. PKA signaling is the series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase A, which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
1	0	1	positive regulation of protein kinase A signaling	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of protein kinase A signaling. PKA signaling is the series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase A, which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
2	0	2	macrophage derived foam cell differentiation	The process in which a monocyte acquires the specialized features of a foam cell. A foam cell is a type of cell containing lipids in small vacuoles and typically seen in atherosclerotic lesions, as well as other conditions.
2	5	1	positive regulation of macrophage derived foam cell differentiation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of macrophage derived foam cell differentiation. Macrophage derived foam cell differentiation is the process in which a macrophage acquires the specialized features of a foam cell. A foam cell is a type of cell containing lipids in small vacuoles and typically seen in atherosclerotic lesions, as well as other conditions.
3	1	0	negative regulation of macrophage derived foam cell differentiation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of macrophage derived foam cell differentiation. Macrophage derived foam cell differentiation is the process in which a macrophage acquires the specialized features of a foam cell. A foam cell is a type of cell containing lipids in small vacuoles and typically seen in atherosclerotic lesions, as well as other conditions.
1	0	0	positive regulation of long-chain fatty acid import across plasma membrane	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of plasma membrane long-chain fatty acid transport. Plasma membrane long-chain fatty acid transport is the directed movement of long-chain fatty acids across the plasma membrane. A long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
0	2	2	negative regulation of long-chain fatty acid import across plasma membrane	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of plasma membrane long-chain fatty acid transport. Plasma membrane long-chain fatty acid transport is the directed movement of long-chain fatty acids across the plasma membrane.
1	0	2	positive regulation of nitric oxide mediated signal transduction	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of nitric oxide mediated signal transduction. Nitric oxide mediated signal transduction is a series of molecular signals mediated by the detection of nitric oxide (NO).
0	1	1	negative regulation of nitric oxide mediated signal transduction	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of nitric oxide mediated signal transduction. Nitric oxide mediated signal transduction is a series of molecular signals mediated by the detection of nitric oxide (NO).
0	1	0	regulation of cGMP-mediated signaling	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of cGMP-mediated signaling. cGMP-mediated signaling is a series of molecular signals in which a cell uses cyclic GMP to convert an extracellular signal into a response.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cGMP-mediated signaling	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of cGMP-mediated signaling. cGMP-mediated signaling is a series of molecular signals in which a cell uses cyclic GMP to convert an extracellular signal into a response.
0	1	0	regulation of plasminogen activation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of plasminogen activation. Plasminogen activation is the process in which plasminogen is processed to plasmin.
1	0	1	positive regulation of plasminogen activation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of plasminogen activation. Plasminogen activation is the process in which plasminogen is processed to plasmin.
3	1	0	negative regulation of plasminogen activation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of plasminogen activation. Plasminogen activation is the process in which plasminogen is processed to plasmin.
1	2	0	regulation of macrophage chemotaxis	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of macrophage chemotaxis. Macrophage chemotaxis is the movement of a macrophage in response to an external stimulus.
2	3	3	positive regulation of macrophage chemotaxis	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of macrophage chemotaxis. Macrophage chemotaxis is the movement of a macrophage in response to an external stimulus.
0	1	0	negative regulation of macrophage chemotaxis	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of macrophage chemotaxis. Macrophage chemotaxis is the movement of a macrophage in response to an external stimulus.
1	4	3	fibroblast migration	Cell migration that is accomplished by extension and retraction of a fibroblast pseudopodium. A fibroblast is a connective tissue cell which secretes an extracellular matrix rich in collagen and other macromolecules.
4	4	0	regulation of fibroblast migration	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of fibroblast cell migration. Fibroblast cell migration is accomplished by extension and retraction of a pseudopodium.
0	4	5	positive regulation of fibroblast migration	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of fibroblast cell migration. Fibroblast cell migration is accomplished by extension and retraction of a pseudopodium.
0	2	2	negative regulation of fibroblast migration	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of fibroblast cell migration. Fibroblast cell migration is accomplished by extension and retraction of a pseudopodium.
2	3	4	positive regulation of sodium ion transport	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of sodium ions (Na+) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	3	1	negative regulation of sodium ion transport	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of sodium ions (Na+) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to UV-induced DNA damage	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a UV damage stimulus.
0	1	0	negative regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to UV-induced DNA damage	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a UV damage stimulus.
1	0	0	meiotic sister chromatid cohesion involved in meiosis I	The cell cycle process in which sister chromatids of a replicated chromosome are joined along the entire length of the chromosome during meiosis I.
0	2	0	DNA double-strand break processing involved in repair via single-strand annealing	The 5' to 3' exonucleolytic resection of the DNA at the site of the break to form a 3' single-strand DNA overhang that results in the repair of a double strand break via single-strand annealing.
1	2	1	regulation of mRNA export from nucleus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of mRNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
1	1	0	regulation of multivesicular body size	Any process that modulates the volume of a multivesicular body, a type of late endosome in which regions of the limiting endosomal membrane invaginate to form internal vesicles.
5	2	7	positive regulation of peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation. Peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation is the phosphorylation of peptidyl-threonine to form peptidyl-O-phospho-L-threonine.
0	3	7	negative regulation of peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation. Peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation is the phosphorylation of peptidyl-threonine to form peptidyl-O-phospho-L-threonine.
3	7	4	regulation of tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the rate or extent of the tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway. The tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of tumor necrosis factor binding to a cell surface receptor.
2	4	0	negative regulation of tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that decreases the rate or extent of the tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway. The tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of tumor necrosis factor binding to a cell surface receptor.
1	0	5	regulation of synaptic vesicle priming	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle priming. Synaptic vesicle priming is the formation of SNARE-containing complexes, bringing synaptic vesicle membrane and plasma membranes into close proximity and thereby facilitating membrane fusion.
1	0	0	positive regulation of synaptic vesicle priming	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle priming. Synaptic vesicle priming is the formation of SNARE-containing complexes, bringing synaptic vesicle membrane and plasma membranes into close proximity and thereby facilitating membrane fusion.
0	0	1	regulation of cell-substrate adhesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell-substrate adhesion. Cell-substrate adhesion is the attachment of a cell to the underlying substrate via adhesion molecules.
7	2	4	positive regulation of cell-substrate adhesion	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell-substrate adhesion. Cell-substrate adhesion is the attachment of a cell to the underlying substrate via adhesion molecules.
0	1	3	negative regulation of cell-substrate adhesion	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of cell-substrate adhesion. Cell-substrate adhesion is the attachment of a cell to the underlying substrate via adhesion molecules.
1	0	0	neuropeptide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of neuropeptides. Neuropeptides are signaling peptides that travel across a synaptic junction.
0	1	0	substance P catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the neuropeptide substance P.
2	1	0	bradykinin catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the peptide bradykinin.
0	1	0	calcitonin catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the peptide calcitonin.
1	0	1	regulation of hormone levels	Any process that modulates the levels of hormone within an organism or a tissue. A hormone is any substance formed in very small amounts in one specialized organ or group of cells and carried (sometimes in the bloodstream) to another organ or group of cells in the same organism, upon which it has a specific regulatory action.
1	0	1	T cell chemotaxis	The directed movement of a T cell in response to an external stimulus. A T cell is a type of lymphocyte whose defining characteristic is the expression of a T cell receptor complex.
0	3	3	positive regulation of T cell chemotaxis	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of T cell chemotaxis. T cell chemotaxis is the directed movement of a T cell in response to an external stimulus.
1	0	5	regulation of mitochondrion organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a mitochondrion.
1	0	1	positive regulation of mitochondrion organization	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a mitochondrion.
0	1	0	negative regulation of mitochondrion organization	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a mitochondrion.
5	3	4	regulation of centrosome duplication	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of centrosome duplication. Centrosome duplication is the replication of a centrosome, a structure comprised of a pair of centrioles and peri-centriolar material from which a microtubule spindle apparatus is organized.
0	0	1	positive regulation of centrosome duplication	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of centrosome duplication. Centrosome duplication is the replication of a centrosome, a structure comprised of a pair of centrioles and peri-centriolar material from which a microtubule spindle apparatus is organized.
0	0	1	negative regulation of centrosome duplication	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of centrosome duplication. Centrosome duplication is the replication of a centrosome, a structure comprised of a pair of centrioles and peri-centriolar material from which a microtubule spindle apparatus is organized.
2	1	1	regulation of glucose transmembrane transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of glucose transport across a membrane. Glucose transport is the directed movement of the hexose monosaccharide glucose into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	2	positive regulation of glucose transmembrane transport	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of glucose transport across a membrane. Glucose transport is the directed movement of the hexose monosaccharide glucose into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	0	1	negative regulation of glucose transmembrane transport	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of glucose transport across a membrane. Glucose transport is the directed movement of the hexose monosaccharide glucose into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	0	regulation of myotube differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of myotube differentiation. Myotube differentiation is the process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a myotube cell. Myotubes are multinucleated cells that are formed when proliferating myoblasts exit the cell cycle, differentiate and fuse.
2	3	1	positive regulation of myotube differentiation	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of myotube differentiation. Myotube differentiation is the process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a myotube cell. Myotubes are multinucleated cells that are formed when proliferating myoblasts exit the cell cycle, differentiate and fuse.
1	1	1	negative regulation of myotube differentiation	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of myotube differentiation. Myotube differentiation is the process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a myotube cell. Myotubes are multinucleated cells that are formed when proliferating myoblasts exit the cell cycle, differentiate and fuse.
1	0	1	telomere maintenance via telomere lengthening	Any process that contributes to the maintenance of proper telomeric length and structure by affecting and monitoring the activity of telomeric proteins and lengthening the telomeric DNA.
2	0	0	regulation of protein ADP-ribosylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein ADP-ribosylation. Protein ADP-ribosylation is the transfer, from NAD, of ADP-ribose to protein amino acids.
0	0	2	negative regulation of protein ADP-ribosylation	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of protein ADP-ribosylation. Protein ADP-ribosylation is the transfer, from NAD, of ADP-ribose to protein amino acids.
0	4	3	regulation of keratinocyte proliferation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of keratinocyte proliferation. Keratinocyte proliferation is the multiplication or reproduction of keratinocytes, resulting in the expansion of a cell population.
2	2	0	positive regulation of keratinocyte proliferation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of keratinocyte proliferation. Keratinocyte proliferation is the multiplication or reproduction of keratinocytes, resulting in the expansion of a cell population.
3	1	2	negative regulation of keratinocyte proliferation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of keratinocyte proliferation. Keratinocyte proliferation is the multiplication or reproduction of keratinocytes, resulting in the expansion of a cell population.
5	3	1	retina layer formation	The process in which the vertebrate retina is organized into three laminae: the outer nuclear layer (ONL), which contains photoreceptor nuclei; the inner nuclear layer (INL), which contains amacrine, bipolar and horizontal cells; and the retinal ganglion cell (RGC) layer. Between the inner and outer nuclear layers, the outer plexiform layer (OPL) contains connections between the photoreceptors and bipolar and horizontal cells. The inner plexiform layer (IPL) is positioned between the INL and the ganglion cell layer and contains the dendrites of RGCs and processes of bipolar and amacrine cells. Spanning all layers of the retina are the radially oriented Mueller glia.
0	1	0	positive regulation of reciprocal meiotic recombination	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of recombination during meiosis. Reciprocal meiotic recombination is the cell cycle process in which double strand breaks are formed and repaired through a double Holliday junction intermediate.
2	0	0	regulation of chromatin assembly	Any process the modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin assembly. Chromatin assembly is the assembly of DNA, histone proteins, and other associated proteins into chromatin structure, beginning with the formation of the basic unit, the nucleosome, followed by organization of the nucleosomes into higher order structures, ultimately giving rise to a complex organization of specific domains within the nucleus.
0	0	1	regulation of chromatin disassembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin disassembly. Chromatin disassembly is the controlled breakdown of chromatin from a higher order structure into its simpler subcomponents, DNA, histones, and other proteins.
1	0	0	regulation of proton-transporting ATPase activity, rotational mechanism	Any process that modulates the rate of ATP hydrolysis by an ATPase. Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + H+(in) = ADP + phosphate + H+(out), by a rotational mechanism.
0	2	4	adenylate cyclase activator activity	Increases the activity of the enzyme that catalyzes the reaction: ATP = 3',5'-cyclic AMP + diphosphate.
0	0	1	calcium-dependent protein kinase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a calcium-dependent protein kinase, an enzyme which phosphorylates a protein in a calcium-dependent manner.
0	1	0	calcium-dependent cysteine-type endopeptidase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a calcium-dependent cysteine-type endopeptidase, any enzyme that hydrolyzes peptide bonds in polypeptides by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile in a calcium-dependent manner.
3	2	2	positive regulation of pathway-restricted SMAD protein phosphorylation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of pathway-restricted SMAD protein phosphorylation. Pathway-restricted SMAD proteins and common-partner SMAD proteins are involved in the transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathways.
3	1	1	positive regulation of phospholipase C activity	Any process that increases the rate of phospholipase C activity.
0	0	1	regulation of triglyceride biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of triglyceride biosynthesis. Triglyceride biosynthesis is the collection of chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of triglyceride, any triester of glycerol.
2	1	0	positive regulation of triglyceride biosynthetic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of triglyceride biosynthesis. Triglyceride biosynthesis is the collection of chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of triglyceride, any triester of glycerol.
1	0	0	negative regulation of triglyceride biosynthetic process	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of triglyceride biosynthesis. Triglyceride biosynthesis is the collection of chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of triglyceride, any triester of glycerol.
1	1	0	regulation of cholesterol esterification	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cholesterol esterification. Cholesterol esterification is the lipid modification process in which a sterol ester is formed by the combination of a carboxylic acid (often a fatty acid) and cholesterol. In the blood this process is associated with the conversion of free cholesterol into cholesteryl ester, which is then sequestered into the core of a lipoprotein particle.
1	2	1	positive regulation of cholesterol esterification	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of cholesterol esterification. Cholesterol esterification is the lipid modification process in which a sterol ester is formed by the combination of a carboxylic acid (often a fatty acid) and cholesterol. In the blood this process is associated with the conversion of free cholesterol into cholesteryl ester, which is then sequestered into the core of a lipoprotein particle.
1	1	0	regulation of cholesterol efflux	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cholesterol efflux. Cholesterol efflux is the directed movement of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol, out of a cell or organelle.
3	4	1	positive regulation of cholesterol efflux	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of cholesterol efflux. Cholesterol efflux is the directed movement of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol, out of a cell or organelle.
0	0	1	lipid localization	Any process in which a lipid is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location.
1	0	0	lipid transport involved in lipid storage	The directed movement of lipids into cells that is part of their accumulation and maintenance.
1	0	0	cholesterol storage	The accumulation and maintenance in cells or tissues of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones.
1	3	6	regulation of release of sequestered calcium ion into cytosol by sarcoplasmic reticulum	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of release of sequestered calcium ion into cytosol by the sarcoplasmic reticulum, the process in which the release of sequestered calcium ion by sarcoplasmic reticulum into cytosol occurs via calcium release channels.
1	1	9	regulation of cardiac muscle contraction by regulation of the release of sequestered calcium ion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle contraction via the regulation of the release of sequestered calcium ion by sarcoplasmic reticulum into cytosol. The sarcoplasmic reticulum is the endoplasmic reticulum of striated muscle, specialised for the sequestration of calcium ions that are released upon receipt of a signal relayed by the T tubules from the neuromuscular junction.
1	0	5	regulation of cardiac muscle contraction by calcium ion signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle contraction by changing the calcium ion signals that trigger contraction.
0	1	0	regulation of lipid storage	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of lipid storage. Lipid storage is the accumulation and maintenance in cells or tissues of lipids, compounds soluble in organic solvents but insoluble or sparingly soluble in aqueous solvents. Lipid reserves can be accumulated during early developmental stages for mobilization and utilization at later stages of development.
0	3	2	positive regulation of lipid storage	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of lipid storage. Lipid storage is the accumulation and maintenance in cells or tissues of lipids, compounds soluble in organic solvents but insoluble or sparingly soluble in aqueous solvents. Lipid reserves can be accumulated during early developmental stages for mobilization and utilization at later stages of development.
1	2	0	positive regulation of cholesterol storage	Any process that increases the rate or extent of cholesterol storage. Cholesterol storage is the accumulation and maintenance in cells or tissues of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones.
1	1	0	negative regulation of cholesterol storage	Any process that decreases the rate or extent of cholesterol storage. Cholesterol storage is the accumulation and maintenance in cells or tissues of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones.
2	3	0	negative regulation of lipid storage	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of lipid storage. Lipid storage is the accumulation and maintenance in cells or tissues of lipids, compounds soluble in organic solvents but insoluble or sparingly soluble in aqueous solvents. Lipid reserves can be accumulated during early developmental stages for mobilization and utilization at later stages of development.
0	2	2	positive regulation of sequestering of triglyceride	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of sequestering of triglyceride. Triglyceride sequestration is the process of binding or confining any triester of glycerol such that it is separated from other components of a biological system.
1	1	1	negative regulation of sequestering of triglyceride	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of sequestering of triglyceride. Triglyceride sequestration is the process of binding or confining any triester of glycerol such that it is separated from other components of a biological system.
1	1	0	negative regulation of triglyceride catabolic process	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate, or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of triglyceride.
2	2	0	positive regulation of triglyceride catabolic process	Any process that increases the frequency, rate, or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of triglyceride.
1	0	0	regulation of phosphatidylcholine catabolic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of phosphatidylcholine catabolism. Phosphatidylcholine catabolic processes are the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phosphatidylcholines, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of choline.
1	1	1	negative regulation of very-low-density lipoprotein particle remodeling	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of very-low-density lipoprotein particle remodeling. Very-low-density lipoprotein particle remodeling is the acquisition, loss or modification of a protein or lipid within a very-low-density lipoprotein particle, including the hydrolysis of triglyceride by hepatic lipase or lipoprotein lipase and the subsequent loss of free fatty acid.
0	0	1	negative regulation of UDP-glucose catabolic process	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of UDP-glucose catabolism. UDP-glucose catabolic processes are the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of UDP-glucose, uridinediphosphoglucose, a substance composed of glucose in glycosidic linkage with uridine diphosphate.
1	4	2	regulation of glucose metabolic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of glucose metabolism. Glucose metabolic processes are the chemical reactions and pathways involving glucose, the aldohexose gluco-hexose.
0	2	3	positive regulation of glucose metabolic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of glucose metabolism. Glucose metabolic processes are the chemical reactions and pathways involving glucose, the aldohexose gluco-hexose.
1	0	1	positive regulation of heparan sulfate proteoglycan biosynthetic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of heparan sulfate proteoglycan biosynthesis. Heparan sulfate proteoglycan biosynthetic processes are the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of the heparan sulfate proteoglycan, a glycosaminoglycan with repeat unit consisting of alternating alpha-(1->4)-linked hexuronic acid and glucosamine residues.
1	1	0	negative regulation of very-low-density lipoprotein particle clearance	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of very-low-density lipoprotein particle clearance. Very-low-density lipoprotein particle clearance is the process in which a very-low-density lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
1	0	3	negative regulation of mitochondrial membrane potential	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of establishment or extent of a mitochondrial membrane potential, the electric potential existing across any mitochondrial membrane arising from charges in the membrane itself and from the charges present in the media on either side of the membrane.
1	2	3	positive regulation of mitochondrial membrane potential	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of establishment or extent of a mitochondrial membrane potential, the electric potential existing across any mitochondrial membrane arising from charges in the membrane itself and from the charges present in the media on either side of the membrane.
1	0	0	negative regulation of inositol phosphate biosynthetic process	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of inositol phosphate biosynthesis. Inositol phosphate biosynthetic processes are the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of an inositol phosphate, 1,2,3,4,5,6-cyclohexanehexol, with one or more phosphate groups attached.
0	0	1	regulation of phosphatase activity	Any process that modulates the rate or frequency of phosphatase activity. Phosphatases catalyze the hydrolysis of phosphoric monoesters, releasing inorganic phosphate.
0	1	0	positive regulation of phosphatase activity	Any process that increases the rate or frequency of phosphatase activity. Phosphatases catalyze the hydrolysis of phosphoric monoesters, releasing inorganic phosphate.
8	8	12	negative regulation of phosphatase activity	Any process that decreases the rate or frequency of phosphatase activity. Phosphatases catalyze the hydrolysis of phosphoric monoesters, releasing inorganic phosphate.
1	0	0	positive regulation of inositol-polyphosphate 5-phosphatase activity	Any process that increases the rate or frequency of inositol-polyphosphate 5-phosphatase activity, the catalysis of the reactions: D-myo-inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate + H2O = myo-inositol 1,4-bisphosphate + phosphate, and 1D-myo-inositol 1,3,4,5-tetrakisphosphate + H2O = 1D-myo-inositol 1,3,4-trisphosphate + phosphate.
1	0	0	regulation of necrotic cell death	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of necrotic cell death. Necrotic cell death is a cell death process that is morphologically characterized by a gain in cell volume (oncosis), swelling of organelles, plasma membrane rupture and subsequent loss of intracellular contents.
1	1	1	positive regulation of necrotic cell death	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of necrotic cell death. Necrotic cell death is a cell death process that is morphologically characterized by a gain in cell volume (oncosis), swelling of organelles, plasma membrane rupture and subsequent loss of intracellular contents.
3	0	2	regulation of cell death	Any process that modulates the rate or frequency of cell death. Cell death is the specific activation or halting of processes within a cell so that its vital functions markedly cease, rather than simply deteriorating gradually over time, which culminates in cell death.
5	7	4	positive regulation of cell death	Any process that increases the rate or frequency of cell death. Cell death is the specific activation or halting of processes within a cell so that its vital functions markedly cease, rather than simply deteriorating gradually over time, which culminates in cell death.
4	2	1	negative regulation of transcription by competitive promoter binding	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA-dependent transcription using a mechanism that involves direct competition for interaction with a promoter binding site.
1	3	0	positive regulation of endopeptidase activity	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of endopeptidase activity, the endohydrolysis of peptide bonds within proteins.
10	7	8	negative regulation of endopeptidase activity	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of endopeptidase activity, the endohydrolysis of peptide bonds within proteins.
2	0	0	positive regulation of peptidase activity	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of peptidase activity, the hydrolysis of peptide bonds within proteins.
3	1	0	positive regulation of protein processing	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of protein maturation by peptide bond cleavage.
2	0	1	negative regulation of protein processing	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of protein maturation by peptide bond cleavage.
0	0	1	negative regulation of calcidiol 1-monooxygenase activity	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of calcidiol 1-monooxygenase activity. Calcidiol 1-monooxygenase activity is the catalysis of the reaction: calcidiol + NADPH + H+ + O2 = calcitriol + NADP+ + H2O.
0	0	1	negative regulation of vitamin D biosynthetic process	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of a vitamin D biosynthetic process. Vitamin D biosynthesis is the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of vitamin D, any of a group of related, fat-soluble compounds that are derived from delta-5,7 steroids and play a central role in calcium metabolism. Specific forms of vitamin D include calciferol (ergocalciferol; vitamin D2) and cholecalciferol (calciol; vitamin D3).
1	0	2	magnesium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of magnesium ions within an organism or cell.
0	1	0	cellular magnesium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of magnesium ions at the level of a cell.
1	0	0	regulation of L-arginine import	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of L-arginine import. L-arginine import is the directed movement of L-arginine, the L-enantiomer of 2-amino-5-guanidinopentanoic acid, into a cell or organelle.
0	0	1	regulation of mitotic sister chromatid separation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic sister chromatid separation. Mitotic sister chromatid separation is the process in which sister chromatids are physically detached from each other during mitosis.
0	0	2	transport along microtubule	The movement of organelles or other particles from one location in the cell to another along microtubules, driven by motor activity.
2	5	7	positive regulation of G2/M transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any signalling pathway that activates or increases the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G2 phase to M phase of the mitotic cell cycle.
10	11	11	negative regulation of G2/M transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any signalling pathway that decreases or inhibits the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G2 phase to M phase of the mitotic cell cycle.
2	1	9	regulation of neuron projection development	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of neuron projection development. Neuron projection development is the process whose specific outcome is the progression of a neuron projection over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A neuron projection is any process extending from a neural cell, such as axons or dendrites (collectively called neurites).
17	18	19	positive regulation of neuron projection development	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of neuron projection development. Neuron projection development is the process whose specific outcome is the progression of a neuron projection over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A neuron projection is any process extending from a neural cell, such as axons or dendrites (collectively called neurites).
5	6	13	negative regulation of neuron projection development	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of neuron projection development. Neuron projection development is the process whose specific outcome is the progression of a neuron projection over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A neuron projection is any process extending from a neural cell, such as axons or dendrites (collectively called neurites).
1	0	0	negative regulation of high-density lipoprotein particle clearance	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of high-density lipoprotein particle clearance. High-density lipoprotein particle clearance is the process in which a high-density lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
1	0	1	regulation of low-density lipoprotein particle clearance	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of low-density lipoprotein particle clearance. Low-density lipoprotein particle clearance is the process in which a low-density lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
1	0	1	negative regulation of low-density lipoprotein particle clearance	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of low-density lipoprotein particle clearance. Low-density lipoprotein particle clearance is the process in which a low-density lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
0	1	0	regulation of SMAD protein complex assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of SMAD protein complex assembly. SMAD protein complex assembly is the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a protein complex that contains SMAD proteins.
1	0	0	negative regulation of SMAD protein complex assembly	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of SMAD protein complex assembly. SMAD protein complex assembly is the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a protein complex that contains SMAD proteins.
1	0	0	ubiquitin recycling	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of ubiquitin monomers and free ubiquitin chains at the level of the cell by recycling ubiquitin from proteasome-bound ubiquitinated intermediates.
0	0	3	response to auditory stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an auditory stimulus.
1	2	0	anaphase-promoting complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an anaphase-promoting complex. A ubiquitin ligase complex that degrades mitotic cyclins and anaphase inhibitory protein, thereby triggering sister chromatid separation and exit from mitosis.
0	1	0	regulation of translational initiation by eIF2 alpha phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of translation initiation in response to stress by the phosphorylation of eIF2 alpha.
1	0	1	programmed cell death	A process which begins when a cell receives an internal or external signal and activates a series of biochemical events (signaling pathway). The process ends with the death of the cell.
13	20	13	endomembrane system	A collection of membranous structures involved in transport within the cell. The main components of the endomembrane system are endoplasmic reticulum, Golgi bodies, vesicles, cell membrane and nuclear envelope. Members of the endomembrane system pass materials through each other or though the use of vesicles.
4	6	5	vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding any membrane-bounded vesicle in the cell.
6	9	7	ER to Golgi transport vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a vesicle transporting substances from the endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi.
1	4	2	astrocyte development	The process aimed at the progression of an astrocyte over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell. An astrocyte is the most abundant type of glial cell. Astrocytes provide support for neurons and regulate the environment in which they function.
2	5	3	oligodendrocyte development	The process aimed at the progression of an oligodendrocyte over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell. An oligodendrocyte is a type of glial cell involved in myelinating the axons in the central nervous system.
1	1	1	glial cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of glial cells by cell division, resulting in the expansion of their population. Glial cells exist throughout the nervous system, and include Schwann cells, astrocytes, and oligodendrocytes among others.
0	1	0	Schwann cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of Schwann cells, resulting in the expansion of their population. Schwann cells are a type of glial cell in the peripheral nervous system.
0	1	3	peripheral nervous system axon regeneration	The regrowth of axons outside the central nervous system (outside the brain and spinal cord) following an axonal injury.
0	1	1	regulation of gliogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gliogenesis, the formation of mature glia.
1	0	0	positive regulation of gliogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of gliogenesis, the formation of mature glia.
0	1	0	notochord formation	The formation of the notochord from the chordamesoderm. The notochord is composed of large cells packed within a firm connective tissue sheath and is found in all chordates at the ventral surface of the neural tube. In vertebrates, the notochord contributes to the vertebral column.
0	0	2	neural crest formation	The formation of the specialized region of ectoderm between the neural ectoderm (neural plate) and non-neural ectoderm. The neural crest gives rise to the neural crest cells that migrate away from this region as neural tube formation procedes.
1	0	0	mesenchymal cell development	The process aimed at the progression of a mesenchymal cell over time, from initial commitment of the cell to its specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
1	1	2	neural crest cell development	The process aimed at the progression of a neural crest cell over time, from initial commitment of the cell to its specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
0	1	0	neural crest cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a neural crest cell.
1	0	0	neural crest cell fate specification	The process in which a cell becomes capable of differentiating autonomously into a neural crest cell in an environment that is neutral with respect to the developmental pathway; upon specification, the cell fate can be reversed.
3	1	0	Schwann cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a Schwann cell. Schwann cells are found in the peripheral nervous system, where they insulate neurons and axons, and regulate the environment in which neurons function.
0	0	1	regulation of Schwann cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Schwann cell differentiation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of Schwann cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Schwann cell differentiation.
0	0	2	regulation of neuron maturation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neuron maturation, the process leading to the attainment of the full functional capacity of a neuron. This process is independent of morphogenetic change.
1	1	0	positive regulation of neuron maturation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neuron maturation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of neuron maturation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neuron maturation.
0	4	0	Schwann cell development	The process aimed at the progression of a Schwann cell over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell. Schwann cells are found in the peripheral nervous system, where they insulate neurons and axons, and regulate the environment in which neurons function.
0	1	0	establishment of endothelial blood-brain barrier	Establishment of the endothelial barrier between the blood and the brain. The endothelial cells in the brain capillaries are packed tightly together preventing the passage of most molecules from the blood into the brain. Only lipid soluble molecules or those that are actively transported can pass through the blood-brain barrier.
1	0	2	glutamate secretion	The controlled release of glutamate by a cell. The glutamate is the most abundant excitatory neurotransmitter in the nervous system.
1	0	0	positive regulation of glutamate secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the controlled release of glutamate.
0	0	1	gamma-aminobutyric acid secretion	The regulated release of gamma-aminobutyric acid by a cell or a tissue. The gamma-aminobutyric acid is the principal inhibitory neurotransmitter in the brain but is also found in several extraneural tissues.
0	0	1	regulation of gamma-aminobutyric acid secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of gamma-aminobutyric acid.
1	0	0	positive regulation of gamma-aminobutyric acid secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of gamma-aminobutyric acid.
2	0	6	regulation of dopamine secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of dopamine.
1	0	0	negative regulation of serotonin secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of serotonin.
5	5	6	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase signaling	A series of reactions within the signal-receiving cell, mediated by the intracellular phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K). Many cell surface receptor linked signaling pathways signal through PI3K to regulate numerous cellular functions.
3	3	3	regulation of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase cascade.
5	0	2	negative regulation of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase signaling	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase cascade.
17	15	5	positive regulation of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase cascade.
22	29	77	postsynaptic density	An electron dense network of proteins within and adjacent to the postsynaptic membrane of an asymmetric, neuron-neuron synapse. Its major components include neurotransmitter receptors and the proteins that spatially and functionally organize them such as anchoring and scaffolding molecules, signaling enzymes and cytoskeletal components.
7	9	5	response to organic cyclic compound	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an organic cyclic compound stimulus.
0	1	0	response to purine-containing compound	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a purine-containing compound stimulus.
3	1	2	response to amine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an amine stimulus. An amine is a compound formally derived from ammonia by replacing one, two or three hydrogen atoms by hydrocarbyl groups.
1	1	3	junctional sarcoplasmic reticulum membrane	The part of the sarcoplasmic reticulum membrane that contains calcium release channels, is devoted to calcium release and is juxtaposed to transverse tubule membrane. The junctional sarcoplasmic reticulum membrane consists of the junctional region of the terminal cisterna membrane.
1	5	19	intercalated disc	A complex cell-cell junction at which myofibrils terminate in cardiomyocytes; mediates mechanical and electrochemical integration between individual cardiomyocytes. The intercalated disc contains regions of tight mechanical attachment (fasciae adherentes and desmosomes) and electrical coupling (gap junctions) between adjacent cells.
0	0	1	striated muscle tissue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a striated muscle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Striated muscle contain fibers that are divided by transverse bands into striations, and cardiac and skeletal muscle are types of striated muscle. Skeletal muscle myoblasts fuse to form myotubes and eventually multinucleated muscle fibers. The fusion of cardiac cells is very rare and can only form binucleate cells.
0	1	1	regulation of the force of skeletal muscle contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the force of skeletal muscle contraction. The force of skeletal muscle contraction is produced by acto-myosin interaction processes through the formation of cross bridges.
0	0	6	spectrin-associated cytoskeleton	The part of the cytoskeleton composed of spectrin, protein 4.1 and ankyrin. Spectrin-associated cytoskeleton is associated with the plasma membrane.
0	2	0	skeletal muscle atrophy	A process, occurring in skeletal muscle, that is characterized by a decrease in protein content, fiber diameter, force production and fatigue resistance in response to different conditions such as starvation, aging and disuse.
0	0	2	regulation of skeletal muscle adaptation	Any process in which skeletal muscle adapts, with consequent modifications to structural and/or functional phenotypes, in response to a stimulus. Stimuli include contractile activity, loading conditions, substrate supply, and environmental factors. These adaptive events occur in both muscle fibers and associated structures (motoneurons and capillaries), and they involve alterations in regulatory mechanisms, contractile properties and metabolic capacities.
0	1	0	negative regulation of muscle atrophy	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of muscle atrophy.
0	1	0	positive regulation of muscle atrophy	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of muscle atrophy.
0	0	1	longitudinal sarcoplasmic reticulum	The portion of the free sarcoplasmic reticulum consisting of longitudinal tubules that connect terminal cisternae.
1	0	0	terminal cisterna	The portion of sarcoplasmic reticulum devoted to calcium ion storage and calcium ion release.
0	0	1	terminal cisterna lumen	The region between the inner and outer lipid bilayers of the terminal cisterna envelope. This space is enriched in calsequestrin.
1	0	0	smooth muscle adaptation	Any process in which smooth muscle adapts, with consequent modifications to structural and/or functional phenotypes, in response to a stimulus. Stimuli include contractile activity, loading conditions, substrate supply, and environmental factors. These adaptive events occur in both muscle fibers and associated structures (motoneurons and capillaries), and they involve alterations in regulatory mechanisms, contractile properties and metabolic capacities.
0	1	0	smooth muscle hyperplasia	A process, occurring in smooth muscle, in which there is an increase in cell number by cell division, often leading to an increase in the size of an organ.
1	0	1	release of sequestered calcium ion into cytosol by sarcoplasmic reticulum	The process in which the release of sequestered calcium ion by sarcoplasmic reticulum into cytosol occurs via calcium release channels.
0	0	1	regulation of skeletal muscle contraction by regulation of release of sequestered calcium ion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle contraction via the regulation of the release of sequestered calcium ion by sarcoplasmic reticulum into cytosol. The sarcoplasmic reticulum is the endoplasmic reticulum of striated muscle, specialised for the sequestration of calcium ions that are released upon receipt of a signal relayed by the T tubules from the neuromuscular junction.
0	1	0	positive regulation of skeletal muscle contraction by regulation of release of sequestered calcium ion	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle contraction via the regulation of the release of sequestered calcium ion by sarcoplasmic reticulum into cytosol. The sarcoplasmic reticulum is the endoplasmic reticulum of striated muscle, specialised for the sequestration of calcium ions that are released upon receipt of a signal relayed by the T tubules from the neuromuscular junction.
0	0	1	tonic smooth muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within tonic smooth muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. In the tonic smooth muscle, the muscle contraction occurs without an ordered sarcomeric structure. Tonic smooth muscle contraction occurs as a sustained continuous contraction.
4	10	4	response to activity	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an activity stimulus.
1	0	0	artery smooth muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within smooth muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. This process occurs in the artery. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. The artery is a vessel carrying blood away from the heart.
1	0	0	vein smooth muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within smooth muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. This process occurs in the vein. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. The vein is a vessel carrying blood away from the capillary beds.
0	0	2	vascular associated smooth muscle contraction	A process, occurring in the vascular tissue, whereby actin/myosin complex activity generates force through ATP hydrolysis resulting in a change in smooth muscle geometry. This process is always coupled to chemo-mechanical energy conversion.
0	0	1	urinary bladder smooth muscle contraction	A process in which force is generated within smooth muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. This process occurs in the urinary bladder. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. The urinary bladder is a musculomembranous sac along the urinary tract.
0	0	1	skeletal muscle satellite cell maintenance involved in skeletal muscle regeneration	Any process by which the number of skeletal muscle satellite cells in a skeletal muscle is maintained during muscle regeneration. There are at least three mechanisms by which this is achieved. Skeletal muscle satellite stem cell asymmetric division ensures satellite stem cell numbers are kept constant. Symmetric division of these cells amplifies the number of skeletal muscle satellite stem cells.  Some adult skeletal muscle myoblasts (descendants of activated satellite cells) can develop back into quiescent satellite cells, replenishing the overall pool of satellite cells.
0	0	1	myoblast differentiation involved in skeletal muscle regeneration	The process in which a relatively unspecialized satellite cell acquires specialized features of a myoblast. This occurs as part of skeletal muscle regeneration. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
0	0	1	myoblast migration involved in skeletal muscle regeneration	The process in which a myoblast migrates along an entire fiber to the site of injury. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
0	1	0	regulation of skeletal muscle satellite cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle satellite cell proliferation.
3	3	2	response to muscle activity	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a muscle activity stimulus.
1	0	0	response to inactivity	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an inactivity stimulus.
0	0	1	response to muscle inactivity	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a muscle inactivity stimulus.
0	1	0	response to muscle activity involved in regulation of muscle adaptation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a muscle activity stimulus. This process occurs as part of the regulation of muscle adaptation.
0	1	0	response to electrical stimulus involved in regulation of muscle adaptation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an electrical stimulus. This process occurs as part of the regulation of muscle adaptation.
0	1	2	transition between fast and slow fiber	The process of conversion of fast-contracting muscle fibers to a slower character. This may involve slowing of contractile rate, slow myosin gene induction, increase in oxidative metabolic properties, altered electrophysiology and altered innervation. This process also regulates skeletal muscle adapatation.
1	0	0	transition between slow and fast fiber	The process of conversion of slow-contracting muscle fibers to a faster character. This may involve increasing of contractile rate, fast myosin gene induction, increase in glycolytic metabolic properties, altered electrophysiology and altered innervation. This process also regulates skeletal muscle adapatation.
0	0	1	muscle atrophy	A process, occurring in the muscle, that is characterized by a decrease in protein content, fiber diameter, force production and fatigue resistance in response to different conditions such as starvation, aging and disuse.
0	0	1	striated muscle atrophy	A process, occurring in striated muscle, that is characterized by a decrease in protein content, fiber diameter, force production and fatigue resistance in response to different conditions such as starvation, aging and disuse.
2	2	2	response to denervation involved in regulation of muscle adaptation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a denervation stimulus. This process occurs as part of the regulation of muscle adaptation.
1	0	0	smooth muscle hypertrophy	The enlargement or overgrowth of all or part of an organ due to an increase in size of its smooth muscle cells without cell division. Physiological hypertrophy is a normal process during development, and can also occur in mature structures on demand. In the uterus, smooth muscle cells undergo hypertrophy during pregnancy.
0	1	5	cardiac muscle hypertrophy in response to stress	The physiological enlargement or overgrowth of all or part of the heart muscle due to an increase in size (not length) of individual cardiac muscle fibers, without cell division, as a result of a disturbance in organismal or cellular homeostasis.
2	1	1	myotube differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a myotube cell. Myotube differentiation starts with myoblast fusion and the appearance of specific cell markers (this is the cell development step). Then individual myotubes can fuse to form bigger myotubes and start to contract. Myotubes are multinucleated cells that are formed when proliferating myoblasts exit the cell cycle, differentiate and fuse.
0	0	1	myotube cell development	The process aimed at the progression of a myotube cell over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell. Myotubes are multinucleated cells that are formed when proliferating myoblasts exit the cell cycle, differentiate and fuse.
0	1	0	myoblast fusion involved in skeletal muscle regeneration	A process in which non-proliferating myoblasts, after migrating to the site of injury, fuse into existing damaged fibers or fuse to myotubes to form new fibers, as part of the process of skeletal muscle regeneration. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
0	1	0	myotube differentiation involved in skeletal muscle regeneration	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a myotube cell. Myotube differentiation starts with myoblast fusion and the appearance of specific cell markers (this is the cell development step). Then individual myotubes can fuse to form bigger myotubes and start to contract. This process occurs as part of the process of skeletal muscle regeneration. Myotubes are multinucleated cells that are formed when proliferating myoblasts exit the cell cycle, differentiate and fuse.
2	1	0	smooth muscle cell migration	The orderly movement of a smooth muscle cell from one site to another, often during the development of a multicellular organism.
1	0	0	regulation of smooth muscle cell migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle cell migration.
3	3	5	positive regulation of smooth muscle cell migration	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle cell migration.
3	1	1	negative regulation of smooth muscle cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle cell migration.
0	1	0	regulation of lung blood pressure	The process that modulates the force with which blood travels through the lungs. The process is controlled by a balance of processes that increase pressure and decrease pressure.
1	0	1	heparan sulfate proteoglycan biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of the heparan sulfate proteoglycan, a glycosaminoglycan with repeat unit consisting of alternating alpha-(1->4)-linked hexuronic acid and glucosamine residues; the former are a mixture of sulfated and nonsulfated D-glucuronic acid and L-iduronic acid; the L-iduronic acid is either sulfated or acetylated on its amino group as well as being sulfated on one of its hydroxyl groups; heparan sulfate chains are covalently linked to peptidyl-serine by a glycosidic attachment through the trisaccharide galactosyl-galactosyl-xylosyl to serine residues.
9	6	1	coreceptor activity	Combining with an extracellular or intracellular messenger, and in cooperation with a nearby primary receptor, initiating a change in cell activity.
7	12	11	Cajal body	A class of nuclear body, first seen after silver staining by Ramon y Cajal in 1903, enriched in small nuclear ribonucleoproteins, and certain general RNA polymerase II transcription factors; ultrastructurally, they appear as a tangle of coiled, electron-dense threads roughly 0.5 micrometers in diameter; involved in aspects of snRNP biogenesis; the protein coilin serves as a marker for Cajal bodies. Some argue that Cajal bodies are the sites for preassembly of transcriptosomes, unitary particles involved in transcription and processing of RNA.
46	67	45	protein transport	The directed movement of proteins into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	2	0	protein disulfide oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a protein with reduced sulfide groups = a protein with oxidized disulfide bonds.
1	3	1	disulfide oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: substrate with reduced sulfide groups = substrate with oxidized disulfide bonds.
0	3	1	peptide disulfide oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a peptide with reduced sulfide groups = a peptide with oxidized disulfide bonds.
1	0	0	glutathione disulfide oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 glutathione + electron acceptor = glutathione disulfide + electron donor.
0	1	0	NADPH-adrenodoxin reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: oxidized adrenodoxin + NADPH + H+ = reduced adrenodoxin + NADP+.
1	0	0	thrombin-activated receptor activity	A G protein-coupled receptor activity that is activated by cleavage by thrombin, which exposes a tethered ligand corresponding to the new N-terminus, which binds to the receptor and activates it.
0	0	1	amidinotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reversible transfer of an amidino group to an acceptor.
0	0	1	glycine amidinotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-arginine + glycine = L-ornithine + guanidinoacetate.
3	0	0	DNA integration	The process in which a segment of DNA is incorporated into another, usually larger, DNA molecule such as a chromosome.
1	3	2	ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of an ion from one side of a membrane to the other.
4	0	2	proton transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a proton from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	1	1	potassium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of potassium ions (K+) from one side of a membrane to the other.
2	0	1	sodium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of sodium ions (Na+) from one side of a membrane to the other.
2	0	3	calcium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of calcium (Ca) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	cadmium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of cadmium (Cd) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	ferrous iron transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of ferrous iron (Fe(II) or Fe2+) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	magnesium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of magnesium (Mg) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	0	1	organic cation transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of organic cations from one side of a membrane to the other. Organic cations are atoms or small molecules with a positive charge that contain carbon in covalent linkage.
3	1	2	bicarbonate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of bicarbonate from one side of a membrane to the other. Bicarbonate is the hydrogencarbonate ion, HCO3-.
3	2	2	chloride transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of chloride ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	phosphate ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of phosphate (PO4 3-) ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
3	1	0	sulfate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of sulfate ions, SO4(2-), from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	thiosulfate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of thiosulfate ions, S2O3(2-), from one side of a membrane to the other.
2	1	0	bile acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of bile acid from one side of a membrane to the other. Bile acids are any of a group of steroid carboxylic acids occurring in bile, where they are present as the sodium salts of their amides with glycine or taurine.
1	0	0	bilirubin transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of bilirubin from one side of a membrane to the other. Bilirubin is a linear tetrapyrrole produced in the reticuloendothelial system from biliverdin and transported to the liver as a complex with serum albumin. In the liver, bilirubin is converted to bilirubin bisglucuronide, which is excreted in the bile.
2	0	1	lactate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of lactate from one side of a membrane to the other. Lactate is 2-hydroxypropanoate, CH3-CHOH-COOH; L(+)-lactate is formed by anaerobic glycolysis in animal tissues, and DL-lactate is found in sour milk, molasses and certain fruit juices.
0	0	1	mevalonate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of mevalonate from one side of a membrane to the other. Mevalonate is the anion of mevalonic acid; its (R)-enantiomer is a strategic intermediate derived from hydroxymethylglutaryl-CoA in the biosynthesis of polyprenyl compounds.
1	0	0	oxaloacetate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of oxaloacetate, the anion of oxobutanedioic acid, from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	prostaglandin transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of prostaglandins from one side of a membrane to the other. A prostaglandin is any of a group of biologically active metabolites which contain a cyclopentane ring due to the formation of a bond between two carbons of a fatty acid. They have a wide range of biological activities.
1	0	0	citrate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of citrate, 2-hydroxy-1,2,3-propanetricarboyxlate, from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	malate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of malate from one side of a membrane to the other. Malate is a chiral hydroxydicarboxylic acid, hydroxybutanedioic acid. The (+) enantiomer is an important intermediate in metabolism as a component of both the TCA cycle and the glyoxylate cycle.
1	0	0	succinate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of succinate, the dianion of ethane dicarboxylic acid, from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	urate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of urate from one side of a membrane to the other. Urate is the anion of uric acid, 2,6,8-trioxypurine, the end product of purine metabolism in certain mammals and the main excretory product in uricotelic animals.
0	1	0	glucuronoside transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a glucuronosides from one side of a membrane to the other. Glucuronosides are any compound formed by combination of glycosidic linkage of a hydroxy compound (e.g. an alcohol or a saccharide) with the anomeric carbon atom of glucuronate.
2	0	0	glycerol transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of glycerol from one side of a membrane to the other. Glycerol is 1,2,3-propanetriol, a sweet, hygroscopic, viscous liquid, widely distributed in nature as a constituent of many lipids.
1	1	4	amino acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of amino acids from one side of a membrane to the other. Amino acids are organic molecules that contain an amino group and a carboxyl group.
0	2	0	aromatic amino acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of aromatic amino acids from one side of a membrane to the other. Aromatic amino acids have an aromatic ring.
0	0	1	basic amino acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of basic amino acids from one side of a membrane to the other. Basic amino acids have side chains with a positive charge at pH 7.3.
2	3	2	neutral amino acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of neutral amino acids from one side of a membrane to the other. Neutral amino acids have side chains with no charge at pH 7.3.
3	2	3	L-amino acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of an L-amino acid from one side of a membrane to the other. L-amino acids are the L-enantiomers of amino acids.
1	2	1	L-alanine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-alanine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-alanine is the L-enantiomer of 2-aminopropanoic acid.
0	0	1	arginine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the stereospecific transfer of arginine, 2-amino-5-guanidinopentanoic acid, across a biological membrane.
1	0	0	L-asparagine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-asparagine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-asparagine is the L-enantiomer of alpha-aminosuccinamic acid.
3	1	0	L-aspartate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-aspartate from one side of a membrane to the other. L-aspartate is the anion derived from aspartic acid.
0	1	0	L-cystine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-cystine from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	0	1	gamma-aminobutyric acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of gamma-aminobutyric acid from one side of a membrane to the other. Gamma-aminobutyric acid is 4-aminobutyrate (GABA).
2	1	1	L-glutamine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-glutamine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-glutamine is 2-amino-4-carbamoylbutanoic acid.
0	0	2	glycine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of glycine from one side of a membrane to the other. Glycine is aminoethanoic acid.
0	0	1	L-lysine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-lysine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-lysine is 2,6-diaminohexanoic acid.
1	2	1	L-leucine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-leucine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-leucine is 2-amino-4-methylpentanoic acid.
1	0	0	L-methionine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-methionine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-methionine is 2-amino-4-(methylthio)butanoic acid.
0	1	0	L-proline transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-proline from one side of a membrane to the other. L-proline is pyrrolidine-2-carboxylic acid.
2	1	0	L-serine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-serine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-serine is the L-enantiomer of 2-amino-3-hydroxypropanoic acid.
0	1	0	L-threonine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-threonine from one side of a membrane to the other. L-threonine is (2R*,3S*)-2-amino-3-hydroxybutanoic acid.
0	1	0	L-tryptophan transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-tryptophan from one side of a membrane to the other. Tryptophan is 2-amino-3-(1H-indol-3-yl)propanoic acid.
0	0	2	adenine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of adenine, 6-aminopurine, from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	uridine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of uridine, uracil riboside, from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	1	0	purine nucleotide transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a purine nucleotide, any compound consisting of a purine nucleoside esterified with (ortho)phosphate, from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	choline transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of choline from one side of a membrane to the other. Choline (2-hydroxyethyltrimethylammonium) is an amino alcohol that occurs widely in living organisms as a constituent of certain types of phospholipids and in the neurotransmitter acetylcholine.
1	0	0	biotin transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of biotin from one side of a membrane to the other. Biotin is cis-tetrahydro-2-oxothieno(3,4-d)imidazoline-4-valeric acid; the (+) enantiomer is very widely distributed in cells and serves as a carrier in a number of enzymatic beta-carboxylation reactions.
1	0	2	heme transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of heme from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	fatty acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of fatty acids from one side of a membrane to the other. Fatty acids are aliphatic monocarboxylic acids liberated from naturally occurring fats and oils by hydrolysis.
0	0	1	aminophospholipid flippase activity	Enables the transfer of aminophospholipids from the exoplasmic to the cytosolic leaftlet of a membrane, using energy from the hydrolysis of ATP. Aminophospholipids contain phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester and an amino (NH2) group.
1	4	5	sterol transporter activity	Enables the directed movement of sterols into, out of or within a cell, or between cells. Sterol are steroids with one or more hydroxyl groups and a hydrocarbon side-chain in the molecule.
2	0	1	water channel activity	Transport systems of this type enable facilitated diffusion of water (by an energy-independent process) by passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism.
1	0	0	proton channel activity	Enables the facilitated diffusion of a hydrogen ion (by an energy-independent process) involving passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism.
2	0	0	channel activity	Enables the energy-independent facilitated diffusion, mediated by passage of a solute through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel. Stereospecificity is not exhibited but this transport may be specific for a particular molecular species or class of molecules.
0	0	1	calcium-activated potassium channel activity	Enables the calcium concentration-regulatable energy-independent passage of potassium ions across a lipid bilayer down a concentration gradient.
1	1	0	outward rectifier potassium channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a potassium ion by an outwardly-rectifying voltage-gated channel. An outwardly rectifying current-voltage relation is one where at any given driving force the outward flow of K+ ions exceeds the inward flow for the opposite driving force.
1	2	1	ligand-gated ion channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of an ion by a channel that opens when a specific ligand has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
4	0	2	calcium-release channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion from intracellular stores by a channel that opens when a specific intracellular ligand has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
1	1	0	store-operated calcium channel activity	A ligand-gated ion channel activity which transports calcium in response to emptying of intracellular calcium stores.
3	1	0	ligand-gated sodium channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a sodium ion by a channel that opens when a specific ligand has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
0	1	2	porin activity	Enables the transfer of substances, sized less than 1000 Da, from one side of a membrane to the other. The transmembrane portions of porins consist exclusively of beta-strands which form a beta-barrel. They are found in the outer membranes of Gram-negative bacteria, mitochondria, plastids and possibly acid-fast Gram-positive bacteria.
5	2	4	symporter activity	Enables the active transport of a solute across a membrane by a mechanism whereby two or more species are transported together in the same direction in a tightly coupled process not directly linked to a form of energy other than chemiosmotic energy.
1	0	0	anion:cation symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: anion(out) + cation(out) = anion(in) + cation(in).
1	1	1	antiporter activity	Enables the active transport of a solute across a membrane by a mechanism whereby two or more species are transported in opposite directions in a tightly coupled process not directly linked to a form of energy other than chemiosmotic energy. The reaction is: solute A(out) + solute B(in) = solute A(in) + solute B(out).
0	0	1	solute:proton antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: solute(out) + H+(in) = solute(in) + H+(out).
4	1	4	anion:anion antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: anion A(out) + anion B(in) = anion A(in) + anion B(out).
1	0	0	phosphate:proton symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: phosphate(out) + H+(out) = phosphate(in) + H+(in).
1	0	0	sodium:inorganic phosphate symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Na+(out) + inorganic phosphate(out) = Na+(in) + inorganic phosphate(in).
1	0	0	cystine:glutamate antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: cystine(out) + glutamate(in) = cystine(in) + glutamate(out).
0	1	0	peptide:proton symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: peptide(out) + H+(out) = peptide(in) + H+(in), up its concentration gradient. The transporter binds the solute and undergoes a series of conformational changes. Transport works equally well in either direction and is driven by hydrogen ion movement.
0	2	0	sodium-independent organic anion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of organic anions from one side of a membrane to the other, in a sodium independent manner.
0	2	1	thyroid hormone transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of thyroid hormones from one side of a membrane to the other. Thyroid hormone are any of the compounds secreted by the thyroid gland, largely thyroxine and triiodothyronine.
1	0	0	oxoglutarate:malate antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: oxoglutarate(out) + malate(in) = oxoglutarate(in) + malate(out).
0	0	1	calcium:proton antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Ca2+(in) + H+(out) = Ca2+(out) + H+(in).
0	0	1	cation:chloride symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: cation(out) + Cl-(out) = cation(in) + Cl-(in).
1	0	0	sodium:chloride symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Na+(out) + Cl-(out) = Na+(in) + Cl-(in).
1	2	3	potassium:chloride symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: K+(out) + Cl-(out) = K+(in) + Cl-(in).
3	0	1	sodium:proton antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: Na+(out) + H+(in) = Na+(in) + H+(out).
3	0	1	potassium:proton antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: K+(in) + H+(out) = K+(out) + H+(in).
0	1	0	pyrimidine- and adenine-specific:sodium symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: (pyrimidine nucleoside or adenine)(out) + Na+(out) = (pyrimidine nucleoside or adenine)(in) + Na+(in).
0	1	0	purine-specific nucleoside:sodium symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: purine(out) + Na+(out) = nucleoside(in) + Na+(in).
3	3	0	ATPase-coupled glutathione S-conjugate transmembrane transporter activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O + glutathione S-conjugate(in) -> ADP + phosphate + glutathione S-conjugate(out).
1	2	0	ATPase-coupled bile acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: bile acid(in) + ATP + H2O -> bile acid(out) + ADP + phosphate.
1	0	0	ATPase-coupled peptide antigen transmembrane transporter activity	Catalysis of the reaction: peptide antigen(in) + ATP = peptide antigen(out) + ADP + phosphate.
1	0	0	ATPase-coupled heme transmembrane transporter activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O + heme(in) = ADP + phosphate + heme(out).
1	0	0	ATPase-coupled peptide transmembrane transporter activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O + peptide(in) = ADP + phosphate + peptide(out). Peptides exported include alpha-hemolysin, cyclolysin, colicin V and siderophores from Gram-negative bacteria, and bacteriocin, subtilin, competence factor and pediocin from Gram-positive bacteria.
0	1	0	P-P-bond-hydrolysis-driven protein transmembrane transporter activity	Primary active carrier-mediated transport of a protein across a membrane, driven by the hydrolysis of the diphosphate bond of inorganic pyrophosphate, ATP, or another nucleoside triphosphate. The transport protein may or may not be transiently phosphorylated, but the substrate is not phosphorylated.
2	1	5	potassium channel regulator activity	Modulates potassium channel activity via direct interaction interaction with a potassium channel (binding or modification).
10	7	9	cholesterol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cholesterol (cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol); the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones.
0	0	1	cation:cation antiporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: cation A(out) + cation B(in) = cation A(in) + cation B(out).
0	0	1	gamma-aminobutyric acid:proton symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: gamma-aminobutyric acid(out) + H+(out) = gamma-aminobutyric acid(in) + H+(in).
0	1	0	formate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of formate from one side of a membrane to the other. Formate is also known as methanoate, the anion HCOO- derived from methanoic (formic) acid.
1	0	1	glutamate:sodium symporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: glutamate(out) + Na+(out) = glutamate(in) + Na+(in).
2	4	1	efflux transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a specific substance or related group of substances from the inside of the cell to the outside of the cell across a membrane.
0	1	1	DNA translocase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, to drive movement along a single- or double-stranded DNA molecule.
33	44	73	actin cytoskeleton	The part of the cytoskeleton (the internal framework of a cell) composed of actin and associated proteins. Includes actin cytoskeleton-associated complexes.
15	21	42	microtubule cytoskeleton	The part of the cytoskeleton (the internal framework of a cell) composed of microtubules and associated proteins.
6	4	20	tubulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with monomeric or multimeric forms of tubulin, including microtubules.
1	0	1	toxic substance binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a toxic substance, a poisonous substance that causes damage to biological systems.
1	3	0	fatty acid ligase activity	Catalysis of the ligation of a fatty acid to an acceptor, coupled to the hydrolysis of ATP.
0	1	0	formate efflux transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of formate from the inside of the cell to the outside of the cell across a membrane.
2	0	0	carbon dioxide transport	The directed movement of carbon dioxide (CO2) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	3	oxygen transport	The directed movement of oxygen (O2) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	copper ion import	The directed movement of copper ions into a cell or organelle.
1	0	0	magnesium ion transport	The directed movement of magnesium (Mg) ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	mercury ion transport	The directed movement of mercury (Hg) ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	1	ammonium transport	The directed movement of ammonium into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Ammonium is the cation NH4+ which is formed from N2 by root-nodule bacteria in leguminous plants and is an excretory product in ammonotelic animals.
7	3	7	bicarbonate transport	The directed movement of bicarbonate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	thiosulfate transport	The directed movement of thiosulfate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	0	organic anion transport	The directed movement of organic anions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Organic anions are atoms or small molecules with a negative charge which contain carbon in covalent linkage.
2	0	1	monocarboxylic acid transport	The directed movement of monocarboxylic acids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
5	6	0	bile acid and bile salt transport	The directed movement of bile acid and bile salts into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	0	canalicular bile acid transport	Enables the transfer of bile acid from one side of a hepatocyte plasma membrane into a bile canaliculus. Bile canaliculi are the thin tubes formed by hepatocyte membranes. Bile acids are any of a group of steroid carboxylic acids occurring in bile, where they are present as the sodium salts of their amides with glycine or taurine.
1	0	0	bilirubin transport	The directed movement of bilirubin into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	formate transport	The directed movement of formate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	mevalonate transport	The directed movement of mevalonate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	oxaloacetate transport	The directed movement of oxaloacetate, the anion of oxobutanedioic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	0	prostaglandin transport	The directed movement of prostaglandins into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	taurine transport	The directed movement of taurine into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	urate transport	The directed movement of urate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	sucrose transport	The directed movement of sucrose into, out of or within a cell, or between cells by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Sucrose is the disaccharide fructofuranosyl-glucopyranoside.
0	0	1	polysaccharide transport	The directed movement of polysaccharides into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. A polysaccharide is a polymer of many (typically more than 10) monosaccharide residues linked glycosidically.
0	0	1	UDP-glucose transmembrane transport	The process in which UDP-glucose is transported across a membrane.
2	0	0	glycerol transport	The directed movement of glycerol into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Glycerol is 1,2,3-propanetriol, a sweet, hygroscopic, viscous liquid, widely distributed in nature as a constituent of many lipids.
0	1	0	mannitol transport	The directed movement of mannitol into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Mannitol is the alditol derived from D-mannose by reduction of the aldehyde group.
0	0	1	myo-inositol transport	The directed movement of myo-inositol into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Myo-inositol is 1,2,3,4,5/4,6-cyclohexanehexol, a growth factor for animals and microorganisms.
2	3	3	neutral amino acid transport	The directed movement of neutral amino acids, amino acids with no net charge, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	L-amino acid transport	The directed movement of L-enantiomer amino acids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	L-alanine transport	The directed movement of L-alanine, the L-enantiomer of 2-aminopropanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	arginine transport	The directed movement of arginine, 2-amino-5-guanidinopentanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	aspartate transmembrane transport	The process in which aspartate is transported across a lipid bilayer, from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	L-cystine transport	The directed movement of L-cystine (also known as dicysteine) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	1	L-glutamate transmembrane transport	The directed movement of L-glutamate across a membrane.
0	0	2	glycine transport	The directed movement of glycine, aminoethanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	2	leucine transport	The directed movement of leucine, 2-amino-4-methylpentanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	2	0	phenylalanine transport	The directed movement of phenylalanine, 2-amino-3-phenylpropanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	2	1	proline transport	The directed movement of proline, pyrrolidine-2-carboxylic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	L-serine transport	The directed movement of L-serine, the L-enantiomer of 2-amino-3-hydroxypropanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	threonine transport	The directed movement of threonine, (2R*,3S*)-2-amino-3-hydroxybutanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	1	tryptophan transport	The directed movement of tryptophan, 2-amino-3-(1H-indol-3-yl)propanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	valine transport	The directed movement of valine, 2-amino-3-methylbutanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	peptide transport	The directed movement of peptides, compounds of two or more amino acids where the alpha carboxyl group of one is bound to the alpha amino group of another, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	peptidoglycan transport	The directed movement of peptidoglycans, a class of glycoconjugates found in bacterial cell walls, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	aminergic neurotransmitter loading into synaptic vesicle	The active transport of aminergic neurotransmitters into a synaptic vesicle.  This import is fuelled by an electrochemical gradient across the vesicle membrane, established by the action proton pumps.
0	1	0	adenine transport	The directed movement of adenine, 6-aminopurine, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	purine nucleoside transmembrane transport	The process in which a purine nucleoside is transported across a membrane. A purine nucleoside is a purine base covalently bonded to a ribose or deoxyribose sugar.
0	1	0	uridine transport	The directed movement of uridine, uracil riboside, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	pyrimidine nucleoside transport	The directed movement of a pyrimidine nucleoside, a pyrimidine base covalently bonded to a ribose or deoxyribose sugar, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	purine nucleotide transport	The directed movement of a purine nucleotide, any compound consisting of a purine nucleoside esterified with (ortho)phosphate, into, out of or within a cell.
0	0	1	ADP transport	The directed movement of ADP, adenosine diphosphate, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	0	1	ATP transport	The directed movement of ATP, adenosine triphosphate, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	0	choline transport	The directed movement of choline into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Choline (2-hydroxyethyltrimethylammonium) is an amino alcohol that occurs widely in living organisms as a constituent of certain types of phospholipids and in the neurotransmitter acetylcholine.
1	0	0	biotin transport	The directed movement of biotin into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Biotin is cis-tetrahydro-2-oxothieno(3,4-d)imidazoline-4-valeric acid; the (+) enantiomer is very widely distributed in cells and serves as a carrier in a number of enzymatic beta-carboxylation reactions.
1	0	0	carnitine transport	The directed movement of carnitine into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Carnitine is a compound that participates in the transfer of acyl groups across the inner mitochondrial membrane.
2	0	1	heme transport	The directed movement of heme, any compound of iron complexed in a porphyrin (tetrapyrrole) ring, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	cobalamin transport	The directed movement of cobalamin (vitamin B12), a water-soluble vitamin characterized by possession of a corrin nucleus containing a cobalt atom, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	1	fatty acid transport	The directed movement of fatty acids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Fatty acids are aliphatic monocarboxylic acids liberated from naturally occurring fats and oils by hydrolysis.
6	1	0	long-chain fatty acid transport	The directed movement of long-chain fatty acids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. A long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
1	1	0	long-chain fatty acid import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of long-chain fatty acids from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol. A long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
5	1	2	phospholipid transport	The directed movement of phospholipids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Phospholipids are any lipids containing phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester.
0	1	1	aminophospholipid transport	The directed movement of aminophospholipids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Aminophospholipids contain phosphoric acid as a mono- or diester and an amino (NH2) group.
0	0	1	sterol transport	The directed movement of sterols into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Sterols are steroids with one or more hydroxyl groups and a hydrocarbon side-chain in the molecule.
0	0	1	large ribosomal subunit	The larger of the two subunits of a ribosome. Two sites on the ribosomal large subunit are involved in translation, namely the aminoacyl site (A site) and peptidyl site (P site).
4	5	3	small ribosomal subunit	The smaller of the two subunits of a ribosome.
0	2	1	coenzyme A metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving coenzyme A, 3'-phosphoadenosine-(5')diphospho(4')pantatheine, an acyl carrier in many acylation and acyl-transfer reactions in which the intermediate is a thiol ester.
0	2	1	coenzyme A biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of coenzyme A, 3'-phosphoadenosine-(5')diphospho(4')pantatheine, an acyl carrier in many acylation and acyl-transfer reactions in which the intermediate is a thiol ester.
0	0	1	pantothenate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving pantothenate, the anion of pantothenic acid, the amide of beta-alanine and pantoic acid. It is a B complex vitamin that is a constituent of coenzyme A and is distributed ubiquitously in foods.
0	1	0	formate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving formate, also known as methanoate, the anion HCOO- derived from methanoic (formic) acid.
3	4	2	nucleobase-containing small molecule interconversion	The chemical reactions and pathways by which a nucleobase, nucleoside or nucleotide small molecule is synthesized from another nucleobase, nucleoside or nucleotide small molecule.
1	1	1	diadenosine tetraphosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of diadenosine tetraphosphate, a derivative of the nucleoside adenosine with four phosphate groups attached.
1	0	1	energy derivation by oxidation of organic compounds	The chemical reactions and pathways by which a cell derives energy from organic compounds; results in the oxidation of the compounds from which energy is released.
3	0	2	ATP synthesis coupled proton transport	The transport of protons across a membrane to generate an electrochemical gradient (proton-motive force) that powers ATP synthesis.
1	0	0	electron transport coupled proton transport	The transport of protons against an electrochemical gradient, using energy from electron transport.
0	4	1	phospholipase activator activity	Increases the activity of a phospholipase, an enzyme that catalyzes of the hydrolysis of a glycerophospholipid.
2	0	0	phospholipase A2 activator activity	Increases the activity of the enzyme phospholipase A2.
1	1	6	dystrophin-associated glycoprotein complex	A multiprotein complex that forms a strong mechanical link between the cytoskeleton and extracellular matrix; typical of, but not confined to, muscle cells. The complex is composed of transmembrane, cytoplasmic, and extracellular proteins, including dystrophin, sarcoglycans, dystroglycan, dystrobrevins, syntrophins, sarcospan, caveolin-3, and NO synthase.
1	0	0	dystroglycan complex	A protein complex that includes alpha- and beta-dystroglycan, which are alternative products of the same gene; the laminin-binding component of the dystrophin-associated glycoprotein complex, providing a link between the subsarcolemmal cytoskeleton (in muscle cells) and the extracellular matrix. Alpha-dystroglycan is an extracellular protein binding to alpha-laminin and to beta-dystroglycan; beta-dystroglycan is a transmembrane protein which binds alpha-dystroglycan and dystrophin.
0	0	1	syntrophin complex	A protein complex that includes alpha-, beta1-, beta2-syntrophins and syntrophin-like proteins; the syntrophin complex binds to the second half of the carboxy-terminal domain of dystrophin; also associates with neuronal nitric oxide synthase.
0	1	0	morphogen activity	Acts as a trigger for a pattern specification process when present at a specific concentration within a gradient.
4	1	3	cyclosporin A binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cyclosporin A, a cyclic undecapeptide that contains several N-methylated and unusual amino acids.
1	2	0	peptidoglycan immune receptor activity	Combining with a peptidoglycan and transmitting the signal to initiate an innate immune response.
273	380	406	membrane	A lipid bilayer along with all the proteins and protein complexes embedded in it an attached to it.
254	174	133	integral component of membrane	The component of a membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
2	1	1	CDP-diacylglycerol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of CDP-diacylglycerol, CDP-1,2-diacylglycerol, a substance composed of diacylglycerol in glycosidic linkage with cytidine diphosphate.
1	0	0	rhabdomere	The specialized microvilli-containing organelle on the apical surfaces of a photoreceptor cell containing the visual pigment rhodopsin and most of the proteins involved in phototransduction.
0	1	0	tRNA import into mitochondrion	The process in which a tRNA is transported from the cytosol, into the mitochondrial matrix.
56	92	125	viral process	A multi-organism process in which a virus is a participant. The other participant is the host. Includes infection of a host cell, replication of the viral genome, and assembly of progeny virus particles. In some cases the viral genetic material may integrate into the host genome and only subsequently, under particular circumstances, 'complete' its life cycle.
0	1	0	zeta DNA polymerase complex	A heterodimeric DNA polymerase complex that catalyzes error-prone DNA synthesis in contexts such as translesion synthesis and double-stranded break repair. First characterized in Saccharomyces, in which the subunits are Rev3p and Rev7p; a third protein, Rev1p, is often associated with the polymerase dimer.
0	1	0	cellular response to phosphate starvation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of deprivation of phosphate.
8	5	6	lipid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of lipids, compounds soluble in an organic solvent but not, or sparingly, in an aqueous solvent.
0	3	2	detection of bacterium	The series of events in which a stimulus from a bacterium is received and converted into a molecular signal.
0	1	0	detection of temperature stimulus	The series of events in which a temperature stimulus (hot or cold) is received and converted into a molecular signal.
3	4	2	vesicle organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a vesicle.
1	0	1	carbohydrate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of carbohydrates, any of a group of organic compounds based of the general formula Cx(H2O)y.
0	1	0	carbohydrate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of carbohydrates, any of a group of organic compounds based of the general formula Cx(H2O)y.
19	21	31	Wnt signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell and ending with a change in cell state.
0	0	1	rhodopsin mediated signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of excitation of rhodopsin by a photon and the events that convert the absorbed photons into a cellular response.
1	2	3	immunoglobulin mediated immune response	An immune response mediated by immunoglobulins, whether cell-bound or in solution.
4	4	22	RNA metabolic process	The cellular chemical reactions and pathways involving RNA, ribonucleic acid, one of the two main type of nucleic acid, consisting of a long, unbranched macromolecule formed from ribonucleotides joined in 3',5'-phosphodiester linkage.
0	2	1	mRNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving mRNA, messenger RNA, which is responsible for carrying the coded genetic 'message', transcribed from DNA, to sites of protein assembly at the ribosomes.
0	1	1	rRNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving rRNA, ribosomal RNA, a structural constituent of ribosomes.
0	0	1	snRNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving snRNA, small nuclear RNA, any of various low-molecular-mass RNA molecules found in the eukaryotic nucleus as components of the small nuclear ribonucleoprotein.
3	5	0	rRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of rRNA, ribosomal RNA, a structural constituent of ribosomes.
0	1	1	snRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of snRNA, small nuclear RNA, low-molecular-mass RNA molecules found in the eukaryotic nucleus as components of the small nuclear ribonucleoprotein.
0	1	1	tRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of tRNA, transfer RNA, a class of relatively small RNA molecules responsible for mediating the insertion of amino acids into the sequence of nascent polypeptide chains during protein synthesis.
2	3	6	synaptic vesicle exocytosis	Fusion of intracellular membrane-bounded vesicles with the pre-synaptic membrane of the neuronal cell resulting in release of neurotransmitter into the synaptic cleft.
0	1	0	synaptic vesicle targeting	The process in which synaptic vesicles are directed to specific destination membranes, mediated by molecules at the vesicle membrane and target membrane surfaces.
3	0	4	synaptic vesicle docking	The initial (indirect) attachment of a synaptic vesicle membrane to the presynaptic active zone membrane, mediated by proteins protruding from the membrane and proteins of the presynaptic active zone cytoplasmic component.  Synaptic vesicle tethering is the first step in this process.
4	1	5	synaptic vesicle priming	A process that converts synaptic vesicles to a state of competence for calcium triggered fusion with the active zone membrane by bringing the two membranes into very close proximity. Priming typically (but not always) occurs after docking (Jahn and Fasshauer, 2012). Primed vesicles are also capable of spontaneously fusing with the active zone membrane.
1	0	0	monoterpenoid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving monoterpenoid compounds, terpenoids having a C10 skeleton.
0	0	1	diterpenoid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving diterpenoid compounds, terpenoids with four isoprene units.
0	1	0	sterol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving sterols, steroids with one or more hydroxyl groups and a hydrocarbon side-chain in the molecule.
2	1	1	sterol biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of sterols, steroids with one or more hydroxyl groups and a hydrocarbon side-chain in the molecule.
1	0	0	brassinosteroid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of brassinosteroids, any of a group of steroid derivatives that occur at very low concentrations in plant tissues and may have hormone-like effects.
0	1	0	glycoside metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycosides, compounds in which a glycosyl group is substituted into a hydroxyl, thiol or selenol group in another compound.
0	0	1	translation release factor activity, codon specific	A translation release factor that is specific for one or more particular termination codons; acts at the ribosomal A-site and require polypeptidyl-tRNA at the P-site.
1	0	0	nickel cation binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with nickel (Ni) cations.
1	0	0	pyrimidine-nucleoside phosphorylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: pyrimidine nucleoside + phosphate = pyrimidine + alpha-D-ribose 1-phosphate.
0	1	0	interleukin-15 receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the interleukin-15 receptor.
3	0	2	NAD(P)H oxidase H2O2-forming activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)H + H+ + O2 = NAD(P)+ + hydrogen peroxide.
3	3	0	superoxide-generating NAD(P)H oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)H + O2 = NAD(P)H + O2-.
2	4	1	superoxide-generating NADPH oxidase activator activity	Increases the activity of the enzyme superoxide-generating NADPH oxidase.
1	1	3	snRNA processing	Any process involved in the conversion of a primary small nuclear RNA (snRNA) transcript into a mature snRNA molecule.
0	0	2	synaptic vesicle budding from endosome	Budding of synaptic vesicles during the formation of constitutive recycling vesicles from early endosomes.
0	0	4	synaptic vesicle budding from presynaptic endocytic zone membrane	Evagination of the presynaptic membrane, resulting in the formation of a new synaptic vesicle.
2	1	6	synaptic vesicle maturation	Steps required to form an initiated synaptic vesicle into a fully formed and transmissible synaptic vesicle.
0	0	1	synaptic vesicle to endosome fusion	Fusion of a synaptic vesicle with an endosome.
0	1	2	synaptic vesicle uncoating	The removal of the protein coat on a synaptic vesicle following the pinching step at the end of budding from the presynaptic membrane.
14	27	29	vesicle-mediated transport	A cellular transport process in which transported substances are moved in membrane-bounded vesicles; transported substances are enclosed in the vesicle lumen or located in the vesicle membrane. The process begins with a step that directs a substance to the forming vesicle, and includes vesicle budding and coating. Vesicles are then targeted to, and fuse with, an acceptor membrane.
13	19	20	endosomal transport	The directed movement of substances mediated by an endosome, a membrane-bounded organelle that carries materials enclosed in the lumen or located in the endosomal membrane.
0	0	1	axon choice point recognition	The recognition of molecules at a choice point by an axon growth cone; at a choice point the growth cone determines the direction of its future growth.
0	1	0	axon midline choice point recognition	The recognition of molecules at the central nervous system midline choice point by an axon growth cone; this choice point determines whether the growth cone will cross the midline.
0	2	0	regulation of striated muscle tissue development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of striated muscle development.
1	0	0	muscle attachment	The developmental process in which a skeletal muscle attaches to its target (such as bone or body wall).
0	0	1	catechol O-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + a catechol = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + a guaiacol.
2	5	3	AMP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with AMP, adenosine monophosphate.
5	2	3	antioxidant activity	Inhibition of the reactions brought about by dioxygen (O2) or peroxides. Usually the antioxidant is effective because it can itself be more easily oxidized than the substance protected. The term is often applied to components that can trap free radicals, thereby breaking the chain reaction that normally leads to extensive biological damage.
0	1	0	kynurenine-oxoglutarate transaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-kynurenine + 2-oxoglutarate = 4-(2-aminophenyl)-2,4-dioxobutanoate + L-glutamate.
0	1	0	procollagen-proline 4-dioxygenase complex	A protein complex that catalyzes the formation of procollagen trans-4-hydroxy-L-proline and succinate from procollagen L-proline and 2-oxoglutarate, requiring Fe2+ and ascorbate. Contains two alpha subunits that contribute to most parts of the catalytic sites, and two beta subunits that are identical to protein-disulfide isomerase.
0	3	0	iron-sulfur cluster assembly	The incorporation of iron and exogenous sulfur into a metallo-sulfur cluster.
4	1	0	steroid dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which one substrate is a sterol derivative.
0	1	0	sphingomyelin phosphodiesterase activator activity	Increases the activity of the enzyme sphingomyelin phosphodiesterase.
0	0	1	beta-N-acetylglucosaminidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of terminal non-reducing N-acetyl-D-glucosamine residues in N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminides.
0	3	3	telomere capping	A process in which telomeres are protected from degradation and fusion, thereby ensuring chromosome stability by protecting the ends from both degradation and from being recognized as damaged DNA. May be mediated by specific single- or double-stranded telomeric DNA binding proteins.
1	3	9	inclusion body	A discrete intracellular part formed of aggregated molecules such as proteins or other biopolymers.
1	3	8	aggresome	An inclusion body formed by dynein-dependent retrograde transport of an aggregated protein on microtubules.
12	15	14	macroautophagy	The major inducible pathway for the general turnover of cytoplasmic constituents in eukaryotic cells, it is also responsible for the degradation of active cytoplasmic enzymes and organelles during nutrient starvation. Macroautophagy involves the formation of double-membrane-bounded autophagosomes which enclose the cytoplasmic constituent targeted for degradation in a membrane-bounded structure.  Autophagosomes then fuse with a lysosome (or vacuole) releasing single-membrane-bounded autophagic bodies that are then degraded within the lysosome (or vacuole). Some types of macroautophagy, e.g. pexophagy, mitophagy, involve selective targeting of the targets to be degraded.
2	6	8	positive regulation of macroautophagy	Any process, such as recognition of nutrient depletion, that activates or increases the rate of macroautophagy to bring cytosolic macromolecules to the vacuole/lysosome for degradation.
1	2	2	autophagosome membrane docking	The initial attachment of an autophagosome membrane to a target membrane, mediated by proteins protruding from the membrane of the vesicle and the target membrane. Docking requires only that the two membranes come close enough for these proteins to interact and adhere.
11	12	10	regulation of macroautophagy	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of macroautophagy.
2	6	5	negative regulation of macroautophagy	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of macroautophagy.
0	0	1	channel regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a channel. A channel catalyzes energy-independent facilitated diffusion, mediated by passage of a solute through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel.
1	0	0	channel inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents, or reduces the activity of a channel via direct interaction with the channel. A channel catalyzes energy-independent facilitated diffusion, mediated by passage of a solute through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel.
3	4	0	RNA polymerase II general transcription initiation factor activity	An activity that contributes to transcription start site selection and transcription initiation of genes transcribed by RNA polymerase II. The general transcription factors for RNA polymerase II include TFIIB, TFIID, TFIIE, TFIIF, TFIIH and TATA-binding protein (TBP).
1	0	0	preassembly of GPI anchor in ER membrane	The stepwise addition of the components of the GPI anchor on to phosphatidylinositol lipids in the endoplasmic reticulum membrane.
0	1	2	gap junction assembly	Assembly of gap junctions, which are found in most animal tissues, and serve as direct connections between the cytoplasms of adjacent cells. They provide open channels through the plasma membrane, allowing ions and small molecules (less than approximately a thousand daltons) to diffuse freely between neighboring cells, but preventing the passage of proteins and nucleic acids.
4	3	1	O-glycan processing	The stepwise addition of carbohydrate or carbohydrate derivative residues to the initially added O-linked residue (usually GalNAc) to form a core O-glycan structure.
1	1	0	protein-arginine N-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + (protein)-arginine = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + (protein)-N-methyl-arginine.
2	2	0	protein-lysine N-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group from S-adenosyl-L-methionine to the epsilon-amino group of a lysine residue in a protein substrate.
1	4	4	eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4F complex	The eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4F complex is composed of eIF4E, eIF4A and eIF4G; it is involved in the recognition of the mRNA cap, ATP-dependent unwinding of the 5'-terminal secondary structure and recruitment of the mRNA to the ribosome.
4	5	3	eukaryotic 43S preinitiation complex	A protein complex composed of the 40S ribosomal subunit plus eIF1A, eIF3, and eIF2-GTP-bound methionyl-initiator methionine tRNA.
1	0	1	palmitoyl-CoA hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: palmitoyl-CoA + H2O = CoA + palmitate.
0	0	1	myristoyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: myristoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + H2O = [acyl-carrier protein] + myristate.
0	0	1	palmitoyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: palmitoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + H2O = [acyl-carrier protein] + palmitate.
3	0	0	lipase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a lipid or phospholipid.
6	14	16	kinase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a substrate molecule.
1	1	3	1-phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol + ATP = a 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3-phosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
1	1	0	1-phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate 5-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 4-phosphate + ATP = 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 4,5-bisphosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
3	10	12	phosphorylation	The process of introducing a phosphate group into a molecule, usually with the formation of a phosphoric ester, a phosphoric anhydride or a phosphoric amide.
6	1	3	dephosphorylation	The process of removing one or more phosphoric (ester or anhydride) residues from a molecule.
1	0	0	phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5-trisphosphate 3-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5-trisphosphate + H2O = phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate + phosphate.
2	0	0	phosphatidylinositol-3,4-bisphosphate 4-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-myo-inositol 3,4-bisphosphate + H2O = 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3-phosphate + phosphate.
0	1	0	endoplasmic reticulum membrane fusion	The joining of 2 or more lipid bilayer membranes that surround the endoplasmic reticulum.
3	0	0	female meiosis chromosome segregation	The cell cycle process in which genetic material, in the form of chromosomes, is organized and then physically separated and apportioned to two or more sets during the meiotic cell cycle in a female.
0	2	3	neuron remodeling	The developmentally regulated remodeling of neuronal projections such as pruning to eliminate the extra dendrites and axons projections set up in early stages of nervous system development.
28	27	38	basolateral plasma membrane	The region of the plasma membrane that includes the basal end and sides of the cell. Often used in reference to animal polarized epithelial membranes, where the basal membrane is the part attached to the extracellular matrix, or in plant cells, where the basal membrane is defined with respect to the zygotic axis.
54	37	41	apical plasma membrane	The region of the plasma membrane located at the apical end of the cell.
3	4	5	apicolateral plasma membrane	The apical end of the lateral plasma membrane of epithelial cells.
16	8	11	lateral plasma membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane at the lateral side of the cell. In epithelial cells, lateral plasma membranes are on the sides of cells which lie at the interface of adjacent cells.
3	1	1	morphogenesis of embryonic epithelium	The process in which the anatomical structures of embryonic epithelia are generated and organized.
1	2	2	calcium-independent cell-cell adhesion via plasma membrane cell-adhesion molecules	The attachment of one cell to another cell via adhesion molecules that do not require the presence of calcium for the interaction.
1	2	1	calcium-dependent cell-cell adhesion via plasma membrane cell adhesion molecules	The attachment of one cell to another cell via adhesion molecules that require the presence of calcium for the interaction.
1	1	0	calcium-dependent cell-matrix adhesion	The binding of a cell to the extracellular matrix via adhesion molecules that require the presence of calcium for the interaction.
1	1	6	catenin complex	Complex of peripheral cytoplasmic proteins (alpha-, beta- and gamma-catenin) that interact with the cytoplasmic region of uvomorulin/E-cadherin to connect it to the actin cytoskeleton.
0	2	0	meiotic chromosome movement towards spindle pole	The cell cycle process in which the directed movement of chromosomes from the center of the spindle towards the spindle poles takes place, mediated by the shortening of microtubules attached to the chromosomes. This occurs during meiosis.
4	3	10	dendrite development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the dendrite over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
12	25	30	nuclear matrix	The dense fibrillar network lying on the inner side of the nuclear membrane.
1	1	0	palmitoyl-CoA oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: palmitoyl-CoA + O2 = trans-2,3-dehydropalmitoyl-CoA + hydrogen peroxide.
1	0	0	dimethylargininase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N(G),N(G)-dimethyl-L-arginine + H2O = dimethylamine + L-citrulline.
0	1	0	15-hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (5Z,13E)-(15S)-11-alpha,15-dihydroxy-9-oxoprost-13-enoate + NAD+ = (5Z,13E)-11-alpha-hydroxy-9,15-dioxoprost-13-enoate + NADH + H+.
1	3	2	acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an acetyl group to an acceptor molecule.
0	2	1	palmitoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a palmitoyl (CH3-[CH2]14-CO-) group to an acceptor molecule.
1	1	0	N-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an acyl group to a nitrogen atom on the acceptor molecule.
1	1	1	mRNA (2'-O-methyladenosine-N6-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + m(7)G(5')pppAm = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + m(7)G(5')pppm(6)Am.
0	1	0	tRNA (guanine) methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing methylguanine.
0	1	0	tRNA (cytosine) methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing methylcytosine.
0	0	1	tRNA (cytosine-5-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing 5-methylcytosine.
1	1	0	rRNA (guanine) methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + rRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + rRNA containing methylguanine.
0	1	3	posttranscriptional gene silencing	The inactivation of gene expression by a posttranscriptional mechanism.
2	5	1	RISC complex	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains members of the Argonaute family of proteins, small interfering RNAs (siRNAs) or microRNAs (miRNAs), and miRNA or siRNA-complementary mRNAs, in addition to a number of accessory factors. The RISC complex is involved in posttranscriptional repression of gene expression through downregulation of translation or induction of mRNA degradation.
0	1	0	somatic diversification of immunoglobulins	The somatic process that results in the generation of sequence diversity of immunoglobulins.
1	2	2	somatic hypermutation of immunoglobulin genes	Mutations occurring somatically that result in amino acid changes in the rearranged V regions of immunoglobulins.
0	0	1	somatic recombination of immunoglobulin gene segments	The process in which immunoglobulin genes are formed through recombination of the germline genetic elements, as known as immunoglobulin gene segments, within a single locus.
0	1	0	C-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an acetyl group to a carbon atom on the acceptor molecule.
2	0	1	gene silencing	Any process carried out at the cellular level that results in either long-term transcriptional repression via action on chromatin structure or RNA mediated, post-transcriptional repression of gene expression.
7	9	9	myosin complex	A protein complex, formed of one or more myosin heavy chains plus associated light chains and other proteins, that functions as a molecular motor; uses the energy of ATP hydrolysis to move actin filaments or to move vesicles or other cargo on fixed actin filaments; has magnesium-ATPase activity and binds actin. Myosin classes are distinguished based on sequence features of the motor, or head, domain, but also have distinct tail regions that are believed to bind specific cargoes.
0	0	3	myosin II complex	A myosin complex containing two class II myosin heavy chains, two myosin essential light chains and two myosin regulatory light chains. Also known as classical myosin or conventional myosin, the myosin II class includes the major muscle myosin of vertebrate and invertebrate muscle, and is characterized by alpha-helical coiled coil tails that self assemble to form a variety of filament structures.
1	5	0	unconventional myosin complex	A portmanteau term for myosins other than myosin II.
1	1	0	pyrophosphatase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a pyrophosphate bond between two phosphate groups, leaving one phosphate on each of the two fragments.
1	0	0	proton-transporting two-sector ATPase complex	A large protein complex that catalyzes the synthesis or hydrolysis of ATP by a rotational mechanism, coupled to the transport of protons across a membrane. The complex comprises a membrane sector (F0, V0, or A0) that carries out proton transport and a cytoplasmic compartment sector (F1, V1, or A1) that catalyzes ATP synthesis or hydrolysis. Two major types have been characterized: V-type ATPases couple ATP hydrolysis to the transport of protons across a concentration gradient, whereas F-type ATPases, also known as ATP synthases, normally run in the reverse direction to utilize energy from a proton concentration or electrochemical gradient to synthesize ATP. A third type, A-type ATPases have been found in archaea, and are closely related to eukaryotic V-type ATPases but are reversible.
2	0	0	vacuolar proton-transporting V-type ATPase complex	A proton-transporting two-sector ATPase complex found in the vacuolar membrane, where it acts as a proton pump to mediate acidification of the vacuolar lumen.
1	0	1	regulation of embryonic cell shape	Any process that modulates the surface configuration of an embryonic cell.
39	42	38	cell migration	The controlled self-propelled movement of a cell from one site to a destination guided by molecular cues. Cell migration is a central process in the development and maintenance of multicellular organisms.
0	1	1	negative regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase I	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transcription mediated by RNA polymerase I.
0	2	1	negative regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase III	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transcription mediated by RNA polymerase III.
0	2	0	cytosolic transport	The directed movement of substances or organelles within the cytosol.
14	9	2	protein processing	Any protein maturation process achieved by the cleavage of a peptide bond or bonds within a protein. Protein maturation is the process leading to the attainment of the full functional capacity of a protein.
1	1	1	peptide hormone processing	The generation of a mature peptide hormone by posttranslational processing of a prohormone.
1	1	0	farnesol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the sesquiterpenoid alcohol farnesol, 3,7,11-trimethyl-2,6,10,dodecatrien-1-ol.
15	11	4	oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction, a reversible chemical reaction in which the oxidation state of an atom or atoms within a molecule is altered. One substrate acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and becomes oxidized, while the other acts as hydrogen or electron acceptor and becomes reduced.
1	0	0	G protein-coupled neurotensin receptor activity	Combining with the tridecapeptide neurotensin to initiate a G-protein mediated change in cell activity. A G-protein is a signal transduction molecule that alternates between an inactive GDP-bound and an active GTP-bound state.
2	2	0	C-C chemokine receptor activity	Combining with a C-C chemokine and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity. C-C chemokines do not have an amino acid between the first two cysteines of the characteristic four-cysteine motif.
1	1	0	C-X-C chemokine receptor activity	Combining with a C-X-C chemokine and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity. A C-X-C chemokine has a single amino acid between the first two cysteines of the characteristic four cysteine motif.
1	0	0	protein-hormone receptor activity	Combining with a protein hormone to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	2	peptidase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a peptidase, any enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis peptide bonds.
1	0	1	peptidase activator activity involved in apoptotic process	Increases the activity of a peptidase that is involved in the apoptotic process.
0	0	1	mitochondrial fatty acid beta-oxidation multienzyme complex	A complex that includes the long-chain 3-hydroxyacyl-CoA dehydrogenase and long-chain enoyl-CoA hydratase activities in two subunits (alpha and beta), catalyzing two steps of the fatty acid beta-oxidation cycle within the mitochondrial matrix.
0	0	1	long-chain-enoyl-CoA hydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a long-chain (3S)-3-hydroxyacyl-CoA = a long-chain trans-2-enoyl-CoA + H2O. A long-chain acyl-CoA is an acyl-CoA thioester where the acyl chain contains 13 to 22 carbon atoms.
0	0	1	long-chain-3-hydroxyacyl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (S)-3-hydroxyacyl-CoA + NAD(P)+ = 3-oxoacyl-CoA + NAD(P)H + H+, where the acyl group is a long-chain fatty acid residue. A long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
1	1	0	core-binding factor complex	A heterodimeric transcription factor complex that contains an alpha subunit (Runx1, Runx2 or Runx3 in human) that binds DNA and a non-DNA-binding beta subunit (CBFbeta), and binds to a consensus sequence 5'-YGYGGTY-3' found in several enhancers and promoters; the beta subunit enhances the DNA binding of the alpha subunit.
4	6	5	SWI/SNF complex	A SWI/SNF-type complex that contains 8 to 14 proteins, including both conserved (core) and nonconserved components; contains the ATPase product of the yeast SNF2 or mammalian SMARCA4/BAF190A/BRG1 gene, or an ortholog thereof.
0	1	0	growth hormone-releasing hormone receptor activity	Combining with growth hormone-releasing hormone to initiate a change in cell activity.
9	13	11	negative regulation of angiogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of angiogenesis.
2	1	4	sarcoplasm	The cytoplasm of a muscle cell; includes the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
6	5	9	sarcoplasmic reticulum	A fine reticular network of membrane-limited elements that pervades the sarcoplasm of a muscle cell; continuous over large portions of the cell and with the nuclear envelope; that part of the endoplasmic reticulum specialized for calcium release, uptake and storage.
0	2	0	superoxide dismutase copper chaperone activity	A copper chaperone activity that specifically delivers copper to the Cu-Zn superoxide dismutase, to activate superoxide dismutase activity.
0	1	0	protein kinase 5 complex	A protein complex that has protein serine/threonine kinase activity; in mammals composed of catalytic subunit CDK5 and regulatory subunits CDK5R1 or CDK5R2. Contrary to its gene symbol, CDK5 is not cyclin-dependent.
3	2	4	cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase, enzymes of the protein kinase family that are regulated through association with cyclins and other proteins.
4	2	0	protein autoprocessing	Processing which a protein carries out itself. This involves actions such as the autolytic removal of residues to generate the mature form of the protein.
0	0	1	base conversion or substitution editing	Any base modification or substitution events that result in alterations in the coding potential or structural properties of RNAs as a result of changes in the base-pairing properties of the modified ribonucleoside(s).
0	0	1	peroxisome membrane biogenesis	The process in which a peroxisome membrane is synthesized, aggregates, and bonds together.
0	2	0	protein import into peroxisome matrix	The import of proteins into the peroxisomal matrix. A peroxisome targeting signal (PTS) binds to a soluble receptor protein in the cytosol, and the resulting complex then binds to a receptor protein in the peroxisome membrane and is imported. The cargo protein is then released into the peroxisome matrix.
2	0	3	peroxisome fission	The division of a mature peroxisome within a cell to form two or more separate peroxisome compartments.
0	1	1	protein import into peroxisome matrix, docking	The process in which a complex formed of a peroxisome targeting sequence (PTS) receptor bound to a PTS-bearing protein docks with translocation machinery in the peroxisomal membrane.
0	1	0	protein import into peroxisome matrix, translocation	The process in which proteins are moved across the peroxisomal membrane into the matrix. It is likely that the peroxisome targeting sequence receptor remains associated with cargo proteins during translocation.
37	51	36	protein ubiquitination	The process in which one or more ubiquitin groups are added to a protein.
0	2	0	covalent chromatin modification	The alteration of DNA or protein in chromatin by the covalent addition or removal of chemical groups.
1	2	0	histone modification	The covalent alteration of one or more amino acid residues within a histone protein.
1	2	3	histone methylation	The modification of histones by addition of methyl groups.
0	1	6	histone phosphorylation	The modification of histones by addition of phosphate groups.
3	11	5	histone acetylation	The modification of a histone by the addition of an acetyl group.
0	2	1	histone ubiquitination	The modification of histones by addition of ubiquitin groups.
5	13	7	histone deacetylation	The modification of histones by removal of acetyl groups.
1	1	0	histone dephosphorylation	The modification of histones by removal of phosphate groups.
1	3	1	histone deubiquitination	The modification of histones by removal of ubiquitin groups.
36	48	46	protein deubiquitination	The removal of one or more ubiquitin groups from a protein.
2	2	4	Sin3 complex	A multiprotein complex that functions broadly in eukaryotic organisms as a transcriptional repressor of protein-coding genes, through the gene-specific deacetylation of histones. Amongst its subunits, the Sin3 complex contains Sin3-like proteins, and a number of core proteins that are shared with the NuRD complex (including histone deacetylases and histone binding proteins). The Sin3 complex does not directly bind DNA itself, but is targeted to specific genes through protein-protein interactions with DNA-binding proteins.
2	6	5	NuRD complex	An approximately 2 MDa multi-subunit complex that exhibits ATP-dependent chromatin remodeling activity in addition to histone deacetylase (HDAC) activity, and has been shown to establish transcriptional repression of a number of target genes in vertebrates, invertebrates and fungi. Amongst its subunits, the NuRD complex contains histone deacetylases, histone binding proteins and Mi-2-like proteins.
1	3	8	nucleosome positioning	Ordering of successions of nucleosomes into regular arrays so that nucleosomes are positioned at defined distances from one another.
0	1	0	RSC-type complex	A SWI/SNF-type complex that contains a bromodomain containing-protein, such as yeast Rsc1 or Rsc4 or mammalian PB1/BAF180. The RSC complex is generally recruited to RNA polymerase III promoters and is specifically recruited to RNA polymerase II promoters by transcriptional activators and repressors; it is also involved in non-homologous end joining.
0	5	1	NURF complex	An ISWI complex that contains an ATPase subunit of the ISWI family (SNF2L in mammals), a NURF301 homolog (BPTF in humans), and additional subunits, though the composition of these additional subunits varies slightly with species. NURF is involved in regulation of transcription from TRNA polymerase II promoters.
0	0	1	ACF complex	An ISWI complex that contains an ATPase subunit of the ISWI family (SNF2H in mammals, Isw2 in S. cerevisiae), an ACF1 homolog, and generally no other subunits, though Xenopus is an exception with a third non-conserved subunit. ACF plays roles in regulation of RNA polymerase II transcription and in DNA replication and repair.
1	4	1	RNA polymerase II, holoenzyme	A nuclear DNA-directed RNA polymerase complex containing an RNA polymerase II core enzyme as well as additional proteins and transcription factor complexes, that are capable of promoter recognition and transcription initiation from an RNA polymerase II promoter in vivo. These additional components may include general transcription factor complexes TFIIA, TFIID, TFIIE, TFIIF, or TFIIH, as well as Mediator, SWI/SNF, GCN5, or SRBs and confer the ability to recognize promoters.
4	6	3	mediator complex	A protein complex that interacts with the carboxy-terminal domain of the largest subunit of RNA polymerase II and plays an active role in transducing the signal from a transcription factor to the transcriptional machinery. The mediator complex is required for activation of transcription of most protein-coding genes, but can also act as a transcriptional corepressor. The Saccharomyces complex contains several identifiable subcomplexes: a head domain comprising Srb2, -4, and -5, Med6, -8, and -11, and Rox3 proteins; a middle domain comprising Med1, -4, and -7, Nut1 and -2, Cse2, Rgr1, Soh1, and Srb7 proteins; a tail consisting of Gal11p, Med2p, Pgd1p, and Sin4p; and a regulatory subcomplex comprising Ssn2, -3, and -8, and Srb8 proteins. Metazoan mediator complexes have similar modular structures and include homologs of yeast Srb and Med proteins.
1	1	2	Cdc73/Paf1 complex	A multiprotein complex that associates with RNA polymerase II and general RNA polymerase II transcription factor complexes and may be involved in both transcriptional initiation and elongation. In Saccharomyces the complex contains Paf1p, Cdc73p, Ctr9p, Rtf1p, and Leo1p.
0	1	2	glycine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with glycine, aminoethanoic acid.
1	0	2	glutamate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with glutamate, the anion of 2-aminopentanedioic acid.
4	3	1	amino acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an amino acid, organic acids containing one or more amino substituents.
2	2	1	flotillin complex	A protein complex that contains flotillin-1 and flotillin-2, and may contain associated proteins. Flotillins associate into membrane microdomains resembling caveolae.
4	5	7	Rac protein signal transduction	A series of molecular signals within the cell that are mediated by a member of the Rac family of proteins switching to a GTP-bound active state.
1	0	0	CCAAT-binding factor complex	A heteromeric transcription factor complex that binds to the CCAAT-box upstream of promoters; functions as both an activator and a repressor, depending on its interacting cofactors. Typically trimeric consisting of NFYA, NFYB and NFYC subunits. In Saccharomyces, it activates the transcription of genes in response to growth in a nonfermentable carbon source and consists of four known subunits: HAP2, HAP3, HAP4 and HAP5.
43	59	49	nuclear body	Extra-nucleolar nuclear domains usually visualized by confocal microscopy and fluorescent antibodies to specific proteins.
17	27	12	PML body	A class of nuclear body; they react against SP100 auto-antibodies (PML, promyelocytic leukemia); cells typically contain 10-30 PML bodies per nucleus; alterations in the localization of PML bodies occurs after viral infection.
59	86	90	nuclear speck	A discrete extra-nucleolar subnuclear domain, 20-50 in number, in which splicing factors are seen to be localized by immunofluorescence microscopy.
2	2	0	oxidoreductase activity, acting on the CH-OH group of donors, NAD or NADP as acceptor	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which a CH-OH group acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and reduces NAD+ or NADP.
0	1	0	oxidoreductase activity, acting on the aldehyde or oxo group of donors, NAD or NADP as acceptor	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which an aldehyde or ketone (oxo) group acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and reduces NAD or NADP.
1	0	1	oxidoreductase activity, acting on the CH-CH group of donors	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which a CH-CH group acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and reduces a hydrogen or electron acceptor.
0	0	1	oxidoreductase activity, acting on NAD(P)H	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which NADH or NADPH acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and reduces a hydrogen or electron acceptor.
5	2	0	oxidoreductase activity, acting on NAD(P)H, quinone or similar compound as acceptor	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which NADH or NADPH acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and reduces a quinone or a similar acceptor molecule.
1	0	0	oxidoreductase activity, acting on other nitrogenous compounds as donors	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which a nitrogenous group, excluding NH and NH2 groups, acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and reduces a hydrogen or electron acceptor.
0	1	0	oxidoreductase activity, acting on a sulfur group of donors	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which a sulfur-containing group acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and reduces a hydrogen or electron acceptor.
1	0	0	oxidoreductase activity, acting on a sulfur group of donors, disulfide as acceptor	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which a sulfur-containing group acts as a hydrogen or electron donor and reduces disulfide.
2	1	0	oxidoreductase activity, acting on peroxide as acceptor	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which the peroxide group acts as a hydrogen or electron acceptor.
0	1	1	2-oxoglutarate-dependent dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: A + 2-oxoglutarate + O2 = B + succinate + CO2. This is an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which hydrogen or electrons are transferred from 2-oxoglutarate and one other donor, and one atom of oxygen is incorporated into each donor.
1	0	2	oxidoreductase activity, acting on paired donors, with incorporation or reduction of molecular oxygen, NAD(P)H as one donor, and incorporation of one atom of oxygen	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which hydrogen or electrons are transferred from NADH or NADPH and one other donor, and one atom of oxygen is incorporated into one donor.
3	1	0	oxidoreductase activity, acting on paired donors, with incorporation or reduction of molecular oxygen, reduced flavin or flavoprotein as one donor, and incorporation of one atom of oxygen	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which hydrogen or electrons are transferred from reduced flavin or flavoprotein and one other donor, and one atom of oxygen is incorporated into one donor.
0	1	0	oxidoreductase activity, oxidizing metal ions	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction in which the oxidation state of metal ion is altered.
6	5	1	transferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a group, e.g. a methyl group, glycosyl group, acyl group, phosphorus-containing, or other groups, from one compound (generally regarded as the donor) to another compound (generally regarded as the acceptor). Transferase is the systematic name for any enzyme of EC class 2.
3	1	2	transferase activity, transferring acyl groups	Catalysis of the transfer of an acyl group from one compound (donor) to another (acceptor).
1	0	0	phosphotransferase activity, alcohol group as acceptor	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphorus-containing group from one compound (donor) to an alcohol group (acceptor).
4	2	2	nucleotidyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a nucleotidyl group to a reactant.
1	1	0	sulfurtransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of sulfur atoms from one compound (donor) to another (acceptor).
13	14	11	hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of various bonds, e.g. C-O, C-N, C-C, phosphoric anhydride bonds, etc. Hydrolase is the systematic name for any enzyme of EC class 3.
1	1	0	hydrolase activity, acting on ester bonds	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of any ester bond.
1	0	0	thiolester hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: RCO-SR' + H2O = RCOOH + HSR'. This reaction is the hydrolysis of a thiolester bond, an ester formed from a carboxylic acid and a thiol (i.e., RCO-SR'), such as that found in acetyl-coenzyme A.
6	0	5	phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of phosphoric monoesters, releasing inorganic phosphate.
0	0	1	triphosphoric monoester hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a triphosphoester to give a triphosphate group and a free hydroxyl group.
0	2	0	dipeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a dipeptide.
2	0	0	cysteine-type carboxypeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of C-terminal peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile.
0	0	3	hydrolase activity, acting on carbon-nitrogen (but not peptide) bonds	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of any carbon-nitrogen bond, C-N, with the exception of peptide bonds.
1	0	0	hydrolase activity, acting on carbon-nitrogen (but not peptide) bonds, in linear amides	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of any non-peptide carbon-nitrogen bond in a linear amide.
4	2	1	lyase activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of C-C, C-O, C-N and other bonds by other means than by hydrolysis or oxidation, or conversely adding a group to a double bond. They differ from other enzymes in that two substrates are involved in one reaction direction, but only one in the other direction. When acting on the single substrate, a molecule is eliminated and this generates either a new double bond or a new ring.
1	0	0	carbon-carbon lyase activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of C-C bonds by other means than by hydrolysis or oxidation, or conversely adding a group to a double bond.
1	2	1	carboxy-lyase activity	Catalysis of the nonhydrolytic addition or removal of a carboxyl group to or from a compound.
3	0	0	hydro-lyase activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of a carbon-oxygen bond by elimination of water.
0	0	1	ammonia-lyase activity	Catalysis of the release of ammonia by the cleavage of a carbon-nitrogen bond or the reverse reaction with ammonia as a substrate.
2	2	2	isomerase activity	Catalysis of the geometric or structural changes within one molecule. Isomerase is the systematic name for any enzyme of EC class 5.
0	1	0	cis-trans isomerase activity	Catalysis of a reaction that interconverts cis and trans isomers. Atoms or groups are termed cis or trans to one another when they lie respectively on the same or on opposite sides of a reference plane identifiable as common among stereoisomers.
1	0	0	intramolecular oxidoreductase activity, transposing C=C bonds	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which the hydrogen donor and acceptor are the same molecule, one or more carbon-carbon double bonds in the molecule are rearranged, and no oxidized product appears.
0	0	2	intramolecular transferase activity, phosphotransferases	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group from one position to another within a single molecule.
1	2	1	ligase activity	Catalysis of the joining of two molecules, or two groups within a single molecule, using the energy from the hydrolysis of ATP, a similar triphosphate, or a pH gradient.
30	49	47	ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate + 2 H+. May or may not be coupled to another reaction.
1	0	0	site-specific endodeoxyribonuclease activity, specific for altered base	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages at specific sites within a deoxyribonucleic acid molecule by creating internal breaks.
1	1	0	G protein-coupled acetylcholine receptor activity	Combining with acetylcholine and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating an associated G-protein; promotes the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha subunit of a heterotrimeric G-protein complex.
2	0	0	retinal binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with retinal, one of the forms of vitamin A. Retinal plays an important role in the visual process in most vertebrates, combining with opsins to form visual pigments in the retina.
2	6	4	nuclear receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently, in a ligand dependent manner, with a nuclear receptor protein.
3	15	13	protein sumoylation	The process in which a SUMO protein (small ubiquitin-related modifier) is conjugated to a target protein via an isopeptide bond between the carboxy-terminus of SUMO with an epsilon-amino group of a lysine residue of the target protein.
1	4	0	protein desumoylation	The process in which a SUMO protein (small ubiquitin-related modifier) is cleaved from its target protein.
1	0	0	galactoside binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any glycoside in which the sugar group is galactose.
0	0	1	kinesin I complex	A complex of two kinesin heavy chains and two kinesin light chains.
1	0	0	kinesin II complex	A complex consisting of two distinct motor subunits that form a heterodimer complexed with a third non-motor accessory subunit, the kinesin associated protein or KAP; the KIF3 heterodimer interacts via its C-terminal portion with KAP, which is thought to regulate the binding of the motor to cargo membranes.
1	1	0	insulin-like growth factor binding protein complex	A complex of proteins which includes the insulin-like growth factor (IGF) and a number of IGF-binding proteins. The complex plays a role in growth and development.
1	0	0	alpha-2 macroglobulin receptor activity	Combining with alpha-2 macroglobulin and delivering alpha-2 macroglobulin into the cell via receptor-mediated endocytosis.
2	0	0	flavin-linked sulfhydryl oxidase activity	Catalysis of the formation of disulfide bridges.
0	1	0	thiol oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 4 R'C(R)SH + O2 = 2 R'C(R)S-S(R)CR' + 2 H2O.
3	7	2	poly(A)+ mRNA export from nucleus	The directed movement of poly(A)+ mRNA out of the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
1	0	0	activin-activated receptor activity	Combining with activin and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity. Activin is one of two gonadal glycoproteins related to transforming growth factor beta.
1	0	0	cytochrome complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a cytochrome complex. A cytochrome complex is a protein complex in which at least one of the proteins is a cytochrome, i.e. a heme-containing protein involved in catalysis of redox reactions.
1	0	0	3'-tyrosyl-DNA phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of 3'-phosphotyrosyl groups formed as covalent intermediates (in DNA backbone breakage) between DNA topoisomerase I and DNA.
4	3	0	regulation of transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of activity of any TGF-beta receptor signaling pathway.
2	0	3	MAP kinase tyrosine/serine/threonine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: MAP kinase serine/threonine/tyrosine phosphate + H2O = MAP kinase serine/threonine/tyrosine + phosphate.
0	0	1	myosin phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phosphomyosin + H2O = myosin + phosphate.
5	3	4	myosin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any part of a myosin complex; myosins are any of a superfamily of molecular motor proteins that bind to actin and use the energy of ATP hydrolysis to generate force and movement along actin filaments.
1	0	0	myosin I binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a class I myosin; myosin I heavy chains are single-headed, possess tails of various lengths, and do not self-associate into bipolar filaments.
1	3	4	TBP-class protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a member of the class of TATA-binding proteins (TBP), including any of the TBP-related factors (TRFs).
1	0	1	protein import	The targeting and directed movement of proteins into a cell or organelle.  Not all import involves an initial targeting event.
2	1	0	peptide hormone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any peptide with hormonal activity in animals.
0	0	1	D-erythro-sphingosine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: sphingosine + ATP = sphingosine 1-phosphate + ADP.
7	12	8	transcription repressor complex	A protein complex that possesses activity that prevents or downregulates transcription.
0	0	1	negative regulation of RNA polymerase II transcription preinitiation complex assembly	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of RNA polymerase II transcriptional preinitiation complex assembly.
4	11	7	structural constituent of nuclear pore	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of the nuclear pore complex, a protein-lined channel in the nuclear envelope that allows the transfer of macromolecules.
0	1	0	6-phosphogluconolactonase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 6-O-phosphono-D-glucono-1,5-lactone + H(2)O = 6-phospho-D-gluconate + H(+).
1	5	4	snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a small nuclear RNA (snRNA).
1	2	1	U6 snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the U6 small nuclear RNA (U6 snRNA).
5	1	9	syntaxin-1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the SNAP receptor syntaxin-1.
0	1	2	purine nucleotide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with purine nucleotides, any compound consisting of a purine nucleoside esterified with (ortho)phosphate.
0	0	2	oxidative phosphorylation uncoupler activity	Enables the transfer of protons from mitochondrial intermembrane space into mitochondrial matrix, dissipating the proton gradient across the mitochondrial inner membrane established by the electron transport chain during the oxidative phosphorylation (proton leak). Proton leak uncouples the processes of electron transport/proton generation and ATP synthesis.
1	3	7	sodium channel regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a sodium channel.
0	1	1	chloride channel regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a chloride channel.
0	1	1	response to insecticide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an insecticide stimulus. Insecticides are chemicals used to kill insects.
0	0	1	sulfonylurea receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the sulfonylurea receptor, a regulatory subunit of the ATP-sensitive potassium ion channel.
0	1	1	very-long-chain-acyl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + acceptor = 2,3-dehydroacyl-CoA + reduced acceptor, where the acyl group is a very long chain fatty acid residue. A very long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid which has a chain length greater than C22.
3	3	2	aminoacyl-tRNA synthetase multienzyme complex	A multienzyme complex found in all multicellular eukaryotes composed of eight proteins with aminoacyl-tRNA synthetase activities (abbreviated as: ArgRS, AspRS, GluProRS, GlnRS, IleRS, LeuRS, LysRS, MetRS where RS is the enzyme, preceded by the amino acid it uses as a substrate) as well as three non-synthetase proteins (p43, p38, and p18) with diverse functions. Several of these subunits are known dimers, so the total polypeptide count in the multisynthetase complex is at least fifteen. All of the enzymes in this assembly catalyze the same reaction, the covalent attachment of an amino acid to either the 2'- or 3'-hydroxyl of the 3'-terminal adenosine of tRNA, but using different substrates.
2	0	0	5'-flap endonuclease activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of a 5' flap structure in DNA, but not other DNA structures; processes the 5' ends of Okazaki fragments in lagging strand DNA synthesis.
0	3	0	nucleoside-triphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a nucleoside triphosphate + H2O = nucleoside diphosphate + phosphate.
1	1	0	single-stranded DNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, in the presence of single-stranded DNA; drives the unwinding of a DNA helix.
2	2	1	Golgi transport complex	A  multisubunit tethering complex of the CATCHR family (complexes associated with tethering containing helical rods) that has a role in tethering vesicles to the Golgi prior to fusion. Composed of 8 subunits COG1-8.
0	0	1	plasma membrane phospholipid scrambling	The movement of a population of phospholipid molecules from one leaflet of the plasma membrane bilayer to the opposite leaflet, resulting in loss of lipid asymmetry and surface exposure of phosphatidylserine (PS) and phosphatidylethanolamine (PE).
17	35	33	SH3 domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a SH3 domain (Src homology 3) of a protein, small protein modules containing approximately 50 amino acid residues found in a great variety of intracellular or membrane-associated proteins.
0	1	0	nucleologenesis	A cellular process that results in the biosynthesis of constituent macromolecules, assembly, and arrangement of constituent parts of a nucleolus, a small, dense body one or more of which are present in the nucleus of eukaryotic cells.
0	0	1	poly(C) RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of cytosine residues in an RNA molecule.
6	1	3	fibroblast growth factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a fibroblast growth factor.
1	2	1	NAD-dependent histone deacetylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: histone N6-acetyl-L-lysine + H2O = histone L-lysine + acetate. This reaction requires the presence of NAD, and represents the removal of an acetyl group from a histone.
4	3	2	drug metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a drug, a substance used in the diagnosis, treatment or prevention of a disease; as used here antibiotic substances (see antibiotic metabolism) are considered to be drugs, even if not used in medical or veterinary practice.
0	1	1	stem cell division	The self-renewing division of a stem cell. A stem cell is an undifferentiated cell, in the embryo or adult, that can undergo unlimited division and give rise to one or several different cell types.
0	2	1	NMDA selective glutamate receptor complex	An assembly of four or five subunits which form a structure with an extracellular N-terminus and a large loop that together form the ligand binding domain. The C-terminus is intracellular. The ionotropic glutamate receptor complex itself acts as a ligand gated ion channel; on binding glutamate, charged ions pass through a channel in the center of the receptor complex. NMDA receptors are composed of assemblies of NR1 subunits (Figure 3) and NR2 subunits, which can be one of four separate gene products (NR2A-D). Expression of both subunits are required to form functional channels. The glutamate binding domain is formed at the junction of NR1 and NR2 subunits. NMDA receptors are permeable to calcium ions as well as being permeable to other ions. Thus NMDA receptor activation leads to a calcium influx into the post-synaptic cells, a signal thought to be crucial for the induction of NMDA-receptor dependent LTP and LTD.
2	0	0	Wnt-protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with Wnt-protein, a secreted growth factor involved in signaling.
7	12	15	negative regulation of translation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of proteins by the translation of mRNA or circRNA.
2	2	0	DEAD/H-box RNA helicase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the enzyme DEAD/H-box RNA helicase.
3	2	0	semaphorin receptor activity	Combining with a semaphorin, and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	1	11	calcium-ion regulated exocytosis	The release of intracellular molecules (e.g. hormones, matrix proteins) contained within a membrane-bounded vesicle by fusion of the vesicle with the plasma membrane of a cell, induced by a rise in cytosolic calcium-ion levels.
3	5	9	regulation of exocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of exocytosis.
0	0	4	regulation of calcium ion-dependent exocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion-dependent exocytosis.
2	0	0	inositol-1,3,4-trisphosphate 4-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-myo-inositol 1,3,4-trisphosphate + H2O = myo-inositol 1,3-bisphosphate + phosphate.
4	2	0	aryl hydrocarbon receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an aryl hydrocarbon receptor.
1	2	5	vinculin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with vinculin, a protein found in muscle, fibroblasts, and epithelial cells that binds actin and appears to mediate attachment of actin filaments to integral proteins of the plasma membrane.
1	0	0	serine hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a substrate by a catalytic mechanism that involves a catalytic triad consisting of a serine nucleophile that is activated by a proton relay involving an acidic residue (e.g. aspartate or glutamate) and a basic residue (usually histidine).
1	1	0	glucosidase II complex	A heterodimeric complex that catalyzes the trimming of glucose residues from N-linked core glycans on newly synthesized glycoproteins.
0	1	0	peptidyl-diphthamide biosynthetic process from peptidyl-histidine	The modification of peptidyl-histidine to 2'-(3-carboxamido-3-(trimethylammonio)propyl)-L-histidine, known as diphthamide, found in translation elongation factor EF-2. The process occurs in eukaryotes and archaea but not eubacteria.
1	2	1	peptidyl-lysine hydroxylation	The hydroxylation of peptidyl-lysine to form peptidyl-hydroxylysine.
0	2	0	N-terminal peptidyl-methionine acetylation	The acetylation of the N-terminal methionine of proteins to form the derivative N-acetyl-L-methionine.
1	1	0	N-terminal peptidyl-serine acetylation	The acetylation of the N-terminal serine of proteins to form the derivative N-acetyl-L-serine.
1	1	0	N-terminal peptidyl-glutamic acid acetylation	The acetylation of the N-terminal glutamic acid of proteins to form the derivate acetyl-glutamic acid.
0	0	1	N-terminal peptidyl-glycine N-myristoylation	The myristoylation of the N-terminal glycine of proteins to form the derivative N-myristoyl-glycine.
0	0	1	N-terminal peptidyl-L-cysteine N-palmitoylation	The covalent attachment of a palmitoyl group to a nitrogen (N) atom in an N-terminal cysteine residue to form N-palmitoyl-L-cysteine.
0	1	0	peptidyl-lysine trimethylation	The methylation of peptidyl-lysine to form peptidyl-N6,N6,N6-trimethyl-L-lysine.
3	4	1	histone-lysine N-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + histone L-lysine = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + histone N6-methyl-L-lysine. The methylation of peptidyl-lysine in histones forms N6-methyl-L-lysine, N6,N6-dimethyl-L-lysine and N6,N6,N6-trimethyl-L-lysine derivatives.
2	1	0	peptidyl-lysine monomethylation	The methylation of peptidyl-lysine to form peptidyl-N6-methyl-L-lysine.
1	1	0	peptidyl-lysine dimethylation	The methylation of peptidyl-lysine to form peptidyl-N6,N6-dimethyl-L-lysine.
1	0	2	N-terminal peptidyl-lysine acetylation	The acetylation of the N-terminal lysine of proteins.
1	0	0	protein polyglutamylation	The addition of one or more alpha-linked glutamyl units to the gamma carboxyl group of peptidyl-glutamic acid.
27	42	41	peptidyl-serine phosphorylation	The phosphorylation of peptidyl-serine to form peptidyl-O-phospho-L-serine.
10	16	24	peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation	The phosphorylation of peptidyl-threonine to form peptidyl-O-phospho-L-threonine.
15	12	6	peptidyl-tyrosine phosphorylation	The phosphorylation of peptidyl-tyrosine to form peptidyl-O4'-phospho-L-tyrosine.
2	2	0	peptidyl-cysteine S-nitrosylation	The covalent addition of a nitric oxide (NO) group to the sulphur (S) atom of a cysteine residue in a protein, to form peptidyl-S-nitrosyl-L-cysteine.
1	0	0	peptidyl-arginine ADP-ribosylation	The transfer, from NAD, of ADP-ribose to peptidyl-arginine to form omega-N-(ADP-ribosyl)-L-arginine.
1	4	0	keratan sulfate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of keratan sulfate, a glycosaminoglycan with repeat units consisting of beta-1,4-linked D-galactopyranosyl-beta-(1,4)-N-acetyl-D-glucosamine 6-sulfate and with variable amounts of fucose, sialic acid and mannose units; keratan sulfate chains are covalently linked by a glycosidic attachment through the trisaccharide galactosyl-galactosyl-xylose to peptidyl-threonine or serine residues.
8	5	17	peptide cross-linking	The formation of a covalent cross-link between or within protein chains.
0	0	1	isopeptide cross-linking via N6-(L-isoglutamyl)-L-lysine	The formation of an isopeptide cross-link between peptidyl-lysine and peptidyl-glutamine to produce N6-(L-isoglutamyl)-L-lysine.
1	1	1	protein oxidation	The modification of a protein amino acid by oxidation.
0	1	0	peptidyl-cysteine oxidation	The oxidation of peptidyl-cysteine to peptidyl-L-cysteine sulfinic acid or peptidyl-L-cysteine sulfenic acid.
1	0	0	peptidyl-amino acid modification	The alteration of an amino acid residue in a peptide.
0	1	0	peptidyl-lysine modification	The modification of peptidyl-lysine.
1	1	1	peptidyl-methionine modification	The modification of peptidyl-methionine.
0	1	0	peptidyl-proline modification	The modification of peptidyl-proline.
0	0	2	protein phosphopantetheinylation	The modification of a protein amino acid by phosphopantetheinylation.
1	1	0	peptidyl-arginine methylation	The addition of a methyl group to an arginine residue in a protein.
0	2	0	peptidyl-L-cysteine S-palmitoylation	The covalent attachment of a palmitoyl group to a sulfur (S) atom within a cysteine residue to form peptidyl-S-palmitoyl-L-cysteine.
1	0	0	protein O-linked glycosylation via serine	The glycosylation of protein via the O3 atom of peptidyl-serine, forming O3-glycosyl-L-serine; the most common forms are N-acetylgalactosaminyl, mannosyl, galactosyl, and xylosyl serine.
2	0	0	protein O-linked glycosylation via threonine	The glycosylation of protein via the O3 atom of peptidyl-threonine, forming O3-glycosyl-L-threonine; the most common forms are N-acetylgalactosaminyl, mannosyl, and galactosyl threonine.
0	1	0	isopeptide cross-linking via N6-glycyl-L-lysine	The formation of an isopeptide cross-link between peptidyl-lysine and peptidyl-glycine to produce N6-glycyl-L-lysine. This is distinct from the formation of the thiolester intermediate, which occurs during ubiquitination.
0	0	1	protein deamination	The removal of an amino group from a protein amino acid.
2	2	2	protein N-linked glycosylation via asparagine	The glycosylation of protein via the N4 atom of peptidyl-asparagine forming N4-glycosyl-L-asparagine; the most common form is N-acetylglucosaminyl asparagine; N-acetylgalactosaminyl asparagine and N4 glucosyl asparagine also occur. This modification typically occurs in extracellular peptides with an N-X-(ST) motif. Partial modification has been observed to occur with cysteine, rather than serine or threonine, in the third position; secondary structure features are important, and proline in the second or fourth positions inhibits modification.
1	0	1	protein-chromophore linkage	The covalent or noncovalent attachment of a chromophore to a protein.
1	1	0	peptidyl-serine ADP-ribosylation	The transfer, from NAD, of ADP-ribose to peptidyl-serine to form peptidyl-O-(ADP-ribosyl)-L-serine.
0	0	1	molybdenum incorporation into molybdenum-molybdopterin complex	The incorporation of molybdenum into a molybdenum-molybdopterin complex.
0	1	0	protein farnesylation	The covalent attachment of a farnesyl group to a protein.
0	1	0	protein geranylgeranylation	The covalent attachment of a geranylgeranyl group to a protein.
0	2	1	protein palmitoylation	The covalent attachment of a palmitoyl group to a protein.
1	0	0	peptidyl-glutamine methylation	The addition of a methyl group to a glutamine residue in a protein.
1	1	3	internal peptidyl-lysine acetylation	The addition of an acetyl group to a non-terminal lysine residue in a protein.
2	1	1	peptidyl-lysine acetylation	The acetylation of peptidyl-lysine.
0	1	0	peptidyl-proline hydroxylation to 3-hydroxy-L-proline	The modification of peptidyl-proline to form 3-hydroxy-L-proline; catalyzed by procollagen-proline 3-dioxygenase.
0	2	0	peptidyl-proline hydroxylation to 4-hydroxy-L-proline	The modification of peptidyl-proline to form 4-hydroxy-L-proline; catalyzed by procollagen-proline,2-oxoglutarate-4-dioxygenase.
0	1	0	peptidyl-glutamic acid poly-ADP-ribosylation	This modification produces peptidyl-glutamic acid poly-ADP-ribose found in a number of nuclear proteins under certain conditions including the repair of single strand DNA breaks. The activated form of the generating enzyme poly(ADP-ribose) polymerase is itself modified in this way.
0	0	1	translation release factor complex	A heterodimeric complex involved in the release of a nascent polypeptide chain from a ribosome.
1	0	0	formaldehyde dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: formaldehyde + H(2)O + NAD(+) = formate + 2 H(+) + NADH.
0	1	0	malonate-semialdehyde dehydrogenase (acetylating) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-oxopropanoate + CoA + NADP+ = acetyl-CoA + CO2 + NADPH + H+.
1	0	1	benzaldehyde dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: benzaldehyde + NAD+ + H2O = benzoate + NADH + H+.
1	0	0	methanethiol oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: methanethiol + O2 + H2O = formaldehyde + hydrogen sulfide + hydrogen peroxide.
3	0	0	phenanthrene 9,10-monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phenanthrene + O2 + NADH + H+ = H2O + NAD+ + phenanthrene-9,10-oxide.
1	0	0	(S)-limonene 6-monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (-)-limonene + NADPH + H+ + O2 = (-)-trans-carveol + NADP+ + H2O.
1	0	0	(S)-limonene 7-monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (4S)-limonene + H(+) + NADPH + O(2) = (4S)-perillyl alcohol + H(2)O + NADP(+).
0	1	0	S-formylglutathione hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-formylglutathione + H(2)O = formate + glutathione + H(+).
0	0	1	3-hydroxyacyl-CoA dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: alkene-CoA + H2O = alcohol-CoA. Substrates are crotonoyl-CoA (producing 3-hydroxyacyl-CoA) and 2,3-didehydro-pimeloyl-CoA (producing 3-hydroxypimeloyl-CoA).
1	2	0	benzoate-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + benzoate + CoA = AMP + benzoyl-CoA + diphosphate.
1	0	0	benzoate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving benzoate, the anion of benzoic acid (benzenecarboxylic acid), a fungistatic compound widely used as a food preservative; it is conjugated to glycine in the liver and excreted as hippuric acid.
0	1	0	naphthalene metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving naphthalene, a fused ring bicyclic aromatic hydrocarbon commonly found in crude oil and oil products. Naphthalene is familiar as the compound that gives mothballs their odor; it is used in the manufacture of plastics, dyes, solvents, and other chemicals, as well as being used as an antiseptic and insecticide.
0	1	0	phenol-containing compound metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a phenol, any compound containing one or more hydroxyl groups directly attached to an aromatic carbon ring.
0	1	0	phthalate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phthalate, the anion of phthalic acid. Phthalic acid diesters are used industrially in the production of a variety of household and consumer goods including plastic polymers, lubricating oils, and carriers for perfumes in cosmetics, while phthalic acid itself is used industrially as a plasticizer. Terephthalate is used in the synthesis of polyethylene terephthalate (polyethene terephthlate, abbreviated PET or PETE), a plastic polymer with many commercial uses.
9	19	3	GDP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with GDP, guanosine 5'-diphosphate.
4	4	1	SCF ubiquitin ligase complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex in which a cullin from the Cul1 subfamily and a RING domain protein form the catalytic core; substrate specificity is conferred by a Skp1 adaptor and an F-box protein. SCF complexes are involved in targeting proteins for degradation by the proteasome. The best characterized complexes are those from yeast and mammals (with core subunits named Cdc53/Cul1, Rbx1/Hrt1/Roc1).
0	1	0	molybdopterin synthase complex	A protein complex that possesses molybdopterin synthase activity. In E. coli, the complex is a heterotetramer consisting of two MoaD and two MoaE subunits.
0	0	2	release from viral latency	The process by which a virus begins to replicate following a latency replication decision (switch).
1	2	0	modulation by virus of host process	The process in which a virus effects a change in the structure or processes of its host organism.
0	1	0	suppression by virus of host apoptotic process	Any viral process that inhibits apoptosis of infected host cells, facilitating prolonged cell survival during viral replication.
0	6	0	modulation by virus of host cellular process	The process in which a virus effects a change in the processes and activities of its host organism.
5	23	32	viral life cycle	A set of processes which all viruses follow to ensure survival; includes attachment and entry of the virus particle, decoding of genome information, translation of viral mRNA by host ribosomes, genome replication, and assembly and release of viral particles containing the genome.
0	0	1	uncoating of virus	The process by which an incoming virus is disassembled in the host cell to release a replication-competent viral genome.
0	0	2	virion attachment to host cell	The process by which a virion protein binds to molecules on the host cellular surface or host cell surface projection.
0	2	1	fusion of virus membrane with host plasma membrane	Fusion of a viral membrane with the host cell membrane during viral entry. Results in release of the virion contents into the cytoplasm.
1	1	2	receptor-mediated endocytosis of virus by host cell	Any receptor-mediated endocytosis that is involved in the uptake of a virus into a host cell; successive instances of virus endocytosis result in the accumulation of virus particles within the cell.
1	3	5	virion assembly	A late phase of the viral life cycle during which all the components necessary for the formation of a mature virion collect at a particular site in the cell and the basic structure of the virus particle is formed.
0	2	0	virus maturation	The refolding and structural rearrangements of virion parts to transition from the intermediate virion to the more mature virion. Maturation usually involves proteolysis events and changes in the folding of the virion proteins. Can occur inside the host cell or after release.
0	1	3	viral release from host cell	The dissemination of mature viral particles from the host cell, e.g. by cell lysis or the budding of virus particles from the cell membrane.
2	2	3	viral genome replication	Any process involved directly in viral genome replication, including viral nucleotide metabolism.
0	1	4	viral translation	A process by which viral mRNA is translated into viral protein, using the host cellular machinery.
4	3	2	viral protein processing	Any protein maturation process achieved by the cleavage of a peptide bond or bonds within a viral protein.
13	33	37	viral transcription	The process by which a viral genome, or part of a viral genome, is transcribed within the host cell.
1	1	0	early viral transcription	The first phase of viral transcription that occurs after entry of the virus into the host cell, but prior to viral genome replication. It involves the transcription of genes for non-structural proteins, and for lytic viruses, the early gene products are involved in establishing control over the host cell.
2	2	0	late viral transcription	The transcription of the final group of viral genes of the viral life cycle, following middle transcription, or where middle transcription doesn't occur, following early transcription. Involves the transcription of genes encoding structural proteins.
1	0	0	transformation of host cell by virus	A virus-induced cellular transformation resulting in immortalized cells, or cells capable of indefinite replication.
1	0	0	male germ-line sex determination	The determination of sex and sexual phenotype in a male organism's germ line.
0	0	1	pyrimidine nucleotide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with pyrimidine nucleotide, any compound consisting of a pyrimidine nucleoside esterified with (ortho)phosphate.
1	1	0	DNA N-glycosylase activity	Catalysis of the removal of damaged bases by cleaving the N-C1' glycosidic bond between the target damaged DNA base and the deoxyribose sugar. The reaction releases a free base and leaves an apurinic/apyrimidinic (AP) site.
0	0	1	myristoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a myristoyl (CH3-[CH2]12-CO-) group to an acceptor molecule.
0	1	0	benzaldehyde dehydrogenase [NAD(P)+] activity	Catalysis of the reaction: benzaldehyde + NAD(P)+ + H2O = benzoate + NAD(P)H + H+.
1	0	0	phenanthrene-9,10-epoxide hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phenanthrene-9,10-oxide + H2O = trans-9,10-dihydrodiolphenanthrene.
0	1	0	deoxynucleoside kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 2'-deoxynucleoside = ADP + 2'-deoxynucleoside 5'-phosphate.
2	0	0	ADP-sugar diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ADP-sugar + H2O = AMP + sugar 1-phosphate.
0	1	0	aminobutyraldehyde dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 4-aminobutanal + NAD+ + H2O = 4-aminobutanoate + NADH + 2 H+.
0	0	1	mannokinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + D-mannose = ADP + D-mannose 6-phosphate.
1	0	0	snRNA-activating protein complex	A protein complex that recognizes the proximal sequence element of RNA polymerase II and III snRNA promoters.
0	2	1	kinase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a kinase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a substrate molecule.
1	4	2	phosphatase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a phosphatase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the removal of a phosphate group from a substrate molecule.
1	0	0	kinase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a kinase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a substrate molecule.
1	0	1	kinase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a kinase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a substrate molecule.
0	1	0	phosphatase activator activity	Increases the activity of a phosphatase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the removal of a phosphate group from a substrate molecule.
1	1	2	phosphatase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a phosphatase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the removal of a phosphate group from a substrate molecule.
1	2	2	deacetylase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of an acetyl group or groups from a substrate molecule.
1	3	4	intermediate filament binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an intermediate filament, a distinct elongated structure, characteristically 10 nm in diameter, that occurs in the cytoplasm of higher eukaryotic cells. Intermediate filaments form a fibrous system, composed of chemically heterogeneous subunits and involved in mechanically integrating the various components of the cytoplasmic space.
12	10	10	regulation of lipid metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving lipids.
1	1	2	regulation of fatty acid metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving fatty acids.
1	0	0	regulation of steroid metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving steroids.
38	34	27	cytokine-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a cytokine to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
8	7	2	regulation of metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways within a cell or an organism.
1	0	2	transmission of nerve impulse	The neurological system process in which a signal is transmitted through the nervous system by a combination of action potential propagation and synaptic transmission.
0	0	1	neuronal action potential propagation	The propagation of an action potential along an axon, away from the soma.
0	0	4	neuronal action potential	An action potential that occurs in a neuron.
3	2	1	regulation of vasoconstriction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of reductions in the diameter of blood vessels.
0	0	1	proprioception	The series of events by which an organism senses the position, location, orientation, and movement of the body and its parts. Proprioception is mediated by proprioceptors, sensory nerve terminals found in muscles, tendons, and joint capsules, which give information concerning movements and position of the body. The receptors in the labyrinth are sometimes also considered proprioceptors.
1	3	4	sensory perception of pain	The series of events required for an organism to receive a painful stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. Pain is medically defined as the physical sensation of discomfort or distress caused by injury or illness, so can hence be described as a harmful stimulus which signals current (or impending) tissue damage. Pain may come from extremes of temperature, mechanical damage, electricity or from noxious chemical substances. This is a neurological process.
0	1	2	centromeric DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a centromere, a region of chromosome where the spindle fibers attach during mitosis and meiosis.
1	0	2	citrulline biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of citrulline, N5-carbamoyl-L-ornithine, an alpha amino acid not found in proteins.
0	0	1	methylglyoxal biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of methylglyoxal, CH3-CO-CHO, the aldehyde of pyruvic acid.
0	0	1	lactate biosynthetic process from pyruvate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of lactate from other compounds, including pyruvate.
0	1	0	lactate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of lactate, the anion of lactic acid.
1	0	0	carnitine metabolic process, CoA-linked	The chemical reactions and pathways involving carnitine, where metabolism is linked to CoA.
0	0	1	glucose 1-phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glucose 1-phosphate, a monophosphorylated derivative of glucose with the phosphate group attached to C-1.
1	0	1	N-acetylneuraminate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of N-acetylneuraminate, the anion of 5-(acetylamino)-3,5-dideoxy-D-glycero-D-galacto-non-3-ulosonic acid.
0	1	0	glycine biosynthetic process from serine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycine from other compounds, including serine.
0	0	1	glycine biosynthetic process, by transamination of glyoxylate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycine by the transamination of glyoxylate.
0	0	1	L-methionine salvage from S-adenosylmethionine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of L-methionine from S-adenosylmethionine.
1	0	0	D-ribose catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of D-ribose (ribo-pentose).
0	1	1	pentose biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a pentose, any monosaccharide with a chain of five carbon atoms in the molecule.
2	0	0	cysteine biosynthetic process via cystathionine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cysteine, via the intermediate cystathionine.
1	0	0	cysteine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cysteine, 2-amino-3-mercaptopropanoic acid.
2	1	0	transsulfuration	The interconversion of homocysteine and cysteine via cystathionine. In contrast with enteric bacteria and mammals, Saccharomyces cerevisiae has two transsulfuration pathways employing two separate sets of enzymes.
1	0	0	fatty acid elongation, saturated fatty acid	Elongation of a saturated fatty acid chain.
2	2	2	arachidonic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving arachidonic acid, a straight chain fatty acid with 20 carbon atoms and four double bonds per molecule. Arachidonic acid is the all-Z-(5,8,11,14)-isomer.
2	1	1	leukotriene biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of leukotriene, a pharmacologically active substance derived from a polyunsaturated fatty acid, such as arachidonic acid.
2	1	1	cyclooxygenase pathway	The chemical reactions and pathways by which prostaglandins are formed from arachidonic acid, and in which prostaglandin-endoperoxide synthase (cyclooxygenase) catalyzes the committed step in the conversion of arachidonic acid to the prostaglandin-endoperoxides PGG2 and PGH2.
1	0	0	lipoxygenase pathway	The chemical reactions and pathways by which an unsaturated fatty acid (such as arachidonic acid or linolenic acid) is converted to other compounds, and in which the first step is hydroperoxide formation catalyzed by lipoxygenase.
3	1	0	epoxygenase P450 pathway	The chemical reactions and pathways by which arachidonic acid is converted to other compounds including epoxyeicosatrienoic acids and dihydroxyeicosatrienoic acids.
1	0	0	galactolipid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of galactolipids, any glycolipid containing one of more residues of galactose and/or N-acetylgalactosamine.
0	1	1	galactose catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of galactose, the aldohexose galacto-hexose.
4	2	0	fatty acid oxidation	The removal of one or more electrons from a fatty acid, with or without the concomitant removal of a proton or protons, by reaction with an electron-accepting substance, by addition of oxygen or by removal of hydrogen.
0	0	1	acetate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of acetate, the anion of acetic acid.
0	0	1	sulfur oxidation	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting the addition of oxygen to elemental sulfur.
0	0	1	acetyl-CoA biosynthetic process from acetate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of acetyl-CoA from acetate, either directly or via acetylphosphate.
1	4	1	removal of superoxide radicals	Any process, acting at the cellular level, involved in removing superoxide radicals (O2-) from a cell or organism, e.g. by conversion to dioxygen (O2) and hydrogen peroxide (H2O2).
2	3	1	triglyceride biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a triglyceride, any triester of glycerol.
6	3	1	triglyceride catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a triglyceride, any triester of glycerol.
0	1	0	aromatic compound catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of aromatic compounds, any substance containing an aromatic carbon ring.
0	1	0	tryptophan catabolic process to kynurenine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of tryptophan into other compounds, including kynurenine.
0	1	0	tryptophan catabolic process to acetyl-CoA	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of tryptophan into other compounds, including acetyl-CoA.
1	0	1	L-cysteine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of L-cysteine, the L-enantiomer of 2-amino-3-mercaptopropanoic acid, i.e. (2R)-2-amino-3-mercaptopropanoic acid.
1	1	0	4-hydroxyproline catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of 4-hydroxyproline, C5H9NO3, a derivative of the amino acid proline.
0	0	1	L-methionine salvage from methylthioadenosine	The generation of L-methionine (2-amino-4-(methylthio)butanoic acid) from methylthioadenosine.
1	0	0	S-adenosylhomocysteine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of S-adenosylhomocysteine, forming homocysteine and then methionine.
0	0	1	lactate oxidation	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the conversion of lactate to other compounds, such as pyruvate, with concomitant loss of electrons.
2	0	1	taurine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving taurine (2-aminoethanesulfonic acid), a sulphur-containing amino acid derivative important in the metabolism of fats.
2	1	0	oxalate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of oxalate from one side of a membrane to the other. Oxalate, or ethanedioic acid, occurs in many plants and is highly toxic to animals.
1	1	0	oxalate transport	The directed movement of oxalate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Oxalate, or ethanedioic acid, occurs in many plants and is highly toxic to animals.
0	0	1	toxin transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a toxin from one side of a membrane to the other. A toxin is a poisonous compound (typically a protein) that is produced by cells or organisms and that can cause disease when introduced into the body or tissues of an organism.
0	0	1	protein metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a protein. Includes protein modification.
0	0	1	propionate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of propionate, the anion derived from propionic acid.
1	0	0	propionate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of propionate, the anion derived from propionic acid.
1	0	0	arginine catabolic process to ornithine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of arginine into other compounds, including ornithine.
0	2	0	glutamate catabolic process to aspartate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glutamate into other compounds, including aspartate.
0	2	0	glutamate catabolic process to 2-oxoglutarate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glutamate into other compounds, including 2-oxoglutarate.
0	0	2	histidine catabolic process to glutamate and formamide	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of histidine into other compounds, including glutamate and formamide.
0	0	2	histidine catabolic process to glutamate and formate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of histidine into other compounds, including glutamate and formate.
0	0	2	glycerol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glycerol, 1,2,3-propanetriol, a sweet, hygroscopic, viscous liquid, widely distributed in nature as a constituent of many lipids.
1	0	0	butyrate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any butyrate, the anions of butyric acid (butanoic acid), a saturated, unbranched aliphatic acid.
1	0	0	2-oxobutyrate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of 2-oxobutyrate, the anion of the organic acid 2-oxobutyric acid, which contains a ketone group on carbon 2.
0	2	0	short-chain fatty acid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of fatty acids with a chain length of less than C6.
1	0	0	urea metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving urea, the water soluble compound O=C-(NH2)2.
1	0	0	urate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of urate, the anion of uric acid, 2,6,8-trioxypurine.
1	1	0	glucuronate catabolic process to xylulose 5-phosphate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glucuronate into other compounds, including xylulose 5-phosphate.
1	4	1	NAD metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide (NAD), a coenzyme present in most living cells and derived from the B vitamin nicotinic acid.
0	0	1	glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate, an important intermediate in glycolysis.
2	0	0	ribose phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ribose phosphate, any phosphorylated ribose sugar.
1	0	0	choline metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving choline (2-hydroxyethyltrimethylammonium), an amino alcohol that occurs widely in living organisms as a constituent of certain types of phospholipids and in the neurotransmitter acetylcholine.
0	1	0	protein-cysteine S-myristoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a myristoyl (systematic name, tetradecanoyl) group to a sulfur atom on a cysteine residue of a protein molecule in the reaction: tetradecanoyl-CoA + L-cysteinyl-[protein] = CoA + S-tetradecanoyl-L-cysteinyl-[protein].
0	2	1	protein-cysteine S-palmitoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a palmitoyl (systematic name, hexadecanoyl) group to a sulfur atom on the cysteine of a protein molecule, in the reaction hexadecanoyl-CoA + L-cysteinyl-[protein] = CoA + S-hexadecanoyl-L-cysteinyl-[protein].
4	7	7	calcium-mediated signaling	Any intracellular signal transduction in which the signal is passed on within the cell via calcium ions.
2	1	1	cellular homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state at the level of the cell.
8	9	4	antimicrobial humoral response	An immune response against microbes mediated through a body fluid. Examples of this process are seen in the antimicrobial humoral response of Drosophila melanogaster and Mus musculus.
7	3	9	antibacterial humoral response	An immune response against bacteria mediated through a body fluid. Examples of this process are the antibacterial humoral responses in Mus musculus and Drosophila melanogaster.
0	1	1	antifungal humoral response	An immune response against a fungus mediated through a body fluid. An example of this process is the antifungal humoral response in Drosophila melanogaster.
1	0	0	pentacyclic triterpenoid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving pentacyclic triterpenoid compounds, terpenoids with six isoprene units and 5 carbon rings.
1	1	2	carboxylic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving carboxylic acids, any organic acid containing one or more carboxyl (COOH) groups or anions (COO-).
1	0	0	immunoglobulin receptor activity	Combining with the Fc region of an immunoglobulin protein and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	1	0	IgE receptor activity	Combining with an immunoglobulin of the IgE isotype via the Fc region, and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
3	1	4	proteasome core complex, alpha-subunit complex	The proteasome core subcomplex that constitutes the two outer rings of the proteasome core complex. An example of this component is found in Mus musculus.
3	2	3	proteasome core complex, beta-subunit complex	The proteasome core subcomplex that constitutes the two inner rings of the proteasome core complex. An example of this component is found in Mus musculus.
0	1	0	NEDD8 activating enzyme activity	Catalysis of the initiation of the NEDD8 (RUB1) conjugation cascade.
0	1	0	NEDD8-specific protease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of NEDD8, a small ubiquitin-related modifier, from previously neddylated substrates.
1	0	0	ubiquitin-like protein transferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a ubiquitin-like from one protein to another via the reaction X-ULP + Y --> Y-ULP + X, where both X-ULP and Y-ULP are covalent linkages. ULP represents a ubiquitin-like protein.
0	4	3	SUMO transferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of SUMO from one protein to another via the reaction X-SUMO + Y --> Y-SUMO + X, where both X-SUMO and Y-SUMO are covalent linkages.
0	1	0	procollagen-proline 3-dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: procollagen L-proline + 2-oxoglutarate + O2 = procollagen trans-3-hydroxy-L-proline + succinate + CO2.
0	1	0	tubulin N-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + (alpha-tubulin) L-lysine = CoA + (alpha-tubulin) N6-acetyl-L-lysine.
0	1	0	peptide cross-linking via chondroitin 4-sulfate glycosaminoglycan	The formation of a cross-link between peptide chains mediated by a chondroitin 4-sulfate glycosaminoglycan that originates from a typical O-glycosidic link to serine of one chain; the other chain is esterified, via the alpha-carbon of its C-terminal Asp, to C-6 of an internal N-acetylgalactosamine of the glycosaminoglycan chain.
1	1	0	quinolinate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of quinolinate, the anion of quinolinic acid, also known as 2,3-pyridinedicarboxylic acid.
1	0	0	bromide peroxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 R-H + 2 bromide + hydrogen peroxide = 2 R-Br + 2 H2O. Enzymes with this activity often accept other halide ions as substrates, including chloride and iodide.
15	0	0	immunoglobulin complex	A protein complex that in its canonical form is composed of two identical immunoglobulin heavy chains and two identical immunoglobulin light chains, held together by disulfide bonds and sometimes complexed with additional proteins. An immunoglobulin complex may be embedded in the plasma membrane or present in the extracellular space, in mucosal areas or other tissues, or circulating in the blood or lymph.
0	2	0	B cell receptor complex	An immunoglobulin complex that is present in the plasma membrane of B cells and that in its canonical form is composed of two identical immunoglobulin heavy chains and two identical immunoglobulin light chains and a signaling subunit, a heterodimer of the Ig-alpha and Ig-beta proteins.
2	5	4	oxygen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with oxygen (O2).
1	1	0	oxygen sensor activity	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with and responding, e.g. by conformational change, to changes in the cellular level of oxygen (O2).
3	11	8	stem cell population maintenance	The process by which an organism or tissue maintains a population of stem cells of a single type.  This can be achieved by a number of mechanisms: stem cell asymmetric division maintains stem cell numbers; stem cell symmetric division increases them; maintenance of a stem cell niche maintains the conditions for commitment to the stem cell fate for some types of stem cell; stem cells may arise de novo from other cell types.
0	1	2	aspartic-type endopeptidase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of aspartic-type endopeptidases, enzymes that catalyze the hydrolysis of nonterminal peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain; the optimum reaction pH is below 5 due to an aspartic residue involved in the catalytic process.
0	2	6	ATPase-coupled cation transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + cation(out) = ADP + phosphate + cation(in).
0	0	3	phospholipase A2 inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of the enzyme phospholipase A2.
3	5	1	cytolysis	The rupture of cell membranes and the loss of cytoplasm.
4	6	0	growth factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any growth factor, proteins or polypeptides that stimulate a cell or organism to grow or proliferate.
2	1	0	retinol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with retinol, vitamin A1, 2,6,6-trimethyl-1-(9'-hydroxy-3',7'-dimethylnona-1',3',5',7'-tetraenyl)cyclohex-1-ene, one of the three components that makes up vitamin A. Retinol is an intermediate in the vision cycle and it also plays a role in growth and differentiation.
3	7	5	rRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ribosomal RNA.
1	3	0	L-ascorbic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving L-ascorbic acid, (2R)-2-[(1S)-1,2-dihydroxyethyl]-4-hydroxy-5-oxo-2,5-dihydrofuran-3-olate; L-ascorbic acid is vitamin C and has co-factor and anti-oxidant activities in many species.
2	2	4	calcium channel inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents, or reduces the activity of a calcium channel.
0	1	1	pyrimidine nucleobase biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of pyrimidine nucleobases, 1,3-diazine, organic nitrogenous bases.
0	0	1	cytosine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving cytosine, 4-amino-2-hydroxypyrimidine, a pyrimidine derivative that is one of the five main bases found in nucleic acids; it occurs widely in cytidine derivatives.
0	1	0	thymine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving thymine, 5-methyluracil, one of the two major pyrimidine bases present (as thymidine) in DNA but not found in RNA other than (as ribothymidine) in transfer RNA, where it is a minor base.
2	0	0	IgA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an immunoglobulin of an IgA isotype.
0	2	0	IgE binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an immunoglobulin of the IgE isotype.
3	2	0	IgG binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an immunoglobulin of an IgG isotype.
0	1	0	immunoglobulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an immunoglobulin.
1	3	3	chloride channel inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents, or reduces the activity of a chloride channel.
0	2	3	potassium channel inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents, or reduces the activity of a potassium channel.
0	1	2	sodium channel inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents, or reduces the activity of a sodium channel.
3	3	1	antigen processing and presentation	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses antigen (peptide or lipid) on its cell surface in association with an MHC protein complex.
1	1	2	antigen processing and presentation of endogenous peptide antigen via MHC class I	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of endogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class I protein complex. The peptide antigen is typically, but not always, processed from a whole protein. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
7	19	21	antigen processing and presentation of exogenous peptide antigen via MHC class II	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of exogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class II protein complex. The peptide antigen is typically, but not always, processed from a whole protein.
2	4	3	protein kinase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a protein kinase, an enzyme which phosphorylates a protein.
2	10	7	protein phosphatase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a protein phosphatase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the removal of a phosphate group from a protein substrate molecule.
9	9	7	kinesin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently and stoichiometrically with kinesin, a member of a superfamily of microtubule-based motor proteins that perform force-generating tasks such as organelle transport and chromosome segregation.
1	2	2	axonal transport of mitochondrion	The directed movement of mitochondria along microtubules in nerve cell axons.
6	1	6	extrinsic component of plasma membrane	The component of a plasma membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
8	6	12	extrinsic component of membrane	The component of a membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
37	63	80	enzyme binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any enzyme.
17	19	22	kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a kinase, any enzyme that catalyzes the transfer of a phosphate group.
62	96	111	protein kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein kinase, any enzyme that catalyzes the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a protein substrate.
6	7	14	phosphatase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any phosphatase.
14	21	18	protein phosphatase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein phosphatase.
24	40	61	protein domain specific binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a specific domain of a protein.
6	10	15	syntaxin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a syntaxin, a SNAP receptor involved in the docking of synaptic vesicles at the presynaptic zone of a synapse.
0	0	1	cyclin-dependent protein kinase activating kinase holoenzyme complex	A cyclin-dependent kinase activating kinase complex capable of activating cyclin-dependent kinases by threonine phosphorylation, thus regulating cell cycle progression. consists of a kinase, cyclin and optional assembly factors, in human CDK7, CCNH and MNAT1. CAK activity is itself regulated throughout the cell cycle by T-loop phosphorylation of its kinase component (CDK7 in human). Phosphorylation of serine residues during mitosis inactivates the enzyme. Also capable of CAK phosphorylating the carboxyl-terminal domain (CTD) of RNA polymerase II and other transcription activating proteins, as part of the general transcription factor TFIIH.
0	1	2	nuclear cyclin-dependent protein kinase holoenzyme complex	Cyclin-dependent protein kinase (CDK) complex found in the nucleus.
1	1	2	structural constituent of myelin sheath	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of the myelin sheath of a nerve.
1	0	0	cyclin-dependent protein kinase activating kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein; increases the activity of a cyclin-dependent protein kinase (CDK).
2	4	2	lipid storage	The accumulation and maintenance in cells or tissues of lipids, compounds soluble in organic solvents but insoluble or sparingly soluble in aqueous solvents. Lipid reserves can be accumulated during early developmental stages for mobilization and utilization at later stages of development.
2	1	0	second-messenger-mediated signaling	Any intracellular signal transduction in which the signal is passed on within the cell via a second messenger; a small molecule or ion that can be quickly generated or released from intracellular stores, and can diffuse within the cell. Second-messenger signaling includes production or release of the second messenger, and effectors downstream of the second messenger that further transmit the signal within the cell.
6	3	7	cAMP-mediated signaling	Any intracellular signal transduction in which the signal is passed on within the cell via cyclic AMP (cAMP). Includes production of cAMP, and downstream effectors that further transmit the signal within the cell.
3	3	0	cGMP-mediated signaling	Any intracellular signal transduction in which the signal is passed on within the cell via cyclic GMP (cGMP). Includes production of cGMP, and downstream effectors that further transmit the signal within the cell.
1	0	4	modification-dependent protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent modification of the target protein.
1	1	0	sexual reproduction	A reproduction process that creates a new organism by combining the genetic material of two gametes, which may come from two organisms or from a single organism, in the case of self-fertilizing hermaphrodites, e.g. C. elegans, or self-fertilization in plants. It occurs both in eukaryotes and prokaryotes: in multicellular eukaryotic organisms, an individual is created anew; in prokaryotes, the initial cell has additional or transformed genetic material. In a process called genetic recombination, genetic material (DNA) originating from two gametes join up so that homologous sequences are aligned with each other, and this is followed by exchange of genetic information. After the new recombinant chromosome is formed, it is passed on to progeny.
2	3	1	cytokine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a cytokine, any of a group of proteins that function to control the survival, growth and differentiation of tissues and cells, and which have autocrine and paracrine activity.
2	3	0	C-C chemokine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a C-C chemokine; C-C chemokines do not have an amino acid between the first two cysteines of the characteristic four-cysteine motif.
1	0	1	C-X-C chemokine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a C-X-C chemokine; C-X-C chemokines have a single amino acid between the first two cysteines of the characteristic four cysteine motif.
0	1	0	interleukin-8 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with interleukin-8.
0	1	0	type I interferon binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type I interferon. Type I interferons include the interferon-alpha, beta, delta, epsilon, zeta, kappa, tau, and omega gene families.
0	2	0	interleukin-1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with interleukin-1.
0	1	0	interleukin-11 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with interleukin-11.
4	4	8	translesion synthesis	The replication of damaged DNA by synthesis across a lesion in the template strand; a specialized DNA polymerase or replication complex inserts a defined nucleotide across from the lesion which allows DNA synthesis to continue beyond the lesion. This process can be mutagenic depending on the damaged nucleotide and the inserted nucleotide.
3	2	2	diacylglycerol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with diacylglycerol, a diester of glycerol and two fatty acids.
1	0	0	symbiont-containing vacuole	Membrane-bounded vacuole within a host cell in which a symbiont organism resides. The vacuole membrane is derived from both the host and symbiont.
0	1	0	symbiont-containing vacuole membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a symbiont-containing vacuole, derived from both the host and symbiont.
1	1	1	ciliary pocket membrane	That part of the plasma membrane found in the ciliary pocket (also called flagellar pocket).
1	0	2	hemoglobin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving hemoglobin, including its uptake and utilization.
19	10	7	heme binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with heme, any compound of iron complexed in a porphyrin (tetrapyrrole) ring.
0	0	1	neural fold bending	The morphogenesis of the neural fold elevations that results in the movement of the tips of the elevations towards each other in order to fuse.
1	0	0	floor plate formation	The formation of a ventral region of glial cells in the neural tube that provides inductive signals for the specification of neuronal cell types. The floor plate is evident at the ventral midline by the neural fold stage.
3	6	4	spinal cord development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the spinal cord over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The spinal cord primarily conducts sensory and motor nerve impulses between the brain and the peripheral nervous tissues.
1	0	0	spinal cord dorsal/ventral patterning	The process that regulates the coordinated growth and differentiation that establishes the non-random dorsal-ventral spatial arrangement of the spinal cord.
1	0	0	ventral spinal cord interneuron differentiation	The process in which neuroepithelial cells in the neural tube acquire specialized structural and/or functional features of ventral spinal cord interneurons. Ventral spinal cord interneurons are cells located in the ventral portion of the spinal cord that transmit signals between sensory and motor neurons and are required for reflexive responses. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
0	1	1	dorsal spinal cord development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the dorsal region of the spinal cord over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The dorsal region of the mature spinal cord contains neurons that process and relay sensory input.
1	0	1	ventral spinal cord development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the ventral region of the spinal cord over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The neurons of the ventral region of the mature spinal cord participate in motor output.
1	0	0	spinal cord motor neuron cell fate specification	The process in which a cell becomes capable of differentiating autonomously into a motor neuron in an environment that is neutral with respect to the developmental pathway.
3	1	0	spinal cord motor neuron differentiation	The process in which neuroepithelial cells in the ventral neural tube acquire specialized structural and/or functional features of motor neurons. Motor neurons innervate an effector (muscle or glandular) tissue and are responsible for transmission of motor impulses from the brain to the periphery. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
2	0	0	spinal cord association neuron differentiation	The process in which neuroepithelial cells in the neural tube acquire specialized structural and/or functional features of association neurons. Association neurons are cells located in the dorsal portion of the spinal cord that integrate sensory input. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
1	1	0	spinal cord oligodendrocyte cell differentiation	The process in which neuroepithelial cells in the neural tube acquire specialized structural and/or functional features of oligodendrocytes. Oligodendrocytes are non-neuronal cells. The primary function of oligodendrocytes is the myelination of nerve axons in the central nervous system. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
1	0	0	neural tube patterning	The regionalization process that regulates the coordinated growth that establishes the non-random spatial arrangement of the neural tube.
1	0	0	cell differentiation in hindbrain	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the mature cells of the hindbrain. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
0	1	0	cell proliferation in hindbrain	The multiplication or reproduction of cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population in the hindbrain.
1	0	0	diencephalon development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the diencephalon over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The diencephalon is the paired caudal parts of the prosencephalon from which the thalamus, hypothalamus, epithalamus and subthalamus are derived; these regions regulate autonomic, visceral and endocrine function, and process information directed to the cerebral cortex.
1	0	0	telencephalon development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the telencephalon over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The telencephalon is the paired anteriolateral division of the prosencephalon plus the lamina terminalis from which the olfactory lobes, cerebral cortex, and subcortical nuclei are derived.
2	1	0	corpus callosum morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the corpus callosum are generated and organized. The corpus callosum is a thick bundle of nerve fibers comprising a commissural plate connecting the two cerebral hemispheres. It consists of contralateral axon projections that provides communications between the right and left cerebral hemispheres.
1	2	0	dentate gyrus development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the dentate gyrus over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The dentate gyrus is one of two interlocking gyri of the hippocampus. It contains granule cells, which project to the pyramidal cells and interneurons of the CA3 region of the ammon gyrus.
1	1	0	cranial nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cranial nerves over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The cranial nerves are composed of twelve pairs of nerves that emanate from the nervous tissue of the hindbrain. These nerves are sensory, motor, or mixed in nature, and provide the motor and general sensory innervation of the head, neck and viscera. They mediate vision, hearing, olfaction and taste and carry the parasympathetic innervation of the autonomic ganglia that control visceral functions.
4	5	4	cerebellum development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cerebellum over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The cerebellum is the portion of the brain in the back of the head between the cerebrum and the pons. In mice, the cerebellum controls balance for walking and standing, modulates the force and range of movement and is involved in the learning of motor skills.
1	1	0	olfactory nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the olfactory nerve over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The olfactory nerve is a collection of sensory nerve rootlets that extend down from the olfactory bulb to the olfactory mucosa of the upper parts of the nasal cavity. This nerve conducts odor information to the brainstem.
0	1	0	optic nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the optic nerve over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The sensory optic nerve originates from the bipolar cells of the retina and conducts visual information to the brainstem. The optic nerve exits the back of the eye in the orbit, enters the optic canal, and enters the central nervous system at the optic chiasm (crossing) where the nerve fibers become the optic tract just prior to entering the hindbrain.
1	1	0	midbrain-hindbrain boundary morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the midbrain-hindbrain boundary is generated and organized. The midbrain-hindbrain domain of the embryonic brain is comprised of the mesencephalic vesicle and the first rhombencephalic vesicle at early somitogenesis stages. An organizing center at the boundary patterns the midbrain and hindbrain primordia of the neural plate.
1	0	0	oculomotor nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the oculomotor nerve over time, from its formation to the mature structure. This motor nerve innervates all extraocular muscles except the superior oblique and the lateral rectus muscles. The superior division supplies the levator palpebrae superioris and superior rectus muscles. The inferior division supplies the medial rectus, inferior rectus and inferior oblique muscles. This nerve also innervates the striated muscles of the eyelid. Pupillary constriction and lens movement are mediated by this nerve for near vision. In the orbit the inferior division sends branches that enter the ciliary ganglion where they form functional contacts (synapses) with the ganglion cells. The ganglion cells send nerve fibers into the back of the eye where they travel to ultimately innervate the ciliary muscle and the constrictor pupillae muscle.
1	0	0	trochlear nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the trochlear nerve over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The trochlear nerve is a motor nerve and is the only cranial nerve to exit the brain dorsally. The trochlear nerve innervates the superior oblique muscle.
1	0	0	trigeminal nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the trigeminal nerve over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The trigeminal nerve is composed of three large branches. They are the ophthalmic (V1, sensory), maxillary (V2, sensory) and mandibular (V3, motor and sensory) branches. The sensory ophthalmic branch travels through the superior orbital fissure and passes through the orbit to reach the skin of the forehead and top of the head. The maxillary nerve contains sensory branches that reach the pterygopalatine fossa via the inferior orbital fissure (face, cheek and upper teeth) and pterygopalatine canal (soft and hard palate, nasal cavity and pharynx). The motor part of the mandibular branch is distributed to the muscles of mastication, the mylohyoid muscle and the anterior belly of the digastric. The mandibular nerve also innervates the tensor veli palatini and tensor tympani muscles. The sensory part of the mandibular nerve is composed of branches that carry general sensory information from the mucous membranes of the mouth and cheek, anterior two-thirds of the tongue, lower teeth, skin of the lower jaw, side of the head and scalp and meninges of the anterior and middle cranial fossae.
1	0	0	vestibulocochlear nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the vestibulocochlear nerve over time, from its formation to the mature structure. This sensory nerve innervates the membranous labyrinth of the inner ear. The vestibular branch innervates the vestibular apparatus that senses head position changes relative to gravity. The auditory branch innervates the cochlear duct, which is connected to the three bony ossicles which transduce sound waves into fluid movement in the cochlea.
2	0	0	hindbrain morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the hindbrain is generated and organized. The hindbrain is the region consisting of the medulla, pons and cerebellum. Areas of the hindbrain control motor and autonomic functions.
0	1	1	cerebellum morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the cerebellum is generated and organized. The cerebellum is the portion of the brain in the back of the head between the cerebrum and the pons. The cerebellum controls balance for walking and standing, modulates the force and range of movement and is involved in the learning of motor skills.
0	0	1	cerebellum structural organization	The process that contributes to the act of creating the structural organization of the cerebellum. This process pertains to the physical shaping of a rudimentary structure. The cerebellum is the portion of the brain in the back of the head between the cerebrum and the pons. The cerebellum controls balance for walking and standing, modulates the force and range of movement and is involved in the learning of motor skills.
2	1	4	ventricular system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the brain ventricular system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The brain ventricular system consists of four communicating cavities within the brain that are continuous with the central canal of the spinal cord. These cavities include two lateral ventricles, the third ventricle and the fourth ventricle. Cerebrospinal fluid fills the ventricles and is produced by the choroid plexus.
0	1	0	fourth ventricle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the fourth ventricle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The fourth ventricle is an irregularly shaped cavity in the rhombencephalon, between the medulla oblongata, the pons, and the isthmus in front, and the cerebellum behind. It is continuous with the central canal of the cord below and with the cerebral aqueduct above, and through its lateral and median apertures it communicates with the subarachnoid space.
2	0	0	facial nerve structural organization	The process that contributes to the act of creating the structural organization of the facial nerve. This process pertains to the physical shaping of a rudimentary structure. This sensory and motor nerve supplies the muscles of facial expression and the expression and taste at the anterior two-thirds of the tongue. The principal branches are the superficial opthalmic, buccal, palatine and hyomandibular. The main trunk synapses within pterygopalatine ganglion in the parotid gland and this ganglion then gives of nerve branches which supply the lacrimal gland and the mucous secreting glands of the nasal and oral cavities.
1	1	0	glossopharyngeal nerve morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the glossopharyngeal nerve is generated and organized. Various sensory and motor branches of the glossopharyngeal nerve supply nerve connections to the pharynx and back of the tongue. The branchial motor component contains motor fibers that innervate muscles that elevate the pharynx and larynx, and the tympanic branch supplies parasympathetic fibers to the otic ganglion.
1	0	0	oculomotor nerve formation	The process that gives rise to the oculomotor nerve. This process pertains to the initial formation of a structure from unspecified parts. This motor nerve innervates all extraocular muscles except the superior oblique and the lateral rectus muscles. The superior division supplies the levator palpebrae superioris and superior rectus muscles. The inferior division supplies the medial rectus, inferior rectus and inferior oblique muscles. This nerve also innervates the striated muscles of the eyelid. Pupillary constriction and lens movement are mediated by this nerve for near vision. In the orbit the inferior division sends branches that enter the ciliary ganglion where they form functional contacts (synapses) with the ganglion cells. The ganglion cells send nerve fibers into the back of the eye where they travel to ultimately innervate the ciliary muscle and the constrictor pupillae muscle.
1	0	0	optic nerve morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the optic nerve is generated and organized. The sensory optic nerve originates from the bipolar cells of the retina and conducts visual information to the brainstem. The optic nerve exits the back of the eye in the orbit, enters the optic canal, and enters the central nervous system at the optic chiasm (crossing) where the nerve fibers become the optic tract just prior to entering the hindbrain.
2	0	0	trigeminal nerve structural organization	The process that contributes to the act of creating the structural organization of the oculomotor nerve. This process pertains to the physical shaping of a rudimentary structure. The trigeminal nerve is composed of three large branches. They are the ophthalmic (V1, sensory), maxillary (V2, sensory) and mandibular (V3, motor and sensory) branches. The sensory ophthalmic branch travels through the superior orbital fissure and passes through the orbit to reach the skin of the forehead and top of the head. The maxillary nerve contains sensory branches that reach the pterygopalatine fossa via the inferior orbital fissure (face, cheek and upper teeth) and pterygopalatine canal (soft and hard palate, nasal cavity and pharynx). The motor part of the mandibular branch is distributed to the muscles of mastication, the mylohyoid muscle and the anterior belly of the digastric. The mandibular nerve also innervates the tensor veli palatini and tensor tympani muscles. The sensory part of the mandibular nerve is composed of branches that carry general sensory information from the mucous membranes of the mouth and cheek, anterior two-thirds of the tongue, lower teeth, skin of the lower jaw, side of the head and scalp and meninges of the anterior and middle cranial fossae.
1	0	0	vagus nerve morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the vagus nerve is generated and organized. This nerve is primarily sensory but also has visceromotor components. It originates in the brain stem and controls many autonomic functions of the heart, lungs, stomach, pharynx, larynx, trachea, esophagus and other gastrointestinal tract components. It controls some motor functions such as speech. The sensory branches mediate sensation from the pharynx, larynx, thorax and abdomen; it also innervates taste buds in the epiglottis.
3	1	0	lateral ventricle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the lateral ventricles over time, from the formation to the mature structure. The two lateral ventricles are a cavity in each of the cerebral hemispheres derived from the cavity of the embryonic neural tube. They are separated from each other by the septum pellucidum, and each communicates with the third ventricle by the foramen of Monro, through which also the choroid plexuses of the lateral ventricles become continuous with that of the third ventricle.
3	1	0	nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a nerve over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	third ventricle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the third ventricle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The third ventricle is the narrow cleft inferior to the corpus callosum, within the diencephalon, between the paired thalami. Its floor is formed by the hypothalamus, its anterior wall by the lamina terminalis, and its roof by ependyma, and it communicates with the fourth ventricle by the cerebral aqueduct, and with the lateral ventricles by the interventricular foramina.
0	0	1	cerebellar Purkinje cell layer development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cerebellar Purkinje cell layer over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The Purkinje cell layer lies just underneath the molecular layer of the cerebellar cortex. It contains the neuronal cell bodies of the Purkinje cells that are arranged side by side in a single layer. Candelabrum interneurons are vertically oriented between the Purkinje cells. Purkinje neurons are inhibitory and provide the output of the cerebellar cortex through axons that project into the white matter. Extensive dendritic trees from the Purkinje cells extend upward in a single plane into the molecular layer where they synapse with parallel fibers of granule cells.
1	0	0	cerebellar granular layer development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cerebellar granule layer over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The granular layer is the innermost layer of the cerebellar cortex. This layer contains densely packed small neurons, mostly granule cells. Some Golgi cells are found at the outer border. Granule neurons send parallel fibers to the upper molecular layer, where they synapse with Purkinje cell dendrites. Mossy fibers from the pontine nuclei in the white matter synapse with granule cell axons, Golgi cell axons and unipolar brush interneuron axons at cerebellar glomeruli in the granule cell layer.
1	0	0	nerve maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for a nerve to attain its fully functional state.
1	0	0	cerebellar granular layer morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the cerebellar granular layer is generated and organized. The granular layer is the innermost layer of the cerebellar cortex. This layer contains densely packed small neurons, mostly granule cells. Some Golgi cells are found at the outer border. Granule neurons send parallel fibers to the upper molecular layer, where they synapse with Purkinje cell dendrites. Mossy fibers from the pontine nuclei in the white matter synapse with granule cell axons, Golgi cell axons and unipolar brush interneuron axons at cerebellar glomeruli in the granule cell layer.
1	0	0	cerebellar granular layer structural organization	The process that contributes to the act of creating the structural organization of the cerebellar granule layer. This process pertains to the physical shaping of a rudimentary structure. The granular layer is the innermost layer of the cerebellar cortex. This layer contains densely packed small neurons, mostly granule cells. Some Golgi cells are found at the outer border. Granule neurons send parallel fibers to the upper molecular layer, where they synapse with Purkinje cell dendrites. Mossy fibers from the pontine nuclei in the white matter synapse with granule cell axons, Golgi cell axons and unipolar brush interneuron axons at cerebellar glomeruli in the granule cell layer.
0	0	1	cerebellar granular layer maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for the cerebellar granular layer to attain its fully functional state. The granular layer is the innermost layer of the cerebellar cortex. This layer contains densely packed small neurons, mostly granule cells. Some Golgi cells are found at the outer border. Granule neurons send parallel fibers to the upper molecular layer, where they synapse with Purkinje cell dendrites. Mossy fibers from the pontine nuclei in the white matter synapse with granule cell axons, Golgi cell axons and unipolar brush interneuron axons at cerebellar glomeruli in the granule cell layer.
0	1	0	cerebellar Purkinje cell layer maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for the cerebellar Purkinje cell layer to attain its fully functional state. The Purkinje cell layer lies just underneath the molecular layer of the cerebellar cortex. It contains the neuronal cell bodies of the Purkinje cells that are arranged side by side in a single layer. Candelabrum interneurons are vertically oriented between the Purkinje cells. Purkinje neurons are inhibitory and provide the output of the cerebellar cortex through axons that project into the white matter. Extensive dendritic trees from the Purkinje cells extend upward in a single plane into the molecular layer where they synapse with parallel fibers of granule cells.
1	0	0	cerebellar Purkinje cell layer morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the cerebellar Purkinje cell layer is generated and organized. The Purkinje cell layer lies just underneath the molecular layer of the cerebellar cortex. It contains the neuronal cell bodies of the Purkinje cells that are arranged side by side in a single layer. Candelabrum interneurons are vertically oriented between the Purkinje cells. Purkinje neurons are inhibitory and provide the output of the cerebellar cortex through axons that project into the white matter. Extensive dendritic trees from the Purkinje cells extend upward in a single plane into the molecular layer where they synapse with parallel fibers of granule cells.
1	0	0	cerebellar Purkinje cell layer structural organization	The process that contributes to the act of creating the structural organization of the cerebellar Purkinje cell layer. This process pertains to the physical shaping of a rudimentary structure. The Purkinje cell layer lies just underneath the molecular layer of the cerebellar cortex. It contains the neuronal cell bodies of the Purkinje cells that are arranged side by side in a single layer. Candelabrum interneurons are vertically oriented between the Purkinje cells. Purkinje neurons are inhibitory and provide the output of the cerebellar cortex through axons that project into the white matter. Extensive dendritic trees from the Purkinje cells extend upward in a single plane into the molecular layer where they synapse with parallel fibers of granule cells.
1	0	1	cerebellar cortex development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cerebellar cortex over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The cerebellar cortex is a thin mantle of gray matter that covers the surface of each cerebral hemisphere. It has a characteristic morphology with convolutions (gyri) and crevices (sulci) that have specific functions. Six layers of nerve cells and the nerve pathways that connect them comprise the cerebellar cortex. Together, these regions are responsible for the processes of conscious thought, perception, emotion and memory as well as advanced motor function.
2	0	0	cerebellar cortex morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of the cranial nerves are generated and organized. The cerebellar cortex is a thin mantle of gray matter that covers the surface of each cerebral hemisphere. It has a characteristic morphology with convolutions (gyri) and crevices (sulci) that have specific functions. Six layers of nerve cells and the nerve pathways that connect them comprise the cerebellar cortex. Together, these regions are responsible for the processes of conscious thought, perception, emotion and memory as well as advanced motor function.
0	2	1	cerebellar cortex formation	The process that gives rise to the cerebellar cortex. This process pertains to the initial formation of a structure from unspecified parts. The cerebellar cortex is a thin mantle of gray matter that covers the surface of each cerebral hemisphere. It has a characteristic morphology with convolutions (gyri) and crevices (sulci) that have specific functions. Six layers of nerve cells and the nerve pathways that connect them comprise the cerebellar cortex. Together, these regions are responsible for the processes of conscious thought, perception, emotion and memory as well as advanced motor function.
0	0	1	developmental maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for an anatomical structure, cell or cellular component to attain its fully functional state.
1	3	1	cerebellar Purkinje cell differentiation	The process in which neuroblasts acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the mature cerebellar Purkinje cell. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a neuroblast to a Purkinje cell fate. A Purkinje cell is an inhibitory GABAergic neuron found in the cerebellar cortex that projects to the deep cerebellar nuclei and brain stem.
0	2	0	cerebellar granule cell differentiation	The process in which neuroblasts acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the mature cerebellar granule cell. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a neuroblast to a granule cell fate. A granule cell is a glutamatergic interneuron found in the cerebellar cortex.
0	0	1	principal sensory nucleus of trigeminal nerve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the pontine nucleus over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	cochlear nucleus development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cochlear nucleus over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	1	striatum development	The progression of the striatum over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The striatum is a region of the forebrain consisting of the caudate nucleus, putamen and fundus striati.
0	1	0	limbic system development	The progression of the limbic system over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The limbic system is a collection of structures in the brain involved in emotion, motivation and emotional aspects of memory.
2	5	22	substantia nigra development	The progression of the substantia nigra over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The substantia nigra is the layer of gray substance that separates the posterior parts of the cerebral peduncles (tegmentum mesencephali) from the anterior parts; it normally includes a posterior compact part with many pigmented cells (pars compacta) and an anterior reticular part whose cells contain little pigment (pars reticularis).
0	0	1	amygdala development	The progression of the amygdala over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The amygdala is an almond-shaped set of neurons in the medial temporal lobe of the brain that play a key role in processing emotions such as fear and pleasure.
7	5	12	hippocampus development	The progression of the hippocampus over time from its initial formation until its mature state.
0	1	0	orbitofrontal cortex development	The progression of the orbitofrontal cortex over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The orbitofrontal cortex is a cerebral cortex region located in the frontal lobe.
2	2	2	olfactory bulb development	The progression of the olfactory bulb over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The olfactory bulb coordinates neuronal signaling involved in the perception of smell. It receives input from the sensory neurons and outputs to the olfactory cortex.
0	1	1	striatal medium spiny neuron differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a medium spiny neuron residing in the striatum.
2	0	0	smoothened signaling pathway involved in ventral spinal cord interneuron specification	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a ligand to the transmembrane receptor smoothened in a precursor cell in the ventral spinal cord that contributes to the commitment of the precursor cell to an interneuron fate.
2	0	0	smoothened signaling pathway involved in spinal cord motor neuron cell fate specification	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a ligand to the transmembrane receptor smoothened in a precursor cell in the spinal cord that contributes to the process of a precursor cell becoming capable of differentiating autonomously into a motor neuron in an environment that is neutral with respect to the developmental pathway.
1	0	1	glial cell development	The process aimed at the progression of a glial cell over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
1	0	0	postganglionic parasympathetic fiber development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the postganglionic portion of the parasympathetic fiber over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The parasympathetic fiber is one of the two divisions of the vertebrate autonomic nervous system. Parasympathetic nerves emerge cranially as pre ganglionic fibers from oculomotor, facial, glossopharyngeal and vagus and from the sacral region of the spinal cord. Most neurons are cholinergic and responses are mediated by muscarinic receptors. The parasympathetic system innervates, for example: salivary glands, thoracic and abdominal viscera, bladder and genitalia.
1	0	1	branchiomotor neuron axon guidance	The process in which a branchiomotor neuron growth cone is directed to a specific target site. Branchiomotor neurons are located in the hindbrain and innervate branchial arch-derived muscles that control jaw movements, facial expression, the larynx, and the pharynx.
1	0	0	chemorepulsion of branchiomotor axon	The process in which a branchiomotor neuron growth cone is directed to a specific target site in response to a repulsive chemical cue. Branchiomotor neurons are located in the hindbrain and innervate branchial arch-derived muscles that control jaw movements, facial expression, the larynx, and the pharynx.
0	1	1	cerebral cortex cell migration	The orderly movement of cells from one site to another in the cerebral cortex.
0	1	1	cerebral cortex regionalization	The regionalization process that results in the creation of areas within the cerebral cortex that will direct the behavior of cell migration and differentiation as the cortex develops.
1	0	0	forebrain dorsal/ventral pattern formation	The formation of specific regional progenitor domains along the dorsal-ventral axis in the developing forebrain.
1	0	0	cerebral cortex radially oriented cell migration	The migration of cells in the developing cerebral cortex in which cells move from the ventricular and/or subventricular zone toward the surface of the brain.
0	1	1	cerebral cortex radial glia guided migration	The radial migration of neuronal or glial precursor cells along radial glial cells during the development of the cerebral cortex.
1	0	0	neuronal-glial interaction involved in cerebral cortex radial glia guided migration	The changes in adhesion between neuronal cells and glial cells as a component of the process of cerebral cortex glial-mediated radial cell migration.
1	0	0	cell motility involved in cerebral cortex radial glia guided migration	The movement of a cell along the process of a radial glial cell involved in cerebral cortex glial-mediated radial migration.
1	1	0	extension of a leading process involved in cell motility in cerebral cortex radial glia guided migration	The rearrangements of the microtubule cytoskeleton that result in the extension of a leading process, where this process is involved in the movement of cells along radial glial cells.
0	1	1	nucleokinesis involved in cell motility in cerebral cortex radial glia guided migration	The microtubule-mediated movement of the nucleus that is required for the movement of cells along radial glial fibers as a component of the process of cerebral cortex glial-mediated radial cell migration.
3	2	0	layer formation in cerebral cortex	The detachment of cells from radial glial fibers at the appropriate time when they cease to migrate and form distinct layer in the cerebral cortex.
0	1	0	chemorepulsion involved in postnatal olfactory bulb interneuron migration	The creation and reception of signals that repel olfactory bulb interneurons from the subventricular zone as a component process in tangential migration.
2	0	0	cell proliferation in forebrain	The creation of greater cell numbers in the forebrain due to cell division of progenitor cells.
1	0	1	neuroblast division in subventricular zone	The division of neuroblasts in the subventricular zone of the forebrain. The interneuron precursors that these cells give rise to include adult olfactory bulb interneurons and migrate tangentially.
1	0	0	pyramidal neuron migration	The migration of pyramidal a neuron precursor from the ventricular zone to the correct layer of the cerebral cortex.
1	2	1	hypothalamus development	The progression of the hypothalamus region of the forebrain, from its initial formation to its mature state.
0	1	1	pyramidal neuron development	The progression of a pyramidal neuron from its initial formation to its mature state.
3	1	0	forebrain radial glial cell differentiation	The process in which neuroepithelial cells of the neural tube give rise to radial glial cells, specialized bipotential progenitors cells of the forebrain. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
1	0	0	forebrain ventricular zone progenitor cell division	The mitotic division of a basal progenitor giving rise to two neurons.
0	1	0	Cajal-Retzius cell differentiation	The process in which a neuroblast acquires specialized structural and/or functional features of a Cajal-Retzius cell, one of a transient population of pioneering neurons in the cerebral cortex. These cells are slender bipolar cells of the developing marginal zone. One feature of these cells in mammals is that they express the Reelin gene.
0	0	1	forebrain neuron differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a neuron that will reside in the forebrain.
0	0	1	forebrain neuron development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a neuron that resides in the forebrain, from its initial commitment to its fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
1	0	0	forebrain cell migration	The orderly movement of a cell from one site to another at least one of which is located in the forebrain.
0	0	1	hypothalamus gonadotrophin-releasing hormone neuron development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a hypothalamus gonadotrophin-releasing hormone neuron over time, from initial commitment of its fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
1	0	0	olfactory bulb interneuron differentiation	The process in which a neuroblast acquires specialized features of an interneuron residing in the olfactory bulb.
0	0	1	cerebral cortex GABAergic interneuron development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a cerebral cortex GABAergic interneuron over time, from initial commitment to its fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
1	0	1	cerebral cortex neuron differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a neuron residing in the cerebral cortex.
0	1	0	forebrain astrocyte development	The process aimed at the progression of an astrocyte that resides in the forebrain, from initial commitment of the cell to its fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell. An astrocyte is the most abundant type of glial cell. Astrocytes provide support for neurons and regulate the environment in which they function.
1	1	0	commitment of neuronal cell to specific neuron type in forebrain	The commitment of neuronal precursor cells to become specialized types of neurons in the forebrain.
1	1	0	dorsal/ventral neural tube patterning	The process in which the neural tube is regionalized in the dorsoventral axis.
3	7	2	neural tube development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the neural tube over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The mature structure of the neural tube exists when the tube has been segmented into the forebrain, midbrain, hindbrain and spinal cord regions. In addition neural crest has budded away from the epithelium.
1	1	0	cerebellar granule cell precursor proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of neuroblasts that will give rise to granule cells. A granule cell is a glutamatergic interneuron found in the cerebellar cortex.
0	0	1	radial glia guided migration of cerebellar granule cell	The inward migration of postmitotic granule cells along a radial glial cell from the external granule layer to the internal granule cell layer.
2	0	0	cerebellar granule cell precursor tangential migration	The early migration of granule cell precursors in which cells move orthogonal to the direction of radial migration and ultimately cover the superficial zone of the cerebellar primordium.
2	0	0	smoothened signaling pathway involved in regulation of cerebellar granule cell precursor cell proliferation	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of activation of the transmembrane protein Smoothened in cerebellar granule cells that contributes to the regulation of proliferation of the cells.
1	0	1	positive regulation of cerebellar granule cell precursor proliferation	The process that activates or increases the rate or extent of granule cell precursor proliferation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cerebellar granule cell precursor proliferation	The process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of granule cell precursor proliferation.
0	1	1	radial glia guided migration of Purkinje cell	The migration of postmitotic a Purkinje cell along radial glial cells from the ventricular zone to the Purkinje cell layer.
0	0	1	formation of radial glial scaffolds	The formation of scaffolds from a radial glial cell. The scaffolds are used as a substrate for the radial migration of cells.
1	0	2	central nervous system projection neuron axonogenesis	Generation of a long process of a CNS neuron, that carries efferent (outgoing) action potentials from the cell body towards target cells in a different central nervous system region.
2	2	3	central nervous system neuron development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a neuron whose cell body is located in the central nervous system, from initial commitment of the cell to a neuronal fate, to the fully functional differentiated neuron.
0	0	3	central nervous system neuron axonogenesis	Generation of a long process from a neuron whose cell body resides in the central nervous system. The process carries efferent (outgoing) action potentials from the cell body towards target cells.
2	0	0	corticospinal tract morphogenesis	Generation of a long process of a pyramidal cell, that carries efferent (outgoing) action potentials from the cell body in cerebral cortex layer V towards target cells in the gray matter of the spinal cord. This axonal process is a member of those that make up the corticospinal tract.
2	0	1	anterior commissure morphogenesis	Generation of a long process of a CNS neuron, that carries efferent (outgoing) action potentials from the cell body in one half of the cerebral cortex towards target cells in the contralateral half. This axonal process is a member of those that make up the anterior commissure, a small midline fiber tract that lies at the anterior end of the corpus callosum.
1	0	0	spinal cord ventral commissure morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the spinal cord ventral commissure are generated and organized.
5	1	1	pituitary gland development	The progression of the pituitary gland over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The pituitary gland is an endocrine gland that secretes hormones that regulate many other glands.
2	0	0	adenohypophysis development	The progression of the adenohypophysis over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The adenohypophysis is the anterior part of the pituitary. It secretes a variety of hormones and its function is regulated by the hypothalamus.
3	12	14	cerebral cortex development	The progression of the cerebral cortex over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The cerebral cortex is the outer layered region of the telencephalon.
0	0	1	olfactory cortex development	The progression of the olfactory cortex over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The olfactory cortex is involved in the perception of smell. It receives input from the olfactory bulb and is responsible for the identification of odors.
0	1	0	initiation of neural tube closure	The process in which closure points are established at multiple points and along the neural rostrocaudal axis.
0	0	1	neural plate axis specification	The pattern specification process in which the axes of the nervous system are established.
5	6	2	neurogenesis	Generation of cells within the nervous system.
1	0	1	central nervous system vasculogenesis	The differentiation of endothelial cells from progenitor cells during blood vessel development, and the de novo formation of blood vessels and tubes in the central nervous system. The capillary endothelial cells in the brain are specialized to form the blood-brain barrier.
1	0	3	central nervous system myelination	The process in which neuronal axons and dendrites become coated with a segmented lipid-rich sheath (myelin) to enable faster and more energetically efficient conduction of electrical impulses. The sheath is formed by the cell membranes of oligodendrocytes in the central nervous system. Adjacent myelin segments are separated by a non-myelinated stretch of axon called a node of Ranvier.
3	3	3	myelination in peripheral nervous system	The process in which neuronal axons and dendrites become coated with a segmented lipid-rich sheath (myelin) to enable faster and more energetically efficient conduction of electrical impulses. The sheath is formed by the cell membranes of Schwann cells in the peripheral nervous system. Adjacent myelin segments are separated by a non-myelinated stretch of axon called a node of Ranvier.
0	0	1	pallium cell proliferation in forebrain	The multiplication or reproduction of pallium cells in the forebrain, resulting in the expansion of the cell population.
1	0	0	lateral ganglionic eminence cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of lateral ganglionic eminence cells, resulting in the expansion of the cell population.
0	0	3	interkinetic nuclear migration	The movement of the nucleus of the ventricular zone cell between the apical and the basal zone surfaces. Mitosis occurs when the nucleus is near the apical surface, that is, the lumen of the ventricle.
0	0	2	tangential migration from the subventricular zone to the olfactory bulb	The migration of cells in the telencephalon from the subventricular zone to the olfactory bulb in which cells move orthogonally to the direction of radial migration and do not use radial glial cell processes as substrates for migration.
0	1	1	telencephalon cell migration	The orderly movement of a cell from one site to another at least one of which is located in the telencephalon.
0	2	0	corpus callosum development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the corpus callosum over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The corpus callosum is a thick bundle of nerve fibers comprising a commissural plate connecting the two cerebral hemispheres. It consists of contralateral axon projections that provide communication between the right and left cerebral hemispheres.
1	1	2	regulation of rhodopsin mediated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of rhodopsin-mediated signaling.
0	1	0	hair cycle process	A multicellular organismal process involved in the cyclical phases of growth (anagen), regression (catagen), quiescence (telogen), and shedding (exogen) in the life of a hair; one of the collection or mass of filaments growing from the skin of an animal, and forming a covering for a part of the head or for any part or the whole of the body.
3	1	1	regulation of cell-cell adhesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of attachment of a cell to another cell.
4	3	1	negative regulation of cell-cell adhesion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of cell adhesion to another cell.
1	0	1	positive regulation of cell-cell adhesion	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of cell adhesion to another cell.
1	0	0	reproductive process	A biological process that directly contributes to the process of producing new individuals by one or two organisms. The new individuals inherit some proportion of their genetic material from the parent or parents.
1	2	1	protein maturation by protein folding	The process of assisting in the covalent and noncovalent assembly of single chain polypeptides or multisubunit complexes into the correct tertiary structure that results in the attainment of the full functional capacity of a protein.
0	2	0	ovulation cycle process	A process involved in the sexual cycle seen in females, often with physiologic changes in the endometrium that recur at regular intervals during the reproductive years.
2	7	7	regulation of cell morphogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell morphogenesis. Cell morphogenesis is the developmental process in which the shape of a cell is generated and organized.
0	0	1	mammalian oogenesis stage	A reproductive process that is a step in the formation and maturation of an ovum or female gamete from a primordial female germ cell.
1	0	0	cellular component assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a cellular component.
1	0	2	gland morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a gland are generated and organized.
0	1	0	ribonucleoprotein complex biogenesis	A cellular process that results in the biosynthesis of constituent macromolecules, assembly, and arrangement of constituent parts of a complex containing RNA and proteins. Includes the biosynthesis of the constituent RNA and protein molecules, and those macromolecular modifications that are involved in synthesis or assembly of the ribonucleoprotein complex.
1	1	2	membrane to membrane docking	The initial attachment of a membrane to a target membrane, mediated by proteins protruding from the two membranes. Docking requires only that the membranes come close enough for the proteins to interact and adhere.
1	0	1	protein to membrane docking	The initial attachment of a protein to a target membrane, mediated by a proteins protruding from the target membrane. Docking requires only that the proteins come close enough to interact and adhere.
11	12	3	extracellular matrix disassembly	A process that results in the breakdown of the extracellular matrix.
2	3	2	proteasome accessory complex	A protein complex, that caps one or both ends of the proteasome core complex and regulates entry into, or exit from, the proteasome core complex.
8	15	15	cytosolic large ribosomal subunit	The large subunit of a ribosome located in the cytosol.
11	21	25	cytosolic ribosome	A ribosome located in the cytosol.
9	12	15	cytosolic small ribosomal subunit	The small subunit of a ribosome located in the cytosol.
0	1	1	wide pore channel activity	Enables the transport of a solute across a membrane via a large pore, un-gated channel. Examples include gap junctions, which transport substances from one cell to another; and porins which transport substances in and out of bacteria, mitochondria and chloroplasts.
0	1	1	voltage-gated cation channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a cation by a voltage-gated channel. A cation is a positively charged ion. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
0	0	1	glutamate-gated calcium ion channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a channel that opens when glutamate has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
8	6	9	transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a substance, usually a specific substance or a group of related substances, from one side of a membrane to the other.
2	0	2	regulation of transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transmembrane transporter activity.
1	0	0	electron transport chain	A process in which a series of electron carriers operate together to transfer electrons from donors to any of several different terminal electron acceptors to generate a transmembrane electrochemical gradient.
2	1	2	respiratory electron transport chain	A process in which a series of electron carriers operate together to transfer electrons from donors such as NADH and FADH2 to any of several different terminal electron acceptors to generate a transmembrane electrochemical gradient.
0	2	0	signal transduction involved in regulation of gene expression	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gene expression as a consequence of a process in which a signal is released and/or conveyed from one location to another.
0	0	1	termination of signal transduction	The signaling process in which signal transduction is brought to an end rather than being reversibly modulated.
2	0	0	MHC class Ib protein complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the class Ib major histocompatibility complex.
2	2	6	MHC class II protein complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the class II major histocompatibility complex.
3	0	0	MHC class Ib protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with major histocompatibility complex class Ib molecules.
3	2	1	CD40 signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the cell surface receptor CD40 to one of its physiological ligands, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	0	neuronal signal transduction	The process in which an activated neuronal cell receptor conveys information down a signaling pathway, resulting in a change in the function or state of a cell. This process may be intracellular or intercellular.
0	0	1	regulation of signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a signaling process.
0	1	1	signaling	The entirety of a process in which information is transmitted within a biological system. This process begins with an active signal and ends when a cellular response has been triggered.
0	0	2	metal ion transport	The directed movement of metal ions, any metal ion with an electric charge, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	cellular cation homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of cations at the level of a cell.
1	0	7	cellular potassium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of potassium ions at the level of a cell.
1	1	1	TRAPP complex	A large complex that acts as a tethering factor involved in transporting vesicles from the ER through the Golgi to the plasma membrane. A TRAPP (transport protein particle) complex has a core set of proteins which are joined by specific subunits depending on the cellular component where a given TRAPP complex is active.
3	5	10	establishment of cell polarity	The specification and formation of anisotropic intracellular organization or cell growth patterns.
0	3	4	maintenance of cell polarity	The maintenance of established anisotropic intracellular organization or cell growth patterns.
2	3	1	CCR4-NOT complex	The Ccr4-Not complex is an eukaryotically conserved deadenylase that can initiate cytoplasmic mRNA decay, and reduce translation by releasing poly(A)-binding protein (Pab1/PABPC1). Ccr4-Not contains seven core subunits, including two poly(A)-specific exonucleases, Ccr4/CNOT6/CNOT6L and Caf1/Pop2/CNOT7/CNOT8.
1	1	0	CCR4-NOT core complex	The core of the CCR4-NOT complex. In Saccharomyces the CCR4-NOT core complex comprises Ccr4p, Caf1p, Caf40p, Caf130p, Not1p, Not2p, Not3p, Not4p, and Not5p.
5	2	8	myofibril	The contractile element of skeletal and cardiac muscle; a long, highly organized bundle of actin, myosin, and other proteins that contracts by a sliding filament mechanism.
8	4	15	sarcomere	The repeating unit of a myofibril in a muscle cell, composed of an array of overlapping thick and thin filaments between two adjacent Z discs.
14	8	47	Z disc	Platelike region of a muscle sarcomere to which the plus ends of actin filaments are attached.
4	8	4	extracellular matrix structural constituent conferring tensile strength	A constituent of the extracellular matrix that enables the matrix to resist longitudinal stress.
1	3	1	extracellular matrix structural constituent conferring compression resistance	A constituent of the extracellular matrix that enables the matrix to resist compressive forces; often a proteoglycan.
3	2	0	extracellular matrix constituent conferring elasticity	A component of the extracellular matrix that enables the matrix to recoil after transient stretching.
22	49	55	lamellipodium	A thin sheetlike process extended by the leading edge of a migrating cell or extending cell process; contains a dense meshwork of actin filaments.
0	0	1	actin filament-based process	Any cellular process that depends upon or alters the actin cytoskeleton, that part of the cytoskeleton comprising actin filaments and their associated proteins.
4	8	3	cell projection organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a prolongation or process extending from a cell, e.g. a flagellum or axon.
2	2	7	cell projection assembly	Formation of a prolongation or process extending from a cell, e.g. a flagellum or axon.
2	7	11	lamellipodium assembly	Formation of a lamellipodium, a thin sheetlike extension of the surface of a migrating cell.
1	1	5	microvillus assembly	Formation of a microvillus, a thin cylindrical membrane-covered projection on the surface of a cell.
1	0	0	microvillar actin bundle assembly	Assembly of the parallel bundle of actin filaments at the core of a microvillus.
0	2	2	microspike assembly	Formation of a microspike, a dynamic, actin-rich projection extending from the surface of a migrating animal cell.
21	34	44	actin cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising actin filaments and their associated proteins.
0	0	1	actin filament reorganization involved in cell cycle	The cell cycle process in which rearrangement of the spatial distribution of actin filaments and associated proteins occurs.
9	10	3	actin filament polymerization	Assembly of actin filaments by the addition of actin monomers to a filament.
0	4	7	actin filament depolymerization	Disassembly of actin filaments by the removal of actin monomers from a filament.
0	1	3	actin filament fragmentation	The severing of actin filaments into numerous short fragments, usually mediated by actin severing proteins.
1	1	1	parallel actin filament bundle assembly	Assembly of actin filament bundles in which the filaments are tightly packed (approximately 10-20 nm apart) and oriented with the same polarity.
1	0	0	actin modification	Covalent modification of an actin molecule.
3	6	7	actin filament-based movement	Movement of organelles or other particles along actin filaments, or sliding of actin filaments past each other, mediated by motor proteins.
8	4	13	muscle filament sliding	The sliding of actin thin filaments and myosin thick filaments past each other in muscle contraction. This involves a process of interaction of myosin located on a thick filament with actin located on a thin filament. During this process ATP is split and forces are generated.
6	7	2	vesicle transport along actin filament	Movement of a vesicle along an actin filament, mediated by motor proteins.
30	40	38	cell junction	A cellular component that forms a specialized region of connection between two or more cells, or between a cell and the extracellular matrix, or between two membrane-bound components of a cell, such as flagella.
1	1	3	cell-substrate junction	A cell junction that forms a connection between a cell and the extracellular matrix.
0	2	4	hemidesmosome	A cell-substrate junction (attachment structure) found in epithelial cells that links intermediate filaments to extracellular matrices via transmembrane complexes. In vertebrates, hemidesmosomes mediate contact between the basal side of epithelial cells and the basal lamina. In C. elegans, hemidesmosomes connect epithelial cells to distinct extracellular matrices on both the apical and basal cell surfaces.
3	4	6	desmosome	A cell-cell junction in which: on the cytoplasmic surface of each interacting plasma membrane is a dense plaque composed of a mixture of intracellular anchor proteins; a bundle of keratin intermediate filaments is attached to the surface of each plaque; transmembrane adhesion proteins of the cadherin family bind to the plaques and interact through their extracellular domains to hold the adjacent membranes together by a Ca2+-dependent mechanism.
0	0	3	L-malate dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (S)-malate + NAD+ = oxaloacetate + NADH + H+.
1	1	1	mitochondrial crista	Any of the inward folds of the mitochondrial inner membrane. Their number, extent, and shape differ in mitochondria from different tissues and organisms. They appear to be devices for increasing the surface area of the mitochondrial inner membrane, where the enzymes of electron transport and oxidative phosphorylation are found. Their shape can vary with the respiratory state of the mitochondria.
1	0	0	insulin processing	The formation of mature insulin by proteolysis of the precursor preproinsulin. The signal sequence is first cleaved from preproinsulin to form proinsulin; proinsulin is then cleaved to release the C peptide, leaving the A and B chains of mature insulin linked by disulfide bridges.
4	2	0	regulation of mitotic metaphase/anaphase transition	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the cell cycle process in which a cell progresses from metaphase to anaphase during mitosis, triggered by the activation of the anaphase promoting complex by Cdc20/Sleepy homolog which results in the degradation of Securin.
0	0	1	peptide hormone secretion	The regulated release of a peptide hormone from a cell.
2	1	5	insulin secretion	The regulated release of proinsulin from secretory granules accompanied by cleavage of proinsulin to form mature insulin. In vertebrates, insulin is secreted from B granules in the B cells of the vertebrate pancreas and from insulin-producing cells in insects.
0	1	0	protein repair	The process of restoring a protein to its original state after damage by such things as oxidation or spontaneous decomposition of residues.
8	11	7	hemopoiesis	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the myeloid and lymphoid derived organ/tissue systems of the blood and other parts of the body over time, from formation to the mature structure. The site of hemopoiesis is variable during development, but occurs primarily in bone marrow or kidney in many adult vertebrates.
0	2	0	lymphocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized precursor cell acquires specialized features of a lymphocyte. A lymphocyte is a leukocyte commonly found in the blood and lymph that has the characteristics of a large nucleus, a neutral staining cytoplasm, and prominent heterochromatin.
1	4	2	myeloid cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized myeloid precursor cell acquires the specialized features of any cell of the myeloid leukocyte, megakaryocyte, thrombocyte, or erythrocyte lineages.
3	5	6	regulation of endocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of endocytosis.
1	2	2	natural killer cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a natural killer cell in response to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
0	0	2	water homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of water within an organism or cell.
1	0	0	HLA-A specific inhibitory MHC class I receptor activity	Combining with a MHC class I molecule of the HLA-A subclass to mediate signaling that inhibits activation of a lymphocyte.
1	0	0	HLA-A specific activating MHC class I receptor activity	Combining with a MHC class I molecule of the HLA-A subclass to mediate signaling that activates a lymphocyte.
1	0	0	HLA-B specific inhibitory MHC class I receptor activity	Combining with a MHC class I molecule of the HLA-B subclass to mediate signaling that inhibits activation of a lymphocyte.
5	4	0	regulation of Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of the Wnt signal transduction pathway.
1	1	1	membrane coat	Any of several different proteinaceous coats that can associate with membranes. Membrane coats include those formed by clathrin plus an adaptor complex, the COPI and COPII complexes, and possibly others. They are found associated with membranes on many vesicles as well as other membrane features such as pits and perhaps tubules.
0	0	2	clathrin coat	A membrane coat found on coated pits and some coated vesicles; consists of polymerized clathrin triskelions, each comprising three clathrin heavy chains and three clathrin light chains, linked to the membrane via one of the AP adaptor complexes.
0	0	1	vesicle coat	A membrane coat found on a coated vesicle.
0	1	2	AP-1 adaptor complex	A heterotetrameric AP-type membrane coat adaptor complex that consists of beta1, gamma, mu1 and sigma1 subunits and links clathrin to the membrane surface of a vesicle; vesicles with AP-1-containing coats are normally found primarily in the trans-Golgi network. In at least humans, the AP-1 complex can be heterogeneric due to the existence of multiple subunit isoforms encoded by different genes (gamma1 and gamma2, mu1A and mu1B, and sigma1A, sigma1B and sigma1C).
0	1	2	AP-2 adaptor complex	A heterotetrameric AP-type membrane coat adaptor complex that consists of alpha, beta2, mu2 and sigma2 subunits, and links clathrin to the membrane surface of a vesicle, and the cargo receptors during receptor/clathrin mediated endocytosis. Vesicles with AP-2-containing coats are normally found primarily near the plasma membrane, on endocytic vesicles. In at least humans, the AP-2 complex can be heterogeneric due to the existence of multiple subunit isoforms encoded by different alpha genes (alphaA and alphaC).
0	0	3	AP-3 adaptor complex	A heterotetrameric AP-type membrane coat adaptor complex that consists of beta3, delta, mu3 and sigma3 subunits and is found associated with endosomal membranes. AP-3 does not appear to associate with clathrin in all organisms. In at least humans, the AP-3 complex can be heterogeneric due to the existence of multiple subunit isoforms encoded by different genes (beta3A and beta3B, mu3A and mu3B, and sigma3A and sigma3B).
0	1	0	AP-4 adaptor complex	An AP-type membrane coat adaptor complex that consists of beta4, epsilon, mu4 and sigma4 subunits and is found associated with membranes in the trans-Golgi network; it is not clear whether AP-4 forms clathrin coats in vivo.
1	4	1	clathrin vesicle coat	A clathrin coat found on a vesicle.
4	1	2	COPI vesicle coat	One of two multimeric complexes that forms a membrane vesicle coat. The mammalian COPI subunits are called alpha-, beta-, beta'-, gamma-, delta-, epsilon- and zeta-COP. Vesicles with COPI coats are found associated with Golgi membranes at steady state.
2	2	1	COPII vesicle coat	One of two multimeric complexes that forms a membrane vesicle coat. COPII is best characterized in S. cerevisiae, where the subunits are called Sar1p, Sec13p, Sec31p, Sec23p, and Sec24p. Vesicles with COPII coats are found associated with endoplasmic reticulum (ER) membranes at steady state.
0	1	0	clathrin coat of endocytic vesicle	A clathrin coat found on an endocytic vesicle.
1	0	4	clathrin coat of trans-Golgi network vesicle	A clathrin coat found on a vesicle of the trans-Golgi network.
0	1	1	clathrin adaptor complex	A membrane coat adaptor complex that links clathrin to a membrane.
0	0	4	clathrin coat of coated pit	The coat found on coated pits and the coated vesicles derived from coated pits; comprises clathrin and the AP-2 adaptor complex.
17	9	12	transport vesicle	Any of the vesicles of the constitutive secretory pathway, which carry cargo from the endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi, between Golgi cisternae, from the Golgi to the ER (retrograde transport) or to destinations within or outside the cell.
9	4	2	COPII-coated ER to Golgi transport vesicle	A vesicle with a coat formed of the COPII coat complex proteins. The COPII coat complex is formed by the Sec23p/Sec24p and the Sec13p/Sec31p heterodimers. COPII-associated vesicles transport proteins from the rough endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi apparatus (anterograde transport).
0	0	2	coated vesicle	Small membrane-bounded organelle formed by pinching off of a coated region of membrane. Some coats are made of clathrin, whereas others are made from other proteins.
13	5	14	clathrin-coated vesicle	A vesicle with a coat formed of clathrin connected to the membrane via one of the clathrin adaptor complexes.
3	1	2	COPI-coated vesicle	A vesicle with a coat formed of the COPI coat complex proteins. COPI-coated vesicles are found associated with Golgi membranes at steady state, are involved in Golgi to endoplasmic reticulum (retrograde) vesicle transport, and possibly also in intra-Golgi transport.
15	10	8	endocytic vesicle	A membrane-bounded intracellular vesicle formed by invagination of the plasma membrane around an extracellular substance. Endocytic vesicles fuse with early endosomes to deliver the cargo for further sorting.
4	4	2	trans-Golgi network transport vesicle	A vesicle that mediates transport between the trans-Golgi network and other parts of the cell.
7	11	14	secretory granule	A small subcellular vesicle, surrounded by a membrane, that is formed from the Golgi apparatus and contains a highly concentrated protein destined for secretion. Secretory granules move towards the periphery of the cell and upon stimulation, their membranes fuse with the cell membrane, and their protein load is exteriorized. Processing of the contained protein may take place in secretory granules.
0	0	1	COPI-coated Golgi to ER transport vesicle	A vesicle that mediates transport from the Golgi to the endoplasmic reticulum.
8	7	3	manganese ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with manganese (Mn) ions.
5	3	7	sphingolipid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of sphingolipids, any of a class of lipids containing the long-chain amine diol sphingosine or a closely related base (a sphingoid).
2	2	0	sphingolipid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of sphingolipids, any of a class of lipids containing the long-chain amine diol sphingosine or a closely related base (a sphingoid).
1	1	1	protein import into mitochondrial matrix	The import of proteins across the outer and inner mitochondrial membranes into the matrix. Unfolded proteins enter the mitochondrial matrix with a chaperone protein; the information required to target the precursor protein from the cytosol to the mitochondrial matrix is contained within its N-terminal matrix-targeting sequence. Translocation of precursors to the matrix occurs at the rare sites where the outer and inner membranes are close together.
0	1	0	molybdenum ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with molybdenum (Mo) ions.
69	67	49	cell differentiation	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells, e.g. embryonic or regenerative cells, acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the cells, tissues, or organs of the mature organism or some other relatively stable phase of the organism's life history. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate and its subsequent development to the mature state.
8	11	9	regulation of cell adhesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of attachment of a cell to another cell or to the extracellular matrix.
2	0	0	benzodiazepine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the peripheral benzodiazepine receptor (PBR).
1	0	1	pancreatic juice secretion	The regulated release of pancreatic juice by the exocrine pancreas into the upper part of the intestine. Pancreatic juice is slightly alkaline and contains numerous enzymes and inactive enzyme precursors including alpha-amylase, chymotrypsinogen, lipase, procarboxypeptidase, proelastase, prophospholipase A2, ribonuclease, and trypsinogen. Its high concentration of bicarbonate ions helps to neutralize the acid from the stomach.
1	0	0	protein xylosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a beta-D-xylosyl residue from UDP-D-xylose to the serine hydroxyl group of an acceptor protein substrate.
3	5	9	signaling receptor complex adaptor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that provides a physical support for the assembly of a multiprotein receptor signaling complex.
0	1	1	synaptic receptor adaptor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that provides a physical support bridging a synaptic signaling receptor and a downstream signaling molecule.
0	0	1	regulation of proteolysis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the hydrolysis of a peptide bond or bonds within a protein.
4	5	2	protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein by the destruction of the native, active configuration, with or without the hydrolysis of peptide bonds.
11	12	15	PDZ domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a PDZ domain of a protein, a domain found in diverse signaling proteins.
2	1	0	proteoglycan biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of proteoglycans, any glycoprotein in which the carbohydrate units are glycosaminoglycans.
17	17	24	platelet activation	A series of progressive, overlapping events triggered by exposure of the platelets to subendothelial tissue. These events include shape change, adhesiveness, aggregation, and release reactions. When carried through to completion, these events lead to the formation of a stable hemostatic plug.
2	2	0	low-density lipoprotein particle binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a low-density lipoprotein particle, a lipoprotein particle that is rich in cholesterol esters and low in triglycerides, is typically composed of APOB100 and APOE, and has a density of 1.02-1.06 g/ml and a diameter of between 20-25 nm.
7	9	3	pyridoxal phosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with pyridoxal 5' phosphate, 3-hydroxy-5-(hydroxymethyl)-2-methyl4-pyridine carboxaldehyde 5' phosphate, the biologically active form of vitamin B6.
8	4	0	integral component of Golgi membrane	The component of the Golgi membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
1	3	1	regulation of DNA-dependent DNA replication initiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of initiation of DNA-dependent DNA replication; the process in which DNA becomes competent to replicate. In eukaryotes, replication competence is established in early G1 and lost during the ensuing S phase.
11	17	19	filopodium	Thin, stiff, actin-based protrusion extended by the leading edge of a motile cell such as a crawling fibroblast or amoeba, or an axonal or dendritic growth cone, or a dendritic shaft.
10	8	10	integral component of endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The component of the endoplasmic reticulum membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
5	1	3	positive regulation of Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Wnt signal transduction.
3	5	2	negative regulation of Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the Wnt signaling pathway.
14	14	14	neuron differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a neuron.
5	10	10	B cell differentiation	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of a B cell. A B cell is a lymphocyte of B lineage with the phenotype CD19-positive and capable of B cell mediated immunity.
1	0	0	nitric oxide transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of nitric oxide, nitrogen monoxide, from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	1	nitric oxide transport	The directed movement of nitric oxide, nitrogen monoxide, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	1	regulation of blood coagulation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of blood coagulation.
4	3	2	positive regulation of blood coagulation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of blood coagulation.
2	0	3	negative regulation of blood coagulation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of blood coagulation.
32	43	17	extracellular matrix organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of an extracellular matrix.
10	19	7	collagen fibril organization	Any process that determines the size and arrangement of collagen fibrils within an extracellular matrix.
1	1	0	glycosaminoglycan metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycosaminoglycans, any one of a group of polysaccharides that contain amino sugars. Formerly known as mucopolysaccharides, they include hyaluronic acid and chondroitin, which provide lubrication in joints and form part of the matrix of cartilage. The three-dimensional structure of these molecules enables them to trap water, which forms a gel and gives glycosaminoglycans their elastic properties.
2	1	2	chondroitin sulfate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of chondroitin sulfate, any member of a group of 10-60 kDa glycosaminoglycans, widely distributed in cartilage and other mammalian connective tissues, the repeat units of which consist of beta-(1,4)-linked D-glucuronyl beta-(1,3)-N-acetyl-D-galactosamine sulfate.
0	1	1	chondroitin sulfate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of chondroitin sulfate, any member of a group of 10-60 kDa glycosaminoglycans, widely distributed in cartilage and other mammalian connective tissues, the repeat units of which consist of beta-(1,4)-linked D-glucuronyl beta-(1,3)-N-acetyl-D-galactosamine sulfate.
0	1	1	dermatan sulfate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of dermatan sulfate, any glycosaminoglycan with repeats consisting of beta-(1,4)-linked L-iduronyl-beta-(1,3)-N-acetyl-D-galactosamine 4-sulfate units.
3	0	2	hyaluronan metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving hyaluronan, the naturally occurring anionic form of hyaluronic acid, any member of a group of glycosaminoglycans, the repeat units of which consist of beta-1,4 linked D-glucuronyl-beta-(1,3)-N-acetyl-D-glucosamine.
1	0	0	hyaluronan biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hyaluronan, the naturally occurring anionic form of hyaluronic acid, any member of a group of glycosaminoglycans, the repeat units of which consist of beta-1,4 linked D-glucuronyl-beta-(1,3)-N-acetyl-D-glucosamine.
0	0	2	hyaluronan catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of hyaluronan, the naturally occurring anionic form of hyaluronic acid, any member of a group of glycosaminoglycans, the repeat units of which consist of beta-1,4 linked D-glucuronyl-beta-(1,3)-N-acetyl-D-glucosamine.
4	0	2	semaphorin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with semaphorin receptors.
7	12	8	keratinocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a keratinocyte.
7	3	1	T cell differentiation	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires characteristics of a more mature T-cell. A T cell is a type of lymphocyte whose definin characteristic is the expression of a T cell receptor complex.
10	8	7	erythrocyte differentiation	The process in which a myeloid precursor cell acquires specializes features of an erythrocyte.
2	0	0	megakaryocyte differentiation	The process in which a myeloid precursor cell acquires specializes features of a megakaryocyte.
3	3	5	platelet formation	The process in which platelets bud from long processes extended by megakaryocytes.
0	0	2	neutrophil differentiation	The process in which a myeloid precursor cell acquires the specialized features of a neutrophil.
2	0	6	monocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized myeloid precursor cell acquires the specialized features of a monocyte.
2	2	2	macrophage differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized monocyte acquires the specialized features of a macrophage.
1	0	0	apolipoprotein receptor activity	Combining with an apolipoprotein to initiate a change in cell activity.
2	0	0	very-low-density lipoprotein particle receptor activity	Combining with a very-low-density lipoprotein particle and delivering the very-low-density lipoprotein into the cell via endocytosis.
1	3	9	enzyme regulator activity	Binds to and modulates the activity of an enzyme.
0	0	6	nitric-oxide synthase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of nitric oxide synthase.
3	1	3	myofibril assembly	Formation of myofibrils, the repeating units of striated muscle.
0	1	3	skeletal muscle thin filament assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins to form the actin-based thin filaments of myofibrils in skeletal muscle.
0	0	2	skeletal muscle myosin thick filament assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins to form the myosin-based thick filaments of myofibrils in skeletal muscle.
1	2	1	autophagy of peroxisome	The process in which peroxisomes are delivered to a type of vacuole and degraded in response to changing nutrient conditions.
19	9	9	carbohydrate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any carbohydrate, which includes monosaccharides, oligosaccharides and polysaccharides as well as substances derived from monosaccharides by reduction of the carbonyl group (alditols), by oxidation of one or more hydroxy groups to afford the corresponding aldehydes, ketones, or carboxylic acids, or by replacement of one or more hydroxy group(s) by a hydrogen atom. Cyclitols are generally not regarded as carbohydrates.
3	0	3	polysaccharide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any polysaccharide, a polymer of many (typically more than 10) monosaccharide residues linked glycosidically.
0	1	1	growth hormone secretion	The regulated release of growth hormone from secretory granules into the blood.
1	0	0	lipid modification	The covalent alteration of one or more fatty acids in a lipid, resulting in a change in the properties of the lipid.
1	2	9	chromosome condensation	The progressive compaction of dispersed interphase chromatin into threadlike chromosomes prior to mitotic or meiotic nuclear division, or during apoptosis, in eukaryotic cells.
0	1	0	apoptotic nuclear changes	Alterations undergone by nuclei at the molecular and morphological level as part of the execution phase of apoptosis.
0	0	2	apoptotic chromosome condensation	The compaction of chromatin during apoptosis.
1	1	2	LIM domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a LIM domain (for Lin-11 Isl-1 Mec-3) of a protein, a domain with seven conserved cysteine residues and a histidine, that binds two zinc ions and acts as an interface for protein-protein interactions.
1	1	2	LRR domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a LRR domain (leucine rich repeats) of a protein.
4	5	12	clathrin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a clathrin heavy or light chain, the main components of the coat of coated vesicles and coated pits, and which also occurs in synaptic vesicles.
1	3	0	maintenance of gastrointestinal epithelium	Protection of epithelial surfaces of the gastrointestinal tract from proteolytic and caustic digestive agents.
0	1	2	regulation of ossification	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ossification, the formation of bone or of a bony substance or the conversion of fibrous tissue or of cartilage into bone or a bony substance.
2	1	0	negative regulation of ossification	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ossification, the formation of bone or of a bony substance or the conversion of fibrous tissue or of cartilage into bone or a bony substance.
3	1	3	structural constituent of skin epidermis	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of an epidermal cutaneous structure.
5	2	2	bone mineralization	The deposition of hydroxyapatite, a form of calcium phosphate with the formula Ca10(PO4)6(OH)2, in bone tissue.
1	0	1	testosterone dehydrogenase [NAD(P)] activity	Catalysis of the reaction: testosterone + NAD(P)+ = androst-4-ene-3,17-dione + NAD(P)H + H+.
3	4	10	integral component of synaptic vesicle membrane	The component of the synaptic vesicle membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
4	1	5	dynein complex	Any of several large complexes that contain two or three dynein heavy chains and several light chains, and have microtubule motor activity.
1	1	1	protein phosphatase 4 complex	A protein serine/threonine phosphatase complex formed by the catalytic subunit of protein phosphatase 4 plus one or more regulatory subunits.
0	3	2	protein serine/threonine kinase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a protein serine/threonine kinase.
0	1	1	protein tyrosine kinase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a protein tyrosine kinase.
1	0	0	transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine kinase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine kinase.
2	4	11	protein kinase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a protein kinase, an enzyme which phosphorylates a protein.
2	1	3	protein tyrosine kinase activator activity	Increases the activity of a protein tyrosine kinase, an enzyme which phosphorylates a tyrosyl phenolic group on a protein.
1	1	0	transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine kinase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a transmembrane receptor protein tyrosine kinase.
2	0	1	intestinal cholesterol absorption	Uptake of cholesterol into the blood by absorption from the small intestine.
0	1	0	regulation of intestinal cholesterol absorption	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of absorption of cholesterol into the blood, and the exclusion of other sterols from absorption.
3	3	3	cholesterol transport	The directed movement of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
9	19	16	positive regulation of cell growth	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, extent or direction of cell growth.
13	18	21	negative regulation of cell growth	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, extent or direction of cell growth.
1	0	0	poly-N-acetyllactosamine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of poly-N-acetyllactosamine, a carbohydrate composed of N-acetyllactosamine repeats (Gal-beta-1,4-GlcNAc-beta-1,3)n.
0	0	1	junctional membrane complex	Complex formed in muscle cells between the membrane of the sarcoplasmic reticulum and invaginations of the plasma membrane (T-tubules).
3	3	15	T-tubule	Invagination of the plasma membrane of a muscle cell that extends inward from the cell surface around each myofibril. The ends of T-tubules make contact with the sarcoplasmic reticulum membrane.
4	5	2	osteoclast differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized monocyte acquires the specialized features of an osteoclast. An osteoclast is a specialized phagocytic cell associated with the absorption and removal of the mineralized matrix of bone tissue.
7	3	5	flagellated sperm motility	The directed, self-propelled movement of a cilium (aka flagellum) that contributes to the movement of a flagellated sperm.
7	4	0	melanocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a melanocyte.
0	1	1	transepithelial chloride transport	The directed movement of chloride ions from one side of an epithelium to the other.
1	0	0	respiratory tube development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the respiratory tube over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The respiratory tube is assumed to mean any tube in the respiratory tract.
13	6	7	lung development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the lung over time, from its formation to the mature structure. In all air-breathing vertebrates the lungs are developed from the ventral wall of the oesophagus as a pouch which divides into two sacs. In amphibians and many reptiles the lungs retain very nearly this primitive sac-like character, but in the higher forms the connection with the esophagus becomes elongated into the windpipe and the inner walls of the sacs become more and more divided, until, in the mammals, the air spaces become minutely divided into tubes ending in small air cells, in the walls of which the blood circulates in a fine network of capillaries. In mammals the lungs are more or less divided into lobes, and each lung occupies a separate cavity in the thorax.
1	4	0	adrenal gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the adrenal gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure. This gland can either be a discrete structure located bilaterally above each kidney, or a cluster of cells in the head kidney that perform the functions of the adrenal gland. In either case, this organ consists of two cells types, aminergic chromaffin cells and steroidogenic cortical cells.
3	5	0	embryonic limb morphogenesis	The process, occurring in the embryo, by which the anatomical structures of the limb are generated and organized. A limb is an appendage of an animal used for locomotion or grasping.
3	3	3	DNA damage response, signal transduction by p53 class mediator	A cascade of processes induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53, or an equivalent protein, in response to the detection of DNA damage.
6	5	9	estrogen receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an estrogen receptor.
3	3	6	cyclin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cyclins, proteins whose levels in a cell varies markedly during the cell cycle, rising steadily until mitosis, then falling abruptly to zero. As cyclins reach a threshold level, they are thought to drive cells into G2 phase and thus to mitosis.
11	16	12	regulation of cell migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell migration.
41	30	32	positive regulation of cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell migration.
20	19	15	negative regulation of cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell migration.
0	0	1	DNA polymerase processivity factor activity	An enzyme regulator activity that increases the processivity of polymerization by DNA polymerase, by allowing the polymerase to move rapidly along DNA while remaining topologically bound to it.
1	0	0	structural constituent of tooth enamel	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of tooth enamel.
1	2	3	protein phosphatase 2B binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the enzyme protein phosphatase 2B.
0	1	0	syntaxin-3 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the SNAP receptor syntaxin-3.
0	1	0	iron-responsive element binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the iron-responsive element, a regulatory sequence found in the 5'- and 3'-untranslated regions of mRNAs encoding many iron-binding proteins.
0	1	0	molybdopterin synthase activity	Catalysis of the conversion of precursor Z to molybdopterin, the final step in molybdopterin biosynthesis.
0	1	0	ICAM-3 receptor activity	Combining with ICAM-3, intercellular adhesion molecule 3, and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity. ICAM-3, or CD50, are constitutively expressed on monocytes, granulocytes and lymphocytes; on physiological stimulation, they become transiently phosphorylated on serine residues.
0	4	1	translation repressor activity	Antagonizes ribosome-mediated translation of mRNA into a polypeptide.
8	14	15	nuclear receptor transcription coactivator activity	The function of a transcription cofactor that activates transcription in conjuction with a ligand-dependent nuclear receptor from a RNA polymerase II promoter; does not bind DNA itself.
1	0	0	neurotensin receptor activity, non-G protein-coupled	Combining with neurotensin, a neuropeptide active in the central and peripheral nervous system in mammals, and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other by a mechanism independent of coupling to G proteins.
1	1	0	sperm mitochondrion organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of sperm mitochondria; the process in which they take on their characteristic morphology; they are flattened, elongated, and arranged circumferentially into a tight helical coil around the tail-dense fibers of the mature sperm.
2	2	5	fructose 1,6-bisphosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving fructose 1,6-bisphosphate, also known as FBP. The D enantiomer is a metabolic intermediate in glycolysis and gluconeogenesis.
1	0	0	fructosamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving fructosamine, a fructose molecule containing an amino group in place of a hydroxyl group.
0	0	1	lactose binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with lactose, a disaccharide of glucose and galactose, the carbohydrate of milk.
0	0	1	formimidoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a formimino group from 5-formimidoyltetrahydrofolate to an acceptor molecule such as an amino acid.
0	0	1	glutamate formimidoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5-formimidoyltetrahydrofolate + L-glutamate = tetrahydrofolate + N-formimidoyl-L-glutamate.
0	0	1	formimidoyltetrahydrofolate cyclodeaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5-formimidoyltetrahydrofolate + 2 H(+) = 5,10-methenyltetrahydrofolate + NH(4)(+).
4	1	0	peptidase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a peptidase, any enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis peptide bonds.
2	3	1	production of siRNA involved in RNA interference	Cleavage of double-stranded RNA to form small interfering RNA molecules (siRNAs) of 21-23 nucleotides, in the context of RNA interference.
2	1	0	targeting of mRNA for destruction involved in RNA interference	The process in which small interfering RNAs target cognate mRNA molecules for degradation.
35	41	71	axon	The long process of a neuron that conducts nerve impulses, usually away from the cell body to the terminals and varicosities, which are sites of storage and release of neurotransmitter.
31	56	73	dendrite	A neuron projection that has a short, tapering, morphology. Dendrites receive and integrate signals from other neurons or from sensory stimuli, and conduct nerve impulses towards the axon or the cell body. In most neurons, the impulse is conveyed from dendrites to axon via the cell body, but in some types of unipolar neuron, the impulse does not travel via the cell body.
17	24	38	growth cone	The migrating motile tip of a growing neuron projection, where actin accumulates, and the actin cytoskeleton is the most dynamic.
0	2	4	site of polarized growth	Any part of a cell where non-isotropic growth takes place.
0	1	0	kynureninase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-kynurenine + H2O = anthranilate + L-alanine.
0	1	0	sleep	Any process in which an organism enters and maintains a periodic, readily reversible state of reduced awareness and metabolic activity. Usually accompanied by physical relaxation, the onset of sleep in humans and other mammals is marked by a change in the electrical activity of the brain.
0	0	1	peristalsis	A wavelike sequence of involuntary muscular contraction and relaxation that passes along a tubelike structure, such as the intestine, impelling the contents onwards.
8	6	10	ubiquitin-dependent ERAD pathway	The series of steps necessary to target endoplasmic reticulum (ER)-resident proteins for degradation by the cytoplasmic proteasome. Begins with recognition of the ER-resident protein, includes retrotranslocation (dislocation) of the protein from the ER to the cytosol, protein ubiquitination necessary for correct substrate transfer, transport of the protein to the proteasome, and ends with degradation of the protein by the cytoplasmic proteasome.
17	10	16	regulation of complement activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of complement activation.
0	1	0	nuclear migration along microtubule	The directed movement of the nucleus along microtubules within the cell, mediated by motor proteins.
0	2	2	actin cap	Polarized accumulation of cytoskeletal proteins (including F-actin) and regulatory proteins in a cell. An example of this is the actin cap found in Saccharomyces cerevisiae.
0	0	1	smooth muscle contractile fiber	The contractile fiber of smooth muscle cells.
3	4	1	tRNA methylation	The posttranscriptional addition of methyl groups to specific residues in a tRNA molecule.
1	6	3	maturation of SSU-rRNA	Any process involved in the maturation of a precursor Small SubUnit (SSU) ribosomal RNA (rRNA) molecule into a mature SSU-rRNA molecule.
0	1	3	hemoglobin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with hemoglobin, an oxygen carrying, conjugated protein containing four heme groups and globin.
29	33	35	midbody	A thin cytoplasmic bridge formed between daughter cells at the end of cytokinesis. The midbody forms where the contractile ring constricts, and may persist for some time before finally breaking to complete cytokinesis.
0	0	1	fatty acid elongation	The elongation of a fatty acid chain by the sequential addition of two-carbon units.
2	2	1	regulation of bone mineralization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of bone mineralization.
3	4	2	positive regulation of bone mineralization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of bone mineralization.
3	4	1	negative regulation of bone mineralization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of bone mineralization.
1	0	0	inorganic diphosphate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of inorganic diphosphate across a membrane.
1	0	0	inorganic diphosphate transport	The directed movement of inorganic diphosphate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	0	8	ankyrin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ankyrin, a 200 kDa cytoskeletal protein that attaches other cytoskeletal proteins to integral membrane proteins.
2	3	14	spectrin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with spectrin, a protein that is the major constituent of the erythrocyte cytoskeletal network. It associates with band 4.1 (see band protein) and actin to form the cytoskeletal superstructure of the erythrocyte plasma membrane. It is composed of nonhomologous chains, alpha and beta, which aggregate side-to-side in an antiparallel fashion to form dimers, tetramers, and higher polymers.
8	4	5	BMP signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a member of the BMP (bone morphogenetic protein) family to a receptor on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	0	regulation of BMP signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of any BMP receptor signaling pathway.
4	6	7	positive regulation of transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of TGF-beta receptor signaling pathway activity.
13	9	11	negative regulation of transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of any TGF-beta receptor signaling pathway.
4	2	2	positive regulation of BMP signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of BMP signaling pathway activity.
10	8	3	negative regulation of BMP signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the BMP signaling pathway.
1	3	4	snoRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with small nucleolar RNA.
2	1	5	regulation of axon extension	Any process that modulates the rate, direction or extent of axon extension.
0	3	5	negative regulation of axon extension	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of axon outgrowth.
2	1	1	intracellular steroid hormone receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a intracellular steroid hormone receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
3	1	5	intracellular estrogen receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an intracellular estrogen receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands. The pathway begins with receptor-ligand binding, and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process (e.g. transcription).
2	1	5	androgen receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an androgen binding to its receptor.
6	9	6	intracellular receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals initiated by a ligand binding to an receptor located within a cell.
1	0	0	granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor receptor complex	The heterodimeric receptor for granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor.
0	0	1	structural constituent of chromatin	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of chromatin.
2	3	1	small nuclear ribonucleoprotein complex	A complex composed of RNA of the small nuclear RNA (snRNA) class and protein, found in the nucleus of a eukaryotic cell. These are typically named after the snRNA(s) they contain, e.g. U1 snRNP or U4/U6 snRNP. Many, but not all, of these complexes are involved in splicing of nuclear mRNAs.
4	1	2	adult behavior	Behavior in a fully developed and mature organism.
1	2	0	male genitalia development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the male genitalia over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	2	0	female genitalia development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the female genitalia over time, from formation to the mature structure.
2	5	6	Hsp70 protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with Hsp70 proteins, any of a group of heat shock proteins around 70kDa in size.
0	0	1	signaling receptor activator activity	The function of interacting (directly or indirectly) with receptors such that the proportion of receptors in the active form is increased.
1	1	0	receptor inhibitor activity	The function of interacting (directly or indirectly) with receptors such that the proportion of receptors in the active form is decreased.
0	1	0	acetylcholine receptor regulator activity	Interacting (directly or indirectly) with acetylcholine receptors such that the proportion of receptors in the active form is changed.
0	1	0	acetylcholine receptor activator activity	Interacting (directly or indirectly) with acetylcholine receptors such that the proportion of receptors in the active form is increased.
0	0	1	acetylcholine receptor inhibitor activity	Interacting (directly or indirectly) with acetylcholine receptors such that the proportion of receptors in the active form is decreased.
0	0	1	cyclic nucleotide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a cyclic nucleotide, a nucleotide in which the phosphate group is in diester linkage to two positions on the sugar residue.
0	2	5	cAMP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cAMP, the nucleotide cyclic AMP (adenosine 3',5'-cyclophosphate).
1	1	0	cGMP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cGMP, the nucleotide cyclic GMP (guanosine 3',5'-cyclophosphate).
1	0	0	adenyl nucleotide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with adenyl nucleotides, any compound consisting of adenosine esterified with (ortho)phosphate.
0	1	0	bile acid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of bile acids, any of a group of steroid carboxylic acids occurring in bile.
7	0	3	collagen catabolic process	The proteolytic chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of collagen in the extracellular matrix, usually carried out by proteases secreted by nearby cells.
0	1	0	Cajal body organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of Cajal bodies, nuclear bodies that appear ultrastructurally as a tangle of coiled, electron-dense threads roughly 0.5 micrometers in diameter and are enriched in ribonucleoproteins, and certain general RNA polymerase II transcription factors.
0	2	3	PML body organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of PML bodies, a class of nuclear body; they react against SP100 auto-antibodies (PML = promyelocytic leukemia).
0	0	2	ubiquitin-dependent SMAD protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of SMAD signaling proteins by ubiquitination and targeting to the proteasome.
1	1	0	DNA ADP-ribosylation	The covalent attachment of an ADP-ribosyl group to a residue in double-stranded DNA.
2	12	4	neutrophil chemotaxis	The directed movement of a neutrophil cell, the most numerous polymorphonuclear leukocyte found in the blood, in response to an external stimulus, usually an infection or wounding.
2	3	0	neurotransmitter receptor activity	Combining with a neurotransmitter and transmitting the signal to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	2	3	leukocyte chemotaxis	The movement of a leukocyte in response to an external stimulus.
1	2	1	U1 snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the U1 small nuclear RNA (U1 snRNA).
1	2	0	U2 snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the U2 small nuclear RNA (U2 snRNA).
0	3	0	U4 snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the U4 small nuclear RNA (U4 snRNA).
0	2	0	U4atac snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the U4atac small nuclear RNA (U4atac snRNA).
2	0	0	U5 snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the U5 small nuclear RNA (U5 snRNA).
1	0	0	U12 snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the U12 small nuclear RNA (U12 snRNA).
1	0	0	pre-mRNA 5'-splice site binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the pre-mRNA 5' splice site sequence.
0	2	1	pre-mRNA 3'-splice site binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the pre-mRNA 3' splice site sequence.
1	0	0	U6 snRNA 3'-end binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the 3' end of the U6 small nuclear RNA (U6 snRNA).
0	0	3	regulation of cellular pH	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal equilibrium of hydrogen ions (protons) within a cell or between a cell and its external environment.
3	1	1	cellular phosphate ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of phosphate ions at the level of a cell.
2	1	2	cellular chloride ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of chloride ions at the level of a cell.
4	4	8	transport vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a transport vesicle.
19	19	16	cytoplasmic vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a cytoplasmic vesicle.
0	0	2	Golgi-associated vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a vesicle associated with the Golgi apparatus.
1	0	0	coated vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a coated vesicle.
2	0	5	clathrin-coated vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a clathrin-coated vesicle.
5	6	13	endocytic vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding an endocytic vesicle.
15	15	12	secretory granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a secretory granule.
7	7	12	clathrin-coated endocytic vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a clathrin-coated endocytic vesicle.
9	14	11	phagocytic vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a phagocytic vesicle.
9	1	23	synaptic vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a synaptic vesicle.
0	1	3	axolemma	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding an axon; it is a specialized trilaminar random mosaic of protein molecules floating within a fluid matrix of highly mobile phospholipid molecules, 7-8 nm in thickness.
10	13	27	protein-macromolecule adaptor activity	The binding activity of a protein that brings together two or more macromolecules in contact, permitting those molecules to function in a coordinated way. The adaptor can bring together two proteins, or a protein and another macromolecule such as a lipid or a nucleic acid.
0	0	1	mitochondrial ribonuclease P complex	A ribonuclease P complex located in the mitochondrion of a eukaryotic cell, where it catalyzes the 5' endonucleolytic cleavage of precursor tRNAs to yield mature tRNAs. The subunit composition of mitochondrial ribonuclease P complexes varies between species, but the complex often contains a single RNA molecule and a single protein molecule.
0	1	2	multimeric ribonuclease P complex	A ribonuclease P complex that generally contains a single RNA molecule and several protein molecules. Examples of this complex are found in Archaeal species.
0	1	1	mitigation of host immune response by virus	A process by which a virus avoids the effects of the host organism's immune response. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
1	0	0	preribosome	Any complex of pre-rRNAs, ribosomal proteins, and associated proteins formed during ribosome biogenesis.
1	6	4	90S preribosome	A large ribonucleoprotein complex considered to be the earliest preribosomal complex. In S. cerevisiae, it has a size of 90S and consists of the 35S pre-rRNA, early-associating ribosomal proteins most of which are part of the small ribosomal subunit, the U3 snoRNA and associated proteins.
6	8	2	preribosome, large subunit precursor	A preribosomal complex consisting of 27SA, 27SB, and/or 7S pre-rRNA, 5S rRNA, ribosomal proteins including late-associating large subunit proteins, and associated proteins; a precursor of the eukaryotic cytoplasmic large ribosomal subunit.
1	9	0	preribosome, small subunit precursor	A preribosomal complex consisting of 20S pre-rRNA, ribosomal proteins including late-associating small subunit proteins, and associated proteins; a precursor of the eukaryotic cytoplasmic small ribosomal subunit.
0	1	0	Noc1p-Noc2p complex	A heterodimer associated with 90S and 66S preribosomes. Predominantly, but not exclusively, nucleolar; involved in ribosomal large subunit biogenesis.
0	1	0	Noc2p-Noc3p complex	A heterodimer associated with 66S preribosomes; predominantly nucleoplasmic, but also locates to the nucleolus; involved in ribosomal large subunit biogenesis.
0	1	0	Noc4p-Nop14p complex	A heterodimer associated with precursors of the eukaryotic small ribosomal subunit, including the 90S preribosome; involved in small subunit biogenesis.
1	4	3	GTPase regulator activity	Modulates the rate of GTP hydrolysis by a GTPase.
2	4	9	cytoskeleton-dependent intracellular transport	The directed movement of substances along cytoskeletal fibers such as microfilaments or microtubules within a cell.
1	1	1	ovulation	The release of a mature ovum/oocyte from an ovary.
2	0	0	sequestering of triglyceride	The process of binding or confining any triester of glycerol such that it is separated from other components of a biological system.
1	0	0	guanidinoacetate N-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + guanidinoacetate = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + creatine + H(+).
2	3	5	GTP-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex (a complex of two or more proteins that may include other nonprotein molecules) when at least one of the interacting partners is in the GTP-bound state.
0	0	2	regulation of actin filament length	Any process that controls the length of actin filaments in a cell.
5	5	5	regulation of actin filament polymerization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of actin filaments by the addition of actin monomers to a filament.
0	0	2	regulation of actin filament depolymerization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the disassembly of actin filaments by the removal of actin monomers from a filament.
0	0	2	negative regulation of actin filament depolymerization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of actin depolymerization.
2	2	2	positive regulation of actin filament depolymerization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of actin depolymerization.
0	6	5	negative regulation of actin filament polymerization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of actin polymerization.
7	11	13	positive regulation of actin filament polymerization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of actin polymerization.
0	0	1	positive regulation of intermediate filament depolymerization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of intermediate filament depolymerization.
1	0	0	phospholipase C-inhibiting G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	A G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway which proceeds with inhibition of phospholipase C (PLC) activity and a subsequent decrease in the levels of cellular inositol trisphosphate (IP3) and diacylglycerol (DAG).
1	0	0	autosome	Any chromosome other than a sex chromosome.
3	1	1	prostate gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the prostate gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The prostate gland is a partly muscular, partly glandular body that is situated near the base of the mammalian male urethra and secretes an alkaline viscid fluid which is a major constituent of the ejaculatory fluid.
3	1	4	granulocyte differentiation	The process in which a myeloid precursor cell acquires the specialized features of a granulocyte. Granulocytes are a class of leukocytes characterized by the presence of granules in their cytoplasm. These cells are active in allergic immune reactions such as arthritic inflammation and rashes. This class includes basophils, eosinophils and neutrophils.
3	1	1	negative regulation of granulocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of granulocyte differentiation.
1	2	0	positive regulation of granulocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of granulocyte differentiation.
9	11	12	epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an epithelial cell, any of the cells making up an epithelium.
1	1	0	regulation of epithelial cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell differentiation.
1	1	2	negative regulation of epithelial cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell differentiation.
1	0	1	positive regulation of epithelial cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell differentiation.
0	3	1	polarized epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a polarized epithelial cell. The polarized epithelial cell can be any of the cells within an epithelium where the epithelial sheet is oriented with respect to the planar axis.
2	0	9	cortical cytoskeleton	The portion of the cytoskeleton that lies just beneath the plasma membrane.
7	11	14	cortical actin cytoskeleton	The portion of the actin cytoskeleton, comprising filamentous actin and associated proteins, that lies just beneath the plasma membrane.
3	0	5	cortical cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures in the cell cortex, i.e. just beneath the plasma membrane.
4	4	15	cortical actin cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of actin-based cytoskeletal structures in the cell cortex, i.e. just beneath the plasma membrane.
0	2	1	rough endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the rough endoplasmic reticulum.
0	1	3	smooth endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the smooth endoplasmic reticulum.
1	2	0	Mre11 complex	Trimeric protein complex that possesses endonuclease activity; involved in meiotic recombination, DNA repair and checkpoint signaling. In Saccharomyces cerevisiae, the complex comprises Mre11p, Rad50p, and Xrs2p; complexes identified in other species generally contain proteins orthologous to the Saccharomyces cerevisiae proteins.
2	2	3	beta-catenin destruction complex	A cytoplasmic protein complex containing glycogen synthase kinase-3-beta (GSK-3-beta), the adenomatous polyposis coli protein (APC), and the scaffolding protein axin, among others; phosphorylates beta-catenin, targets it for degradation by the proteasome.
0	1	5	thyroid gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the thyroid gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The thyroid gland is an endoderm-derived gland that produces thyroid hormone.
4	2	5	mammary gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the mammary gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The mammary gland is a large compound sebaceous gland that in female mammals is modified to secrete milk. Its development starts with the formation of the mammary line and ends as the mature gland cycles between nursing and weaning stages.
1	0	1	beta-2-microglobulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with beta-2-microglobulin.
1	0	0	negative regulation of myeloid dendritic cell activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of myeloid dendritic cell activation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of myeloid dendritic cell activation	Any process that stimulates, induces or increases the rate of myeloid dendritic cell activation.
1	1	0	regulation of B cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of B cell proliferation.
3	1	5	negative regulation of B cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of B cell proliferation.
3	3	5	positive regulation of B cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of B cell proliferation.
1	0	0	VCB complex	A protein complex that possesses ubiquitin ligase activity; the complex is usually pentameric; for example, in mammals the subunits are pVHL, elongin B, elongin C, cullin-2 (Cul2), and Rbx1.
0	1	1	meiotic cohesin complex	A cohesin complex that mediates sister chromatid cohesion during meiosis; has a subunit composition distinct from that of the mitotic cohesin complex.
1	0	1	replisome	A multi-component enzymatic machine at the replication fork which mediates DNA replication. Includes DNA primase, one or more DNA polymerases, DNA helicases, and other proteins.
0	1	0	checkpoint clamp complex	Conserved heterotrimeric complex of PCNA-like proteins that is loaded onto DNA at sites of DNA damage.
1	0	0	HOPS complex	A multimeric protein complex that associates with the vacuolar membrane, late endosomal (multivesicular body) and lysosomal membranes. HOPS is a tethering complex involved in vesicle fusion.
7	6	6	actin-dependent ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate. This reaction requires the presence of an actin filament to accelerate release of ADP and phosphate.
1	1	0	calcium-dependent ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate. This reaction requires the presence of calcium ion (Ca2+).
3	6	7	forebrain development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the forebrain over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The forebrain is the anterior of the three primary divisions of the developing chordate brain or the corresponding part of the adult brain (in vertebrates, includes especially the cerebral hemispheres, the thalamus, and the hypothalamus and especially in higher vertebrates is the main control center for sensory and associative information processing, visceral functions, and voluntary motor functions).
2	2	0	midbrain development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the midbrain over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The midbrain is the middle division of the three primary divisions of the developing chordate brain or the corresponding part of the adult brain (in vertebrates, includes a ventral part containing the cerebral peduncles and a dorsal tectum containing the corpora quadrigemina and that surrounds the aqueduct of Sylvius connecting the third and fourth ventricles).
3	1	0	hindbrain development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the hindbrain over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The hindbrain is the posterior of the three primary divisions of the developing chordate brain, or the corresponding part of the adult brain (in vertebrates, includes the cerebellum, pons, and medulla oblongata and controls the autonomic functions and equilibrium).
1	1	1	notochord development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the notochord over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The notochord is a mesoderm-derived structure located ventral of the developing nerve cord. In vertebrates, the notochord serves as a core around which other mesodermal cells form the vertebrae. In the most primitive chordates, which lack vertebrae, the notochord persists as a substitute for a vertebral column.
0	1	5	retromer complex	A conserved hetero-pentameric membrane-associated complex involved in retrograde transport from endosomes to the Golgi apparatus. The budding yeast retromer comprises Vps35p, Vps29p, Vps26p, Vps5p, and Vps17p. The mammalian complex shows slight variation in composition compared to yeast, and comprises SNX1 or SNX2, SNX5 or SNX6, VPS26A or VPS26B, VPS29, and VPS35.
0	1	1	retromer, tubulation complex	The dimeric subcomplex of the retromer, believed to be peripherally associated with the membrane. This dimeric complex is responsible for remodelling endosomal membranes to form a tube-structure to which cargo molecules are selected for recycling. The budding yeast complex comprises Vps5p and Vps17p, and may contain multiple copies of a Vps5p/Vps17p dimer. The mammalian complex contains SNX1 or SNX2 dimerized with SNX5 or SNX6.
0	0	2	retromer, cargo-selective complex	The trimeric subcomplex of the retromer, believed to be closely associated with the membrane. This trimeric complex is responsible for recognizing and binding to cargo molecules. The complex comprises three Vps proteins in both yeast and mammalian cells: Vps35p, Vps29p, and Vps26p in yeast, and VPS35, VPS29 and VPS26A or VPS26B in mammals.
0	1	0	olfactory placode formation	The formation of a thickening of the neural ectoderm in the head region of the vertebrate embryo which develops into the olfactory region of the nasal cavity.
0	0	4	TPR domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a tetratricopeptide repeat (TPR) domain of a protein, the consensus sequence of which is defined by a pattern of small and large hydrophobic amino acids and a structure composed of helices.
1	0	2	paranodal junction assembly	Formation of the junction between an axon and the glial cell that forms the myelin sheath. Paranodal junctions form at each paranode, i.e. at the ends of the unmyelinated nodes of Ranvier.
3	2	1	STAGA complex	A large multiprotein complex that possesses histone acetyltransferase and is involved in regulation of transcription. The composition is similar to that of the SAGA complex; for example, the human complex contains the transcription-transformation cofactor TRRAP, hGCN5L acetylase, novel human ADA-like and SPT-like cofactors, and a subset of TAFs.
0	3	0	Smc5-Smc6 complex	A conserved complex that contains a heterodimer of SMC proteins (Smc5p and Smc6p, or homologs thereof) and several other proteins, and is involved in DNA repair and maintaining cell cycle arrest following DNA damage. In S. cerevisiae, this is an octameric complex called Mms21-Smc5-Smc6 complex, with at least five of its subunits conserved in fission yeast and humans.
2	0	0	otic vesicle formation	The process resulting in the transition of the otic placode into the otic vesicle, a transient embryonic structure formed during development of the vertebrate inner ear.
1	0	1	endoplasmic reticulum signal peptide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an endoplasmic reticulum signal peptide, a specific peptide sequence that acts as a signal to localize the protein within the endoplasmic reticulum.
0	1	1	mitochondrion targeting sequence binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a mitochondrion targeting sequence, a specific peptide sequence that acts as a signal to localize the protein within the mitochondrion.
2	3	2	negative regulation of vascular endothelial growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular endothelial growth factor receptor signaling pathway activity.
3	1	4	positive regulation of vascular endothelial growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular endothelial growth factor receptor signaling pathway activity.
1	1	2	establishment or maintenance of actin cytoskeleton polarity	Any cellular process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of polarized actin-based cytoskeletal structures.
0	2	2	establishment or maintenance of microtubule cytoskeleton polarity	Any cellular process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of polarized microtubule-based cytoskeletal structures.
0	3	5	astral microtubule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of astral microtubules, any of the spindle microtubules that radiate in all directions from the spindle poles.
0	2	4	potassium ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with potassium (K+) ions.
1	1	3	Tat protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with Tat, a viral transactivating regulatory protein from the human immunodeficiency virus, or the equivalent protein from another virus.
2	3	5	endoplasmic reticulum unfolded protein response	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the presence of unfolded proteins in the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) or other ER-related stress; results in changes in the regulation of transcription and translation.
2	1	3	retrograde protein transport, ER to cytosol	The directed movement of unfolded or misfolded proteins from the endoplasmic reticulum to the cytosol through the translocon.
7	18	6	receptor tyrosine kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a receptor that possesses protein tyrosine kinase activity.
3	0	1	thiamine pyrophosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with thiamine pyrophosphate, the diphosphoric ester of thiamine. Acts as a coenzyme of several (de)carboxylases, transketolases, and alpha-oxoacid dehydrogenases.
0	1	1	cortical microtubule cytoskeleton	The portion of the microtubule cytoskeleton that lies just beneath the plasma membrane.
1	0	1	mismatched DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded DNA containing one or more mismatches.
0	0	1	kininogen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a kininogen, any of a group of plasma proteins that are kinin precursors.
1	0	0	intraciliary transport particle A	The smaller subcomplex of the intraciliary transport particle; characterized complexes have molecular weights of 710-760 kDa.
1	2	0	intraciliary transport particle B	The larger subcomplex of the intraciliary transport particle; characterized complexes have molecular weights around 550 kDa.
1	0	1	regulation of centriole-centriole cohesion	Any process that modulates the extent to which the two centrioles within a centrosome remain tightly paired; may be mediated by the assembly and disassembly of a proteinaceous linker.
2	1	3	response to caffeine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a caffeine stimulus. Caffeine is an alkaloid found in numerous plant species, where it acts as a natural pesticide that paralyzes and kills certain insects feeding upon them.
1	1	3	filamin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a filamin, any member of a family of high molecular mass cytoskeletal proteins that crosslink actin filaments to form networks and stress fibers. Filamins contain an amino-terminal alpha-actinin-like actin binding domain, which is followed by a rod-domain composed of 4 to 24 100-residue repetitive segments including a carboxy-terminal dimerization domain.
1	5	4	Ino80 complex	A multisubunit protein complex that contains the Ino80p ATPase; exhibits chromatin remodeling activity and 3' to 5' DNA helicase activity.
27	22	12	extracellular matrix	A structure lying external to one or more cells, which provides structural support, biochemical or biomechanical cues for cells or tissues.
0	0	1	troponin I binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with troponin I, the inhibitory subunit of the troponin complex.
1	0	0	troponin T binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with troponin T, the tropomyosin-binding subunit of the troponin complex.
4	2	0	pancreas development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the pancreas over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The pancreas is an endoderm derived structure that produces precursors of digestive enzymes and blood glucose regulating enzymes.
5	1	1	endocrine pancreas development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the endocrine pancreas over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The endocrine pancreas is made up of islet cells that produce insulin, glucagon and somatostatin.
0	1	1	nuclear migration along microfilament	The directed movement of the nucleus along microfilaments within the cell, mediated by motor proteins.
0	3	2	microtubule organizing center organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a microtubule organizing center, a structure from which microtubules grow.
3	7	16	actomyosin structure organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures containing both actin and myosin or paramyosin. The myosin may be organized into filaments.
3	0	2	dense core granule	Electron-dense organelle with a granular internal matrix; contains proteins destined to be secreted.
5	3	4	gene silencing by RNA	Any process in which RNA molecules inactivate expression of target genes.
1	0	1	chromosome breakage	Regulated cleavage of the developing macronuclear genome at a limited number of chromosome breakage sites (CBS). The macronuclear destined segment (MDS) sequence adjacent to the CBS (or separated from it by a BES) receives a macronuclear telomere following chromosome breakage.
2	2	2	primary miRNA processing	Any process involved in the conversion of a primary microRNA transcript into a pre-microRNA molecule.
3	2	3	pre-miRNA processing	Any process involved in the conversion of a pre-microRNA transcript into a mature microRNA molecule.
0	1	0	regulation of histone modification	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent alteration of a histone.
2	3	0	positive regulation of histone methylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of methyl groups to histones.
1	0	0	regulation of histone deacetylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the removal of acetyl groups from histones.
0	0	1	negative regulation of histone deacetylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the removal of acetyl groups from histones.
0	2	4	positive regulation of histone deacetylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the removal of acetyl groups from histones.
4	3	1	hair follicle morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the hair follicle are generated and organized.
6	14	18	heat shock protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a heat shock protein, any protein synthesized or activated in response to heat shock.
1	1	1	embryonic camera-type eye development	The process occurring during the embryonic phase whose specific outcome is the progression of the eye over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	post-embryonic camera-type eye development	The process occurring during the post-embryonic phase whose specific outcome is the progression of the camera-type eye over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	3	2	nuclear pore outer ring	A subcomplex of the nuclear pore complex (NPC) that forms the outer rings of the core scaffold, a lattice-like structure that gives the NPC its shape and strength. In S. cerevisiae, the two outer rings each contain multiple copies of the following proteins: Nup133p, Nup120p, Nup145Cp, Nup85p, Nup84p, Seh1p, and Sec13p. In vertebrates, the two outer rings each contain multiple copies of the following proteins: Nup133, Nup160, Nup96, Nup75, Nup107, Seh1, Sec13, Nup43, Nup37, and ALADIN. Components are arranged in 8-fold symmetrical 'spokes' around the central transport channel. A single 'spoke', can be isolated and is sometimes referred to as the Nup84 complex (S. cerevisiae) or the Nup107-160 complex (vertebrates).
1	1	0	BLOC-1 complex	A protein complex required for the biogenesis of specialized organelles of the endosomal-lysosomal system, such as melanosomes and platelet dense granules. Many of the protein subunits are conserved between mouse and human; the mouse complex contains the Pallidin, Muted, Cappuccino, Dysbindin, Snapin, BLOS1, BLOS2, AND BLOS3 proteins.
2	0	0	BLOC-2 complex	A protein complex required for the biogenesis of specialized organelles of the endosomal-lysosomal system, such as melanosomes and platelet dense granules. The human complex contains the Hps3, Hps5, and Hps6 proteins; the mouse complex contains ru2 and ru.
0	1	0	BLOC-3 complex	A protein complex required for the biogenesis of specialized organelles of the endosomal-lysosomal system, such as melanosomes and platelet dense granules. The human complex contains the Hps1 and Hps4 proteins.
0	2	0	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, deadenylation-independent decay	A pathway of degradation of nuclear-transcribed mRNAs that proceeds through a series of steps that is independent of deadenylation, but requires decapping followed by transcript decay, and that can regulate mRNA stability.
0	3	1	deadenylation-independent decapping of nuclear-transcribed mRNA	Cleavage of the 5'-cap of a nuclear-transcribed mRNA that is independent of poly(A) tail shortening.
1	1	0	platelet dense granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the platelet dense granule.
5	1	1	platelet dense granule lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of the platelet dense granule.
2	0	6	organelle membrane	A membrane that is one of the two lipid bilayers of an organelle envelope or the outermost membrane of single membrane bound organelle.
3	4	4	platelet alpha granule	A secretory organelle found in blood platelets, which is unique in that it exhibits further compartmentalization and acquires its protein content via two distinct mechanisms: (1) biosynthesis predominantly at the megakaryocyte (MK) level (with some vestigial platelet synthesis) (e.g. platelet factor 4) and (2) endocytosis and pinocytosis at both the MK and circulating platelet levels (e.g. fibrinogen (Fg) and IgG).
5	3	1	platelet alpha granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the platelet alpha granule.
11	14	14	platelet alpha granule lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of the platelet alpha granule.
2	0	0	platelet dense tubular network	A network of membrane-bounded compartments found in blood platelets, where they regulate platelet activation by sequestering or releasing calcium. The dense tubular network exists as thin elongated membranes in resting platelets, and undergoes a major ultrastructural change, to a rounded vesicular form, upon addition of thrombin.
2	3	3	platelet dense tubular network membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the platelet dense tubular network.
1	4	10	stress-activated protein kinase signaling cascade	A series of molecular signals in which a stress-activated protein kinase (SAPK) cascade relays one or more of the signals.
10	6	5	animal organ regeneration	The regrowth of a lost or destroyed animal organ.
0	1	0	neuron projection regeneration	The regrowth of neuronal processes such as axons or dendrites in response to their loss or damage.
3	0	4	axon regeneration	The regrowth of axons following their loss or damage.
1	2	5	septin complex	A protein complex containing septins.  Typically, these complexes contain multiple septins and are oligomeric.
0	1	1	septin ring organization	Control of the formation, spatial distribution, and breakdown of the septin ring.
0	0	1	microtubule polymerization or depolymerization	Assembly or disassembly of microtubules by the addition or removal of tubulin heterodimers from a microtubule.
0	3	7	regulation of microtubule polymerization or depolymerization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule polymerization or depolymerization by the addition or removal of tubulin heterodimers from a microtubule.
0	1	1	negative regulation of microtubule polymerization or depolymerization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule polymerization or depolymerization.
0	2	6	regulation of microtubule polymerization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule polymerization.
0	0	3	regulation of microtubule depolymerization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule depolymerization.
0	2	5	negative regulation of microtubule polymerization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule polymerization.
3	5	9	positive regulation of microtubule polymerization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule polymerization.
0	1	1	positive regulation of microtubule depolymerization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule depolymerization.
0	0	1	rRNA pseudouridine synthesis	The intramolecular conversion of uridine to pseudouridine in an rRNA molecule.
0	0	1	snRNA pseudouridine synthesis	The intramolecular conversion of uridine to pseudouridine in an snRNA molecule.
5	4	14	cytoplasmic microtubule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of structures formed of microtubules and associated proteins in the cytoplasm of a cell.
1	0	2	RNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of an RNA molecule.
7	24	16	mRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of an mRNA molecule.
1	0	0	inductive cell-cell signaling	Signaling at short range between cells of different ancestry and developmental potential that results in one cell or group of cells effecting a developmental change in the other. This is often done by secretion of proteins by one cell which affects the neighboring cells and causes them to adopt a certain fate.
0	0	1	regulation of axon diameter	Any process that modulates the rate, direction or extent of axon growth such that the correct diameter is attained and maintained.
0	1	1	sister chromatid biorientation	The cell cycle process in which sister chromatids establish stable attachments to microtubules emanating from opposite spindle poles.
2	5	8	pseudopodium	A temporary protrusion or retractile process of a cell, associated with flowing movements of the protoplasm, and serving for locomotion and feeding.
14	13	18	anaphase-promoting complex-dependent catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of ubiquitin, with ubiquitin-protein ligation catalyzed by the anaphase-promoting complex, and mediated by the proteasome.
13	11	12	SCF-dependent proteasomal ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of ubiquitin, with ubiquitin-protein ligation catalyzed by an SCF (Skp1/Cul1/F-box protein) complex, and mediated by the proteasome.
0	1	0	histone methyltransferase activity (H3-K79 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + histone H3 L-lysine (position 79) = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + histone H3 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 79). This reaction is the addition of a methyl group onto lysine at position 79 of the histone H3 protein.
0	1	0	phosphatidylinositol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phosphatidylinositol, any glycophospholipid with its sn-glycerol 3-phosphate residue is esterified to the 1-hydroxyl group of 1D-myo-inositol.
4	1	1	rRNA methylation	The posttranscriptional addition of methyl groups to specific residues in an rRNA molecule.
14	19	29	neuron projection development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a neuron projection over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A neuron projection is any process extending from a neural cell, such as axons or dendrites (collectively called neurites).
0	0	1	phosphopantetheine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphopantetheine, the vitamin pantetheine 4'-(dihydrogen phosphate).
8	7	11	SNARE complex	A protein complex involved in membrane fusion; a stable ternary complex consisting of a four-helix bundle, usually formed from one R-SNARE and three Q-SNAREs with an ionic layer sandwiched between hydrophobic layers. One well-characterized example is the neuronal SNARE complex formed of synaptobrevin 2, syntaxin 1a, and SNAP-25.
0	2	2	posttranslational protein targeting to membrane, translocation	The process in which a protein translocates through the ER membrane posttranslationally.
0	1	0	endoplasmic reticulum Sec complex	An endoplasmic reticulum membrane-associated complex involved in the translocation of proteins that are targeted to the ER. In yeast, this complex consists of two subcomplexes, namely, the Sec61 complex and the Sec62/Sec63 complex.
0	1	0	Sec62/Sec63 complex	A protein complex involved in the posttranslational targeting of proteins to the ER. In yeast, it is a tetrameric complex consisting of Sec62p, Sec63p, Sec71p and Sec72p.
0	2	0	POZ domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a POZ (poxvirus and zinc finger) domain of a protein, a protein-protein interaction domain found in many transcription factors.
2	2	3	SCAR complex	A pentameric complex that includes orthologues of human PIR121, Nap1, Abi, SCAR, and HSPC300 and regulates actin polymerization and/or depolymerization through small GTPase mediated signal transduction.
3	6	6	phosphatidylcholine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylcholine, a class of glycophospholipids in which a phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of choline.
0	1	1	RSF complex	An ISWI complex that contains an ATPase subunit of the ISWI family (SNF2H in mammals) and an RSF1 homolog. It mediates nucleosome deposition and generates regularly spaced nucleosome arrays. In mammals, RSF is involved in regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoters).
6	2	3	biomineral tissue development	Formation of hard tissues that consist mainly of inorganic compounds, and also contain a small amounts of organic matrices that are believed to play important roles in their formation.
1	0	0	auditory behavior	The behavior of an organism in response to a sound.
0	2	5	intrinsic component of membrane	The component of a membrane consisting of the gene products having some covalently attached portion, for example part of a peptide sequence or some other covalently attached group such as a GPI anchor, which spans or is embedded in one or both leaflets of the membrane.
10	1	3	anchored component of membrane	The component of a membrane consisting of the gene products that are tethered to the membrane only by a covalently attached anchor, such as a lipid group that is embedded in the membrane. Gene products with peptide sequences that are embedded in the membrane are excluded from this grouping.
5	2	3	intrinsic component of plasma membrane	The component of the plasma membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having either part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane or some other covalently attached group such as a GPI anchor that is similarly embedded in the membrane.
1	0	3	intrinsic component of endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The component of the endoplasmic reticulum membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having either part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane or some other covalently attached group such as a GPI anchor that is similarly embedded in the membrane.
2	1	2	extrinsic component of external side of plasma membrane	The component of a plasma membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to its external surface, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	1	0	intrinsic component of external side of plasma membrane	The component of a plasma membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that penetrate the external side of the plasma membrane only, either directly or via some covalently attached hydrophobic anchor.
9	19	13	extrinsic component of cytoplasmic side of plasma membrane	The component of a plasma membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to its cytoplasmic surface, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
1	0	2	intrinsic component of the cytoplasmic side of the plasma membrane	The component of a plasma membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that have some covalently attached part (e.g. peptide sequence or GPI anchor) which is embedded in the cytoplasmic side of the plasma membrane only.
0	0	1	actin rod assembly	The assembly of actin rods, a cellular structure consisting of parallel, hexagonally arranged actin tubules.
0	0	1	denatured protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with denatured proteins.
0	2	0	PAN complex	A complex that possesses poly(A)-specific ribonuclease activity; catalyzes the message-specific shortening of mRNA poly(A) tails. Contains at least two subunits, known as Pan2p and Pan3p in Saccharomyces.
9	16	12	cell leading edge	The area of a motile cell closest to the direction of movement.
1	2	4	cell projection membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a plasma membrane bounded cell surface projection.
2	4	1	leading edge membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding the leading edge of a motile cell.
2	5	7	lamellipodium membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a lamellipodium.
1	0	0	uropod membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a uropod.
1	0	0	pseudopodium membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a pseudopodium.
0	1	0	Ndc80 complex	An outer kinetochore protein complex that is part of the KMN kinetochore network (also known as the NMS complex) providing the platform with which the plus ends of spindle microtubules directly interact to form stable kinetochore-microtubule attachments. A common subunit nomenclature is used from yeast to human: Ndc80, Nuf2, Spc24, and Spc25.
1	3	0	death-inducing signaling complex	A protein complex formed by the association of signaling proteins with a death receptor upon ligand binding. The complex includes procaspases and death domain-containing proteins in addition to the ligand-bound receptor, and may control the activation of caspases 8 and 10.
2	2	0	CD95 death-inducing signaling complex	A protein complex formed upon binding of Fas/CD95/APO-1 to its ligand. The complex includes FADD/Mort1, procaspase-8/10 and c-FLIP in addition to the ligand-bound receptor.
35	49	63	small GTPase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a small monomeric GTPase.
1	0	0	pseudopodium organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a pseudopodium, a temporary protrusion or retractile process of a cell, associated with cellular movement.
2	2	2	positive regulation of pseudopodium assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of pseudopodia.
1	0	0	regulation of lateral pseudopodium assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of pseudopodia from the lateral side of the cell.
1	1	1	positive regulation of cyclase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of a cyclase.
0	1	0	negative regulation of guanylate cyclase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of guanylate cyclase activity.
1	0	0	positive regulation of guanylate cyclase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of guanylate cyclase activity.
3	1	0	retinal ganglion cell axon guidance	The process in which the migration of an axon growth cone of a retinal ganglion cell (RGC) is directed to its target in the brain in response to a combination of attractive and repulsive cues.
0	2	0	Ran protein signal transduction	A series of molecular signals within the cell that are mediated by a member of the Ran family of proteins switching to a GTP-bound active state.
1	4	1	membrane protein intracellular domain proteolysis	The proteolytic cleavage of a transmembrane protein leading to the release of an intracellular domain.
4	8	10	T cell costimulation	The process of providing, via surface-bound receptor-ligand pairs, a second, antigen-independent, signal in addition to that provided by the T cell receptor to augment T cell activation.
3	6	4	replication fork processing	The process in which a DNA replication fork that has stalled is restored to a functional state and replication is restarted. The stalling may be due to DNA damage, DNA secondary structure, bound proteins, dNTP shortage, or other causes.
1	0	0	replication fork protection complex	A protein complex conserved in eukaryotes and associated with the replication fork; the complex stabilizes stalled replication forks and is thought to be involved in coordinating leading- and lagging-strand synthesis and in replication checkpoint signaling.
0	1	0	intrinsic component of organelle membrane	The component of the organelle membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having either part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane or some other covalently attached group such as a GPI anchor that is similarly embedded in the membrane.
1	0	0	integral component of organelle membrane	The component of the organelle membrane consisting of the gene products having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
0	1	0	intrinsic component of endosome membrane	The component of the endosome membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having either part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane or some other covalently attached group such as a GPI anchor that is similarly embedded in the membrane.
4	1	0	integral component of mitochondrial inner membrane	The component of the mitochondrial inner membrane consisting of the gene products having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
4	5	3	integral component of mitochondrial outer membrane	The component of the mitochondrial outer membrane consisting of the gene products having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
1	0	0	extrinsic component of organelle membrane	The component of an organelle membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
1	1	2	extrinsic component of endosome membrane	The component of an endosome membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
2	0	1	extrinsic component of mitochondrial inner membrane	The component of mitochondrial inner membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
2	0	0	extrinsic component of mitochondrial outer membrane	The component of a mitochondrial outer membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	0	3	positive regulation of cellular metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways by which individual cells transform chemical substances.
0	1	0	positive regulation of cellular biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of substances, carried out by individual cells.
3	6	10	negative regulation of protein-containing complex assembly	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein complex assembly.
11	5	6	positive regulation of protein-containing complex assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein complex assembly.
0	2	0	negative regulation of vesicle fusion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vesicle fusion.
0	2	3	positive regulation of vesicle fusion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vesicle fusion.
2	0	1	positive regulation of cell killing	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell killing.
1	0	0	regulation of cell projection organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cell projections.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cell projection organization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cell projections.
1	0	1	positive regulation of cell projection organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cell projections.
3	1	0	anchored component of external side of plasma membrane	The component of the plasma membrane consisting of the gene products that are tethered to the external side of the membrane only by a covalently attached anchor, such as a lipid group embedded in the membrane. Gene products with peptide sequences that are embedded in the membrane are excluded from this grouping.
1	0	0	N-terminal protein amino acid modification	The alteration of the N-terminal amino acid residue in a protein.
3	5	4	translation initiation factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a translation initiation factor, any polypeptide factor involved in the initiation of ribosome-mediated translation.
0	1	0	eukaryotic initiation factor 4G binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with eukaryotic initiation factor 4G, a polypeptide factor involved in the initiation of ribosome-mediated translation.
0	0	1	ubiquitin conjugating enzyme complex	Any complex that possesses ubiquitin conjugating enzyme activity.
1	0	4	protein tag	A molecular function exhibited by a protein that is covalently attached (AKA tagged or conjugated) to another protein where it acts as a marker, recognized by the cellular apparatus to target the tagged protein for some cellular process such as modification, sequestration, transport or degradation.
0	1	0	Ctf18 RFC-like complex	A heptameric complex related to replication factor C, which loads the DNA polymerase processivity factor proliferating cell nuclear antigen (PCNA) onto DNA and plays a vital role in chromosome cohesion. In Saccharomyces the subunits are known as Ctf18p, Rfc2p, Rfc3p, Rfc4p, Rfc5p, Dcc1p, and Ctf8p.
0	1	1	Elg1 RFC-like complex	A pentameric replication factor C (RLC) complex, which unloads the DNA polymerase processivity factor proliferating cell nuclear antigen (PCNA) from chromatin and has roles in telomere length regulation and other aspects of genome stability. In Saccharomyces the subunits are known as Elg1p, Rfc2p, Rfc3p, Rfc4p, and Rfc5p.
1	0	0	regulation of prostaglandin biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of prostaglandin.
1	1	0	negative regulation of prostaglandin biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of prostaglandin.
1	0	1	positive regulation of prostaglandin biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of prostaglandin.
1	1	6	regulation of protein ubiquitination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of ubiquitin groups to a protein.
4	12	10	negative regulation of protein ubiquitination	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of ubiquitin groups to a protein.
12	10	11	positive regulation of protein ubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of ubiquitin groups to a protein.
0	0	1	positive regulation of protein modification process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent alteration of one or more amino acid residues within a protein.
0	1	2	sodium ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with sodium ions (Na+).
0	1	1	lithium ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with lithium ions (Li+).
2	1	0	chloride ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with chloride ions (Cl-).
3	3	0	carboxylic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a carboxylic acid, any organic acid containing one or more carboxyl (COOH) groups or anions (COO-).
35	39	29	cytoplasmic vesicle	A vesicle found in the cytoplasm of a cell.
1	2	0	NatA complex	A conserved complex that catalyzes the transfer of an acetyl group to an N-terminal Ser, Ala, Gly, or Thr residue of a protein acceptor molecule. In Saccharomyces the complex includes Nat1p and Ard1p, and may contain additional proteins.
0	1	0	NatC complex	A conserved complex that catalyzes the transfer of an acetyl group to the N-terminal residue of a protein acceptor molecule that has a Met-Ile, Met-Leu, Met-Trp, or Met-Phe N-terminus. In Saccharomyces the complex includes Mak3p, Mak10p, and Mak31p.
2	1	0	L-ascorbic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with L-ascorbic acid, (2R)-2-[(1S)-1,2-dihydroxyethyl]-4-hydroxy-5-oxo-2,5-dihydrofuran-3-olate; L-ascorbic acid is vitamin C and has co-factor and anti-oxidant activities in many species.
2	1	0	cobalamin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cobalamin (vitamin B12), a water-soluble vitamin characterized by possession of a corrin nucleus containing a cobalt atom.
1	0	0	RecQ family helicase-topoisomerase III complex	A complex containing a RecQ family helicase and a topoisomerase III homologue (a member of the topoisomerase type IA subfamily); may also include one or more additional proteins; conserved from E. coli to human.
20	11	21	keratinization	The process in which the cytoplasm of the outermost cells of the vertebrate epidermis is replaced by keratin. Keratinization occurs in the stratum corneum, feathers, hair, claws, nails, hooves, and horns.
1	0	0	response to methotrexate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a methotrexate stimulus. Methotrexate is 4-amino-10-methylformic acid, a folic acid analogue that is a potent competitive inhibitor of dihydrofolate reductase.
1	0	5	box C/D snoRNP complex	A ribonucleoprotein complex containing small nucleolar RNA of the box C/D type that can carry out ribose-2'-O-methylation of target RNAs.
0	0	2	box H/ACA snoRNP complex	A box H/ACA RNP complex that is located in the nucleolus.
5	0	9	M band	The midline of aligned thick filaments in a sarcomere; location of specific proteins that link thick filaments. Depending on muscle type the M band consists of different numbers of M lines.
0	1	0	Dbf4-dependent protein kinase complex	A heterodimeric protein complex required for the activation of DNA replication origins; comprises a catalytic subunit and a regulatory subunit (in Saccharomyces, Cdc7p and Dbf4p, respectively); complexes identified in other species generally contain proteins related to the Saccharomyces proteins.
0	0	6	titin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with titin, any of a family of giant proteins found in striated and smooth muscle. In striated muscle, single titin molecules span half the sarcomere, with their N- and C-termini in the Z-disc and M-line, respectively.
1	1	1	telethonin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with telethonin, a protein found in the Z disc of striated muscle and which is a substrate of the titin kinase.
2	2	2	mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase, any protein that can phosphorylate a MAP kinase.
3	4	3	mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase kinase, any protein that can phosphorylate a MAP kinase kinase.
1	1	0	BRCA1-BARD1 complex	A heterodimeric complex comprising BRCA1 and BARD1, which possesses ubiquitin ligase activity and is involved in genome maintenance, possibly by functioning in surveillance for DNA damage.
1	0	0	positive regulation of mRNA cleavage	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA cleavage.
1	1	1	regulation of mRNA 3'-end processing	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA 3'-end processing, any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of an mRNA molecule.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mRNA 3'-end processing	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA 3'-end processing.
2	0	1	positive regulation of mRNA 3'-end processing	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA 3'-end processing.
0	0	1	fast-twitch skeletal muscle fiber contraction	A process in which force is generated within fast-twitch skeletal muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. The fast-twitch skeletal muscle is characterized by fast time parameters, high force development and fatiguability.
0	0	1	slow-twitch skeletal muscle fiber contraction	A process in which force is generated within slow-twitch skeletal muscle tissue, resulting in a change in muscle geometry. Force generation involves a chemo-mechanical energy conversion step that is carried out by the actin/myosin complex activity, which generates force through ATP hydrolysis. The slow-twitch skeletal muscle is characterized by slow time parameters, low force development and resistance to fatigue.
0	1	0	positive regulation of fast-twitch skeletal muscle fiber contraction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of fast-twitch skeletal muscle contraction.
0	0	1	regulation of slow-twitch skeletal muscle fiber contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of slow-twitch skeletal muscle contraction.
0	0	1	positive regulation of heterochromatin assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of heterochromatin formation.
1	2	2	cullin-RING ubiquitin ligase complex	Any ubiquitin ligase complex in which the catalytic core consists of a member of the cullin family and a RING domain protein; the core is associated with one or more additional proteins that confer substrate specificity.
0	2	0	Cul2-RING ubiquitin ligase complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex in which a cullin from the Cul2 subfamily and a RING domain protein form the catalytic core; substrate specificity is conferred by an elongin-BC adaptor and a SOCS/BC box protein.
3	2	0	Cul3-RING ubiquitin ligase complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex in which a cullin from the Cul3 subfamily and a RING domain protein form the catalytic core; substrate specificity is conferred by a BTB-domain-containing protein.
1	2	1	Cul4A-RING E3 ubiquitin ligase complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex in which a cullin from the Cul4A subfamily and a RING domain protein form the catalytic core; substrate specificity is conferred by an adaptor protein.
1	3	0	Cul4B-RING E3 ubiquitin ligase complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex in which a cullin from the Cul4B subfamily and a RING domain protein form the catalytic core; substrate specificity is conferred by unknown subunits.
2	4	1	nuclear envelope reassembly	The reformation of the nuclear envelope following its breakdown in the context of a normal process.
0	0	1	myosin V complex	A myosin complex containing a dimer of class V myosin heavy chains and associated light chains; involved in intracellular transport. Myosin V is a dimeric molecule consisting of conserved motor domains followed by 6 IQ motifs which bind specific light chains and calmodulin. The tail domain is important for cellular localization and cargo binding and can be divided into an alpha-helical coiled coil region and a C-terminal globular region.
1	0	0	myosin VII complex	A myosin complex containing a dimer of class VII myosin heavy chains and associated light chains. Myosin VII (240 kDa) is predicted to be a dimeric molecule with 5 IQ motifs and a tail region with a short stretch of coiled coil followed by two myosin-tail homology (MyTH4) domains, two talin-binding (FERM) domains and an SH3-domain.
1	6	1	myosin V binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a class V myosin; myosin V is a dimeric molecule involved in intracellular transport.
10	8	16	chromatin DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA that is assembled into chromatin.
3	7	4	nucleosome binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a nucleosome, a complex comprised of DNA wound around a multisubunit core and associated proteins, which forms the primary packing unit of DNA into higher order structures.
3	6	11	nucleosomal DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the DNA portion of a nucleosome.
1	1	1	nucleosomal histone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone that is assembled into a nucleosome.
1	4	2	chromatin assembly	The assembly of DNA, histone proteins, other associated proteins, and sometimes RNA, into chromatin structure, beginning with the formation of the basic unit, the nucleosome, followed by organization of the nucleosomes into higher order structures, ultimately giving rise to a complex organization of specific domains within the nucleus.
0	0	1	TRAMP complex	A multiprotein complex having distributive polyadenylation activity of a variety of RNA substrates including hypomodified and incorrectly folded tRNAs, pre-snRNAs, pre-snoRNAs, incorrectly spliced or processed pre-mRNAs, cryptic unstable transcripts (CUTs), pre-rRNAs and rRNA fragments released as part of rRNA processing. In S. cerevisiae, the complex consists of either Pap2 (also known as Trf4) or Trf5, Air1 or Air2, and Mtr4, and is involved in RNA 3'-end processing and in RNA surveillance and quality control.
0	1	1	heterochromatin assembly	The assembly of chromatin into heterochromatin, a compact and highly condensed form that is often, but not always, transcriptionally silent.
1	1	0	pericentric heterochromatin assembly	The assembly of chromatin located adjacent to the CENP-A rich centromere 'central core' and characterized by the modified histone H3K9me3, into heterochromatin, resulting in the repression of transcription of centromeric DNA.
0	1	0	subtelomeric heterochromatin assembly	The assembly of chromatin into heterochromatin at the subtelomeric region.
0	1	0	SUMO activating enzyme complex	A conserved heterodimeric complex with SUMO activating enzyme activity.
7	3	4	motile cilium	A cilium which may have a variable arrangement of axonemal microtubules and also contains molecular motors. It may beat with a whip-like pattern that promotes cell motility or transport of fluids and other cells across a cell surface, such as on epithelial cells that line the lumenal ducts of various tissues; or they may display a distinct twirling motion that directs fluid flow asymmetrically across the cellular surface to affect asymmetric body plan organization. Motile cilia can be found in single as well as multiple copies per cell.
3	5	1	PcG protein complex	A chromatin-associated multiprotein complex containing Polycomb Group proteins. In Drosophila, Polycomb group proteins are involved in the long-term maintenance of gene repression, and PcG protein complexes associate with Polycomb group response elements (PREs) in target genes to regulate higher-order chromatin structure.
1	1	1	Myb complex	A multisubunit complex consisting of Myb and other proteins that regulates site specific DNA replication, gene amplification and transcriptional repression.
7	6	5	brush border membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding the brush border.
5	4	5	filopodium membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a filopodium.
7	2	6	microvillus membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a microvillus.
3	3	4	ruffle organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a ruffle, a projection at the leading edge of a crawling cell.
8	12	13	actin cytoskeleton reorganization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in dynamic structural changes to the arrangement of constituent parts of cytoskeletal structures comprising actin filaments and their associated proteins.
0	1	0	mRNA cap methyltransferase complex	A protein complex that consists of an RNA 5' triphosphatase and a guanyl transferase (Cet1p and Ceg1p in S. cerevisiae; Pct1 and Ceg1 in S. pombe) and is involved in mRNA capping.
1	1	0	positive regulation of exit from mitosis	Any process that activates or increases the rate of progression from anaphase/telophase (high mitotic CDK activity) to G1 (low mitotic CDK activity).
0	0	1	brain-derived neurotrophic factor receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a brain-derived neurotrophic factor receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
0	1	0	negative regulation of brain-derived neurotrophic factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signaling via the brain-derived neurotrophic factor receptor signaling pathway.
2	2	1	mitotic G1 DNA damage checkpoint	A mitotic cell cycle checkpoint that detects and negatively regulates progression through the G1/S transition of the cell cycle in response to DNA damage.
0	6	2	intra-S DNA damage checkpoint	A mitotic cell cycle checkpoint that slows DNA synthesis in response to DNA damage by the prevention of new origin firing and the stabilization of slow replication fork progression.
1	0	2	membrane raft organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of membrane rafts, small (10-200 nm), heterogeneous, highly dynamic, sterol- and sphingolipid-enriched membrane domains that compartmentalize cellular processes.
1	0	0	membrane raft distribution	The process that establishes the spatial arrangement of membrane rafts within a cellular membrane.
0	3	4	hemidesmosome assembly	Assembly of hemidesmosomes, integrin-containing protein complexes that bind to laminin in the basal lamina. Hemidesmosomes form the contact between the basal surface of epithelial cells and the underlying basal lamina.
1	2	0	activation of phospholipase D activity	Any process that initiates the activity of inactive phospholipase D.
0	0	1	regulation of inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate-sensitive calcium-release channel activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of the inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate-sensitive calcium-release channel.
0	1	1	positive regulation of inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate-sensitive calcium-release channel activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of the inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate-sensitive calcium-release channel.
1	1	5	nucleotide-activated protein kinase complex	A protein complex that possesses nucleotide-dependent protein kinase activity. The nucleotide can be AMP (in S. pombe and human) or ADP (in S. cerevisiae).
3	5	2	cell-substrate adhesion	The attachment of a cell to the underlying substrate via adhesion molecules.
0	0	1	centrosomal corona	An amorphous structure surrounding the core of the centrosome, from which microtubules are nucleated; contains gamma-tubulin.
2	8	7	polyubiquitin modification-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon poly-ubiquitination of the target protein.
8	11	20	neuromuscular junction	The junction between the axon of a motor neuron and a muscle fiber. In response to the arrival of action potentials, the presynaptic button releases molecules of neurotransmitters into the synaptic cleft. These diffuse across the cleft and transmit the signal to the postsynaptic membrane of the muscle fiber, leading to a change in post-synaptic potential.
1	1	0	cytosolic proteasome complex	A proteasome complex found in the cytosol of a cell.
3	1	4	spindle pole centrosome	A centrosome from which one pole of a mitotic or meiotic spindle is organized.
1	0	0	regulation of fever generation	Any process that modulates the rate or extent of fever generation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of fever generation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of fever generation.
5	10	6	receptor internalization	A receptor-mediated endocytosis process that results in the movement of receptors from the plasma membrane to the inside of the cell. The process begins when cell surface receptors are monoubiquitinated following ligand-induced activation. Receptors are subsequently taken up into endocytic vesicles from where they are either targeted to the lysosome or vacuole for degradation or recycled back to the plasma membrane.
3	2	1	ubiquitin conjugating enzyme binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a ubiquitin conjugating enzyme, any of the E2 proteins.
45	45	56	ubiquitin protein ligase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a ubiquitin protein ligase enzyme, any of the E3 proteins.
0	0	1	telomeric loop formation	The process in which linear telomeric DNA is remodeled into duplex loops, by the invasion of a 3' single-stranded overhang into the duplex region.
1	2	4	synaptic vesicle fusion to presynaptic active zone membrane	Fusion of the membrane of a synaptic vesicle with the presynaptic active zone membrane, thereby releasing its cargo neurotransmitters into the synaptic cleft.
1	0	2	regulation of synaptic vesicle fusion to presynaptic active zone membrane	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle fusion to the presynaptic membrane.
5	1	1	zymogen activation	The proteolytic processing of an inactive enzyme to an active form.
2	0	5	plasminogen activation	The process in which inactive plasminogen is processed to active plasmin. This process includes cleavage at an internal Arg-Val site to form an N-terminal A-chain and C-terminal B-chain held together by a disulfide bond, and can include further proteolytic cleavage events to remove the preactivation peptide.
7	5	6	killing of cells of other organism	Any process in an organism that results in the killing of cells of another organism, including in some cases the death of the other organism. Killing here refers to the induction of death in one cell by another cell, not cell-autonomous death due to internal or other environmental conditions.
3	3	3	regulation of myelination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the formation of a myelin sheath around nerve axons.
3	1	0	negative regulation of myelination	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the formation of a myelin sheath around nerve axons.
5	1	2	positive regulation of myelination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the formation of a myelin sheath around nerve axons.
0	0	1	regulation of nervous system process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a neurophysiological process, an organ system process carried out by any of the organs or tissues of the nervous system.
13	14	16	regulation of protein stability	Any process that affects the structure and integrity of a protein, altering the likelihood of its degradation or aggregation.
4	9	4	protein destabilization	Any process that decreases the stability of a protein, making it more vulnerable to degradative processes or aggregation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of heat generation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of heat generation.
5	4	6	lipopolysaccharide-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a lipopolysaccharide (LPS) to a receptor on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Lipopolysaccharides are major components of the outer membrane of Gram-negative bacteria, making them prime targets for recognition by the immune system.
2	2	0	negative regulation of lipopolysaccharide-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signaling in response to detection of lipopolysaccharide.
1	0	2	positive regulation of lipopolysaccharide-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signaling in response to detection of lipopolysaccharide.
4	7	2	response to nutrient levels	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus reflecting the presence, absence, or concentration of nutrients.
3	0	3	cellular response to extracellular stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an extracellular stimulus.
2	3	3	cellular response to nutrient levels	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus reflecting the presence, absence, or concentration of nutrients.
0	1	0	cellular response to nutrient	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nutrient stimulus.
4	2	5	A band	The dark-staining region of a sarcomere, in which myosin thick filaments are present; the center is traversed by the paler H zone, which in turn contains the M line.
0	1	1	H zone	A relatively pale zone traversing the center of the A band of a sarcomere, visible in relaxed muscle fibers; consists of the central portion of thick (myosin) filaments that are not overlapped by thin (actin) filaments.
3	4	5	I band	A region of a sarcomere that appears as a light band on each side of the Z disc, comprising a region of the sarcomere where thin (actin) filaments are not overlapped by thick (myosin) filaments; contains actin, troponin, and tropomyosin; each sarcomere includes half of an I band at each end.
1	0	2	G-protein beta/gamma-subunit complex	The heterodimer formed by the beta and gamma subunits of a heterotrimeric G protein, which dissociates from the alpha subunit upon guanine nuclotide exchange.
3	0	3	G-protein beta-subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a G-protein beta subunit.
1	0	3	G-protein gamma-subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a G-protein gamma subunit.
2	4	2	G-protein beta/gamma-subunit complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a complex of G-protein beta/gamma subunits.
0	1	0	adenosine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an adenosine receptor.
0	0	1	adrenergic receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an adrenergic receptor.
0	1	0	alpha-1A adrenergic receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an alpha-1A adrenergic receptor.
1	1	0	alpha-1B adrenergic receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an alpha-1B adrenergic receptor.
0	1	1	alpha-2A adrenergic receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an alpha-2A adrenergic receptor.
1	0	0	alpha-2C adrenergic receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an alpha-2C adrenergic receptor.
1	1	3	beta-1 adrenergic receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a beta-1 adrenergic receptor.
0	2	3	beta-2 adrenergic receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a beta-2 adrenergic receptor.
0	1	0	angiotensin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an angiotensin receptor.
4	1	1	type 1 angiotensin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type 1 angiotensin receptor.
0	1	0	type 2 angiotensin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type 2 angiotensin receptor.
0	0	1	C5L2 anaphylatoxin chemotactic receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a C5L2 anaphylatoxin chemotactic receptor.
0	3	2	hemoglobin alpha binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a hemoglobin alpha chain.
0	0	1	CCR5 chemokine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a CCR5 chemokine receptor.
1	0	0	CCR6 chemokine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a CCR6 chemokine receptor.
1	2	3	D1 dopamine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a D1 dopamine receptor.
1	0	2	D2 dopamine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a D2 dopamine receptor.
1	0	2	D3 dopamine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a D3 dopamine receptor.
1	0	1	D4 dopamine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a D4 dopamine receptor.
0	0	1	D5 dopamine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a D5 dopamine receptor.
0	1	0	Edg-2 lysophosphatidic acid receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an Edg-2 lysophosphatidic acid receptor.
0	1	0	follicle-stimulating hormone receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a follicle-stimulating hormone receptor.
1	0	0	glucagon receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a glucagon receptor.
0	0	1	lutropin-choriogonadotropic hormone receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a lutropin-choriogonadotropic hormone receptor.
0	0	1	type 1 metabotropic glutamate receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type 1 metabotropic glutamate receptor.
0	0	1	type 2 metabotropic glutamate receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type 2 metabotropic glutamate receptor.
0	0	3	type 3 metabotropic glutamate receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type 3 metabotropic glutamate receptor.
0	1	1	type 5 metabotropic glutamate receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type 5 metabotropic glutamate receptor.
0	0	1	P2Y1 nucleotide receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a P2Y1 nucleotide receptor.
0	2	1	G protein-coupled serotonin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a metabotropic serotonin receptor.
1	0	0	type 2A serotonin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type 2A serotonin receptor.
0	3	4	haptoglobin-hemoglobin complex	A protein complex formed by the stable binding of a haptoglobin to hemoglobin.
0	0	1	neuropeptide Y receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a neuropeptide Y receptor.
1	1	3	protection from non-homologous end joining at telomere	A process that prevents non-homologous end joining at telomere, thereby ensuring that telomeres do not fuse.
0	1	0	olfactory receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an olfactory receptor.
0	1	2	mu-type opioid receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a mu-type opioid receptor.
1	2	0	telomeric 3' overhang formation	The formation of the single stranded telomeric 3' overhang, a conserved feature that ranges in length from 12 nt in budding yeast to approximately 500 nt in humans.
1	2	0	proteinase activated receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a proteinase activated receptor.
0	1	0	V2 vasopressin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a V2 vasopressin receptor.
32	21	19	early endosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding an early endosome.
14	17	8	late endosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a late endosome.
1	4	1	endosome lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of an endosome.
1	0	2	early endosome lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of an early endosome.
1	0	0	late endosome lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of a late endosome.
1	1	0	negative regulation of synaptic plasticity	A process that decreases synaptic plasticity, the ability of synapses to change as circumstances require. They may alter function, such as increasing or decreasing their sensitivity, or they may increase or decrease in actual numbers.
1	2	1	positive regulation of synaptic plasticity	A process that increases synaptic plasticity, the ability of synapses to change as circumstances require. They may alter function, such as increasing or decreasing their sensitivity, or they may increase or decrease in actual numbers.
4	3	6	TOR signaling	A series of molecular signals mediated by TOR (Target of rapamycin) proteins, members of the phosphoinositide (PI) 3-kinase related kinase (PIKK) family that act as serine/threonine kinases in response to nutrient availability or growth factors.
2	2	1	TORC1 complex	A protein complex that contains at least TOR (target of rapamycin) and Raptor (regulatory-associated protein of TOR), or orthologs of, in complex with other signaling components. Mediates the phosphorylation and activation of S6K. In Saccharomyces, the complex contains Kog1p, Lst8p, Tco89p, and either Tor1p or Tor2p.
2	6	0	TORC2 complex	A protein complex that contains at least TOR (target of rapamycin) and Rictor (rapamycin-insensitive companion of TOR), or orthologs of, in complex with other signaling components. Mediates the phosphorylation and activation of PKB (also called AKT). In Saccharomyces, the complex contains Avo1p, Avo2p, Tsc11p, Lst8p, Bit61p, Slm1p, Slm2p, and Tor2p.
1	3	8	negative regulation of chromatin silencing	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin silencing.
1	0	1	positive regulation of chromatin silencing	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin silencing.
0	1	0	positive regulation of chromatin silencing at telomere	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin silencing at telomeres.
5	6	11	filamentous actin	A two-stranded helical polymer of the protein actin.
0	0	1	regulation of glucocorticoid metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving glucocorticoids.
0	0	1	negative regulation of glucocorticoid biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glucocorticoids.
2	1	0	regulation of protein autophosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of addition of the phosphorylation by a protein of one or more of its own residues.
3	2	1	negative regulation of protein autophosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents or decreases the rate of the phosphorylation by a protein of one or more of its own residues.
4	4	4	positive regulation of protein autophosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation by a protein of one or more of its own residues.
0	1	0	medium-chain fatty acid-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a medium-chain carboxylic acid + CoA = AMP + diphosphate + an acyl-CoA; a medium-chain fatty acid is any fatty acid with a chain length of between C6 and C12.
1	0	1	very long-chain fatty acid-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a very-long-chain fatty acid + CoA = AMP + diphosphate + an acyl-CoA; a very long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid which has a chain length greater than C22.
1	0	0	mineralocorticoid receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a mineralocorticoid binding to its receptor.
1	0	1	response to corticosteroid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a corticosteroid hormone stimulus. A corticosteroid is a steroid hormone that is produced in the adrenal cortex. Corticosteroids are involved in a wide range of physiologic systems such as stress response, immune response and regulation of inflammation, carbohydrate metabolism, protein catabolism, blood electrolyte levels, and behavior. They include glucocorticoids and mineralocorticoids.
30	50	48	nuclear membrane	Either of the lipid bilayers that surround the nucleus and form the nuclear envelope; excludes the intermembrane space.
11	7	15	mitochondrial membrane	Either of the lipid bilayers that surround the mitochondrion and form the mitochondrial envelope.
0	0	1	nuclear lumen	The volume enclosed by the nuclear inner membrane.
15	23	47	vesicle	Any small, fluid-filled, spherical organelle enclosed by membrane.
0	1	0	vesicle lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane or protein that forms a vesicle.
0	1	1	Golgi cisterna	Any of the thin, flattened membrane-bounded compartments that form the central portion of the Golgi complex.
0	1	0	locomotion involved in locomotory behavior	Self-propelled movement of a cell or organism from one location to another in a behavioral context; the aspect of locomotory behavior having to do with movement.
0	0	1	mRNA export from nucleus in response to heat stress	The directed movement of mRNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm during a heat stimulus, a temperature stimulus above the optimal temperature for the organism; in particular, a process that enables an organism withstand exposure to temperatures that would otherwise lethally impair poly(A)+ mRNA-nucleus export.
3	2	1	insulin-like growth factor I binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with insulin-like growth factor I.
2	2	1	insulin-like growth factor II binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with insulin-like growth factor II.
5	0	1	thioesterase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any thioesterase enzyme.
0	0	3	N-terminal myristoylation domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the N-terminus of a protein that has the potential to be, or has been, modified by N-terminal myristoylation. Binding affinity is typically altered by myristoylation; for example, N-terminal myristoylation of HIV Nef increases its affinity for calmodulin.
1	1	0	regulation of fatty acid beta-oxidation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of fatty acid bbeta-oxidation.
0	1	1	negative regulation of fatty acid beta-oxidation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of fatty acid beta-oxidation.
1	2	2	positive regulation of fatty acid beta-oxidation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of fatty acid beta-oxidation.
1	0	0	interleukin-28 receptor complex	A protein complex that binds interleukin-28 and interleukin-29. It is composed of an alpha and a beta receptor subunit (in human IFNLR1/IL28Ralpha & IL10RB) and either Interleukin-28 (IFNL2 or IFNL3) or Interleukin-29 (IFNL1).
4	3	1	regulation of TOR signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of TOR signaling.
4	9	4	negative regulation of TOR signaling	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of TOR signaling.
6	8	3	positive regulation of TOR signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of TOR signaling.
2	2	1	early phagosome	A membrane-bounded intracellular vesicle as initially formed upon the ingestion of particulate material by phagocytosis.
2	1	0	phagolysosome	A membrane-bounded intracellular vesicle formed by maturation of an early phagosome following the ingestion of particulate material by phagocytosis; during maturation, phagosomes acquire markers of late endosomes and lysosomes.
0	2	8	regulation of ARF protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ARF protein signal transduction.
0	0	2	positive regulation of ARF protein signal transduction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ARF protein signal transduction.
2	0	0	ISG15-protein conjugation	The covalent addition to a protein of ISG15, a ubiquitin-like protein.
0	2	1	NELF complex	A complex of five proteins, designated NELF-A, -B, -C, -D, and -E in human, that can physically associate with RNP polymerase II to induce transcriptional pausing.
7	5	4	positive regulation of insulin secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of insulin.
1	0	1	response to cobalt ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cobalt ion stimulus.
2	1	0	response to magnesium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a magnesium ion stimulus.
1	2	1	myosin light chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a light chain of a myosin complex.
0	0	1	myosin head/neck binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the head/neck region of a myosin heavy chain.
0	1	0	myosin tail binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the tail region of a myosin heavy chain.
0	0	1	myosin II head/neck binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the head/neck region of a myosin II heavy chain.
2	1	2	myosin heavy chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a heavy chain of a myosin complex.
2	0	0	myosin II heavy chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a heavy chain of a myosin II complex.
2	2	4	integrator complex	A protein complex that stably associates with the C-terminus of RNA polymerase II and mediates 3'-end processing of small nuclear RNAs generated by RNA polymerase II.
10	7	5	small-subunit processome	A large ribonucleoprotein complex that is an early preribosomal complex. In S. cerevisiae, it has a size of 80S and consists of the 35S pre-rRNA, early-associating ribosomal proteins most of which are part of the small ribosomal subunit, the U3 snoRNA and associated proteins.
1	3	4	NAD-dependent histone deacetylase activity (H3-K14 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: histone H3 N6-acetyl-L-lysine (position 14) + H2O = histone H3 L-lysine (position 14) + acetate. This reaction requires the presence of NAD, and represents the removal of an acetyl group from lysine at position 14 of the histone H3 protein.
0	1	0	mitochondrial DNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving mitochondrial DNA.
0	0	1	DSIF complex	A heterodimeric protein complex formed of Spt4 and Spt5 proteins which is expressed in eukaryotes from yeast to man. DSIF is an inhibitory elongation factor that promotes RNA polymerase II transcriptional pausing, but can also stimulate transcriptional elongation under certain conditions, and may play a role in RNA processing via its physical association with mRNA capping enzymes.
1	3	1	guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor complex	A protein complex that stimulates the exchange of guanyl nucleotides associated with a GTPase.
0	0	1	cardiolipin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving cardiolipin, 1,3-bis(3-phosphatidyl)glycerol.
1	0	0	cardiolipin biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cardiolipin, 1,3-bis(3-phosphatidyl)glycerol.
2	0	2	clathrin heavy chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a clathrin heavy chain.
1	0	2	clathrin light chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a clathrin light chain.
5	0	0	bile acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with bile acids, any of a group of steroid carboxylic acids occurring in bile.
0	2	0	ciliary basal body organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a ciliary basal body, a short cylindrical array of microtubules and associated proteins found at the base of a eukaryotic cilium (also called flagellum).
0	1	0	negative regulation of translation in response to stress	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate of translation as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress.
0	1	0	negative regulation of translational initiation in response to stress	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate of translation initiation as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress.
2	2	3	bleb	A cell extension caused by localized decoupling of the cytoskeleton from the plasma membrane and characterized by rapid formation, rounded shape, and scarcity of organelles within the protrusion. Blebs are formed during apoptosis and other cellular processes, including cell locomotion, cell division, and as a result of physical or chemical stresses.
0	0	1	bleb assembly	The assembly of a bleb, a cell extension caused by localized decoupling of the cytoskeleton from the plasma membrane and characterized by rapid formation, rounded shape, and scarcity of organelles within the protrusion. Plasma membrane blebbing occurs during apoptosis and other cellular processes, including cell locomotion, cell division, and as a result of physical or chemical stresses.
0	1	1	regulation of endodeoxyribonuclease activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of endodeoxyribonuclease activity, the hydrolysis of ester linkages within deoxyribonucleic acid by creating internal breaks.
0	0	1	regulation of restriction endodeoxyribonuclease activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a restriction endodeoxyribonuclease activity, the catalysis of endonucleolytic cleavage of DNA in a site-specific manner, resulting in double-strand breaks.
0	1	0	positive regulation of nuclease activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of nuclease activity, the hydrolysis of ester linkages within nucleic acids.
0	1	0	negative regulation of deoxyribonuclease activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of deoxyribonuclease activity, the hydrolysis of ester linkages within deoxyribonucleic acid.
0	0	1	positive regulation of deoxyribonuclease activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of deoxyribonuclease activity, the hydrolysis of ester linkages within deoxyribonucleic acid.
0	1	0	negative regulation of endodeoxyribonuclease activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of endodeoxyribonuclease activity, the hydrolysis of ester linkages within deoxyribonucleic acid by creating internal breaks.
0	0	3	positive regulation of endodeoxyribonuclease activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endodeoxyribonuclease activity, the hydrolysis of ester linkages within deoxyribonucleic acid by creating internal breaks.
10	8	4	negative regulation of NF-kappaB transcription factor activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of the transcription factor NF-kappaB.
0	1	0	NACHT domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a NACHT (NAIP, CIITA, HET-E and TP1) domain. The NACHT domain consists of seven distinct conserved motifs, including an ATP/GTPase specific P-loop, a Mg(2+)-binding site and five more specific motifs.
1	0	0	Pyrin domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a Pyrin (PAAD/DAPIN) domain, a protein-protein interaction domain that has the same fold as the Death domain.
11	11	15	negative regulation of protein binding	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein binding.
6	12	13	positive regulation of protein binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein binding.
1	0	0	SAM domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a SAM (Sterile Alpha Motif) domain, which is a 70-amino acid protein sequence that participates in protein-protein, protein-lipid, and protein-RNA interactions and is conserved from lower to higher eukaryotes.
2	2	5	response to food	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a food stimulus; food is anything which, when taken into the body, serves to nourish or build up the tissues or to supply body heat.
0	1	1	regulation of response to food	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a response to a food stimulus.
0	1	1	negative regulation of appetite	Any process that reduces appetite.
0	0	1	positive regulation of appetite	Any process that increases appetite.
0	0	1	SMC loading complex	A protein complex required for the loading of a structural maintenance of chromosome (SMC) complex, such as cohesin, condensin or SMC5/SMC6, onto DNA. Appears to be eukaryotically conserved.
0	2	0	sequestering of zinc ion	The process of binding or confining zinc ions such that they are separated from other components of a biological system.
1	0	1	dense core granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a dense core granule.
1	1	1	chromosome passenger complex	A eukaryotically conserved protein complex that localizes to kinetochores in early mitosis, the spindle mid-zone in anaphase B and to the telophase midbody. It has been proposed that the passenger complex coordinates various events based on its location to different structures during the course of mitosis. Complex members include the BIR-domain-containing protein Survivin, Aurora kinase, INCENP and Borealin.
0	0	1	guanine/thymine mispair binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded DNA containing a G/T mispair.
0	0	1	dinucleotide insertion or deletion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded DNA containing a dinucleotide insertion or deletion.
8	6	15	activation of protein kinase activity	Any process that initiates the activity of an inactive protein kinase.
5	7	6	activation of protein kinase B activity	Any process that initiates the activity of the inactive enzyme protein kinase B.
1	2	5	cell division site	The eventual plane of cell division (also known as cell cleavage or cytokinesis) in a dividing cell. In Eukaryotes, the cleavage apparatus, composed of septin structures and the actomyosin contractile ring, forms along this plane, and the mitotic, or meiotic, spindle is aligned perpendicular to the division plane. In bacteria, the cell division site is generally located at mid-cell and is the site at which the cytoskeletal structure, the Z-ring, assembles.
9	11	13	cleavage furrow	The cleavage furrow is a plasma membrane invagination at the cell division site. The cleavage furrow begins as a shallow groove and eventually deepens to divide the cytoplasm.
0	1	0	septin collar	A tubular, hourglass-shaped structure composed of highly ordered arrays of septin filaments; in budding yeast cells, the septin collar forms from the initial septin ring by expanding into the daughter cell.
1	1	0	ubiquitin-like protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a small conjugating protein such as ubiquitin or a ubiquitin-like protein.
1	1	3	SUMO binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the small ubiquitin-like protein SUMO.
0	1	0	septin cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising septin complexes and their associated proteins.
1	0	0	ubiquinone biosynthetic process via 3,4-dihydroxy-5-polyprenylbenzoate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ubiquinone, via the intermediates 3,4-dihydroxy-5-polyprenylbenzoate and 3-methoxy-4-hydroxy-5-polyprenylbenzoate.
0	2	0	transposition, RNA-mediated	Any process involved in a type of transpositional recombination which occurs via an RNA intermediate.
0	3	1	telomere organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of telomeres, terminal regions of a linear chromosome that include the telomeric DNA repeats and associated proteins.
2	6	6	telomere maintenance via semi-conservative replication	The process in which telomeric DNA is synthesized semi-conservatively by the conventional replication machinery and telomeric accessory factors as part of cell cycle DNA replication.
0	1	0	telomere assembly	A cellular process that results in the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a telomere at a non-telomeric double-stranded DNA end. A telomere is a terminal region of a linear chromosome that includes telomeric DNA repeats and associated proteins.
0	1	0	telomere formation via telomerase	A cellular process that results in the formation of a telomere at a non-telomeric double-stranded DNA end that involves the activity of a telomerase enzyme.
1	3	5	regulation of telomere maintenance	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process that affects and monitors the activity of telomeric proteins and the length of telomeric DNA.
0	0	2	negative regulation of telomere maintenance	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a process that affects and monitors the activity of telomeric proteins and the length of telomeric DNA.
1	4	4	positive regulation of telomere maintenance	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of a process that affects and monitors the activity of telomeric proteins and the length of telomeric DNA.
0	0	1	negative regulation of telomere maintenance via recombination	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a recombinational process involved in the maintenance of proper telomeric length.
0	0	2	regulation of telomere maintenance via telomerase	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of telomeric repeats by telomerase.
1	2	5	negative regulation of telomere maintenance via telomerase	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of telomeric repeats by telomerase.
5	10	12	positive regulation of telomere maintenance via telomerase	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of telomeric repeats by telomerase.
0	0	1	negative regulation of telomere maintenance via semi-conservative replication	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the semi-conservative replication of telomeric DNA.
0	1	0	positive regulation of synaptic transmission, dopaminergic	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dopaminergic synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to another neuron across a synapse using the neurotransmitter dopamine.
2	1	3	regulation of synaptic transmission, GABAergic	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of GABAergic synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to another neuron across a synapse using the neurotransmitter gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA).
0	0	1	negative regulation of synaptic transmission, GABAergic	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of GABAergic synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to another neuron across a synapse using the neurotransmitter gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA).
1	0	2	positive regulation of synaptic transmission, GABAergic	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of GABAergic synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to another neuron across a synapse using the neurotransmitter gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA).
0	0	1	regulation of actin filament bundle assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of actin filament bundles.
0	0	2	negative regulation of actin filament bundle assembly	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of actin filament bundles.
2	1	4	positive regulation of actin filament bundle assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of actin filament bundles.
0	1	2	activation of store-operated calcium channel activity	A process that initiates the activity of an inactive store-operated calcium channel.
0	0	1	secretory granule localization	Any process in which a secretory granule is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location within the cell.
6	6	3	methylation	The process in which a methyl group is covalently attached to a molecule.
2	1	0	IMP salvage	Any process which produces inosine monophosphate from derivatives of it, without de novo synthesis.
10	4	5	phosphatidylinositol-3-phosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol-3-phosphate, a derivative of phosphatidylinositol in which the inositol ring is phosphorylated at the 3' position.
0	1	1	regulation of cellular protein metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving a protein, occurring at the level of an individual cell.
2	0	1	negative regulation of cellular protein metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving a protein, occurring at the level of an individual cell.
0	2	2	positive regulation of cellular protein metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving a protein, occurring at the level of an individual cell.
0	0	1	negative regulation of protein polymerization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the process of creating protein polymers.
0	0	2	positive regulation of protein polymerization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the process of creating protein polymers.
0	0	1	gonadotropin secretion	The regulated release of a gonadotropin, any hormone that stimulates the gonads, especially follicle-stimulating hormone and luteinizing hormone.
0	1	1	luteinizing hormone secretion	The regulated release of luteinizing hormone, a gonadotropic glycoprotein hormone secreted by the anterior pituitary.
0	0	1	negative regulation of gonadotropin secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a gonadotropin.
1	0	1	asymmetric synapse	A type of synapse occurring between an axon and a dendritic spine or dendritic shaft. Asymmetric synapses, the most abundant synapse type in the central nervous system, involve axons that contain predominantly spherical vesicles and contain a thickened postsynaptic density.  Most or all synapses of this type are excitatory.
1	0	1	symmetric synapse	A synapse that lacks an electron dense postsynaptic specialization. In vertebtrates, these occur primarily on dendrite shafts and neuronal cell bodies and involve persynapses containing clusters of predominantly flattened or elongated vesicles and are typcially inhibitory.
0	0	2	AMPA glutamate receptor complex	An assembly of four or five subunits which form a structure with an extracellular N-terminus and a large loop that together form the ligand binding domain. The C-terminus is intracellular. The ionotropic glutamate receptor complex itself acts as a ligand gated ion channel; on binding glutamate, charged ions pass through a channel in the center of the receptor complex. The AMPA receptors mediate fast synaptic transmission in the CNS and are composed of subunits GluR1-4, products from separate genes. These subunits have an extracellular N-terminus and an intracellular C-terminus.
0	0	1	central nervous system myelin maintenance	The process in which the structure and material content of mature central nervous system myelin is kept in a functional state.
2	1	2	peripheral nervous system myelin maintenance	The process in which the structure and material content of mature peripheral nervous system myelin is kept in a functional state.
1	1	1	myelin assembly	The process in which the wraps of cell membrane that constitute myelin are laid down around an axon in the central or peripheral nervous system.
2	0	0	central nervous system myelin formation	The process in which the wraps of cell membrane that constitute myelin are laid down around an axon by an oligodendrocyte in the central nervous system.
1	1	0	peripheral nervous system myelin formation	The process in which the wraps of cell membrane that constitute myelin are laid down around an axon by an oligodendrocyte in the peripheral nervous system.
1	0	0	ribonuclease H2 complex	A protein complex that possesses ribonuclease H activity, in which the catalytic subunit is a member of the RNase H2 (or HII) class. For example, in Saccharomyces the complex contains Rnh201p, Rnh202p and Rnh203p.
0	0	1	mismatch repair complex	Any complex formed of proteins that act in mismatch repair.
0	0	1	MutSalpha complex	A heterodimer involved in the recognition and repair of base-base and small insertion/deletion mismatches. In human the complex consists of two subunits, MSH2 and MSH6.
0	0	1	negative regulation of prostaglandin secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a prostaglandin from a cell.
1	1	1	positive regulation of prostaglandin secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a prostaglandin from a cell.
1	1	0	prostaglandin secretion	The regulated release of a prostaglandin, any of a group of biologically active metabolites which contain a cyclopentane ring, from a cell or a tissue.
0	0	1	angiogenin-PRI complex	A stable heterodimer of angiogenin and placental ribonuclease inhibitor; interaction between angiogenin and PRI prevents angiogenin binding to its receptor to stimulate angiogenesis.
0	3	1	molybdopterin cofactor biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of the molybdopterin cofactor (Moco), essential for the catalytic activity of some enzymes, e.g. sulfite oxidase, xanthine dehydrogenase, and aldehyde oxidase. The cofactor consists of a mononuclear molybdenum (Mo-molybdopterin) or tungsten ion (W-molybdopterin) coordinated by one or two molybdopterin ligands.
0	0	1	alanine transport	The directed movement of alanine, 2-aminopropanoic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	1	0	regulation of chondrocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chondrocyte differentiation.
2	2	0	negative regulation of chondrocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chondrocyte differentiation.
4	0	0	positive regulation of chondrocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of chondrocyte differentiation.
1	0	0	aldosterone metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving aldosterone, a corticosteroid hormone that is produced by the zona glomerulosa of the adrenal cortex and regulates salt (sodium and potassium) and water balance.
1	0	0	regulation of aldosterone biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of aldosterone.
1	1	0	negative regulation of aldosterone biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of aldosterone.
1	0	0	regulation of hormone metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving any hormone.
1	0	0	response to follicle-stimulating hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a follicle-stimulating hormone stimulus.
10	10	15	response to estradiol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of stimulus by estradiol, a C18 steroid hormone hydroxylated at C3 and C17 that acts as a potent estrogen.
0	0	1	oxidized DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with oxidized residues in DNA.
0	1	1	oxidized purine DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with oxidized purine residues in DNA.
0	0	1	oxidized pyrimidine DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with oxidized pyrimidine residues in DNA.
0	1	0	oxygen homeostasis	A homeostatic process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of oxygen within an organism or cell.
1	0	0	intracellular lipid transport	The directed movement of lipids within cells.
0	2	1	intracellular cholesterol transport	The directed movement of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol, within cells.
1	1	0	negative regulation of lipid transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of lipids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	positive regulation of lipid transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of lipids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	1	regulation of cholesterol transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of cholesterol into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	2	negative regulation of cholesterol transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of cholesterol into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	regulation of intracellular cholesterol transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of cholesterol within cells.
1	0	0	negative regulation of intracellular cholesterol transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of cholesterol within cells.
1	0	0	regulation of intracellular transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of substances within cells.
0	0	2	negative regulation of intracellular transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of substances within cells.
1	0	2	positive regulation of intracellular transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of substances within cells.
6	2	2	photoreceptor connecting cilium	The portion of the photoreceptor cell cilium linking the photoreceptor inner and outer segments. It's considered to be equivalent to the ciliary transition zone.
0	1	1	DNA geometric change	The process in which a transformation is induced in the geometry of a DNA double helix, resulting in a change in twist, writhe, or both, but with no change in linking number. Includes the unwinding of double-stranded DNA by helicases.
1	0	0	MHC class I receptor activity	Combining with an MHC class I protein complex to initiate a change in cellular activity. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
1	0	0	MHC class Ib receptor activity	Combining with an MHC class Ib protein complex and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity. Class Ib here refers to non-classical class I molecules, such as those of the CD1 or HLA-E gene families.
0	1	1	MHC class II receptor activity	Combining with an MHC class II protein complex and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	inhibitory MHC class I receptor activity	Combining with a MHC class I protein complex to mediate signaling that inhibits activation of a lymphocyte.
1	2	0	melanosome localization	Any process in which a melanosome is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location within the cell.
0	1	0	establishment of melanosome localization	The directed movement of a melanosome to a specific location.
1	6	2	melanosome transport	The directed movement of melanosomes into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	1	MutLalpha complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the mismatch repair complex MutLalpha.
1	1	0	MutSalpha complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the mismatch repair complex MutSalpha.
0	2	0	negative regulation of transporter activity	Any process that stops or reduces the activity of a transporter.
0	0	1	positive regulation of transporter activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of a transporter.
1	1	0	regulation of ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that modulates the activity of an ion transporter.
1	1	1	positive regulation of ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of an ion transporter.
0	0	1	regulation of sodium:proton antiporter activity	Any process that modulates the activity of a sodium:hydrogen antiporter, which catalyzes the reaction: Na+(out) + H+(in) = Na+(in) + H+(out).
0	0	1	negative regulation of sodium:proton antiporter activity	Any process that stops or reduces the activity of a sodium:hydrogen antiporter, which catalyzes the reaction: Na+(out) + H+(in) = Na+(in) + H+(out).
0	0	1	positive regulation of sodium:proton antiporter activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of a sodium:hydrogen antiporter, which catalyzes the reaction: Na+(out) + H+(in) = Na+(in) + H+(out).
4	7	8	lysosome localization	Any process in which a lysosome is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location.
0	0	1	extrinsic component of lysosome membrane	The component of an lysosome membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
5	6	1	stereocilium	An actin-based protrusion from the apical surface of auditory and vestibular hair cells and of neuromast cells. These protrusions are supported by a bundle of cross-linked actin filaments (an actin cable), oriented such that the plus (barbed) ends are at the tip of the protrusion, capped by a tip complex which bridges to the plasma. Bundles of stereocilia act as mechanosensory organelles.
0	2	0	stereocilium bundle	A bundle of cross-linked stereocilia, arranged around a kinocilium on the apical surface of a sensory hair cell (e.g. a neuromast, auditory or vestibular hair cell). Stereocilium bundles act as mechanosensory organelles by responding to fluid motion or fluid pressure changes.
1	1	1	purine-rich negative regulatory element binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a 30-bp purine-rich negative regulatory element; the best characterized such element is found in the first intronic region of the rat cardiac alpha-myosin heavy chain gene, and contains two palindromic high-affinity Ets-binding sites (CTTCCCTGGAAG). The presence of this element restricts expression of the gene containing it to cardiac myocytes.
0	1	0	regulation of mismatch repair	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mismatch repair.
0	0	2	positive regulation of mismatch repair	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mismatch repair.
2	2	1	stereocilium tip	A distinct compartment at the tip of a stereocilium, distal to the site of attachment to the apical cell surface. It consists of a dense matrix bridging the barbed ends of the stereocilium actin filaments with the overlying plasma membrane, is dynamic compared to the shaft, and is required for stereocilium elongation.
1	0	0	GBD domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the GTPase protein binding domain (GDB) domain of a protein. The GBD is a short motif, including a minimum region of 16 amino acids, identified in proteins that bind to small GTPases such as Cdc42 and Rac.
1	0	0	regulation of phospholipase A2 activity	Any process that modulates the activity of the enzyme phospholipase A2.
1	0	0	positive regulation of phospholipase A2 activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of the enzyme phospholipase A2.
1	2	4	actin filament bundle	An assembly of actin filaments that are on the same axis but may be oriented with the same or opposite polarities and may be packed with different levels of tightness.
1	2	6	filopodium tip	The end of a filopodium distal to the body of the cell.
0	1	4	regulation of proteasomal ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of ubiquitin, and mediated by the proteasome.
7	8	5	negative regulation of proteasomal ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of ubiquitin, and mediated by the proteasome.
10	4	18	positive regulation of proteasomal ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of ubiquitin, and mediated by the proteasome.
2	4	4	melanosome organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a melanosome. A melanosome is a tissue-specific, membrane-bounded cytoplasmic organelle within which melanin pigments are synthesized and stored.
1	2	1	protein modification by small protein conjugation	A protein modification process in which one or more groups of a small protein, such as ubiquitin or a ubiquitin-like protein, are covalently attached to a target protein.
1	1	0	protein urmylation	Covalent attachment of the ubiquitin-like protein URM1 to another protein.
0	1	1	CBM complex	A protein complex comprising Carma1, Bcl10 and MALT1; plays a role in signal transduction during NF-kappaB activation.
1	0	1	demethylase activity	Catalysis of the removal of a methyl group from a substrate.
2	5	1	histone demethylase activity	Catalysis of the removal of a methyl group from a histone.
1	1	1	histone demethylase activity (H3-K4 specific)	Catalysis of the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 4 of the histone H3 protein.
4	2	2	histone demethylase activity (H3-K9 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: histone H3 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 9) + alpha-ketoglutarate + O2 = succinate + CO2 + formaldehyde + lysine. This reaction is the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 9 of the histone H3 protein.
10	10	11	endocytic recycling	The directed movement of membrane-bounded vesicles from recycling endosomes back to the plasma membrane where they are recycled for further rounds of transport.
0	0	1	slow endocytic recycling	The directed movement of membrane-bounded vesicles from deep (non-peripheral) compartments endocytic compartments back to the plasma membrane where they are recycled for further rounds of transport.
0	1	0	negative regulation of protein homooligomerization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein homooligomerization.
1	0	0	positive regulation of protein homooligomerization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein homooligomerization.
7	10	7	regulation of cytokinesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the division of the cytoplasm of a cell and its separation into two daughter cells.
3	3	0	negative regulation of cytokinesis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the division of the cytoplasm of a cell, and its separation into two daughter cells.
6	8	4	positive regulation of cytokinesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the division of the cytoplasm of a cell, and its separation into two daughter cells.
3	3	3	endoplasmic reticulum calcium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of calcium ions within the endoplasmic reticulum of a cell or between the endoplasmic reticulum and its surroundings.
0	1	1	positive regulation of endoplasmic reticulum calcium ion concentration	Any process that increases the concentration of calcium ions in the endoplasmic reticulum.
2	1	1	negative regulation of endoplasmic reticulum calcium ion concentration	Any process that decreases the concentration of calcium ions in the endoplasmic reticulum.
0	0	1	cytoplasmic side of mitochondrial outer membrane	The external (cytoplasmic) face of the mitochondrial outer membrane.
2	1	2	regulation of type I interferon production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interferon type I production. Type I interferons include the interferon-alpha, beta, delta, episilon, zeta, kappa, tau, and omega gene families.
4	6	5	negative regulation of type I interferon production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of type I interferon production. Type I interferons include the interferon-alpha, beta, delta, episilon, zeta, kappa, tau, and omega gene families.
8	6	8	positive regulation of type I interferon production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of type I interferon production. Type I interferons include the interferon-alpha, beta, delta, episilon, zeta, kappa, tau, and omega gene families.
2	1	0	Rab protein signal transduction	A series of molecular signals within the cell that are mediated by a member of the Rab family of proteins switching to a GTP-bound active state.
1	1	2	regulation of Rab protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Rab protein signal transduction.
2	0	1	regulation of Ral protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Ral protein signal transduction.
2	3	1	Rap protein signal transduction	A series of molecular signals within the cell that are mediated by a member of the Rap family of proteins switching to a GTP-bound active state.
2	1	1	regulation of Rap protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Rap protein signal transduction.
1	2	0	Cdc42 protein signal transduction	A series of molecular signals within the cell that are mediated by the Cdc42 protein switching to a GTP-bound active state.
2	2	0	regulation of Cdc42 protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Cdc42 protein signal transduction.
0	1	0	detection of molecule of bacterial origin	The series of events in which a stimulus from a molecule of bacterial origin is received and converted into a molecular signal.
1	2	0	response to peptidoglycan	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a peptidoglycan stimulus. Peptidoglycan is a bacterial cell wall macromolecule.
1	2	1	response to muramyl dipeptide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a muramyl dipeptide stimulus. Muramyl dipeptide is derived from peptidoglycan.
16	24	12	response to lipopolysaccharide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lipopolysaccharide stimulus; lipopolysaccharide is a major component of the cell wall of gram-negative bacteria.
0	1	2	developmental process	A biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of an integrated living unit: an anatomical structure (which may be a subcellular structure, cell, tissue, or organ), or organism over time from an initial condition to a later condition.
1	1	1	cytokinetic process	A cellular process that is involved in cytokinesis (the division of the cytoplasm of a cell and its separation into two daughter cells).
0	0	2	maintenance of protein location in cell	Any process in which a protein is maintained in a specific location within, or in the membrane of, a cell, and is prevented from moving elsewhere.
4	10	2	DNA duplex unwinding	The process in which interchain hydrogen bonds between two strands of DNA are broken or 'melted', generating a region of unpaired single strands.
3	1	1	endosome transport via multivesicular body sorting pathway	The directed movement of substances from endosomes to lysosomes or vacuoles by a pathway in which molecules are sorted into multivesicular bodies, which then fuse with the target compartment.
0	1	3	endosome to lysosome transport via multivesicular body sorting pathway	The directed movement of substances from endosomes to lysosomes by a pathway in which molecules are sorted into multivesicular bodies, which then fuse with the lysosome.
3	1	0	late endosome to vacuole transport via multivesicular body sorting pathway	The directed movement of substances from endosomes to vacuoles by a pathway in which molecules are sorted into multivesicular bodies, which then fuse with the vacuole.
1	1	3	negative regulation of phosphoprotein phosphatase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the activity of a phosphoprotein phosphatase.
2	2	5	positive regulation of phosphoprotein phosphatase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of a phosphoprotein phosphatase.
5	3	3	response to retinoic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a retinoic acid stimulus.
0	1	2	protein exit from endoplasmic reticulum	The directed movement of proteins from the endoplasmic reticulum.
0	1	0	microvillus organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a microvillus, a thin cylindrical membrane-covered projection on the surface of a cell.
1	3	1	regulation of microvillus length	A process that modulates the length of a microvillus.
2	0	1	regulation of microvillus assembly	A process that modulates the formation of a microvillus.
0	0	4	cortical endoplasmic reticulum	A cortical network of highly dynamic tubules that are juxtaposed to the plasma membrane and undergo ring closure and tubule-branching movements.
1	2	1	mitochondrial translation	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a protein in a mitochondrion. This is a ribosome-mediated process in which the information in messenger RNA (mRNA) is used to specify the sequence of amino acids in the protein; the mitochondrion has its own ribosomes and transfer RNAs, and uses a genetic code that differs from the nuclear code.
1	1	0	ribonucleoside binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a ribonucleoside, a compound consisting of a purine or pyrimidine nitrogenous base linked to ribose.
0	1	0	pyrimidine deoxyribonucleotide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a pyrimidine deoxyribonucleotide, any compound consisting of a pyrimidine deoxyribonucleoside that is esterified with (ortho)phosphate or an oligophosphate at any hydroxyl group on the deoxyribose moiety.
0	1	0	adenyl deoxyribonucleotide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an adenyl deoxyribonucleotide, any compound consisting of adenosine esterified with (ortho)phosphate or an oligophosphate at any hydroxyl group on the deoxyribose moiety.
0	1	2	dATP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with dATP, deoxyadenosine triphosphate.
0	0	1	dGTP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with dGTP, deoxyguanosine triphosphate.
3	5	2	response to progesterone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a progesterone stimulus.
0	0	1	5'-3' RNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; this reaction drives the unwinding of an RNA helix in the direction 5' to 3'.
7	6	3	Golgi cisterna membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding any of the thin, flattened compartments that form the central portion of the Golgi complex.
2	1	3	growth cone membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a growth cone.
2	1	0	multivesicular body membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a multivesicular body.
20	21	19	ruffle membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a ruffle.
7	19	10	trans-Golgi network membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding any of the compartments that make up the trans-Golgi network.
0	0	1	neuron projection membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a neuron projection.
2	2	4	dendrite membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a dendrite.
0	0	3	dendritic spine membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a dendritic spine.
1	0	2	integral component of mitochondrial membrane	The component of the mitochondrial membrane consisting of the gene products having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
2	2	2	insulin-responsive compartment	A small membrane-bounded vesicle that releases its contents by exocytosis in response to insulin stimulation; the contents are enriched in GLUT4, IRAP and VAMP2.
0	0	1	protein transport into membrane raft	The directed movement of a protein into a membrane raft. Membrane rafts are small (10-200 nm), heterogeneous, highly dynamic, sterol- and sphingolipid-enriched membrane domains that compartmentalize cellular processes.
1	0	0	regulation of chemokine production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of chemokine production.
1	1	1	regulation of interferon-gamma production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interferon-gamma production. Interferon-gamma is also known as type II interferon.
2	0	1	regulation of interleukin-1 beta production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-1 beta production.
0	0	1	regulation of interleukin-1 production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-1 production.
0	0	1	regulation of interleukin-10 production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-10 production.
1	2	0	regulation of interleukin-12 production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-12 production.
0	0	1	regulation of interleukin-4 production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-4 production.
0	4	1	regulation of interleukin-6 production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-6 production.
0	0	1	regulation of interleukin-8 production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-8 production.
1	4	2	regulation of tumor necrosis factor production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of tumor necrosis factor production.
2	4	0	negative regulation of chemokine production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of chemokine production.
1	0	0	negative regulation of granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor production.
1	1	0	negative regulation of interferon-alpha production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interferon-alpha production.
4	2	1	negative regulation of interferon-beta production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interferon-beta production.
7	1	3	negative regulation of interferon-gamma production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interferon-gamma production. Interferon-gamma is also known as type II interferon.
3	5	2	negative regulation of interleukin-1 beta production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-1 beta production.
1	0	0	negative regulation of interleukin-1 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-1 production.
6	0	0	negative regulation of interleukin-10 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-10 production.
4	1	2	negative regulation of interleukin-12 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-12 production.
1	0	0	negative regulation of interleukin-13 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-13 production.
2	0	1	negative regulation of interleukin-17 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of any member of the interleukin-17 family of cytokines.
1	0	0	negative regulation of interleukin-18 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-18 production.
5	4	3	negative regulation of interleukin-2 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-2 production.
0	0	1	negative regulation of interleukin-23 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-23 production.
1	0	0	negative regulation of interleukin-3 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-3 production.
1	0	0	negative regulation of interleukin-4 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-4 production.
2	0	0	negative regulation of interleukin-5 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-5 production.
4	3	2	negative regulation of interleukin-6 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-6 production.
4	5	2	negative regulation of interleukin-8 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-8 production.
11	7	1	negative regulation of tumor necrosis factor production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of tumor necrosis factor production.
3	6	2	positive regulation of chemokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of chemokine production.
0	0	1	positive regulation of connective tissue growth factor production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of connective tissue growth factor production.
2	2	0	positive regulation of granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor production.
2	4	5	positive regulation of interferon-alpha production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interferon-alpha production.
5	7	6	positive regulation of interferon-beta production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interferon-beta production.
13	8	5	positive regulation of interferon-gamma production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interferon-gamma production. Interferon-gamma is also known as type II interferon.
0	0	2	positive regulation of interleukin-1 alpha production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-1 alpha production.
5	5	5	positive regulation of interleukin-1 beta production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-1 beta production.
3	2	2	positive regulation of interleukin-1 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-1 production.
8	3	3	positive regulation of interleukin-10 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-10 production.
2	3	4	positive regulation of interleukin-12 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-12 production.
1	1	1	positive regulation of interleukin-13 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-13 production.
2	3	2	positive regulation of interleukin-17 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of any member of the interleukin-17 family of cytokines.
0	1	0	positive regulation of interleukin-18 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-18 production.
3	4	10	positive regulation of interleukin-2 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-2 production.
1	1	0	positive regulation of interleukin-21 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-21 production.
0	1	0	positive regulation of interleukin-3 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-3 production.
3	4	1	positive regulation of interleukin-4 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-4 production.
1	1	1	positive regulation of interleukin-5 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-5 production.
12	11	7	positive regulation of interleukin-6 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-6 production.
12	9	6	positive regulation of interleukin-8 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of interleukin-8 production.
12	17	12	positive regulation of tumor necrosis factor production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of tumor necrosis factor production.
0	1	0	positive regulation of lymphotoxin A production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of lymphotoxin A production.
0	1	1	negative regulation of mast cell cytokine production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell cytokine production.
1	1	0	positive regulation of mast cell cytokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell cytokine production.
0	2	0	copper-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex (a complex of two or more proteins that may include other nonprotein molecules), in the presence of copper.
0	1	0	positive regulation of monophenol monooxygenase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of the enzyme monophenol oxygenase. Monophenol monooxygenase catalyzes the reaction: L-tyrosine + L-DOPA + O2 = L-DOPA + DOPAquinone + H2O.
2	1	0	Piccolo NuA4 histone acetyltransferase complex	A heterotrimeric H4/H2A histone acetyltransferase complex with a substrate preference of chromatin over free histones. It contains a subset of the proteins found in the larger NuA4 histone acetyltransferase complex; for example, the S. cerevisiae complex contains Esa1p, Yng2p, and Epl1p.
2	2	1	negative regulation of ATPase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of ATP hydrolysis by an ATPase.
7	3	4	positive regulation of ATPase activity	Any process that activates or increases the rate of ATP hydrolysis by an ATPase.
0	1	1	bile acid secretion	The regulated release of bile acid, composed of any of a group of steroid carboxylic acids occurring in bile, by a cell or a tissue.
2	2	0	super elongation complex	A transcription elongation factor complex that increases the overall rate of RNA polymerase II transcription elongation by suppressing transient polymerase pausing. At minimum, the complex contains a transcription factor of the ELL family, an EAF protein, and an AFF family protein or distant relative and most likely also P-TEFb and AF9 or ENL. The complex is conserved from yeast to humans. In Schizosaccharomyces pombe it contains Ell1, Eaf1, and Ebp1, but it is absent from S. cerevisiae.
1	3	2	regulation of DNA-templated transcription, elongation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription elongation, the extension of an RNA molecule after transcription initiation and promoter clearance by the addition of ribonucleotides catalyzed by a DNA-dependent RNA polymerase.
0	0	1	negative regulation of DNA-templated transcription, elongation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transcription elongation, the extension of an RNA molecule after transcription initiation and promoter clearance by the addition of ribonucleotides catalyzed by a DNA-dependent RNA polymerase.
1	6	5	positive regulation of DNA-templated transcription, elongation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription elongation, the extension of an RNA molecule after transcription initiation and promoter clearance by the addition of ribonucleotides catalyzed by a DNA-dependent RNA polymerase.
1	1	0	monocarboxylic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving monocarboxylic acids, any organic acid containing one carboxyl (COOH) group or anion (COO-).
0	1	1	ribosome disassembly	The disaggregation of a ribosome into its constituent components; includes the dissociation of ribosomal subunits.
1	1	0	negative regulation of CREB transcription factor activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of the transcription factor CREB.
1	2	4	positive regulation of CREB transcription factor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of activity of the transcription factor CREB.
1	4	5	GTPase activating protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a GTPase activating protein.
1	0	0	heterotrimeric G-protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a heterotrimeric G-protein.
0	1	1	uropod organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a uropod, a rigid membrane projection with related cytoskeletal components at the trailing edge of a lymphocyte or other cell in the process of migrating or being activated.
1	2	1	SMN complex	A protein complex that contains the survival motor neuron (SMN) protein and at least eight additional integral components, including the Gemin2-8 and Unrip proteins; the complex is found in the cytoplasm and in nuclear Gems, and is involved in spliceosomal snRNP assembly in the cytoplasm and in pre-mRNA splicing in the nucleus.
1	4	0	receptor catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a receptor molecule, a macromolecule that undergoes combination with a hormone, neurotransmitter, drug or intracellular messenger to initiate a change in cell function.
0	1	2	low-density lipoprotein particle receptor catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a low-density lipoprotein particle receptor molecule, a macromolecule that undergoes combination with a hormone, neurotransmitter, drug or intracellular messenger to initiate a change in cell function.
0	0	1	negative regulation of low-density lipoprotein particle receptor catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of low-density lipoprotein receptors.
2	0	0	positive regulation of low-density lipoprotein particle receptor catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of low-density lipoprotein particle receptors.
1	0	0	DNA ligase IV complex	A eukaryotically conserved protein complex that contains DNA ligase IV and is involved in DNA repair by non-homologous end joining; in addition to the ligase, the complex also contains XRCC4 or a homolog, e.g. Saccharomyces Lif1p.
2	0	0	lacrimal gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the lacrimal gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The lacrimal gland produces secretions that lubricate and protect the cornea of the eye.
4	2	6	neuronal cell body membrane	The plasma membrane of a neuron cell body - excludes the plasma membrane of cell projections such as axons and dendrites.
1	0	0	negative regulation of epinephrine secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of epinephrine.
0	0	1	positive regulation of epinephrine secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of epinephrine.
0	1	0	tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any member of the tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily.
0	1	0	regulation of natural killer cell activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell activation.
4	0	0	negative regulation of natural killer cell activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell activation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of natural killer cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell activation.
1	0	0	regulation of natural killer cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell proliferation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of natural killer cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell proliferation.
0	1	0	regulation of natural killer cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell differentiation.
2	0	0	positive regulation of natural killer cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell differentiation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of natural killer cell differentiation involved in immune response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell differentiation as part of an immune response.
0	0	1	positive regulation of CD4-positive, CD25-positive, alpha-beta regulatory T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of differentiation of CD4-positive, CD25-positive, alpha-beta regulatory T cells.
1	0	1	glomerulus development	The progression of the glomerulus over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The glomerulus is a capillary tuft which forms a close network with the visceral epithelium (podocytes) and the mesangium to form the filtration barrier and is surrounded by Bowman's capsule in nephrons of the vertebrate kidney. The glomerulus is part of the nephron and is restricted to one body segment.
1	2	0	glomerular basement membrane development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the glomerular basement membrane over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The glomerular basement membrane is the basal laminal portion of the glomerulus which performs the actual filtration.
0	1	0	plasma membrane bounded cell projection cytoplasm	All of the contents of a plasma membrane bounded cell projection, excluding the plasma membrane surrounding the projection.
1	3	10	dendrite cytoplasm	All of the contents of a dendrite, excluding the surrounding plasma membrane.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cellular pH reduction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of a process that reduces the internal pH of a cell.
1	0	0	positive regulation of cellular pH reduction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of a process that reduces the internal pH of a cell.
9	9	5	response to insulin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an insulin stimulus. Insulin is a polypeptide hormone produced by the islets of Langerhans of the pancreas in mammals, and by the homologous organs of other organisms.
17	27	15	cellular response to insulin stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an insulin stimulus. Insulin is a polypeptide hormone produced by the islets of Langerhans of the pancreas in mammals, and by the homologous organs of other organisms.
5	2	1	cellular response to hormone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hormone stimulus.
0	3	4	regulation of stress-activated MAPK cascade	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the stress-activated MAPK cascade.
2	3	1	negative regulation of stress-activated MAPK cascade	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the stress-activated MAPK cascade.
3	5	0	positive regulation of stress-activated MAPK cascade	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the stress-activated MAPK cascade.
0	1	0		
1	1	0	positive regulation of DNA endoreduplication	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA endoreduplication.
1	0	0	regulation of establishment or maintenance of cell polarity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the specification, formation or maintenance of anisotropic intracellular organization or cell growth patterns.
1	0	0	regulation of localization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of any process in which a cell, a substance, or a cellular entity is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location.
8	9	9	regulation of protein localization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location.
1	2	3	regulation of microtubule-based process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of any cellular process that depends upon or alters the microtubule cytoskeleton.
0	0	3	regulation of vacuole fusion, non-autophagic	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the fusion of two vacuole membranes to form a single vacuole.
0	1	0	palmitoyl-CoA 9-desaturase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: palmitoyl-CoA + AH2 + O2 = palmitoleic acid (16:1delta9) + A + 2 H2O.
3	2	2	negative regulation of viral transcription	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of viral transcription.
1	1	0	negative regulation of transforming growth factor beta1 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of transforming growth factor-beta1.
0	2	0	positive regulation of transforming growth factor beta1 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of transforming growth factor-beta1.
0	1	0	positive regulation of transforming growth factor beta2 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of transforming growth factor-beta2.
0	0	1	positive regulation of transforming growth factor beta3 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of transforming growth factor-beta3.
13	11	13	circadian regulation of gene expression	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gene expression such that an expression pattern recurs with a regularity of approximately 24 hours.
1	0	0	activin receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to an activin receptor on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	1	negative regulation of activin receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of any activin receptor signaling pathway.
1	0	1	positive regulation of activin receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of any activin receptor signaling pathway.
0	1	0	regulation of superoxide anion generation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of enzymatic generation of superoxide by a cell.
0	0	1	negative regulation of superoxide anion generation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of enzymatic generation of superoxide by a cell.
1	5	4	positive regulation of superoxide anion generation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of enzymatic generation of superoxide by a cell.
1	1	1	SREBP signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals from the endoplasmic reticulum to the nucleus generated as a consequence of decreased levels of one or more sterols (and in some yeast, changes in oxygen levels) and which proceeds through activation of a sterol response element binding transcription factor (SREBP) to result in up-regulation of target gene transcription.
1	5	5	sterol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sterol, any steroid containing a hydroxy group in the 3 position, closely related to cholestan-3-ol.
0	0	1	negative regulation of translation in response to oxidative stress	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of translation as a result of oxidative stress, a state often resulting from exposure to high levels of reactive oxygen species, e.g. superoxide anions, hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), and hydroxyl radicals.
4	0	1	secretion by cell	The controlled release of a substance by a cell.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mononuclear cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mononuclear cell proliferation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of mononuclear cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mononuclear cell proliferation.
11	11	16	regulation of actin cytoskeleton organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising actin filaments and their associated proteins.
0	1	0	inositol trisphosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving myo-inositol phosphate, 1,2,3,4,5,6-cyclohexanehexol, with three phosphate groups attached.
0	2	1	inositol phosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of an inositol phosphate, 1,2,3,4,5,6-cyclohexanehexol, with one or more phosphate groups attached.
0	1	0	regulation of inositol trisphosphate biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of inositol trisphosphate.
0	2	0	positive regulation of inositol trisphosphate biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of inositol trisphosphate.
2	1	4	collagen metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving collagen, any of a group of fibrous proteins of very high tensile strength that form the main component of connective tissue in animals. Collagen is highly enriched in glycine (some regions are 33% glycine) and proline, occurring predominantly as 3-hydroxyproline (about 20%).
1	2	1	collagen biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of collagen, any of a group of fibrous proteins of very high tensile strength that form the main component of connective tissue in animals. Collagen is highly enriched in glycine (some regions are 33% glycine) and proline, occurring predominantly as 3-hydroxyproline (about 20%).
1	4	0	negative regulation of collagen biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of collagen, any of a group of fibrous proteins of very high tensile strength that form the main component of connective tissue in animals.
5	5	3	positive regulation of collagen biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of collagen, any of a group of fibrous proteins of very high tensile strength that form the main component of connective tissue in animals.
2	2	4	positive regulation of transcription elongation from RNA polymerase II promoter	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription elongation, the extension of an RNA molecule after transcription initiation and promoter clearance by the addition of ribonucleotides, catalyzed by RNA polymerase II.
0	0	1	regulation of actin filament-based process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of any cellular process that depends upon or alters the actin cytoskeleton.
1	0	0	protein insertion into mitochondrial inner membrane from matrix	The process in which a protein is incorporated into the mitochondrial inner membrane from the matrix side. This includes membrane insertion of newly synthesized mitochondrially-encoded proteins, and insertion of nuclear-encoded proteins after their import into the mitochondrial matrix.
0	0	1	keratinocyte activation	A change in the morphology or behavior of a keratinocyte resulting from exposure to an activating factor such as a cellular or soluble ligand. Upon activation, keratinocytes become migratory and hyperproliferative, and produce growth factors and cytokines.
4	2	1	mitochondrial respiratory chain complex I assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form mitochondrial respiratory chain complex I.
4	0	8	myosin filament	A supramolecular fiber containing myosin heavy chains, plus associated light chains and other proteins, in which the myosin heavy chains are arranged into a filament.
0	1	0	protein-containing complex disassembly	The disaggregation of a protein-containing macromolecular complex into its constituent components.
1	1	0	protein-DNA complex disassembly	The disaggregation of a protein-DNA complex into its constituent components.
0	1	0	cell part morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a cell part are generated and organized.
91	133	131	protein-containing complex	A stable assembly of two or more macromolecules, i.e. proteins, nucleic acids, carbohydrates or lipids, in which at least one component is a protein and the constituent parts function together.
5	6	7	protein-DNA complex	A macromolecular complex containing both protein and DNA molecules.
1	0	0	protein-lipid complex	A macromolecular complex containing separate protein and lipid molecules.  Separate in this context means not covalently bound to each other.
0	1	0	Bcl3-Bcl10 complex	A protein complex containing Bcl3 and Bcl10, which forms when Akt1 is activated by TNF-alpha to phosphorylate Bcl10; the Bcl3-Bcl10 complex is translocated to the nucleus.
0	1	0	Fc-epsilon receptor I complex	A protein complex composed of an Fc-epsilon RI alpha chain and an Fc-epsilon RI gamma chain dimer with or without an Fc-episilon RI beta chain and additional signaling components. The complex functions primarily as an activating receptor for IgE.
0	0	1	regulation of mast cell activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell activation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mast cell activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell activation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of mast cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell activation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mast cell activation involved in immune response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell activation as part of an immune response.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mast cell activation involved in immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell activation as part of an immune response.
1	1	3	paranodal junction	A highly specialized cell-cell junction found in vertebrates, which forms between a neuron and a glial cell, and has structural similarity to Drosophila septate junctions. It flanks the node of Ranvier in myelinated nerve and electrically isolates the myelinated from unmyelinated nerve segments and physically separates the voltage-gated sodium channels at the node from the cluster of potassium channels underneath the myelin sheath.
1	0	0	tetrapyrrole metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving tetrapyrroles, natural pigments containing four pyrrole rings joined by one-carbon units linking position 2 of one pyrrole ring to position 5 of the next.
7	3	9	sarcoplasmic reticulum membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
1	0	5	sarcoplasmic reticulum lumen	The volume enclosed by the membranes of the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
0	1	0	regulation of mast cell apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell apoptotic process.
1	0	0	myeloid cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a myeloid cell, a cell of the monocyte, granulocyte, mast cell, megakaryocyte, or erythroid lineage.
1	0	0	regulation of neutrophil apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of neutrophil apoptotic process.
0	1	0	negative regulation of neutrophil apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of neutrophil apoptotic process.
0	0	1	positive regulation of neutrophil apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of neutrophil apoptotic process.
1	0	1	negative regulation of myeloid cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of a myeloid cell apoptotic process.
1	0	0	positive regulation of myeloid cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of myeloid cell apoptotic process.
0	1	0	bitter taste receptor activity	Combining with soluble bitter compounds to initiate a change in cell activity. These receptors are responsible for the sense of bitter taste.
0	0	2	regulation of organelle organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of an organelle.
1	0	1	regulation of chromosome organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a chromosome.
0	1	0	isoquinoline alkaloid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving isoquinoline alkaloids, alkaloid compounds that contain bicyclic N-containing aromatic rings and are derived from a 3,4-dihydroxytyramine (dopamine) precursor that undergoes a Schiff base addition with aldehydes of different origin.
3	9	2	T cell differentiation in thymus	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of a T cell via a differentiation pathway dependent upon transit through the thymus.
1	1	0	regulation of T cell differentiation in thymus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of T cell differentiation in the thymus.
0	1	0	regulation of extrathymic T cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of extrathymic T cell differentiation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of T cell differentiation in thymus	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T cell differentiation in the thymus.
1	1	0	negative regulation of immature T cell proliferation in thymus	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of immature T cell proliferation in the thymus.
2	0	1	positive regulation of T cell differentiation in thymus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T cell differentiation in the thymus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of immature T cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of immature T cell proliferation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of immature T cell proliferation in thymus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of immature T cell proliferation in the thymus.
0	3	0	Weibel-Palade body	A large, elongated, rod-shaped secretory granule characteristic of vascular endothelial cells that contain a number of structurally and functionally distinct proteins, of which the best characterized are von Willebrand factor (VWF) and P-selectin. Weibel-Palade bodies are formed from the trans-Golgi network in a process that depends on VWF, which is densely packed in a highly organized manner, and on coat proteins that remain associated with the granules. Upon cell stimulation, regulated exocytosis releases the contained proteins to the cell surface, where they act in the recruitment of platelets and leukocytes and in inflammatory and vasoactive responses.
1	0	0	cis-Golgi network membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding any of the compartments that make up the cis-Golgi network.
1	0	1	mitochondrial respiratory chain complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a mitochondrial respiratory chain complex.
10	8	6	endoplasmic reticulum-Golgi intermediate compartment membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding any of the compartments of the endoplasmic reticulum (ER)-Golgi intermediate compartment system.
3	1	1	negative regulation of RNA splicing	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of RNA splicing.
1	4	5	positive regulation of RNA splicing	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of RNA splicing.
0	1	0	regulation of histone phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of one or more phosphate groups to a histone protein.
0	0	1	negative regulation of histone phosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of one or more phosphate groups to a histone protein.
1	0	3	positive regulation of histone phosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of one or more phosphate groups to a histone protein.
1	1	2	acetylcholine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an acetylcholine receptor.
0	2	1	positive regulation of glucokinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glucokinase activity, the catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a glucose molecule.
1	3	2	regulation of peptidyl-serine phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation of peptidyl-serine.
3	3	5	negative regulation of peptidyl-serine phosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation of peptidyl-serine.
5	11	22	positive regulation of peptidyl-serine phosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation of peptidyl-serine.
0	0	1	negative regulation of peptidyl-serine phosphorylation of STAT protein	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation of a serine residue of a STAT (Signal Transducer and Activator of Transcription) protein.
1	0	0	positive regulation of peptidyl-serine phosphorylation of STAT protein	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation of a serine residue of a STAT (Signal Transducer and Activator of Transcription) protein.
0	2	0	progesterone receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a progesterone receptor.
0	0	1	negative regulation of intracellular steroid hormone receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of any intracellular steroid hormone receptor signaling pathway.
4	4	0	regulation of intracellular estrogen receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of an intracellular estrogen receptor signaling pathway.
1	3	2	negative regulation of intracellular estrogen receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of an intracellular estrogen receptor signaling pathway.
1	1	5	positive regulation of intracellular estrogen receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of an intracellular estrogen receptor signaling pathway.
0	2	0	FFAT motif binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the FFAT motif, a short motif containing diphenylalanine in an acidic tract that targets proteins to the cytosolic surface of the ER and to the nuclear membrane by binding directly to members of the VAP (VAMP-associated protein) protein family.
1	1	3	V(D)J recombination	The process in which immune receptor V, D, and J, or V and J gene segments, depending on the specific receptor, are recombined within a single locus utilizing the conserved heptamer and nonomer recombination signal sequences (RSS).
1	2	0	immunoglobulin V(D)J recombination	The process in which immunoglobulin gene segments are recombined within a single locus utilizing the conserved heptamer and nonomer recombination signal sequences (RSS). For immunoglobulin heavy chains V, D, and J gene segments are joined, and for immunoglobulin light chains V and J gene segments are joined.
0	2	0	T cell receptor V(D)J recombination	The process in which T cell receptor V, D, and J, or V and J gene segments, depending on the specific locus, are recombined within a single locus utilizing the conserved heptamer and nonomer recombination signal sequences (RSS).
0	1	2	regulation of intracellular protein transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of proteins within cells.
3	4	1	melanosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a melanosome.
0	0	1	interphotoreceptor matrix	A specialized extracellularc matrix that surrounds the photoreceptors of the retina and lies between them and the apical surface of the retinal pigment epithelium. The IPM has been implicated in several important activities required for photoreceptor function and maintenance.
1	0	0	ARC complex	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains members of the Argonaute family of proteins, additional protein subunits, and duplex siRNA; required for heterochromatin assembly and siRNA generation. Possibly involved in the conversion of ds siRNA to ss siRNA.
1	0	0	conversion of ds siRNA to ss siRNA involved in RNA interference	The process in which double-stranded siRNA molecules are converted to single-stranded siRNAs; required for the formation of a mature RITS complex during RNA interference.
4	2	1	histone H3-K9 demethylation	The modification of histone H3 by the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 9 of the histone.
1	1	2	calcineurin-NFAT signaling cascade	Any intracellular signal transduction in which the signal is passed on within the cell by activation of a member of the NFAT protein family as a consequence of NFAT dephosphorylation by Ca(2+)-activated calcineurin. The cascade begins with calcium-dependent activation of the phosphatase calcineurin. Calcineurin dephosphorylates multiple phosphoserine residues on NFAT, resulting in the translocation of NFAT to the nucleus. The cascade ends with regulation of transcription by NFAT. The calcineurin-NFAT cascade lies downstream of many cell surface receptors, including G protein-coupled receptors (GPCRs) and receptor tyrosine kinases (RTKs) that signal to mobilize calcium ions (Ca2+).
1	0	0	proton-transporting V-type ATPase, V0 domain	A protein complex that forms part of a proton-transporting V-type ATPase and mediates proton transport across a membrane. The V0 complex consists of at least four different subunits (a,c,d and e); six or more c subunits form a proton-binding rotor ring.
3	0	0	proton-transporting V-type ATPase, V1 domain	A protein complex that forms part of a proton-transporting V-type ATPase and catalyzes ATP hydrolysis. The V1 complex consists of: (1) a globular headpiece with three alternating copies of subunits A and B that form a ring, (2) a central rotational stalk composed of single copies of subunits D and F, and (3) a peripheral stalk made of subunits C, E, G and H. Subunits A and B mediate the hydrolysis of ATP at three reaction sites associated with subunit A.
1	0	0	plasma membrane proton-transporting V-type ATPase complex	A proton-transporting two-sector ATPase complex found in the plasma membrane.
0	1	0	regulation of histone ubiquitination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of a ubiquitin group to a histone protein.
0	0	1	positive regulation of histone ubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of a ubiquitin group to a histone protein.
0	2	1	CAF-1 complex	A conserved heterotrimeric protein complex that promotes histone H3 and H4 deposition onto newly synthesized DNA during replication or DNA repair; specifically facilitates replication-dependent nucleosome assembly with the major histone H3 (H3.1). In many species the CAF-1 subunits are designated p150, p60, and p48.
1	0	0	sphingomyelin synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1,2-diacyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + ceramide = 1,2-diacyl-sn-glycerol + sphingomyelin.
3	1	1	response to vitamin A	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin A stimulus.
2	0	0	calmodulin-dependent protein phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein serine/threonine phosphate + H2O = protein serine/threonine + phosphate, dependent on the presence of calcium-bound calmodulin.
2	0	1	response to hydroperoxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydroperoxide stimulus. Hydroperoxides are monosubstitution products of hydrogen peroxide, HOOH.
2	1	1	response to vitamin E	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin E stimulus.
0	0	1	response to ATP	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an ATP (adenosine 5'-triphosphate) stimulus.
0	1	2	ribonuclease P RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the RNA subunit of ribonuclease P.
0	2	0	meiotic cytokinesis	A cell cycle process that results in the division of the cytoplasm of a cell after meiosis, resulting in the separation of the original cell into two daughter cells.
18	16	14	tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a tumor necrosis factor to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
2	1	0	leptin-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of leptin to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Leptin is a hormone manufactured primarily in the adipocytes of white adipose tissue, and the level of circulating leptin is directly proportional to the total amount of fat in the body.
1	1	1	adiponectin-activated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of adiponectin to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	0	iron import into cell	The directed movement of iron ions from outside of a cell into the cytoplasmic compartment. This may occur via transport across the plasma membrane or via endocytosis.
0	1	0	siderophore-dependent iron import into cell	A process in which iron (Fe3+) is solubilized by ferric iron-specific chelators, known as siderophores, excreted by a cell; the iron-siderophore complex is then transported into the cell by specific cell surface receptors.
0	1	0	reductive iron assimilation	A process in which iron is solubilized by reduction from Fe3+ to Fe2+ via a cell surface reductase and subsequent transport of the iron across the membrane by iron uptake proteins.
1	0	0	amide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an amide, any derivative of an oxoacid in which an acidic hydroxy group has been replaced by an amino or substituted amino group.
0	1	1	dsRNA transport	The directed movement of dsRNA, double-stranded ribonucleic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	cysteine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of cysteine from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	2	negative regulation of protein sumoylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of SUMO groups to a protein.
1	2	1	positive regulation of protein sumoylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of SUMO groups to a protein.
0	0	1	I-kappaB/NF-kappaB complex	A protein complex containing an inhibitory-kappaB (I-kappaB/IKB) protein and one or more copies of an NF-kappaB protein. In the resting state, NF-kappaB dimers are bound to I-kappaB proteins, sequestering NF-kappaB in the cytoplasm.
1	1	0	Bcl3/NF-kappaB2 complex	A protein complex containing one Bcl protein and one or more copies of NF-kappaB2; formation of complexes of different stoichiometry depends on the Bcl3:NF-kappaB2 ratio, and allow Bcl3 to exert different regulatory effects on NF-kappaB2-dependent transcription.
2	0	0	nuclear DNA replication	The DNA-dependent DNA replication that occurs in the nucleus of eukaryotic organisms as part of the cell cycle.
1	0	0	regulation of nuclear cell cycle DNA replication	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of The DNA-dependent DNA replication that occurs in the nucleus of eukaryotic organisms as part of the cell cycle.
1	1	0	CORVET complex	A multimeric protein complex that acts as an endosomal tethering complex (CORVET = class C core vacuole/endosome tethering) by cooperating with Rab GTPases to capture endosomal vesicles and trap them prior to the action of SNAREs; the complex is involved in endo-lysosomal biogenesis and required for transport between endosome and vacuole. The Saccharomyces cerevisiae complex contains Vps8p, Vps3p, Pep5p, Vps16p, Pep3p, and Vps33p.
2	0	4	node of Ranvier	An axon part that is a gap in the myelin where voltage-gated sodium channels cluster and saltatory conduction is executed.
1	1	2	internode region of axon	An axon part that is located between the nodes of Ranvier and surrounded by compact myelin sheath.
1	1	5	paranode region of axon	An axon part that is located adjacent to the nodes of Ranvier and surrounded by lateral loop portions of myelin sheath.
0	1	0	response to vitamin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin stimulus.
0	0	1	actin-myosin filament sliding	The sliding movement of actin thin filaments and myosin thick filaments past each other.
3	3	1	transcription factor TFTC complex	A protein complex that does not contain either a TATA-binding protein (TBP) or a TBP-like factor, but is composed of several TAFIIs and other proteins, including a histone acetyltransferase. This complex is able to nucleate transcription initiation by RNA polymerase II, can mediate transcriptional activation, and has histone acetyltransferase activity.
1	1	0	abortive mitotic cell cycle	A cell cycle in which mitosis is begun and progresses normally through the end of anaphase, but not completed, resulting in a cell with increased ploidy.
1	0	0	cell proliferation in midbrain	The multiplication or reproduction of cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population in the midbrain.
1	1	1	response to vitamin D	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin D stimulus.
4	4	3	eukaryotic 48S preinitiation complex	A protein complex composed of the small ribosomal subunit, eIF3, eIF1A, methionyl-initiatior methionine and a capped mRNA. The complex is initially positioned at the 5'-end of the capped mRNA.
1	1	3	T-tubule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level that results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the T-tubule. A T-tubule is an invagination of the plasma membrane of a muscle cell that extends inward from the cell surface around each myofibril.
0	1	0	dehydroascorbic acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of dehydroascorbate, 5-(1,2-dihydroxyethyl)furan-2,3,4(5H)-trione, from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	cell cycle comprising mitosis without cytokinesis	A mitotic cell cycle in which mitosis is completed but cytokinesis does not occur, resulting in a cell containing multiple nuclei each with a chromosomal complement of the original ploidy (usually 2N).
0	0	1	meiotic cell cycle checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that ensures accurate chromosome replication and segregation by preventing progression through a meiotic cell cycle until conditions are suitable for the cell to proceed to the next stage.
2	4	0	mitotic DNA replication checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that acts during a mitotic cell cycle and prevents the initiation of mitosis until DNA replication is complete, thereby ensuring that progeny inherit a full complement of the genome.
1	0	0	meiotic spindle assembly checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that delays the metaphase/anaphase transition of a meiotic cell cycle until the spindle is correctly assembled and chromosomes are attached to the spindle.
2	0	0	cerebrospinal fluid secretion	The regulated release of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) from the choroid plexus of the lateral, third and fourth ventricles. The cerebrospinal fluid is a clear liquid that located within the ventricles, spinal canal, and subarachnoid spaces.
1	1	1	Leydig cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized structural and/or functional features of a Leydig cell. A Leydig cell is a testosterone-secreting cell in the interstitial area, between the seminiferous tubules, in the testis.
0	0	1	peroxisome membrane targeting sequence binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a peroxisomal membrane targeting sequence, any of several sequences of amino acids within a protein that can act as a signal for the localization of the protein into the peroxisome membrane.
1	0	0	negative regulation of collagen binding	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of collagen binding.
1	0	0	positive regulation of collagen binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of collagen binding.
4	2	1	cholesterol efflux	The directed movement of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol, out of a cell or organelle.
2	0	0	S-adenosylmethionine cycle	A cyclic series of interconversions involving S-adenosylmethionine, S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine, L-cysteine, and L-methionine. Couples utilization of the methyl group of SAM with recycling of the homocysteinyl group and regeneration of methionine.
2	0	1	secretory granule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a secretory granule. A secretory granule is a small subcellular vesicle, surrounded by a membrane, that is formed from the Golgi apparatus and contains a highly concentrated protein destined for secretion.
1	0	1	mast cell secretory granule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a secretory granule in a mast cell. A secretory granule is a small subcellular vesicle, surrounded by a membrane, that is formed from the Golgi apparatus and contains a highly concentrated protein destined for secretion.
2	6	1	protein localization to organelle	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within an organelle.
0	0	1	protein localization to secretory granule	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a secretory granule.
1	0	0	T cell secretory granule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a secretory granule in a T cell. A secretory granule is a small subcellular vesicle, surrounded by a membrane, that is formed from the Golgi apparatus and contains a highly concentrated protein destined for secretion.
1	0	0	maintenance of protease location in mast cell secretory granule	A process in which a protease is maintained in a secretory granule in a mast cell and prevented from moving elsewhere.
1	0	0	maintenance of granzyme B location in T cell secretory granule	A process in which the protease granyme B is maintained in a secretory granule in a T cell and prevented from moving elsewhere.
5	1	1	chromatoid body	A ribonucleoprotein complex found in the cytoplasm of male germ cells, composed of exceedingly thin filaments that are consolidated into a compact mass or into dense strands of varying thickness that branch to form an irregular network. Contains mRNAs, miRNAs, and protein components involved in miRNA processing (such as Argonaute proteins and the endonuclease Dicer) and in RNA decay (such as the decapping enzyme DCP1a and GW182).
0	0	1	nitric oxide homeostasis	A homeostatic process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of nitric oxide within an organism or cell.
1	0	0	cholesterol biosynthetic process via desmosterol	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, via the intermediate desmosterol.
1	0	0	cholesterol biosynthetic process via lathosterol	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, via the intermediate lathosterol.
0	1	0	HULC complex	A ubiquitin-conjugating enzyme complex that contains two RING finger proteins, which have ubiquitin ligase activity, in addition to a protein with ubiquitin-conjugating enzyme activity; catalyzes the ubiquitination of histone H2B at lysine 119 (or the equivalent residue). In Schizosaccharomyces the subunits are Rhp1, Brl2/Rfp1 and Brl1/Rfp2.
0	0	1	L-lysine catabolic process to acetyl-CoA via saccharopine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of L-lysine into other compounds, including acetyl-CoA, via the intermediate saccharopine.
1	1	0	histone H2A ubiquitination	The modification of histone H2A by addition of one or more ubiquitin groups.
1	2	2	histone H2B ubiquitination	The modification of histone H2B by addition of ubiquitin groups.
2	2	2	fatty acid beta-oxidation using acyl-CoA dehydrogenase	A fatty acid beta-oxidation pathway in which the initial step of each oxidation cycle, which converts an acyl-CoA to a trans-2-enoyl-CoA, is catalyzed by acyl-CoA dehydrogenase; the electrons removed by oxidation pass through the respiratory chain to oxygen and leave H2O as the product. Fatty acid beta-oxidation begins with the addition of coenzyme A to a fatty acid, and ends when only two or three carbons remain (as acetyl-CoA or propionyl-CoA respectively).
1	2	1	fatty acid beta-oxidation using acyl-CoA oxidase	A fatty acid beta-oxidation pathway in which the initial step, which converts an acyl-CoA to a trans-2-enoyl-CoA, is catalyzed by acyl-CoA oxidase; the electrons removed by oxidation pass directly to oxygen and produce hydrogen peroxide, which is cleaved by peroxisomal catalases. Fatty acid beta-oxidation begins with the addition of coenzyme A to a fatty acid, and ends when only two or three carbons remain (as acetyl-CoA or propionyl-CoA respectively).
1	2	1	rDNA heterochromatin	A region of heterochromatin located at the rDNA repeats in a chromosome.
1	0	0	multicellular organismal response to stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a multicellular organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress. The stress is usually, but not necessarily, exogenous (e.g. temperature, humidity, ionizing radiation).
0	1	0	Slx1-Slx4 complex	A heterodimeric protein complex that possesses an endonuclease activity that specifically cleaves certain types of branched DNA structures; because such structures often form during the replication ribosomal DNA (rDNA) repeats, the complex plays a role in the maintenance of rDNA. The subunits are known as Slx1 and Slx 4 in budding and fission yeasts, and are conserved in eukaryotes.
1	4	5	protein deacetylase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of an acetyl group or groups from a protein substrate.
0	0	1	regulation of water loss via skin	A process that modulates the rate or extent of water loss from an organism via the skin.
0	0	1	anterior/posterior axon guidance	The process in which the migration of an axon growth cone is directed to a specific target site along the anterior-posterior body axis in response to a combination of attractive and repulsive cues. The anterior-posterior axis is defined by a line that runs from the head or mouth of an organism to the tail or opposite end of the organism.
1	0	0	ESCRT-0 complex	A protein complex required for the recycling of Golgi proteins, formation of lumenal membranes and sorting of ubiquitinated proteins into those membranes. This complex includes Vps1p and Hse1p in yeast and the Hrs and STAM proteins in mammals.
0	1	0	gamma-tubulin complex localization	Any process in which a gamma-tubulin complex is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location.
5	1	3	transferrin transport	The directed movement of transferrin into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	6	3	response to testosterone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a testosterone stimulus.
1	0	0	Elongator holoenzyme complex	A heterohexameric protein complex that is involved in modification of wobble nucleosides in tRNA. The complex can associate physically with hyperphosphorylated RNA polymerase II; it contains two discrete heterotrimeric subcomplexes.
0	0	1	response to cobalamin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cobalamin (vitamin B12) stimulus.
2	3	0	response to L-ascorbic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an L-ascorbic acid (vitamin C) stimulus.
0	3	1	RNA strand annealing activity	Facilitates the base-pairing of complementary single-stranded RNA.
1	0	0	BRCA2-MAGE-D1 complex	A heterodimeric protein complex formed of BRCA2 and MAGE-D1; may mediate the synergistic activities of the two proteins in regulating cell growth.
0	0	1	response to hydroxyisoflavone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydroxyisoflavone stimulus.
0	1	1	TSC1-TSC2 complex	A protein complex consisting of at least tumerin and hamartin; its formation may regulate hamartin homomultimer formation. The complex acts as a GTPase activating protein (GAP) for the small GTPase (Rheb), and inhibits the TOR signaling pathway.
0	1	0	mitotic checkpoint complex	A multiprotein complex that functions as a mitotic checkpoint inhibitor of the anaphase-promoting complex/cyclosome (APC/C). In budding yeast this complex consists of Mad2p, Mad3p, Bub3p and Cdc20p, and in mammalian cells it consists of MAD2, BUBR1, BUB3, and CDC20.
0	1	1	mammary gland epithelial cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of mammary gland epithelial cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population. Mammary gland epithelial cells make up the covering of surfaces of the mammary gland. The mammary gland is a large compound sebaceous gland that in female mammals is modified to secrete milk.
2	0	1	regulation of mammary gland epithelial cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mammary gland epithelial cell proliferation.
2	1	0	negative regulation of mammary gland epithelial cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of mammary gland epithelial cell proliferation.
4	0	2	positive regulation of mammary gland epithelial cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of mammary gland epithelial cell proliferation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of catecholamine secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a catecholamine.
0	1	2	positive regulation of catecholamine secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a catecholamine.
0	1	0	receptor serine/threonine kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a receptor that possesses protein serine/threonine kinase activity.
4	6	9	activating transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an activating transcription factor, any protein whose activity is required to initiate or upregulate transcription.
1	0	0	mitochondrial cytochrome c oxidase assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form respiratory chain complex IV (also known as cytochrome c oxidase) in the mitochondrial inner membrane.
3	0	0	membrane protein proteolysis	The proteolytic cleavage of a transmembrane protein leading to the release of its intracellular or ecto-domains.
2	3	2	integrin activation	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of an integrin, a heterodimeric adhesion receptor formed by the non-covalent association of particular alpha and beta subunits, that lead to the increased affinity of the integrin for its extracellular ligands.
0	1	0	regulation of integrin activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of integrin activation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of integrin activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of integrin activation.
1	4	1	positive regulation of integrin activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of integrin activation.
5	8	2	cell adhesion mediated by integrin	The attachment of a cell, either to another cell or to an underlying substrate such as the extracellular matrix, via an integrin, a heterodimeric adhesion receptor formed by the non-covalent association of particular alpha and beta subunits.
2	5	2	regulation of cell adhesion mediated by integrin	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of cell adhesion mediated by integrin.
1	2	0	negative regulation of cell adhesion mediated by integrin	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of cell adhesion mediated by integrin.
1	2	1	positive regulation of cell adhesion mediated by integrin	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of cell adhesion mediated by integrin.
1	3	1	cell-cell adhesion mediated by integrin	The attachment of one cell to another cell via an integrin, a heterodimeric adhesion receptor formed by the non-covalent association of particular alpha and beta subunits.
1	0	0	regulation of cell-cell adhesion mediated by integrin	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of cell-cell adhesion mediated by integrin.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cell-cell adhesion mediated by integrin	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of cell-cell adhesion mediated by integrin.
1	0	1	positive regulation of cell-cell adhesion mediated by integrin	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of cell-cell adhesion mediated by integrin.
3	1	3	negative regulation by symbiont of host apoptotic process	Any process in which an organism stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of programmed cell death in the host, where programmed cell death proceeds by apoptosis. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
0	3	3	negative regulation of kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of kinase activity, the catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a substrate molecule.
18	9	4	positive regulation of kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of kinase activity, the catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a substrate molecule.
0	0	2	DNA/RNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; this reaction drives the unwinding of a DNA/RNA duplex, i.e. a double helix in which a strand of DNA pairs with a complementary strand of RNA.
0	1	0	3'-5' DNA/RNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; this reaction drives the unwinding of a DNA/RNA duplex in the direction 3' to 5'.
3	5	8	nucleotide-excision repair, DNA incision	A process that results in the endonucleolytic cleavage of the damaged strand of DNA. The incision occurs at the junction of single-stranded DNA and double-stranded DNA that is formed when the DNA duplex is unwound.
0	1	0	osteoblast proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of osteoblasts, resulting in the expansion of an osteoblast cell population. An osteoblast is a bone-forming cell which secretes an extracellular matrix. Hydroxyapatite crystals are then deposited into the matrix to form bone.
1	2	0	negative regulation of osteoblast proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of osteoblast proliferation.
0	3	0	positive regulation of osteoblast proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of osteoblast proliferation.
6	0	1	sialic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with sialic acid, any of a variety of N- or O- substituted derivatives of neuraminic acid, a nine carbon monosaccharide. Sialic acids often occur in polysaccharides, glycoproteins, and glycolipids in animals and bacteria.
0	0	3	neurofilament bundle assembly	The assembly of neurofilaments into bundles, in which the filaments are longitudinally oriented, with numerous crossbridges between them. Neurofilament bundles may be cross-linked to each other, to membrane-bounded organelles or other cytoskeletal structures such as microtubules.
1	0	0	DNA 5'-adenosine monophosphate hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5'-AMP-DNA + H2O = AMP + DNA; nucleophilic release of a covalently linked adenylate residue from a DNA strand, leaving a 5' phosphate terminus.
2	1	1	phospholipid efflux	The directed movement of a phospholipid out of a cell or organelle.
1	0	0	3beta-hydroxy-5beta-steroid dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3beta-hydroxy-5beta-pregnane-20-one + NADP(+) = 5beta-pregnan-3,20-dione + H(+) + NADPH.
0	1	0	1-pyrroline dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-pyrroline + NAD+ + 2 H2O = 4-aminobutanoate + NADH + 2 H+.
2	1	2	response to glucagon	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glucagon stimulus.
1	0	0	cyanocobalamin reductase (cyanide-eliminating) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: cob(I)alamin + hydrogen cyanide + NADP(+) = cyanocob(III)alamin + H(+) + NADPH.
1	0	0	procollagen glucosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-glucose + 5-(D-galactosyloxy)-L-lysine-procollagen = UDP + 1,2-D-glucosyl-5-D-(galactosyloxy)-L-lysine-procollagen.
0	1	1	diphosphoinositol-pentakisphosphate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 1D-myo-inositol 5-diphosphate pentakisphosphate = ADP + 1D-myo-inositol bisdiphosphate tetrakisphosphate.
0	3	1	positive regulation of NAD(P)H oxidase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of the enzyme NAD(P)H oxidase.
0	1	0	hormone-sensitive lipase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: diacylglycerol + H2O = monoacylglycerol + a carboxylate; triacylglycerol + H2O = diacylglycerol + a carboxylate; and monoacylglycerol + H2O = glycerol + a carboxylate.
0	1	0	glucan 1,3-alpha-glucosidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of terminal (1->3)-alpha-D-glucosidic links in 1,3-alpha-D-glucans.
0	1	0	cis-stilbene-oxide hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: cis-stilbene oxide + H2O = (+)-(1R,2R)-1,2-diphenylethane-1,2-diol.
0	3	5	P-body assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and RNA molecules to form a cytoplasmic mRNA processing body.
0	0	1	box H/ACA snoRNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving box H/ACA type small nucleolar RNA.
0	0	1	3alpha,7alpha,12alpha-trihydroxy-5beta-cholest-24-enoyl-CoA hydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (24R,25R)-3alpha,7alpha,12alpha,24-tetrahydroxy-5beta-cholestanoyl-CoA = (24E)-3alpha,7alpha,12alpha-trihydroxy-5beta-cholest-24-enoyl-CoA + H2O.
4	0	1	response to lipid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lipid stimulus.
0	0	1	FAD-AMP lyase (cyclizing) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: FAD = AMP + riboflavin cyclic-4',5'-phosphate.
0	1	0	response to silicon dioxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a silicon dioxide stimulus.
0	1	0	ATPase-coupled lipid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + lipid(in) = ADP + phosphate + lipid(out).
3	3	3	phagophore assembly site membrane	A cellular membrane associated with the phagophore assembly site.
0	2	3	poly(G) binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence of guanine residues in an RNA molecule.
0	0	1	suppression by symbiont of host defense-related programmed cell death	Any process in which a symbiont stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of defense-related programmed cell death in the host organism. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
0	1	0	estrogen response element binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the estrogen response element (ERE), a conserved sequence found in the promoters of genes whose expression is regulated in response to estrogen.
0	1	1	RNA strand-exchange activity	Facilitates the displacement of one strand of an RNA-RNA duplex and its replacement with a different strand of higher complementarity.
1	2	0	endosomal vesicle fusion	The homotypic fusion of endocytic vesicles to form or add to an early endosome.
5	4	10	stress granule assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and RNA molecules to form a stress granule.
0	1	0	RIC1-RGP1 guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor complex	A protein complex that acts as a nucleotide exchange factor for the GTPase Ypt6p, and is required for fusion of endosome-derived vesicles with the Golgi.
1	3	3	protein localization to Golgi apparatus	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the Golgi apparatus.
5	7	5	CENP-A containing nucleosome assembly	The formation of nucleosomes containing the histone H3 variant CENP-A to form centromeric chromatin. This specialised chromatin occurs at centromeric region in point centromeres,  and the central core in modular centromeres.
0	0	1	establishment of mitotic sister chromatid cohesion	The process in which the sister chromatids of a replicated chromosome become joined along the entire length of the chromosome during S phase during a mitotic cell cycle.
0	1	1	maintenance of mitotic sister chromatid cohesion	The process in which the association between sister chromatids of a replicated chromosome is maintained as chromosomes condense, attach to the spindle in a bipolar orientation, and congress to the metaphase plate during a mitotic cell cycle.
9	5	7	response to cytokine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cytokine stimulus.
1	2	2	VCP-NPL4-UFD1 AAA ATPase complex	A multiprotein ATPase complex required for the efficient dislocation of ER-lumenal degradation substrates, and their subsequent proteolysis by the proteasome. In budding yeast, this complex includes Cdc48p, Npl4p and Ufd1p proteins. In mammals, this complex includes a hexamer of VCP/p97 (a cytosolic ATPase) and trimers of each of its cofactors UFD1L and NPL4 (NPLOC4) (e.g. a 6:3:3 stoichiometry).
4	2	1	erythrocyte homeostasis	Any process of regulating the production and elimination of erythrocytes within an organism.
0	1	0	regulation of tissue remodeling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of tissue remodeling.
2	1	1	homotypic cell-cell adhesion	The attachment of a cell to a second cell of the identical type via adhesion molecules.
1	0	1	negative regulation of homotypic cell-cell adhesion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of homotypic cell-cell adhesion.
0	0	1	positive regulation of homotypic cell-cell adhesion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of homotypic cell-cell adhesion.
6	5	2	heterotypic cell-cell adhesion	The attachment of a cell to a cell of a different type via adhesion molecules.
2	1	3	negative regulation of heterotypic cell-cell adhesion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of heterotypic cell-cell adhesion.
2	3	4	positive regulation of heterotypic cell-cell adhesion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of heterotypic cell-cell adhesion.
0	0	1	positive regulation of erythrocyte aggregation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of erythrocyte aggregation.
1	0	0	regulation of toll-like receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor signaling pathway.
2	1	1	negative regulation of toll-like receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor signaling pathway.
1	0	0	negative regulation of MyD88-independent toll-like receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of MyD88-independent toll-like receptor signaling pathway.
1	2	0	toll-like receptor 2 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to toll-like receptor 2.
0	1	1	negative regulation of toll-like receptor 2 signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 2 signaling pathway.
1	0	1	positive regulation of toll-like receptor 2 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 2 signaling pathway.
2	3	1	toll-like receptor 3 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to toll-like receptor 3.
0	1	0	negative regulation of toll-like receptor 3 signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 3 signaling pathway.
1	1	2	positive regulation of toll-like receptor 3 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 3 signaling pathway.
3	5	1	toll-like receptor 4 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to toll-like receptor 4.
0	1	0	regulation of toll-like receptor 4 signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 4 signaling pathway.
1	1	1	negative regulation of toll-like receptor 4 signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 4 signaling pathway.
1	1	2	positive regulation of toll-like receptor 4 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 4 signaling pathway.
0	1	0	negative regulation of toll-like receptor 5 signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 5 signaling pathway.
3	0	0	toll-like receptor 7 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to toll-like receptor 7.
1	1	0	positive regulation of toll-like receptor 7 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 7 signaling pathway.
0	1	0	positive regulation of toll-like receptor 8 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 8 signaling pathway.
3	3	0	toll-like receptor 9 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to toll-like receptor 9.
1	0	2	positive regulation of toll-like receptor 9 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of toll-like receptor 9 signaling pathway.
1	1	1	positive regulation of maintenance of mitotic sister chromatid cohesion	Any process that increases the extent to which the association between sister chromatids of a replicated chromosome is maintained during a mitotic cell cycle.
2	1	2	apolipoprotein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an apolipoprotein, the protein component of a lipoprotein complex.
0	0	1	apolipoprotein A-I binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with apolipoprotein A-I.
0	1	1	apolipoprotein receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an apolipoprotein receptor.
1	1	0	apolipoprotein A-I receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an apolipoprotein A-I receptor.
1	1	1	triglyceride transport	The directed movement of triglyceride into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Triglycerides are important components of plant oils, animal fats and animal plasma lipoproteins.
11	17	5	cellular response to amino acid starvation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of deprivation of amino acids.
0	4	5	activation of protein kinase A activity	Any process that initiates the activity of the inactive enzyme protein kinase A.
0	1	0	response to oleic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an oleic acid stimulus.
1	2	1	amyloid-beta formation	The generation of amyloid-beta by cleavage of the amyloid precursor protein (APP).
0	0	1	GTP-dependent protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein serine/threonine = ADP + protein serine/threonine phosphate, dependent on the presence of GTP.
0	2	3	protein hexamerization	The formation of a protein hexamer, a macromolecular structure consisting of six noncovalently associated identical or nonidentical subunits.
16	9	20	ion transmembrane transport	A process in which an ion is transported across a membrane.
1	1	0	tRNA thio-modification	The addition a sulfur atom to a nucleotide in a tRNA molecule.
1	0	0	enkephalin processing	The formation of mature enkephalin, a pentapeptide hormone involved in regulating pain and nociception in the body by proteolytic processing of enkephalin propeptide.
1	0	0	islet amyloid polypeptide processing	The formation of mature islet amyloid polypeptide (IAPP) by posttranslational processing of pro-islet amyloid polypeptide (pro-IAPP).
0	1	0	GPI anchor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any glycosylphosphatidylinositol anchor. GPI anchors serve to attach membrane proteins to the lipid bilayer of cell membranes.
2	1	6	protein kinase A catalytic subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with one or both of the catalytic subunits of protein kinase A.
2	4	8	protein kinase A regulatory subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with one or both of the regulatory subunits of protein kinase A.
0	1	0	macrophage fusion	The binding and fusion of a macrophage to one or more other cells to form a multinucleated cell.
0	1	0	positive regulation of macrophage fusion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage fusion.
4	1	0	regulation of transcription elongation from RNA polymerase II promoter	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription elongation, the extension of an RNA molecule after transcription initiation and promoter clearance by the addition of ribonucleotides, catalyzed by RNA polymerase II.
1	3	4	negative regulation of transcription elongation from RNA polymerase II promoter	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transcription elongation, the extension of an RNA molecule after transcription initiation and promoter clearance by the addition of ribonucleotides, catalyzed by RNA polymerase II.
1	1	0	mitochondrial transcription factor activity	Interacting with the mitochondrial promoter DNA to modulate transcription by the mitochondrial RNA polymerase.
0	1	0	snoRNA splicing	The process of removing sections of a primary snoRNA transcript to remove sequences not present in the mature form of the snoRNA and joining the remaining sections to form the mature form of the snoRNA.
5	9	6	negative regulation of GTPase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of GTP hydrolysis by a GTPase.
0	2	0	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex, class III, type I	A class III phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex that is involved in autophagy. In budding yeast, this complex consists of Vps30p, Vps34p, Apg14p and Vps15p.
0	2	0	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex, class III, type II	A class III phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex that is involved in vacuolar protein sorting (VPS) via endosomes. In budding yeast, this complex consists of Vps30p, Vps34p, Vps38 and Vps15p.
1	0	0	kynurenic acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of kynurenic acid, 4-hydroxyquinoline-2-carboxylic acid.
2	7	2	Arp2/3 complex-mediated actin nucleation	The actin nucleation process in which actin monomers combine to form a new branch on the side of an existing actin filament; mediated by the Arp2/3 protein complex and its interaction with other proteins.
0	3	1	regulation of Arp2/3 complex-mediated actin nucleation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of actin nucleation mediated by the Arp2/3 complex and interacting proteins.
2	0	1	negative regulation of Arp2/3 complex-mediated actin nucleation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of actin nucleation mediated by the Arp2/3 complex and interacting proteins.
3	3	6	cell junction assembly	A cellular process that results in the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a cell junction.
0	1	0	cell junction maintenance	The organization process that preserves a cell junction in a stable functional or structural state. A cell junction is a specialized region of connection between two cells or between a cell and the extracellular matrix.
5	3	7	adherens junction organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of an adherens junction. An adherens junction is a cell-cell junction composed of the epithelial cadherin-catenin complex at which the cytoplasmic face of the plasma membrane is attached to actin filaments.
1	1	4	adherens junction assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an adherens junction. An adherens junction is a cell-cell junction composed of the epithelial cadherin-catenin complex at which the cytoplasmic face of the plasma membrane is attached to actin filaments.
1	1	1	adherens junction maintenance	The maintenance of an adherens junction. An adherens junction is a cell-cell junction composed of the epithelial cadherin-catenin complex at which the cytoplasmic face of the plasma membrane is attached to actin filaments.
0	1	0	RNA folding	The process of assisting in the covalent and noncovalent assembly of single or multimeric RNAs into the correct tertiary structure.
1	0	0	short-chain carboxylesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a carboxylic ester + H2O = an alcohol + a carboxylic anion, where the carboxylic chain has 8 or fewer carbon atoms.
1	2	2	response to type I interferon	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a type I interferon stimulus. Type I interferons include the interferon-alpha, beta, delta, episilon, zeta, kappa, tau, and omega gene families.
1	1	1	response to interferon-gamma	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interferon-gamma stimulus. Interferon-gamma is also known as type II interferon.
2	0	0	regulation of type III interferon production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of type III interferon production. Interferon lambda is the only member of the type III interferon found so far.
1	1	0	glial cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a glial cell, a non-neuronal cell of the nervous system.
0	2	2	negative regulation of glial cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of glial cell apoptotic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of glial cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of glial cell apoptotic process.
1	1	0	'de novo' NAD biosynthetic process from tryptophan	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide (NAD), beginning with the synthesis of tryptophan from simpler precursors; biosynthesis may be of either the oxidized form, NAD, or the reduced form, NADH.
0	0	1	NAD salvage	Any process that generates nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide (NAD) from derivatives of it, without de novo synthesis; salvage is usually from the degradation products nicotinic acid (Na) and nicotinamide (Nam).
3	0	1	NAD biosynthesis via nicotinamide riboside salvage pathway	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide (NAD) from the vitamin precursor nicotinamide riboside.
0	1	0	mature chylomicron	A chylomicron that contains apolipoprotein C2 (APOC2), a cofactor for lipoprotein lipase (LPL) activity, and has a mean diameter of 500 nm and density of 0.95g/ml. Mature chylomicron particles transport exogenous (dietary) lipids from the intestines to other body tissues, via the blood and lymph.
0	1	0	chylomicron remnant	A lipoprotein particle that is derived from a mature chylomicron particle by the removal of triglycerides from the chylomicron core by lipoprotein lipase and the subsequent loss of surface components. It characteristically contains apolipoprotein E (APOE) and is cleared from the blood by the liver.
3	3	3	very-low-density lipoprotein particle	A triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle that is typically composed of APOB100, APOE and APOCs and has a density of about 1.006 g/ml and a diameter of between 20-80 nm. It is found in blood and transports endogenous products (newly synthesized cholesterol and triglycerides) from the liver.
5	2	1	low-density lipoprotein particle	A lipoprotein particle, rich in cholesterol esters and low in triglycerides that is typically composed of APOB100 and APOE and has a density of 1.02-1.06 g/ml and a diameter of between 20-25 nm. LDL particles are formed from VLDL particles (via IDL) by the loss of triglyceride and gain of cholesterol ester. They transport endogenous cholesterol (and to some extent triglycerides) from peripheral tissues back to the liver.
2	2	0	intermediate-density lipoprotein particle	A triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle that typically contains APOB100, APOE and APOCs and has a density of 1.006-1.019 g/ml and a diameter of between 25-30 nm. IDL particles are found in blood and are formed by the delipidation of very-low-density lipoprotein particles (VLDL). IDL particles are removed from blood by the liver, following binding to the APOE receptor, or are converted to low-density lipoprotein (LDL).
3	3	3	high-density lipoprotein particle	A lipoprotein particle with a high density (typically 1.063-1.21 g/ml) and a diameter of 5-10 nm that contains APOAs and may contain APOCs and APOE; found in blood and carries lipids from body tissues to the liver as part of the reverse cholesterol transport process.
1	1	0	discoidal high-density lipoprotein particle	A newly formed high-density lipoprotein particle; consists of a phospholipid bilayer surrounded by two or more APOA1 molecules. The discoidal HDL particle is formed when lipid-free or lipid-poor APOA1 acquires phospholipids and unesterified cholesterol from either cell membranes or triglyceride-rich lipoproteins (undergoing lipolysis by lipoprotein lipase).
1	2	2	spherical high-density lipoprotein particle	A mature high-density lipoprotein (HDL) particle, converted from discoidal HDL particles following the esterification of cholesterol in the particle by phosphatidylcholine-sterol O-acyltransferase (lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase; LCAT).
0	0	1	triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle remodeling	The acquisition, loss or modification of a protein or lipid within a triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle, including the hydrolysis of triglyceride by lipoprotein lipase, with the subsequent loss of free fatty acid, and the transfer of cholesterol esters to a triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle by cholesteryl ester transfer protein (CETP), with the simultaneous transfer of triglyceride from a triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle.
2	2	1	chylomicron remodeling	The acquisition, loss or modification of a protein or lipid within a chylomicron, including the hydrolysis of triglyceride by lipoprotein lipase and the subsequent loss of free fatty acid.
1	1	0	very-low-density lipoprotein particle remodeling	The acquisition, loss or modification of a protein or lipid within a very-low-density lipoprotein particle, including the hydrolysis of triglyceride by hepatic lipase or lipoprotein lipase and the subsequent loss of free fatty acid.
2	4	1	low-density lipoprotein particle remodeling	The acquisition, loss or modification of a protein or lipid within a low-density lipoprotein particle, including the hydrolysis of triglyceride by hepatic lipase, with the subsequent loss of free fatty acid, and the transfer of cholesterol esters from LDL to a triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle by cholesteryl ester transfer protein (CETP), with the simultaneous transfer of triglyceride to LDL.
2	1	2	high-density lipoprotein particle remodeling	The acquisition, loss or modification of a protein or lipid within a high-density lipoprotein particle, including the hydrolysis of triglyceride by hepatic lipase, with the subsequent loss of free fatty acid, and the transfer of cholesterol esters from LDL to a triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle by cholesteryl ester transfer protein (CETP), with the simultaneous transfer of triglyceride to LDL.
1	0	0	plasma lipoprotein particle assembly	The non-covalent aggregation and arrangement of proteins and lipids to form a plasma lipoprotein particle.
3	3	1	chylomicron assembly	The non-covalent aggregation and arrangement of proteins and lipids in the intestine to form a chylomicron.
3	3	1	very-low-density lipoprotein particle assembly	The non-covalent aggregation and arrangement of proteins and lipids in the liver to form a very-low-density lipoprotein particle.
1	1	4	high-density lipoprotein particle assembly	The non-covalent aggregation and arrangement of proteins and lipids to form a high-density lipoprotein particle.
2	0	0	plasma lipoprotein particle clearance	The process in which a lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
3	1	0	chylomicron remnant clearance	The process in which a chylomicron remnant is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis into liver cells and its constituent parts degraded.
3	5	2	low-density lipoprotein particle clearance	The process in which a low-density lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
2	1	2	high-density lipoprotein particle clearance	The process in which a high-density lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
1	2	0	Pwp2p-containing subcomplex of 90S preribosome	A protein complex that forms a subcomplex of the 90S preribosome and can interact directly with the 5' External Transcribed Spacer (ETS) of the full length pre-rRNA transcript. In S. cerevisiae, it sediments at 25-30 S and is composed of Pwp2p, Dip2p, Utp21p, Utp13p, Utp18p, and Utp6p.
0	3	2	lipid droplet organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a lipid particle.
0	1	0	regulation of smooth muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of smooth muscle cell apoptotic process.
0	0	1	negative regulation of smooth muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of smooth muscle cell apoptotic process.
1	1	2	positive regulation of smooth muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of smooth muscle cell apoptotic process.
3	5	5	protein localization to cell surface	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the external part of the cell wall and/or plasma membrane.
0	1	0	regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to iron	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter in response to an iron stimulus.
3	3	7	nuclear periphery	The portion of the nuclear lumen proximal to the inner nuclear membrane.
1	0	0	chromatin organization involved in regulation of transcription	Any cellular process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of the physical structure of eukaryotic chromatin that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of DNA-dependent transcription.
0	0	2	response to fluid shear stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fluid shear stress stimulus. Fluid shear stress is the force acting on an object in a system where the fluid is moving across a solid surface.
0	1	0	urate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of urate, the anion of uric acid, 2,6,8-trioxypurine.
0	1	0	post-translational protein acetylation	The addition of an acetyl group to one or more amino acids in a protein, occurring after the protein has been completely translated and released from the ribosome.
2	2	1	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, exonucleolytic, 3'-5'	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the mRNA transcript body that occurs when the 3' end is not protected by a 3'-poly(A) tail; degradation proceeds in the 3' to 5' direction.
1	1	0	cholesterol esterification	A lipid modification process in which a sterol ester is formed by the combination of a carboxylic acid (often a fatty acid) and cholesterol. In the blood this process is associated with the conversion of free cholesterol into cholesteryl ester, which is then sequestered into the core of a lipoprotein particle.
10	15	5	substrate adhesion-dependent cell spreading	The morphogenetic process that results in flattening of a cell as a consequence of its adhesion to a substrate.
2	1	0	very-low-density lipoprotein particle clearance	The process in which a very-low-density lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
0	3	1	ubiquitin-ubiquitin ligase activity	Isoenergetic transfer of ubiquitin from one protein to an existing ubiquitin chain via the reaction X-ubiquitin + Y-ubiquitin -> Y-ubiquitin-ubiquitin + X, where both the X-ubiquitin and Y-ubiquitin-ubiquitin linkages are thioester bonds between the C-terminal glycine of ubiquitin and a sulfhydryl side group of a cysteine residue.
20	24	15	centriolar satellite	A small (70-100 nm) cytoplasmic granule that contains a number of centrosomal proteins; centriolar satellites traffic toward microtubule minus ends and are enriched near the centrosome.
0	3	3	dynactin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any part of a dynactin complex; dynactin is a large protein complex that activates dynein-based motor activity.
2	4	4	microtubule anchoring	Any process in which a microtubule is maintained in a specific location in a cell.
1	1	2	microtubule anchoring at centrosome	Any process in which a microtubule is maintained in a specific location in a cell by attachment to a centrosome.
0	0	1	t-UTP complex	A protein complex that forms a subcomplex of the 90S preribosome and is required for the subsequent assembly of the rest of the preribosome. In S. cerevisiae, it is composed of Utp5p, Utp4p, Nan1p, Utp8p, Utp9p, Utp10 and Utp15p.
1	0	0	Mpp10 complex	A protein complex that forms a subcomplex of the 90S preribosome. In S. cerevisiae, it is composed of Mpp10p, Imp3p and Imp4p.
0	3	0	3'-5' RNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; this reaction drives the unwinding of an RNA helix in the direction 3' to 5'.
1	1	0	small-subunit processome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and RNA molecules to form a small-subunit processome.
1	0	1	response to carbon monoxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a carbon monoxide (CO) stimulus.
0	0	1	ncRNA processing	Any process that results in the conversion of one or more primary non-coding RNA (ncRNA) transcripts into one or more mature ncRNA molecules.
2	2	0	snRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of an snRNA molecule.
0	2	0	U1 snRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of a U1 snRNA molecule.
0	0	1	U2 snRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of a U2 snRNA molecule.
2	2	0	U4 snRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of a U4 snRNA molecule.
0	2	0	U5 snRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of a U5 snRNA molecule.
1	0	0	U6 snRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of a U6 snRNA molecule.
0	0	1	phosphatidylglycerol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phosphatidylglycerols, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of glycerol.
3	0	1	phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5-trisphosphate 5-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5-trisphosphate + H2O = phosphatidylinositol-3,4-bisphosphate + phosphate.
1	4	0	protein localization to phagophore assembly site	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, the phagophore assembly site (PAS).
0	2	3	early endosome to Golgi transport	The directed movement of substances from early endosomes to the Golgi.
1	1	0	late endosome to Golgi transport	The directed movement of substances from late endosomes to the Golgi.
3	2	2	protein localization to kinetochore	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, the kinetochore.
1	1	0	protein localization to chromosome	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, a specific location on a chromosome.
3	3	6	protein localization to nucleus	A process in which a protein transports or maintains the localization of another protein to the nucleus.
0	0	1	tooth mineralization	The process in which calcium salts are deposited into calcareous tooth structures such as dental enamel, dentin and cementum.
0	1	0	chromosome, centromeric core domain	The innermost portion of the centromeric region of a chromosome, encompassing the core region of a chromosome centromere and the proteins that bind to it.
2	2	1	U3 snoRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with U3 small nucleolar RNA.
0	0	1	box C/D snoRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with box C/D small nucleolar RNA.
0	0	2	box H/ACA snoRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with box H/ACA small nucleolar RNA.
0	0	1	mitochondrial unfolded protein response	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the presence of unfolded proteins in the mitochondrial matrix; results in transcriptional upregulation of nuclear genes encoding mitochondrial stress proteins.
0	0	2	proteasome storage granule	A multisubunit proteasome complex that localizes in the cytoplasm as dot-like structures when cells are in a quiescent state.
0	1	0	response to vitamin B6	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin B6 stimulus. Vitamin B6 encompasses pyridoxal, pyridoxamine and pyridoxine and the active form, pyridoxal phosphate.
1	0	1	RNA cap binding complex	Any protein complex that binds to a specialized RNA cap structure at any time in the lifetime of the RNA.
4	0	0	mitochondrial respiratory chain complex III assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the cytochrome bc(1) complex (also known as ubiquinol-cytochrome c reductase), in the mitochondrial inner membrane.
1	0	0	piRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a piRNA, a Piwi-associated RNA, a 24- to 30-nucleotide RNA derived from repeat or complex DNA sequence elements and processed by a Dicer-independent mechanism.
2	0	0	piRNA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving piRNAs, Piwi-associated RNAs, a class of 24- to 30-nucleotide RNA derived from repeat or complex DNA sequence elements and processed by a Dicer-independent mechanism.
0	1	0	hydroxyproline transport	The directed movement of hydroxyproline into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	L-hydroxyproline transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of L-hydroxyproline from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	1	phosphatidylinositol phosphate 5-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the removal of the 5-phosphate group of a phosphatidylinositol phosphate.
0	1	0	phosphatidylinositol phosphate 4-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the removal of the 4-phosphate group of a phosphatidylinositol phosphate.
4	0	0	phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 4-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-myo-inositol 4,5-bisphosphate + H2O = 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3-phosphate + phosphate.
15	20	12	cellular response to oxidative stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of oxidative stress, a state often resulting from exposure to high levels of reactive oxygen species, e.g. superoxide anions, hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), and hydroxyl radicals.
0	0	2	pyruvate dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: pyruvate + CoA + NAD+ = acetyl-CoA + CO2 + NADH.
4	4	19	cellular response to heat	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a heat stimulus, a temperature stimulus above the optimal temperature for that organism.
6	5	2	response to tumor necrosis factor	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a tumor necrosis factor stimulus.
6	14	14	cellular protein localization	Any process in which a protein is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location at the level of a cell. Localization at the cellular level encompasses movement within the cell, from within the cell to the cell surface, or from one location to another at the surface of a cell.
6	6	9	cellular response to reactive oxygen species	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a reactive oxygen species stimulus. Reactive oxygen species include singlet oxygen, superoxide, and oxygen free radicals.
0	1	0	response to laminar fluid shear stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a laminar fluid shear stress stimulus. Laminar fluid flow is the force acting on an object in a system where the fluid is moving across a solid surface in parallel layers. As an example, laminar shear stress can be seen where blood flows against the luminal side of blood vessel walls.
1	1	0	tetrahydrobiopterin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a tetrahydrobiopterin, 5,6,7,8-tetrahydrobiopterin or a derivative thereof; tetrahydrobiopterins are enzyme cofactors that carry electrons in redox reactions.
1	1	0	arginine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with 2-amino-5-(carbamimidamido)pentanoic acid.
5	3	11	cellular response to unfolded protein	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an unfolded protein stimulus.
2	4	5	cellular protein-containing complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a protein complex, occurring at the level of an individual cell.
1	0	0	fatty acid elongation, monounsaturated fatty acid	Elongation of a fatty acid chain into which one C-C double bond has been introduced.
1	0	0	fatty acid elongation, polyunsaturated fatty acid	Elongation of a fatty acid chain into which two or more C-C double bonds have been introduced.
1	3	2	cellular protein-containing complex localization	A protein complex localization process that takes place at the cellular level; as a result, a protein complex is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location within a cell.
1	0	0	retinol transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of retinol from one side of a membrane to the other. Retinol is vitamin A1, 2,6,6-trimethyl-1-(9'-hydroxy-3',7'-dimethylnona-1',3',5',7'-tetraenyl)cyclohex-1-ene, one of the three components that makes up vitamin A.
1	0	0	retinol transport	The directed movement of retinol into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Retinol is vitamin A1, 2,6,6-trimethyl-1-(9'-hydroxy-3',7'-dimethylnona-1',3',5',7'-tetraenyl)cyclohex-1-ene, one of the three components that makes up vitamin A.
0	2	1	glutathione transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of glutathione, the tripeptide glutamylcysteinylglycine, from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	0	1	glutathione transport	The directed movement of glutathione, the tripeptide glutamylcysteinylglycine, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	1	phosphatidylcholine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phosphatidylcholines, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of choline.
1	0	0	establishment of mitochondrion localization by microtubule attachment	The directed movement of a mitochondrion by attachment to a microtubule, followed by elongation of the microtubule by tubulin polymerization.
0	1	0	mitochondrion migration along actin filament	The directed movement of a mitochondrion along a microfilament, mediated by motor proteins.
8	14	7	cellular response to UV	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an ultraviolet radiation (UV light) stimulus. Ultraviolet radiation is electromagnetic radiation with a wavelength in the range of 10 to 380 nanometers.
0	0	2	cellular macromolecule biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a macromolecule, any molecule of high relative molecular mass, the structure of which essentially comprises the multiple repetition of units derived, actually or conceptually, from molecules of low relative molecular mass, carried out by individual cells.
1	2	0	histone demethylase activity (H3-trimethyl-K4 specific)	Catalysis of the removal of a methyl group from trimethylated lysine at position 4 of the histone H3 protein.
1	2	1	histone demethylase activity (H3-dimethyl-K4 specific)	Catalysis of the removal of a methyl group from dimethylated lysine at position 4 of the histone H3 protein.
0	1	0	histone demethylase activity (H3-monomethyl-K4 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: histone H3 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 4) + O2 + FAD + H2O = histone H3 L-lysine (position 4) + H2O2 + formaldehyde + FADH2. This reaction is the removal of a methyl group from monomethylated lysine at position 4 of the histone H3 protein.
2	0	0	nucleobase-containing small molecule catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a nucleobase-containing small molecule: a nucleobase, a nucleoside, or a nucleotide.
3	0	2	endoplasmic reticulum chaperone complex	A protein complex that is located in the endoplasmic reticulum and is composed of chaperone proteins, including BiP, GRP94; CaBP1, protein disulfide isomerase (PDI), ERdj3, cyclophilin B, ERp72, GRP170, UDP-glucosyltransferase, and SDF2-L1.
0	1	0	integrin alpha1-beta1 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha1 subunit and one beta1 subunit.
1	1	1	integrin alpha2-beta1 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha2 subunit and one beta1 subunit.
0	2	0	integrin alpha3-beta1 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha3 subunit and one beta1 subunit.
0	2	0	integrin alpha4-beta1 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha4 subunit and one beta1 subunit.
1	1	0	integrin alpha4-beta7 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha4 subunit and one beta7 subunit.
0	0	1	chemotaxis to arachidonic acid	The directed movement of a motile cell or organism in response to the presence of arachidonic acid.
2	0	0	inhibin-betaglycan-ActRII complex	A protein complex that consists of inhibin, type III transforming growth factor beta receptor (also known as betaglycan), and the type II activin receptor ActRII. The complex is thought to negatively regulate the activity of activin B.
0	1	1	integrin alpha5-beta1 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha5 subunit and one beta1 subunit.
0	1	0	integrin alpha8-beta1 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha8 subunit and one beta1 subunit.
0	1	0	integrin alpha10-beta1 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha10 subunit and one beta1 subunit.
0	1	0	integrin alpha11-beta1 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alpha11 subunit and one beta1 subunit.
1	1	1	integrin alphav-beta3 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alphav subunit and one beta3 subunit.
1	1	0	integrin alphav-beta5 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alphav subunit and one beta5 subunit.
0	1	0	integrin alphav-beta6 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alphav subunit and one beta6 subunit.
0	1	0	integrin alphav-beta8 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alphav subunit and one beta8 subunit.
0	1	0	integrin alphaL-beta2 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alphaL subunit and one beta2 subunit.
0	2	0	integrin alphaM-beta2 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alphaM subunit and one beta2 subunit.
1	1	0	integrin alphaX-beta2 complex	An integrin complex that comprises one alphaX subunit and one beta2 subunit.
0	0	1	U11/U12 snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex formed by the association of the U11 and U12 small nuclear ribonucleoproteins.
1	0	1	response to prostaglandin E	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a prostagladin E stimulus.
1	0	0	response to prostaglandin F	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a prostagladin F stimulus.
1	1	0	response to gonadotropin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a gonadotropin stimulus.
1	0	0	response to luteinizing hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a luteinizing hormone stimulus.
1	0	1	ion channel complex	A protein complex that spans a membrane and forms a water-filled channel across the phospholipid bilayer allowing selective ion transport down its electrochemical gradient.
1	1	0	cation channel complex	An ion channel complex through which cations pass.
3	2	7	calcium channel complex	An ion channel complex through which calcium ions pass.
2	0	1	sodium channel complex	An ion channel complex through which sodium ions pass.
3	4	2	chloride channel complex	An ion channel complex through which chloride ions pass.
0	1	0	methyltransferase complex	A protein complex that possesses methyltransferase activity.
3	2	2	methylosome	A large (20 S) protein complex that possesses protein arginine methyltransferase activity and modifies specific arginines to dimethylarginines in the arginine- and glycine-rich domains of several spliceosomal Sm proteins, thereby targeting these proteins to the survival of motor neurons (SMN) complex for assembly into small nuclear ribonucleoprotein (snRNP) core particles. Proteins found in the methylosome include the methyltransferase JBP1 (PRMT5), pICln (CLNS1A), MEP50 (WDR77), and unmethylated forms of SM proteins that have RG domains.
1	0	0	inhibin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an inhibin monomer, any of the polypeptides that combine to form activin and inhibin dimers.
2	1	0	type I transforming growth factor beta receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type I transforming growth factor beta receptor.
1	0	0	type III transforming growth factor beta receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type III transforming growth factor beta receptor.
1	0	2	pICln-Sm protein complex	A protein complex that contains pICln (CLNS1A) and several Sm proteins, including SmD1, SmD2, SmE, SmF, and SmG.
0	1	0	SMN-Gemin2 complex	A protein complex that contains the survival motor neuron (SMN) protein and Gemin2; may form the stable core of the larger SMN complex.
2	2	2	SMN-Sm protein complex	A protein complex formed by the association of several methylated Sm proteins with the SMN complex; the latter contains the survival motor neuron (SMN) protein and at least eight additional integral components, including the Gemin2-8 and unrip proteins; additional proteins, including galectin-1 and galectin-3, are also found in the SMN-SM complex. The SMN-Sm complex is involved in spliceosomal snRNP assembly in the cytoplasm.
1	3	1	histone H3-K4 demethylation	The modification of histone H3 by the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 4 of the histone.
1	0	0	gamma-glutamyl-peptidase activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of a gamma-linked glutamate bond.
2	0	1	piecemeal microautophagy of the nucleus	Degradation of a cell nucleus by lysosomal microautophagy.
1	2	0	nucleosome organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of one or more nucleosomes.
0	1	0	histone H3-K79 methylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of a methyl group to lysine at position 79 of the histone.
1	0	0	cholesterol O-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + cholesterol = a cholesterol ester + CoA.
0	1	0	histone deacetylase activity (H4-K16 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: histone H4 N6-acetyl-L-lysine (position 16) + H2O = histone H4 L-lysine (position 16) + acetate. This reaction represents the removal of an acetyl group from lysine at position 16 of the histone H4 protein.
0	0	1	Scrib-APC-beta-catenin complex	A protein complex that contains the Scribble protein (a cell polarity determinant), the tumor suppressor protein adenomatous polyposis coli (APC), and beta-catenin; may be involved in the control of cell proliferation.
3	0	1	aryl hydrocarbon receptor complex	A protein complex that acts as an aryl hydrocarbon (Ah) receptor. Cytosolic and nuclear Ah receptor complexes have different subunit composition, but both contain the ligand-binding subunit AhR.
2	0	0	iron ion transmembrane transport	A process in which an iron ion is transported from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	2	regulation of iron ion transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of iron ions (Fe) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	negative regulation of iron ion transmembrane transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of iron ions from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	negative regulation of transmembrane transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a solute from one side of a membrane to the other.
7	4	10	regulation of ion transmembrane transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	0	1	negative regulation of ion transmembrane transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	0	1	positive regulation of ion transmembrane transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	0	basement membrane disassembly	The controlled breakdown of the basement membrane in the context of a normal process such as imaginal disc eversion.
0	1	0	histone H4-K20 methylation	The modification of histone H4 by addition of one or more methyl groups to lysine at position 20 of the histone.
1	1	1	histone H4-K20 trimethylation	The modification of histone H4 by addition of three methyl groups to lysine at position 20 of the histone.
17	28	34	secretory granule lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of a secretory granule.
1	1	0	glutathione transmembrane transport	A process in which glutathione is transported across a membrane.
0	0	1	recycling endosome lumen	The volume enclosed by the membranes of a recycling endosome.
1	0	0	caffeine oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: caffeine + O2 + 2 H+ + 2 e- = 1,3,7-trimethyluric acid + H2O.
0	1	0	endothelin maturation	The process leading to the attainment of the full functional capacity of endothelin by conversion of Big-endothelin substrate into mature endothelin.
3	2	1	histone lysine methylation	The modification of a histone by addition of one or more methyl groups to a lysine residue.
1	0	0	histone arginine methylation	The modification of a histone by addition of a methyl group to an arginine residue.
1	2	4	protein folding in endoplasmic reticulum	A protein folding process that takes place in the endoplasmic reticulum (ER). Secreted, plasma membrane and organelle proteins are folded in the ER, assisted by chaperones and foldases (protein disulphide isomerases), and additional factors required for optimal folding (ATP, Ca2+ and an oxidizing environment to allow disulfide bond formation).
9	14	8	response to endoplasmic reticulum stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stress acting at the endoplasmic reticulum. ER stress usually results from the accumulation of unfolded or misfolded proteins in the ER lumen.
1	1	1	NAD-dependent protein deacetylase activity	Catalysis of the removal of one or more acetyl groups from a protein, requiring NAD.
0	0	1	mitochondrial protein processing	The peptide cleavage of mitochondrial proteins, including cleavage contributing to their import.
1	3	2	peptidyl-lysine deacetylation	The removal of an acetyl group from an acetylated lysine residue in a peptide or protein.
0	0	1	iron chaperone activity	Directly binding to and delivering iron ions to a target protein.
4	3	11	immunoglobulin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with one or more specific sites on an immunoglobulin receptor molecule.
1	0	1	Fc-gamma receptor I complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with one or more specific sites on the Fc-gamma receptor I complex. The complex functions primarily as an activating receptor for IgG.
1	1	0	nuclear mitotic cohesin complex	A cohesin complex that mediates sister chromatid cohesion in the nucleus during mitosis; has a subunit composition distinct from that of the meiotic cohesin complex.
1	1	1	nuclear meiotic cohesin complex	A cohesin complex that mediates sister chromatid cohesion in the nucleus during meiosis; has a subunit composition distinct from that of the mitotic cohesin complex.
1	1	2	meiotic nuclear membrane microtubule tethering complex	A nuclear membrane  protein complex  which connects the nuclear outer and inner membranes together, and links links the nuclear lumen to cytoplasmic microtubules during meiosis.
0	0	1	oligosaccharyltransferase I complex	An oligosaccharyltransferase (OST) complex that contains at least seven polypeptides and is the major OST complex in mammalian cells. Of the three forms of mammalian OST complex identified, the OSTI complex has the weakest affinity for ribosomes.
0	0	2	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a phosphatidylinositol = ADP + a phosphatidylinositol 3-phosphate. This reaction is the addition of a phosphate group to phosphatidylinositol or one of its phosphorylated derivatives at the 3' position of the inositol ring.
1	0	2	1-phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate 3-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 4-phosphate + ATP = 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3,4-bisphosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
1	2	0	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of any of the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinases (PI3Ks). Regulatory subunits can link a PI3K catalytic subunit to upstream signaling events and help position the catalytic subunits close to their lipid substrates.
14	4	3	somatic stem cell population maintenance	Any process by which an organism retains a population of somatic stem cells, undifferentiated cells in the embryo or adult which can undergo unlimited division and give rise to cell types of the body other than those of the germ-line.
1	0	5	regulation of Rac protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Rac protein signal transduction.
0	0	1	negative regulation of Rac protein signal transduction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Rac protein signal transduction.
0	1	2	positive regulation of Rac protein signal transduction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Rac protein signal transduction.
4	7	10	regulation of Rho protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Rho protein signal transduction.
3	8	4	negative regulation of Rho protein signal transduction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Rho protein signal transduction.
2	8	3	positive regulation of Rho protein signal transduction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Rho protein signal transduction.
0	0	1	leading edge cell differentiation	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and/or functional features of leading edge cells, cells at the front of a migrating epithelial sheet.
0	3	0	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex, class III	A phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase complex that contains a catalytic class III phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K) subunit bound to a regulatory (adaptor) subunit. Additional adaptor proteins may be present. Class III PI3Ks have a substrate specificity restricted to phosphatidylinositol (PI).
1	1	0	histone deacetylase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of histone deacetylase.
0	0	1	histone acetyltransferase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of histone acetyltransferase.
1	6	5	histone acetyltransferase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the enzyme histone acetyltransferase.
1	0	0	sperm entry	An endocytosis process that results in penetration of the egg shell through the micropyle (a specialized anterior opening in the vitelline envelope) and entry of the entire sperm, including the surrounding plasma membrane and the sperm tail, into the egg cytoplasm. This step in fertilization is seen in Drosophila, where a plasma membrane fusion event between the sperm and the egg does not occur.
1	0	1	embryonic heart tube development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the embryonic heart tube over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The heart tube forms as the heart rudiment from the heart field.
1	1	1	brahma complex	A SWI/SNF-type complex that contains 8 to 14 proteins, including both conserved (core) and nonconserved components; contains the ATPase product of the Drosophila brm (brahma) or mammalian SMARCA2/BAF190B/BRM gene, or an ortholog thereof.
0	3	1	interchromatin granule	A class of nuclear body measuring 20-25 nm in diameter and distributed throughout the interchromatin space, linked together by thin fibrils. They are believed to be storage centers for various snRNAs, snRNPs, serine/arginine-rich proteins and RNA polymerase II. A typical mammalian cell contains 25-50 clusters of interchromatin granules. Interchromatin granule clusters do not contain the heterogeneous nuclear RNA-binding proteins (hnRNPs).
1	1	0	nuclear speck organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of nuclear specks, a class of nuclear body in which splicing factors are localized.
10	16	9	methylated histone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone in which a residue has been modified by methylation. Histones are any of a group of water-soluble proteins found in association with the DNA of eukaroytic chromosomes.
1	3	0	regulation of histone acetylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of an acetyl group to a histone protein.
2	4	2	positive regulation of histone acetylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of an acetyl group to a histone protein.
1	4	0	negative regulation of histone acetylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of an acetyl group to a histone protein.
1	0	0	axoneme assembly	The assembly and organization of an axoneme, the bundle of microtubules and associated proteins that forms the core of cilia (also called flagella) in eukaryotic cells and is responsible for their movements.
2	1	0	siRNA loading onto RISC involved in RNA interference	The transfer of small interfering RNA molecules (siRNAs) from the Dicer family of enzymes that cleave the double-stranded RNA, onto the nuclease-containing RNA-initiated silencing complex (RISC), in the context of RNA interference.
0	1	1	establishment or maintenance of apical/basal cell polarity	Any cellular process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance polarization of a cell's architecture along its apical/basal axis so that the apical and basal regions of the cell have different membrane, extracellular matrix and sub-membrane cellular components.
1	1	2	establishment of apical/basal cell polarity	The specification and formation of the polarity of a cell along its apical/basal axis.
17	14	16	phosphatidylinositol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any inositol-containing glycerophospholipid, i.e. phosphatidylinositol (PtdIns) and its phosphorylated derivatives.
0	1	0	sperm chromatin condensation	The progressive compaction of the spermatid chromatin so that it reaches a level of condensation that is not compatible with nuclear activities such as transcription or DNA replication.
2	0	0	spermatogenesis, exchange of chromosomal proteins	The replacement of somatic histones within sperm chromatin with sperm-specific histones or protamines with unique DNA-binding properties, resulting in condensation of the sperm chromatin.
3	1	6	response to nicotine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nicotine stimulus.
6	4	6	histone methyltransferase complex	A multimeric complex that is able to catalyze the addition of methyl groups to histone proteins.
0	4	2	ESC/E(Z) complex	A multimeric protein complex that can methylate lysine-27 and lysine-9 residues of histone H3. In Drosophila the core subunits of the complex include ESC, E(Z), CAF1 (NURF-55) and SU(Z)12. In mammals the core subunits of the complex include EED, EZH2, SUZ12 and RBBP4.
0	0	1	FACT complex	An abundant nuclear complex, which was originally identified in mammalian systems as a factor required for transcription elongation on chromatin templates. The FACT complex has been shown to destablilize the interaction between the H2A/H2B dimer and the H3/H4 tetramer of the nucleosome, thus reorganizing the structure of the nucleosome. In this way, the FACT complex may play a role in DNA replication and other processes that traverse the chromatin, as well as in transcription elongation. FACT is composed of two proteins that are evolutionarily conserved in all eukaryotes and homologous to mammalian Spt16 and SSRP1. In metazoans, the SSRP1 homolog contains an HMG domain; however in fungi and protists, it does not. For example, in S. cerevisiae the Pob3 protein is homologous to SSRP1, but lacks the HMG chromatin binding domain. Instead, the yFACT complex of Spt16p and Pob3p, binds to nucleosomes where multiple copies of the HMG-domain containing protein Nhp6p have already bound, but Nhp6p does not form a stable complex with the Spt16p/Pob3p heterodimer.
2	3	0	PRC1 complex	A multiprotein complex that mediates monoubiquitination of lysine residues of histone H2A (lysine-118 in Drosophila or lysine-119 in mammals). The complex is required for stable long-term maintenance of transcriptionally repressed states and is involved in chromatin remodeling.
2	1	0	limb morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a limb are generated and organized. A limb is a paired appendage of a tetrapod used for locomotion or grasping.
1	4	1	embryonic forelimb morphogenesis	The process, occurring in the embryo, by which the anatomical structures of the forelimb are generated and organized. The forelimbs are the front limbs of an animal, e.g. the arms of a human.
1	4	1	embryonic hindlimb morphogenesis	The process, occurring in the embryo, by which the anatomical structures of the hindlimbs are generated and organized. The hindlimbs are the posterior limbs of an animal.
0	0	1	post-embryonic forelimb morphogenesis	The process, occurring after embryonic development, by which the anatomical structures of the forelimb are generated and organized. The forelimbs are the front limbs of an organism.
1	1	1	forelimb morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the forelimb are generated and organized. The forelimbs are the front limbs of an animal, e.g. the arms of a human.
1	0	0	hindlimb morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the hindlimb are generated and organized.
4	5	1	exon-exon junction complex	A multi-subunit complex deposited by the spliceosome upstream of messenger RNA exon-exon junctions. The exon-exon junction complex provides a binding platform for factors involved in mRNA export and nonsense-mediated mRNA decay.
1	2	0	tube formation	Creation of the central hole of a tube in an anatomical structure through which gases and/or liquids flow.
4	0	2	embryonic hemopoiesis	The stages of blood cell formation that take place within the embryo.
0	1	0	post-embryonic hemopoiesis	The stages of blood cell formation that take place after completion of embryonic development.
0	0	2	histone kinase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group to a histone. Histones are any of a group of water-soluble proteins found in association with the DNA of eukaroytic chromosomes.
2	1	0	histone serine kinase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group to a serine residue of a histone. Histones are any of a group of water-soluble proteins found in association with the DNA of eukaroytic  chromosomes.
3	6	7	social behavior	Behavior directed towards society, or taking place between members of the same species. Occurs predominantly, or only, in individuals that are part of a group.
0	1	0	Rb-E2F complex	A multiprotein complex containing a heterodimeric E2F transcription factor and a Retinoblastoma (Rb) family member. This complex is capable of repressing transcription of E2F-regulated genes in order to regulate cell cycle progression.
0	5	1	post-transcriptional gene silencing by RNA	Any process of posttranscriptional gene inactivation (silencing) mediated by small RNA molecules that may trigger RNA (often mRNA) degradation or negatively regulate mRNA translation.
1	6	1	gene silencing by miRNA	Downregulation of gene expression through the action of microRNAs (miRNAs), endogenous 21-24 nucleotide small RNAs processed from stem-loop RNA precursors (pre-miRNAs). Once incorporated into a RNA-induced silencing complex (RISC), miRNAs can downregulate gene expression by either of two posttranscriptional mechanisms: endolytic cleavage of the RNA (often mRNA) or mRNA translational repression, usually accompanied by poly-A tail shortening and subsequent degradation of the mRNA.
3	1	5	production of miRNAs involved in gene silencing by miRNA	Cleavage of stem-loop RNA precursors into microRNAs (miRNAs), a class of small RNAs that primarily silence genes by blocking the translation of mRNA transcripts into protein, or by increasing the degradation of non-protein-coding RNA transcripts.
3	2	1	siRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a small interfering RNA, a 21-23 nucleotide RNA that is processed from double stranded RNA (dsRNA) by an RNAse enzyme.
4	3	11	miRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a microRNA, a 21-23 nucleotide RNA that is processed from a stem-loop RNA precursor (pre-miRNA) that is encoded within plant and animal genomes.
0	0	1	cell competition in a multicellular organism	Competitive interactions within multicellular organisms between cell populations that differ in growth rates, leading to the elimination of the slowest-growing cells.
1	2	0	ectopic germ cell programmed cell death	Programmed cell death of an errant germ line cell that is outside the normal migratory path or ectopic to the gonad. This is an important mechanism of regulating germ cell survival within the embryo.
2	2	0	ionotropic glutamate receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by glutamate binding to a glutamate receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by the movement of ions through a channel in the receptor complex. Ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	0	dopamine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with dopamine, a catecholamine neurotransmitter formed by aromatic-L-amino-acid decarboxylase from 3,4-dihydroxy-L-phenylalanine.
0	1	0	protein-arginine omega-N monomethyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the addition of a methyl group to either of the unmethylated terminal nitrogen atoms (also called omega nitrogen) in peptidyl-arginine to form an omega-N-G-monomethylated arginine residue.  The reaction is S-adenosyl-L-methionine + [protein]-L-arginine = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + [protein]-Nomega-methyl-L-arginine.
0	1	0	protein-arginine omega-N asymmetric methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the addition of a second methyl group to methylated peptidyl-arginine. Methylation is on the same terminal nitrogen (omega nitrogen) residue that was previously methylated, resulting in asymmetrical peptidyl-N(omega),N(omega)-dimethylated arginine residues.
1	0	0	protein-arginine omega-N symmetric methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the addition of a second methyl group to methylated peptidyl-arginine. Methylation is on the terminal nitrogen (omega nitrogen) residue that is not already methylated, resulting in symmetrical peptidyl-N(omega),N'(omega)-dimethyled arginine residues.
1	0	0	peptidyl-arginine N-methylation	The addition of a methyl group onto a nitrogen atom of an arginine residue in a protein.
6	2	1	synaptic transmission, glutamatergic	The vesicular release of glutamate from a presynapse, across a chemical synapse, the subsequent activation of glutamate receptors at the postsynapse of a target cell (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell) and the effects of this activation on the postsynaptic membrane potential and ionic composition of the postsynaptic cytosol. This process encompasses both spontaneous and evoked release of neurotransmitter and all parts of synaptic vesicle exocytosis. Evoked transmission starts with the arrival of an action potential at the presynapse.
0	1	0	UDP-galactosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a galactose group from UDP-galactose to an acceptor molecule.
1	4	1	ciliary rootlet	A cytoskeleton-like structure, originating from the basal body at the proximal end of a cilium, and extending proximally toward the cell nucleus. Rootlets are typically 80-100 nm in diameter and contain cross striae distributed at regular intervals of approximately 55-70 nm.
2	0	2	glutamate receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a glutamate receptor.
0	3	5	ionotropic glutamate receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an ionotropic glutamate receptor. Ionotropic glutamate receptors bind glutamate and exert an effect through the regulation of ion channels.
0	1	0	G protein-coupled glutamate receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a G protein-coupled glutamate receptor (a metabotropic glutamate receptor).
2	5	11	nuclear hormone receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a nuclear hormone receptor, a ligand-dependent receptor found in the nucleus of the cell.
2	0	3	glucocorticoid receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a glucocorticoid receptor.
0	0	1	external genitalia morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the external genitalia are generated and organized. The external genitalia are the outer sex organs, such as the penis or vulva in mammals.
12	14	11	multicellular organism growth	The increase in size or mass of an entire multicellular organism, as opposed to cell growth.
1	1	0	organ growth	The increase in size or mass of an organ. Organs are commonly observed as visibly distinct structures, but may also exist as loosely associated clusters of cells that function together as to perform a specific function.
3	7	4	NuA4 histone acetyltransferase complex	A complex having histone acetylase activity on chromatin, as well as ATPase, DNA helicase and structural DNA binding activities. The complex is thought to be involved in double-strand DNA break repair. Subunits of the human complex include HTATIP/TIP60, TRRAP, RUVBL1, BUVBL2, beta-actin and BAF53/ACTL6A. In yeast, the complex has 13 subunits, including the catalytic subunit Esa1 (homologous to human Tip60).
2	0	0	protein O-linked mannosylation	The transfer of mannose from dolichyl activated mannose to the hydroxyl group of a seryl or threonyl residue of a protein acceptor molecule, to form an O-linked protein-sugar linkage.
0	1	1	ethanol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ethanol, CH(3)-CH(2)-OH.
1	7	0	miRNA mediated inhibition of translation	The process in which microRNAs (miRNAs) block the translation of target mRNAs into proteins. Once incorporated into a RNA-induced silencing complex (RISC), a miRNA will typically mediate repression of translation if the miRNA imperfectly base-pairs with the 3' untranslated regions of target mRNAs.
0	1	1	mRNA cleavage involved in gene silencing by miRNA	The process in which microRNAs (miRNAs) direct the cleavage of target mRNAs. Once incorporated into a RNA-induced silencing complex (RISC), a miRNA base pairing with near-perfect complementarity to the target mRNA will typically direct targeted endonucleolytic cleavage of the mRNA. Many plant miRNAs downregulate gene expression through this mechanism.
2	1	1	miRNA loading onto RISC involved in gene silencing by miRNA	The transfer of a microRNA (miRNA) strand from a miRNA:miRNA duplex onto the RNA-initiated silencing complex (RISC).
0	1	0	pre-miRNA export from nucleus	Transport of pre-microRNAs (pre-miRNAs) from the nucleus to the cytoplasm. Pre-miRNAs are a ~60-70 nucleotide stem loop intermediate in miRNA production, produced by the nuclear cleavage of a primary miRNA (pri-mRNA) transcript. Pre-miRNAs are transported from the nucleus to the cytoplasm where further cleavage occurs to produce a mature miRNA product.
2	0	0	tube development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a tube over time, from its initial formation to a mature structure. Epithelial and endothelial tubes transport gases, liquids and cells from one site to another and form the basic structure of many organs and tissues including lung and trachea, kidney, the mammary gland, the vascular system and the gastrointestinal and urinary-genital tracts.
0	1	0	regulation of dephosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of removal of phosphate groups from a molecule.
0	1	0	positive regulation of dephosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of removal of phosphate groups from a molecule.
2	4	7	positive regulation of protein dephosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of removal of phosphate groups from a protein.
0	0	3	negative regulation of protein dephosphorylation	Any process the stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of removal of phosphate groups from a protein.
2	0	0	5'-3' exodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 5' terminus of a DNA molecule.
0	2	1	wound healing, spreading of epidermal cells	The migration of an epidermal cell along or through a wound gap that contributes to the reestablishment of a continuous epidermis.
0	0	1	hair cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a hair cell.
0	1	0	Toll-like receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a Toll-like protein, a pattern recognition receptor that binds pattern motifs from a variety of microbial sources to initiate an innate immune response.
6	5	3	transcriptionally active chromatin	The ordered and organized complex of DNA and protein that forms regions of the chromosome that are being actively transcribed.
6	5	7	hippo signaling	The series of molecular signals mediated by the serine/threonine kinase Hippo or one of its orthologs. In Drosophila, Hippo in complex with the scaffold protein Salvador (Sav), phosphorylates and activates Warts (Wts), which in turn phosphorylates and inactivates the Yorkie (Yki) transcriptional activator. The core fly components hippo, sav, wts and mats are conserved in mammals as STK4/3 (MST1/2), SAV1/WW45, LATS1/2 and MOB1.
1	1	0	regulation of hippo signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of hippo signaling.
1	9	1	negative regulation of hippo signaling	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hippo signaling.
0	1	0	positive regulation of hippo signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hippo signaling.
1	2	0	Notch receptor processing, ligand-dependent	The proteolytic cleavages to the Notch protein that occur as a result of ligand binding. Ligand binding at the cell surface exposes an otherwise inaccessible cleavage site in the extracellular portion of Notch, which when cleaved releases a membrane-tethered form of the Notch intracellular domain. Subsequent cleavage within the transmembrane domain then leads to the release of the soluble Notch intracellular domain (NICD).
7	4	6	peptidyl-tyrosine dephosphorylation	The removal of phosphoric residues from peptidyl-O-phospho-tyrosine to form peptidyl-tyrosine.
0	0	2	long-chain fatty-acyl-CoA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving long-chain fatty-acyl-CoAs, any derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is in a thioester linkage with a long-chain fatty-acyl group. Long-chain fatty-acyl-CoAs have chain lengths of C13 or more.
2	0	2	long-chain fatty-acyl-CoA biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a long-chain fatty-acyl-CoA any derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is in a thioester linkage with a long-chain fatty-acyl group. Long-chain fatty-acyl-CoAs have chain lengths of C13 or more.
1	0	0	SPOTS complex	A multiprotein complex at least composed of serine palmitoyltransferases and ORM proteins (known as ORMDL proteins in mammals and other higher vertebrates) that plays a key role in sphingolipid homeostasis.
1	0	0	heme transmembrane transport	The process in which heme, any compound of iron complexed in a porphyrin (tetrapyrrole) ring, is transported from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	cellular triglyceride homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of triglyceride within a cell or between a cell and its external environment.
1	0	2	peroxisome proliferator activated receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a ligand to any of the peroxisome proliferator activated receptors (alpha, beta or gamma) in the nuclear membrane, and ending with the initiation or termination of the transcription of target genes.
0	1	0	regulation of peroxisome proliferator activated receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the peroxisome proliferator activated receptor signaling pathway.
1	1	0	negative regulation of peroxisome proliferator activated receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the peroxisome proliferator activated receptor signaling pathway.
1	2	0	positive regulation of peroxisome proliferator activated receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the peroxisome proliferator activated receptor signaling pathway.
2	2	0	histone locus body	A nuclear body associated with the histone gene locus that is thought to contain all of the factors necessary for histone mRNA transcription and pre-mRNA processing. In Drosophila, U7 snRNP is located in the histone locus body rather than the distinct Cajal body.
1	1	1	selenocysteine insertion sequence binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the selenocysteine insertion sequence (SECIS), a regulatory sequence within mRNA which directs incorporation of a selenocysteine at a stop codon (UGA) during translation.
3	4	7	microtubule plus-end	The growing (plus) end of a microtubule. In vitro, microtubules polymerize more quickly at the plus end than at the minus end. In vivo, microtubule growth occurs only at the plus end, and the plus end switches between periods of growth and shortening, a behavior known as dynamic instability.
3	2	1	protein localization to microtubule	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, a microtubule.
1	0	0	chondroitin sulfate proteoglycan binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a chondroitin sulfate proteoglycan, any proteoglycan containing chondroitin sulfate as the glycosaminoglycan carbohydrate unit.
1	1	1	chondroitin sulfate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with chondroitin sulfate, a glycosaminoglycan made up of two alternating monosaccharides: D-glucuronic acid (GlcA) and N-acetyl-D-galactosamine (GalNAc).
1	0	0	transepithelial water transport	The directed movement of water (H2O) from one side of an epithelium to the other.
1	0	0	carbon dioxide transmembrane transport	The process in which carbon dioxide (CO2) is transported across a membrane.
1	0	0	carbon dioxide transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of carbon dioxide (CO2) from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	1	Roundabout signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a SLIT protein to a Roundabout (ROBO) family receptor on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	0	negative regulation of chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 9 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 9.
1	0	0	histone kinase activity (H3-Y41 specific)	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group to the tyrosine-41 residue of histone H3.
0	1	1	histone kinase activity (H3-T11 specific)	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group to the threonine-11 residue of the N-terminal tail of histone H3.
0	0	2	histone kinase activity (H3-T6 specific)	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group to the threonine-6 residue of the N-terminal tail of histone H3.
0	0	1	histone H3-T11 phosphorylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an phosphate group to a threonine residue at position 11 of the histone.
0	0	2	histone H3-T6 phosphorylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an phosphate group to a threonine residue at position 6 of the histone.
1	0	0	histone H3-Y41 phosphorylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of a phosphate group to a tyrosine residue at position 41 of the histone.
3	0	0	dihydrotestosterone 17-beta-dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5alpha-dihydrotestosterone + NAD+ = 5alpha-androstane-3,17-dione + NADH.
1	1	3	protein localization to synapse	Any process in which a protein is transported to, and/or maintained at the synapse, the junction between a nerve fiber of one neuron and another neuron or muscle fiber or glial cell.
0	2	0	autocrine signaling	Signaling between cells of the same type. The signal produced by the signaling cell binds to a receptor on, and affects a cell of the same type.
1	0	0	extracellular matrix-cell signaling	Any process that mediates the transfer of information between the extracellular matrix and a cell.
2	2	1	phosphate ion transmembrane transport	The process in which a phosphate is transported across a membrane.
0	1	2	maintenance of protein localization in endoplasmic reticulum	Any process in which a protein is maintained in the endoplasmic reticulum and prevented from moving elsewhere. These include sequestration within the endoplasmic reticulum, protein stabilization to prevent transport elsewhere and the active retrieval of proteins that escape the endoplasmic reticulum.
0	1	1	cell migration involved in vasculogenesis	The orderly movement of a cell from one site to another that will contribute to the differentiation of an endothelial cell that will form de novo blood vessels and tubes.
0	1	1	response to interferon-alpha	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interferon-alpha stimulus. Interferon-alpha is a type I interferon.
0	0	1	response to interferon-beta	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interferon-beta stimulus. Interferon-beta is a type I interferon.
2	1	1	cellular response to interferon-alpha	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interferon-alpha stimulus. Interferon-alpha is a type I interferon.
2	2	2	cellular response to interferon-beta	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interferon-beta stimulus. Interferon-beta is a type I interferon.
1	3	2	vesicle cargo loading	The formation of a macromolecular complex between the coat proteins and proteins and/or lipoproteins that are going to be transported by a vesicle.
1	0	0	determination of pancreatic left/right asymmetry	Determination of the asymmetric location of the pancreas with respect to the left and right halves of the organism.
0	1	0	positive regulation of vascular wound healing	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of blood vessel formation when new vessels emerge from the proliferation of pre-existing blood vessels and contribute to the series of events that restore integrity to damaged vasculature.
0	1	0	choriogonadotropin hormone receptor activity	Combining with the choriogonadotropin hormone to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	3	0	lipase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any lipase.
0	1	0	positive regulation of Notch signaling pathway involved in heart induction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the series of molecular signals initiated by binding of an extracellular ligand to a Notch receptor on the surface of the target cell that contributes to heart induction.
2	2	5	SNARE complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a SNARE complex, a protein complex involved in membrane fusion; a stable ternary complex consisting of a four-helix bundle, usually formed from one R-SNARE and three Q-SNAREs with an ionic layer sandwiched between hydrophobic layers.
1	0	1	SNARE complex disassembly	The disaggregation of the SNARE protein complex into its constituent components. The SNARE complex is a protein complex involved in membrane fusion; a stable ternary complex consisting of a four-helix bundle, usually formed from one R-SNARE and three Q-SNAREs with an ionic layer sandwiched between hydrophobic layers.
0	3	3	cAMP response element binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the cyclic AMP response element (CRE), a short palindrome-containing sequence found in the promoters of genes whose expression is regulated in response to cyclic AMP.
0	0	2	MH2 domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the MH2 (MAD homology 2) domain of a protein. The MH2 domain is found at the carboxy-terminus of MAD related proteins such as Smads. The MH2 domain mediates interaction with a wide variety of proteins and provides specificity and selectivity to Smad function and also is critical for mediating interactions in Smad oligomers.
0	0	1	MH1 domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the MH1 (MAD homology 1) domain of a protein. The MH1 domain is found at the amino terminus of MAD related proteins such as Smads and can mediate DNA binding in some proteins. Smads also use the MH1 domain to interact with some transcription factors.
0	1	0	metanephric part of ureteric bud development	The development of the portion of the ureteric bud tube that contributes to the morphogenesis of the metanephros.
1	1	0	positive regulation of myosin light chain kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of myosin light chain kinase activity.
0	0	2	regulation of myosin-light-chain-phosphatase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of myosin-light-chain-phosphatase activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of myosin-light-chain-phosphatase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of myosin-light-chain-phosphatase activity.
0	2	1	negative regulation of myosin-light-chain-phosphatase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of myosin-light-chain-phosphatase activity.
0	0	1	oxidative RNA demethylase activity	Catalysis of the removal of a methyl group from one or more nucleosides within a RNA molecule involving the oxidation (i.e. electron loss) of one or more atoms.
1	1	1	PR-DUB complex	A multimeric protein complex that removes monoubiquitin from histone H2A. In Drosophila and mammals, the core of the complex is composed of Calypso/BAP1 and Asx/ASXL1, respectively.
3	4	0	histone H2A monoubiquitination	The modification of histone H2A by addition of a single ubiquitin group.
1	0	0	protein K29-linked ubiquitination	A protein ubiquitination process in which a polymer of ubiquitin, formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 29 of the ubiquitin monomers, is added to a protein. K29-linked ubiquitination targets the substrate protein for degradation.
0	3	2	monoubiquitinated protein deubiquitination	The removal of the ubiquitin group from a monoubiquitinated protein.
2	0	2	monoubiquitinated histone H2A deubiquitination	The removal of the ubiquitin group from a monoubiquitinated histone H2A protein.
0	1	0	protein K29-linked deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a K29-linked ubiquitin chain, i.e. a polymer of ubiquitin formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 29 of the ubiquitin monomers, is removed from a protein.
0	0	1	proline transmembrane transport	The directed movement of proline, pyrrolidine-2-carboxylic acid, across a membrane by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0		
1	1	1	NADH pyrophosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADH + H2O = AMP + NMNH + 2 H+.
0	0	2	regulation of SNARE complex assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of assembly of the SNARE complex. The SNARE complex is a protein complex involved in membrane fusion; a stable ternary complex consisting of a four-helix bundle, usually formed from one R-SNARE and three Q-SNAREs with an ionic layer sandwiched between hydrophobic layers.
1	0	1	negative regulation of SNARE complex assembly	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of assembly of the SNARE complex. The SNARE complex is a protein complex involved in membrane fusion; a stable ternary complex consisting of a four-helix bundle, usually formed from one R-SNARE and three Q-SNAREs with an ionic layer sandwiched between hydrophobic layers.
0	0	1	oxidative single-stranded RNA demethylation	Removal of the methyl group from one or more nucleotides within a single-stranded RNA molecule involving the oxidation (i.e. electron loss) of one or more atoms.
54	77	69	intracellular signal transduction	The process in which a signal is passed on to downstream components within the cell, which become activated themselves to further propagate the signal and finally trigger a change in the function or state of the cell.
1	1	2	negative regulation of chromatin binding	Any process that stops or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin binding. Chromatin binding is the selective interaction with chromatin, the network of fibers of DNA, protein, and sometimes RNA, that make up the chromosomes of the eukaryotic nucleus during interphase.
3	2	2	positive regulation of chromatin binding	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin binding. Chromatin binding is the selective interaction with chromatin, the network of fibers of DNA, protein, and sometimes RNA, that make up the chromosomes of the eukaryotic nucleus during interphase.
1	0	1	regulation of kidney size	Any process that modulates the size of a kidney.
1	0	0	regulation of pronephros size	Any process that modulates the size of a pronephric kidney.
2	0	0	non-canonical Wnt signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via effectors other than beta-catenin.
0	1	0	histone H4-K20 demethylation	The modification of histone H4 by the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 20 of the histone.
0	1	0	histone demethylase activity (H4-K20 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: histone H4 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 20) + 2-oxoglutarate + O2 = histone H4 L-lysine (position 20) + succinate + formaldehyde + CO2. This reaction is the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 20 of the histone H4 protein.
10	15	3	azurophil granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding an azurophil granule, a primary lysosomal granule found in neutrophil granulocytes that contains a wide range of hydrolytic enzymes and is released into the extracellular fluid.
12	17	19	azurophil granule lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of an azurophil granule, a primary lysosomal granule found in neutrophil granulocytes that contains a wide range of hydrolytic enzymes and is released into the extracellular fluid.
16	12	7	specific granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a specific granule, a granule with a membranous, tubular internal structure, found primarily in mature neutrophil cells. Most are released into the extracellular fluid. Specific granules contain lactoferrin, lysozyme, vitamin B12 binding protein and elastase.
9	14	11	specific granule lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of a specific granule, a granule with a membranous, tubular internal structure, found primarily in mature neutrophil cells. Most are released into the extracellular fluid. Specific granules contain lactoferrin, lysozyme, vitamin B12 binding protein and elastase.
0	1	0	sequestering of BMP in extracellular matrix	Confining a bone morphogenetic protein (BMP) to the extracellular matrix (ECM), such that it is separated from other components of the signaling pathway, including its cell surface receptor. Bone morphogenetic proteins (BMPs) are secreted as homodimers, non-covalently associated with N-terminal pro-peptides, and are targeted to the extracellular matrix through interaction with matrix proteins.
0	2	1	sequestering of TGFbeta in extracellular matrix	Confining TGFbeta to the extracellular matrix (ECM) such that it is separated from other components of the signaling pathway, including its cell surface receptor. TGFbeta is secreted as part of a latent complex that is targeted to the extracellular matrix through latent-TGFbeta-binding protein (LTBP)-mediated association with matrix proteins.
3	0	5	calcium-mediated signaling using intracellular calcium source	A series of molecular signals in which a cell uses calcium ions released from an intracellular store to convert a signal into a response.
0	0	1	calcium-mediated signaling using extracellular calcium source	A series of molecular signals in which a cell uses calcium ions imported from an extracellular source to convert a signal into a response.
5	1	2	purinergic nucleotide receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a receptor binding to an extracellular purine nucleotide to initiate a change in cell activity.
2	6	8	signaling adaptor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that brings together two or more molecules in a signaling pathway, permitting those molecules to function in a coordinated way. Adaptor molecules themselves do not have catalytic activity.
0	0	1	peptidyl-cysteine S-nitrosylase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a nitric oxide (NO) group to a sulphur atom within a cysteine residue of a protein.
0	1	1	peptidyl-cysteine S-trans-nitrosylation	Transfer of a nitric oxide (NO) group from one cysteine residue to another.
0	1	0	protein deglutamylation	The removal of a glutamate residue from a protein. Glutamate residues in proteins can be gene-encoded, or added as side chains during the protein modification process of polyglutamylation.
0	1	0	C-terminal protein deglutamylation	The removal of a C-terminal, gene-encoded glutamate residue from a protein.
0	1	0	protein side chain deglutamylation	The removal of a glutamate residue from the side chain of a protein. Glutamate side chains are added to glutamic acid residues within the primary protein sequence during polyglutamylation.
3	3	2	AP-2 adaptor complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the AP-2 adaptor complex. The AP-2 adaptor complex is a heterotetrameric AP-type membrane coat adaptor complex that consists of alpha, beta2, mu2 and sigma2 subunits and links clathrin to the membrane surface of a vesicle. In at least humans, the AP-2 complex can be heterogeneric due to the existence of multiple subunit isoforms encoded by different alpha genes (alphaA and alphaC).
4	4	2	RNA stem-loop binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a stem-loop in an RNA molecule. An RNA stem-loop is a secondary RNA structure consisting of a double-stranded RNA (dsRNA) stem and a terminal loop.
1	3	3	clathrin adaptor activity	Bringing together a cargo protein with clathrin, responsible for the formation of endocytic vesicles.
0	1	1	histone H2B conserved C-terminal lysine deubiquitination	A histone deubiquitination process in which a ubiquitin monomer is removed from a conserved lysine residue in the C-terminus of histone H2B. The conserved lysine residue is K119 in fission yeast, K123 in budding yeast, or K120 in mammals.
1	1	2	stress granule disassembly	The disaggregation of a stress granule into its constituent protein and RNA parts.
0	0	2	ER to Golgi ceramide transport	The directed movement of a ceramide from the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) to the Golgi. Ceramides are a class of lipid composed of sphingosine linked to a fatty acid.
1	1	0	intrahepatic bile duct development	The progression of the intrahepatic bile ducts over time, from their formation to the mature structure. Intrahepatic bile ducts (bile ducts within the liver) collect bile from bile canaliculi in the liver, and connect to the extrahepatic bile ducts (bile ducts outside the liver).
1	0	0	renal glucose absorption	A renal system process in which glucose is taken up from the collecting ducts and proximal and distal loops of the nephron. In non-mammalian species, absorption may occur in related structures.
1	1	1	receptor transactivation	The process in which a receptor is activated by another receptor. Receptor transactivation can occur through different mechanisms and includes cross-talk between signaling pathways where one receptor activates a receptor for a different ligand, and also activation of subunits within a receptor oligomer.
0	1	1	ceramide transport	The directed movement of ceramides into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Ceramides are a class of lipid composed of sphingosine linked to a fatty acid.
3	1	0	CD40 receptor complex	A protein complex that contains at least CD40 (a cell surface receptor of the tumour necrosis factor receptor (TNFR) superfamily), and other signaling molecules.
2	0	0	mitochondrial prohibitin complex	A complex composed of two proteins, prohibitin 1 and prohibitin 2 (PHB1/PHB-1 and PHB2/PHB-2) that is highly conserved amongst eukaryotes and associated with the inner mitochondrial membrane. The mitochondrial prohibitin complex is a macromolecular supercomplex composed of repeating heterodimeric subunits of PHB1 and PHB2. The mitochondrial prohibitin complex plays a role in a number of biological processes, including mitochondrial biogenesis and function, development, replicative senescence, and cell death.
3	9	9	maintenance of blood-brain barrier	Maintaining the structure and function of the blood-brain barrier, thus ensuring specific regulated transport of substances (e.g. macromolecules, small molecules, ions) into the brain, and out of the brain into the blood circulation.
2	3	2	entry of bacterium into host cell	The process in which a bacterium enters a host cell. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
1	0	0	purine ribonucleoside triphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a purine ribonucleoside triphosphate, a compound consisting of a purine base linked to a ribose sugar esterified with triphosphate on the sugar.
0	3	1	exploration behavior	The specific behavior of an organism in response to a novel environment or stimulus.
1	0	6	locomotory exploration behavior	The specific movement from place to place of an organism in response to a novel environment.
1	0	0	L-DOPA receptor activity	Combining with L-DOPA to initiate a change in cell activity. L-DOPA is the modified amino acid (2S)-2-amino-3-(3,4-dihydroxyphenyl) propanoic acid, and is the precursor to dopamine, norepinephrine (noradrenaline) and epinephrine.
1	0	0	phosphoanandamide dephosphorylation	The process of removing one or more phosphate groups from a phosphorylated anandamide.
1	0	0	enteric smooth muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a smooth muscle cell of the intestine.
1	0	2	endosome to melanosome transport	The directed movement of substances from endosomes to the melanosome, a specialised lysosome-related organelle.
1	2	0	AP-1 adaptor complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the AP-1 adaptor complex. The AP-1 adaptor complex is a heterotetrameric AP-type membrane coat adaptor complex that consists of beta1, gamma, mu1 and sigma1 subunits and links clathrin to the membrane surface of a vesicle. In at least humans, the AP-1 complex can be heterogeneric due to the existence of multiple subunit isoforms encoded by different genes (gamma1 and gamma2, mu1A and mu1B, and sigma1A, sigma1B and sigma1C).
0	0	1	AP-3 adaptor complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the AP-3 adaptor complex. The AP-3 adaptor complex is a heterotetrameric AP-type membrane coat adaptor complex that consists of beta3, delta, mu3 and sigma3 subunits and is found associated with endosomal membranes. In at least humans, the AP-3 complex can be heterogeneric due to the existence of multiple subunit isoforms encoded by different genes (beta3A and beta3B, mu3A and mu3B, and sigma3A and sigma3B).
0	0	1	interleukin-18-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-18 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	0	Mon1-Ccz1 complex	A protein complex that functions as a guanine nucleotide exchange factor (GEF) and converts Rab-GDP to Rab-GTP. In S. cerevisiae, this complex consists of at least Mon1 and Ccz1, and serves as a GEF for the Rab Ypt7p.
0	2	0	Toll-like receptor 4 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a Toll-like 4 protein, a pattern recognition receptor that binds bacterial lipopolysaccharide (LPS) to initiate an innate immune response.
3	6	4	TRIF-dependent toll-like receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to a toll-like receptor where the TRIF adaptor mediates transduction of the signal. Toll-like receptors directly bind pattern motifs from a variety of microbial sources to initiate innate immune response.
0	1	1	TRAM-dependent toll-like receptor 4 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to a toll-like receptor 4 where the TRAM adaptor mediates transduction of the signal. Toll-like 4 receptors are pattern recognition receptors that bind bacterial lipopolysaccharide (LPS) to initiate an innate immune response.
0	1	0	memory T cell extravasation	The migration of a memory T cell from the blood vessels into the surrounding tissue. A memory T cell is a distinctly differentiated long-lived T cell that has the phenotype CD45RO-positive and CD127-positive.
0	1	1	helper T cell diapedesis	The passage of a helper T cell between the tight junctions of endothelial cells lining blood vessels, typically the fourth and final step of cellular extravasation.
3	1	0	sperm fibrous sheath	A cytoskeletal structure surrounding the axoneme and outer dense fibers of the sperm flagellum. Consists of two longitudinal columns connected by closely arrayed semicircular ribs that assemble from distal to proximal throughout spermiogenesis. The fibrous sheath probably influences the degree of flexibility, plane of flagellar motion, and the shape of the flagellar beat.
15	13	7	cellular response to drug	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a drug stimulus. A drug is a substance used in the diagnosis, treatment or prevention of a disease.
0	0	1	macrophage migration inhibitory factor receptor complex	A protein complex that binds macrophage migration inhibitory factor. Comprises CD74 and CD44 cell surface proteins.
0	0	2	mitochondrial protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a mitochondrial protein. This process is necessary to maintain the healthy state of mitochondria and is thought to occur via the induction of an intramitochondrial lysosome-like organelle that acts to eliminate the damaged oxidised mitochondrial proteins without destroying the mitochondrial structure.
1	0	1	monocyte extravasation	The migration of a monocyte from the blood vessels into the surrounding tissue.
1	1	0	hematopoietic stem cell migration	The orderly movement of a hematopoietic stem cell from one site to another. A hematopoietic stem cell is a cell from which all cells of the lymphoid and myeloid lineages develop, including blood cells and cells of the immune system.
1	0	0	monocyte homeostasis	The process of regulating the proliferation and elimination of monocytes such that the total number of monocytes within a whole or part of an organism is stable over time in the absence of an outside stimulus.
0	0	1	CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell resulting from exposure to a mitogen, cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or an antigen for which it is specific.
0	0	1	T-helper 1 cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a T-helper 1 cell resulting from exposure to a mitogen, cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or an antigen for which it is specific.
0	1	0	chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 7 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 7.
1	0	0	intraciliary anterograde transport	The directed movement of large protein complexes along microtubules from the cell body toward the tip of a cilium (also called flagellum), mediated by motor proteins.
3	0	1	intraciliary retrograde transport	The directed movement of large protein complexes along microtubules from the tip of a cilium (also called flagellum) toward the cell body, mediated by motor proteins.
8	11	14	interleukin-12-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-12 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
4	1	1	interleukin-15-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-15 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
4	2	8	sodium ion transmembrane transport	A process in which a sodium ion is transported from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	3	0	common myeloid progenitor cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of common myeloid progenitor cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population. A common myeloid progenitor cell is a progenitor cell committed to the myeloid lineage.
2	2	1	lysophosphatidic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with lysophosphatidic acid (LPA), a phospholipid derivative that acts as a potent mitogen due to its activation of high-affinity G protein-coupled receptors.
0	1	1	response to hepatocyte growth factor	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hepatocyte growth factor stimulus.
0	4	3	cellular response to hepatocyte growth factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hepatocyte growth factor stimulus.
0	1	0	S-nitrosoglutathione binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with S-nitrosoglutathione, a nitrosothiol considered to be a natural nitric oxide (NO) donor involved in S-nitrosylation, and in the storage and transport of nitric oxide in biological systems.
0	1	0	dinitrosyl-iron complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a dinitrosyl-iron complex. Nitric oxide (NO) is stored as dinitrosyl-iron complexes, which form spontaneously from Glutathione (GSH), S-nitrosoglutathione, and trace amounts of ferrous ions, or by reaction of iron-sulfur centers with NO.
0	1	0	nitric oxide storage	The accumulation and maintenance in cells or tissues of nitric oxide (NO). Nitric oxide is stored in the form of dinitrosyl-iron complexes, which are stabilized, and possibly sequestered, by binding to glutathione S-transferase proteins.
0	0	1	hepatic stellate cell activation	A change in the morphology or behavior of a hepatic stellate cell resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, hormone, cellular ligand or soluble factor.
4	4	4	intraciliary transport involved in cilium assembly	The bidirectional movement of large protein complexes along microtubules within a cilium that contributes to cilium assembly.
1	0	3	myelin sheath abaxonal region	The region of the myelin sheath furthest from the axon.
0	1	2	myelin sheath adaxonal region	The region of the myelin sheath nearest to the axon.
0	0	1	regulation of lysosomal lumen pH	Any process that modulates the pH of the lysosomal lumen, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
1	0	0	lysosomal lumen pH elevation	Any process that increases the pH of the lysosomal lumen, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
1	0	1	endothelial cell chemotaxis	The directed movement of an endothelial cell guided by a specific chemical concentration gradient. Movement may be towards a higher concentration (positive chemotaxis) or towards a lower concentration (negative chemotaxis).
2	1	1	ribonucleoprotein granule	A non-membranous macromolecular complex containing proteins and translationally silenced mRNAs. RNA granules contain proteins that control the localization, stability, and translation of their RNA cargo. Different types of RNA granules (RGs) exist, depending on the cell type and cellular conditions.
1	0	0	interleukin-4-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-4 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	2	3	insulin secretion involved in cellular response to glucose stimulus	The regulated release of proinsulin from secretory granules (B granules) in the B cells of the pancreas; accompanied by cleavage of proinsulin to form mature insulin, in response to a glucose stimulus.
2	4	7	positive regulation of insulin secretion involved in cellular response to glucose stimulus	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of insulin that contributes to the response of a cell to glucose.
0	1	0	CD86 biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of CD86, a CD marker that occurs on antigen presenting cells that provides co-stimulatory signals necessary for T cell activation and survival.
0	1	0	CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell costimulation	The process of providing, via surface-bound receptor-ligand pairs, a second, antigen-independent, signal in addition to that provided by the T cell receptor to augment CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation.
0	2	1	platelet-derived growth factor receptor-beta signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a ligand to a beta-type platelet-derived growth factor receptor (PDGFbeta) on the surface of a signal-receiving cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	1	positive regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the passage or uptake of molecules by the mitochondrial membrane.
0	1	0	2-alkenal reductase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: n-alkanal + NADP+ = alk-2-enal + NADPH + H+.
0	1	1	deubiquitinase activator activity	Increases the activity of deubiquitinase, an enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis of various forms of polymeric ubiquitin sequences.
1	1	0	regulation of urine volume	Any process that modulates the amount of urine excreted from the body over a unit of time.
1	0	1	positive regulation of urine volume	Any process that increases the amount of urine excreted from the body over a unit of time.
0	2	1	negative regulation of urine volume	Any process that decreases the amount of urine excreted from the body over a unit of time.
1	1	0	renal sodium excretion	The elimination by an organism of sodium in the urine.
0	1	0	regulation of renal sodium excretion	Any process that modulates the amount of sodium excreted in urine over a unit of time.
1	0	1	positive regulation of renal sodium excretion	Any process that increases the amount of sodium excreted in urine over a unit of time.
0	1	0	modulation of process of other organism	The process in which an organism effects a change in the structure or processes of another organism.
0	0	1	gene conversion	A DNA recombination process that results in the unidirectional transfer of genetic material from a donor sequence to a highly homologous acceptor. The resulting acceptor sequence is identical to that of the donor.
0	0	1	growing cell tip	The region at either end of the longest axis of a cylindrical or elongated cell, where polarized growth occurs.
1	1	0	photoreceptor cell outer segment organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level and results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the outer segment of a photoreceptor cell, a sensory cell that reacts to the presence of light. The outer segment of the photoreceptor cell contains the light-absorbing materials.
0	0	1	oviduct epithelium development	The progression of the oviduct epithelium over time from its initial formation to the mature structure. An oviduct is a tube through which an ova passes from the ovary to the uterus, or from the ovary to the outside of the organism. The oviduct epithelium is the specialized epithelium that lines the oviduct.
0	0	2	Krueppel-associated box domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a Krueppel-associated box (KRAB) domain of a protein. The approximately 75 amino acid KRAB domain is enriched in charged amino acids, and is found in the N-terminal regions of many zinc finger-containing transcription factors.
1	0	0	eosinophil fate commitment	The process in which the developmental fate of a cell becomes restricted such that it will develop into a eosinophil cell. A eosinophil is any of the immature or mature forms of a granular leukocyte with a nucleus that usually has two lobes connected by one or more slender threads of chromatin, and cytoplasm containing coarse, round granules that are uniform in size and which can be stained by the dye eosin.
4	3	3	megakaryocyte development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a megakaryocyte cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Megakaryocyte development does not include the steps involved in committing a cell to a megakaryocyte fate. A megakaryocyte is a giant cell 50 to 100 micron in diameter, with a greatly lobulated nucleus, found in the bone marrow.
12	22	8	site of double-strand break	A region of a chromosome at which a DNA double-strand break has occurred. DNA damage signaling and repair proteins accumulate at the lesion to respond to the damage and repair the DNA to form a continuous DNA helix.
2	0	4	cellular response to potassium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a potassium ion stimulus.
1	1	1	alphav-beta3 integrin-PKCalpha complex	A protein complex that consists of an alphav-beta3 integrin complex bound to protein kinase C alpha.
2	1	0	alphav-beta3 integrin-IGF-1-IGF1R complex	A protein complex that consists of an alphav-beta3 integrin complex bound to insulin-like growth factor-1 (IGF-1) and type I insulin-like growth factor receptor (IGF1R). IGF1R is a heterotetramer that consists of two alpha-subunits and two beta-subunits.
1	1	1	alphav-beta3 integrin-HMGB1 complex	A protein complex that consists of an alphav-beta3 integrin complex bound to high mobility group box 1 protein.
3	3	2	ciliary transition zone	A region of the cilium between the basal body and proximal segment that is characterized by Y-shaped assemblages that connect axonemal microtubules to the ciliary membrane. The ciliary transition zone appears to function as a gate that controls ciliary membrane composition and separates the cytosol from the ciliary plasm.
0	1	0	dITP diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dITP + H2O = dIMP + diphosphate.
1	3	1	protein K11-linked deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a K11-linked ubiquitin chain, i.e. a polymer of ubiquitin formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 11 of the ubiquitin monomers, is removed from a protein.
1	0	0	nucleotide-binding domain, leucine rich repeat containing receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a nucleotide-binding domain, leucine rich repeat containing receptor (NLR) binding to one of its physiological ligands. NLRs are cytoplasmic receptors defined by their tripartite domain architecture that contains: a variable C-terminus, a middle nucleotide-binding domain, and a LRR domain that is variable in the repeats composition and number. The NLR signaling pathway begins with binding of a ligand to a NLR receptor and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process.
1	0	0	lactate transmembrane transport	The process in which lactate is transported across a membrane. Lactate is 2-hydroxypropanoate, CH3-CHOH-COOH; L(+)-lactate is formed by anaerobic glycolysis in animal tissues, and DL-lactate is found in sour milk, molasses and certain fruit juices.
1	1	0	death effector domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DED domain (death effector domain) of a protein, a homotypic protein interaction module composed of a bundle of six alpha-helices that is related in structure to the death domain (DD).
1	1	1	nail development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a nail over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A nail is a horn-like envelope covering the outer end of a finger or toe, and consists of the nail plate, the nail matrix and the nail bed below it, and the grooves surrounding it.
1	0	1	plasma membrane lactate transport	The directed movement of lactate across a plasma membrane.
1	0	0	embryonic nail plate morphogenesis	The process, occurring in the embryo, by which the anatomical structures of a nail plate are generated and organized. The nail plate is the hard and translucent portion of the nail, composed of keratin, and serves to protect the tips of digits.
1	0	1	vascular associated smooth muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a vascular smooth muscle cell.
0	2	1	response to isolation stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lack of contact with other members of the same species.
2	6	1	response to immobilization stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of being rendered immobile.
1	2	4	aorta development	The progression of the aorta over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure. An aorta is an artery that carries blood from the heart to other parts of the body.
0	1	0	dorsal aorta development	The progression of the dorsal aorta over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure. The dorsal aorta is a blood vessel in a single-pass circulatory system that carries oxygenated blood from the gills to the rest of the body. In a single-pass circulatory system blood passes once through the heart to supply the body once.
2	2	0	aorta morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of an aorta are generated and organized. An aorta is an artery that carries blood from the heart to other parts of the body.
2	0	0	ascending aorta morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the ascending aorta are generated and organized. The ascending aorta is the portion of the aorta in a two-pass circulatory system that lies between the heart and the arch of aorta. In a two-pass circulatory system blood passes twice through the heart to supply the body once.
1	0	1	dorsal aorta morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the dorsal aorta are generated and organized. The dorsal aorta is a blood vessel in a single-pass circulatory system that carries oxygenated blood from the gills to the rest of the body. In a single-pass circulatory system blood passes once through the heart to supply the body once.
3	4	3	skeletal muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a skeletal muscle cell, a somatic cell located in skeletal muscle.
0	0	1	pore formation in membrane of other organism	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components by an organism to form a pore complex in a membrane of another organism.
1	3	5	cellular response to vascular endothelial growth factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vascular endothelial growth factor stimulus.
5	5	4	mRNA 3'-UTR AU-rich region binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a region containing frequent adenine and uridine bases within the 3' untranslated region of a mRNA molecule.
0	1	0	rRNA import into mitochondrion	The process in which a rRNA, ribosomal ribonucleic acid, transported from the cytosol, into the mitochondrial matrix.
0	1	0	mitochondrial ncRNA surveillance	The set of processes involved in identifying and degrading defective or aberrant non-coding RNA transcripts (ncRNAs) within the mitochondrion.
0	1	0	mitochondrial mRNA surveillance	The set of processes involved in identifying and degrading messenger RNA (mRNA) within the mitochondrion.
1	0	0	COPI-coated vesicle budding	The evagination of a Golgi membrane, resulting in formation of a COPI-coated vesicle.
0	1	2	cardiolipin acyl-chain remodeling	Remodeling the acyl chains of premature (de novo synthesized) cardiolipin (1,3-bis(3-phosphatidyl)glycerol), through sequential deacylation and re-acylation reactions, to generate mature cardiolipin containing high-levels of unsaturated fatty acids.
0	1	0	cellular response to topologically incorrect protein	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a protein that is not folded in its correct three-dimensional structure.
5	0	4	peptidyl-threonine dephosphorylation	The removal of phosphoric residues from peptidyl-O-phospho-L-threonine to form peptidyl-threonine.
0	1	0	peptidyl-histidine dephosphorylation	The removal of phosphoric residues from peptidyl-O-phospho-L-histidine to form peptidyl-histidine.
0	3	14	aggrephagy	Selective degradation of protein aggregates by macroautophagy.
0	1	1	transcription factor AP-1 complex	A heterodimeric transcription factor complex composed of proteins from the c-Fos, c-Jun, activating transcription factor (ATF) or JDP families. The subunits contain a basic leucine zipper (bZIP) domain that is essential for dimerization and DNA binding. Jun-Fos heterodimers bind preferentially to a heptamer consensus sequence (TPA responsive element (TRE)), whereas Jun-ATF dimers bind the cyclic AMP responsive element (CRE) to regulate transcription of target genes.
0	0	1	histone H2A-S139 phosphorylation	The modification of histone H2A by the addition of an phosphate group to a serine residue at position 139 of the histone.
0	2	1	cellular response to trichostatin A	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a trichostatin A stimulus.
0	0	3	senescence-associated heterochromatin focus	A transcriptionally-silent heterochromatin structure present in senescent cells. Contains the condensed chromatin of one chromosome and is enriched for histone modifications. Thought to repress expression of proliferation-promoting genes.
0	0	2	senescence-associated heterochromatin focus assembly	The assembly of chromatin into senescence-associated heterochromatin foci (SAHF), transcriptionally-silent heterochromatin structures present in senescent cells, containing the condensed chromatin of one chromosome, and enriched for histone modifications. Formation of these chromatin structures is thought to repress expression of proliferation-promoting genes.
5	5	5	endodermal cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of an endoderm cell, a cell of the inner of the three germ layers of the embryo.
1	1	1	chondrocyte proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of chondrocytes by cell division, resulting in the expansion of their population. A chondrocyte is a polymorphic cell that forms cartilage.
0	1	6	response to muscle stretch	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a myofibril being extended beyond its slack length.
1	1	2	detection of muscle stretch	The series of events by which a muscle stretch stimulus is received by a cell and converted into a molecular signal.
0	2	1	tetrahydrofolate interconversion	The chemical reactions and pathways by which one-carbon (C1) units are transferred between tetrahydrofolate molecules, to synthesise other tetrahydrofolate molecules.
1	0	6	pre-mRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with pre-messenger RNA (pre-mRNA), an intermediate molecule between DNA and protein that may contain introns and, at least in part, encodes one or more proteins. Introns are removed from pre-mRNA to form a mRNA molecule.
3	2	0	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to stress	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress. The stress is usually, but not necessarily, exogenous (e.g. temperature, humidity, ionizing radiation).
1	0	0	GAF domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the GAF domain of a protein.
1	0	1	cellular response to macrophage colony-stimulating factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a macrophage colony-stimulating factor stimulus.
1	0	6	protein localization to endosome	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within an endosome.
2	0	2	cellular response to interleukin-3	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-3 stimulus.
0	0	1	endolysosome	An transient hybrid organelle formed by fusion of a late endosome with a lysosome, and in which active degradation takes place.
2	1	2	endolysosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding an endolysosome. An endolysosome is a transient hybrid organelle formed by fusion of a late endosome with a lysosome.
2	0	1	endolysosome lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of an endolysosome. An endolysosome is a transient hybrid organelle formed by fusion of a late endosome with a lysosome.
0	0	1	embryonic skeletal limb joint morphogenesis	The process, occurring in the embryo, in which the anatomical structures of a skeletal limb joint are generated and organized. A skeletal limb joint is the connecting structure between the bones of a limb.
0	1	0	recruitment of mRNA capping enzyme to RNA polymerase II holoenzyme complex	The process in which the guanylyltransferase enzyme responsible for adding a 7-methylguanosine cap on pre-mRNA becomes associated with the RNA polymerase II holoenzyme complex and the 5' end of a transcript.
1	1	2	mediator complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a mediator complex. The mediator complex is a protein complex that interacts with the carboxy-terminal domain of the largest subunit of RNA polymerase II and plays an active role in transducing the signal from a transcription factor to the transcriptional machinery. The Saccharomyces complex contains several identifiable subcomplexes: a head domain comprising Srb2, -4, and -5, Med6, -8, and -11, and Rox3 proteins; a middle domain comprising Med1, -4, and -7, Nut1 and -2, Cse2, Rgr1, Soh1, and Srb7 proteins; a tail consisting of Gal11p, Med2p, Pgd1p, and Sin4p; and a regulatory subcomplex comprising Ssn2, -3, and -8, and Srb8 proteins. Metazoan mediator complexes have similar modular structures and include homologs of yeast Srb and Med proteins.
1	1	1	osteoclast development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a osteoclast from its formation to the mature structure. Cell development does not include the steps involved in committing a cell to a specific fate. An osteoclast is a specialized phagocytic cell associated with the absorption and removal of the mineralized matrix of bone tissue.
1	0	1	CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell resulting from exposure to a mitogen, cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or an antigen for which it is specific.
1	0	0	MKS complex	A protein complex that is located at the ciliary transition zone and consists of several proteins some of which are membrane bound. Acts as an organiser of transition zone inner structure, specifically the Y-shaped links, in conjunction with the NPHP complex. The MKS complex also acts as part of the selective barrier that prevents diffusion of proteins between the ciliary cytoplasm and cellular cytoplasm as well as between the ciliary membrane and plasma membrane.
2	0	0	long-chain fatty acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a long-chain fatty acid. A long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
1	0	0	long-chain fatty acyl-CoA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a long-chain fatty acyl-CoA, any derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is in a thioester linkage with a long-chain fatty-acyl group. Long-chain fatty-acyl-CoAs have chain lengths of C13 or more.
1	1	2	slit diaphragm	A specialized cell-cell junction found between the interdigitating foot processes of the glomerular epithelium (the podocytes) in the vertebrate kidney, which is adapted for facilitating glomerular filtration.
19	20	12	ciliary basal body	A membrane-tethered, short cylindrical array of microtubules and associated proteins found at the base of a eukaryotic cilium (also called flagellum) that is similar in structure to a centriole and derives from it. The cilium basal body is the site of assembly and remodelling of the cilium and serves as a nucleation site for axoneme growth. As well as anchoring the cilium, it is thought to provide a selective gateway regulating the entry of ciliary proteins and vesicles by intraflagellar transport.
0	0	1	protein O-linked fucosylation	The process of transferring a fucosyl group to a serine or threonine residues in a protein acceptor molecule, to form an O-linked protein-sugar linkage.
1	1	0	cleavage furrow formation	Generation of the cleavage furrow, a shallow groove in the cell surface near the old metaphase plate that marks the site of cytokinesis. This process includes the recruitment and localized activation of signals such as RhoA at the site of the future furrow to ensure that furrowing initiates at the correct site in the cell.
2	0	0	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to oxidative stress	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under oxidative stress, a state often resulting from exposure to high levels of reactive oxygen species, e.g. superoxide anions, hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), and hydroxyl radicals.
1	1	2	phosphatidylinositol-3-phosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phosphatidylinositol-3-phosphate, a phosphatidylinositol monophosphate carrying the phosphate group at the 3-position.
2	1	0	small molecule binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a small molecule, any low molecular weight, monomeric, non-encoded molecule.
0	1	0	leukotriene B4 metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving leukotriene B4, a leukotriene composed of (6Z,8E,10E,14Z)-eicosatetraenoic acid having (5S)- and (12R)-hydroxy substituents.
0	0	1	peroxisome membrane class-1 targeting sequence binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a class I peroxisomal membrane targeting sequence, any of several sequences of amino acids within a protein that can act as a signal for the localization of the protein into the peroxisome membrane in a PEX19-dependent manner.
2	1	1	alpha-linolenic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving alpha-linolenic acid, an unsaturated omega-6 fatty acid that has the molecular formula C18H32O2.
0	0	1	very long-chain fatty-acyl-CoA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving very long-chain fatty-acyl-CoAs, any derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is in a thioester linkage with a medium-chain fatty-acyl group. A very long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid which has a chain length greater than C22.
0	1	1	medium-chain fatty-acyl-CoA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving medium-chain fatty-acyl-CoAs, any derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is in a thioester linkage with a long-chain fatty-acyl group. A medium-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length of between C6 and C12.
1	0	0	response to platelet-derived growth factor	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a platelet-derived growth factor stimulus.
1	5	4	cellular response to platelet-derived growth factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a platelet-derived growth factor stimulus.
0	1	2	double-stranded DNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, in the presence of double-stranded DNA; drives the unwinding of a DNA helix.
1	2	0	BMP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a member of the bone morphogenetic protein (BMP) family.
3	0	0	histone H3-K9 dimethylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of two methyl groups to lysine at position 9 of the histone.
3	1	0	histone H3-K9 trimethylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of three methyl groups to lysine at position 9 of the histone.
4	3	3	sperm flagellum	A microtubule-based flagellum (or cilium) that is part of a sperm, a mature male germ cell that develops from a spermatid.
0	0	1	CatSper complex	A sperm-specific voltage-gated calcium channel that controls the intracellular calcium ion concentration and, thereby, the swimming behavior of sperm. Consists of a heteromeric tetramer surrounding a calcium ion- selective pore. May also contain additional auxiliary subunits.
1	1	0	prostaglandin H2 endoperoxidase reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: prostaglandin H2 + NADPH + H+ -> prostaglandin F2alpha + NADP+. This reaction is the reduction of prostaglandin H2 ((5Z,13E)-(15S)-9alpha,11alpha-Epidioxy-15-hydroxyprosta-5,13-dienoate) to prostaglandin F2alpha ((5Z,13E)-(15S)-9alpha,11alpha,15-Trihydroxyprosta-5,13-dienoate).
1	0	0	prostaglandin D2 11-ketoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: prostaglandin D2 + H+ + NADPH -> 11-epi-prostaglandin F2alpha + NADP+.
1	1	0	13-prostaglandin reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 15-keto-prostaglandin + NAD(P)H + H+ -> 13,14-dihydro-15-keto-prostaglandin + NAD(P)+. This reaction is the reduction of 15-keto-prostaglandin.
0	1	1	phosphatidylglycerol acyl-chain remodeling	Remodeling the acyl chains of phosphatidylglycerol, through sequential deacylation and re-acylation reactions, to generate phosphatidylglycerol containing different types of fatty acid acyl chains.
1	2	1	phosphatidylinositol acyl-chain remodeling	Remodeling the acyl chains of phosphatidylinositol, through sequential deacylation and re-acylation reactions, to generate phosphatidylinositol containing different types of fatty acid acyl chains.
1	2	2	phosphatidylserine acyl-chain remodeling	Remodeling the acyl chains of phosphatidylserine, through sequential deacylation and re-acylation reactions, to generate phosphatidylserine containing different types of fatty acid acyl chains.
2	3	1	phosphatidylcholine acyl-chain remodeling	Remodeling the acyl chains of phosphatidylcholine, through sequential deacylation and re-acylation reactions, to generate phosphatidylcholine containing different types of fatty acid acyl chains.
0	2	1	phosphatidylethanolamine acyl-chain remodeling	Remodeling the acyl chains of phosphatidylethanolamine, through sequential deacylation and re-acylation reactions, to generate phosphatidylethanolamine containing different types of fatty acid acyl chains.
0	1	0	acylglycerol acyl-chain remodeling	Remodeling the acyl chains of an acylglycerol, through sequential deacylation and re-acylation reactions, to generate an acylglycerol containing different types of fatty acid acyl chains.
1	0	0	inner dynein arm	Inner arm structure present on the outer doublet microtubules of ciliary and flagellar axonemes. The structure of inner dynein arms is complex and may vary within the axoneme. Inner dynein arms are heteromeric, comprising 8 different heavy chains and various subunits. Inner and outer dynein arms have different functions in the generation of microtubule-based motility.
1	0	0	outer dynein arm	Outer arm structure present on the outer doublet microtubules of ciliary and flagellar axonemes. Outer dynein arms contain 2-3 heavy chains, two or more intermediate chains and a cluster of 4-8 light chains. Inner and outer dynein arms have different functions in the generation of microtubule-based motility.
4	0	0	outer dynein arm assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an axonemal dynein outer arm, an outer arm structure present on the outer doublet microtubules of ciliary and flagellar axonemes.
3	0	0	inner dynein arm assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an axonemal dynein inner arm, an inner arm structure present on the outer doublet microtubules of ciliary and flagellar axonemes.
0	1	0	13-lipoxin reductase activity	Definition: Catalysis of the reaction: 15-oxolipoxin A4 + NAD(P)H + H+ = 13,14-dihydro-15-oxolipoxin A4 + NAD(P)+.
1	0	0	early phagosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding an early phagosome.
1	1	0	muscle cell projection membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a muscle cell projection.
0	1	0	protein modification process	The covalent alteration of one or more amino acids occurring in proteins, peptides and nascent polypeptides (co-translational, post-translational modifications). Includes the modification of charged tRNAs that are destined to occur in a protein (pre-translation modification).
1	1	1	dTTP diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dTTP + H2O = dTMP + diphosphate.
0	0	1	UTP diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UTP + H2O = UMP + diphosphate.
0	2	0	protein localization to nuclear inner membrane	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the nuclear inner membrane.
1	0	0	cellular response to menadione	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a menadione stimulus. Menadione (also called vitamin K3) is a naphthoquinone having a methyl substituent at the 2-position.
0	1	0	peroxisome transport along microtubule	The directed movement of a peroxisome along a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins.
0	1	0	multivesicular body organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a multivesicular body. A multivesicular body is a type of late endosome in which regions of the limiting endosomal membrane invaginate to form internal vesicles; membrane proteins that enter the internal vesicles are sequestered from the cytoplasm.
5	7	2	multivesicular body assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a multivesicular body, a type of late endosome in which regions of the limiting endosomal membrane invaginate to form internal vesicles; membrane proteins that enter the internal vesicles are sequestered from the cytoplasm.
0	1	0	7-methylguanosine cap hypermethylation	Hypermethylation of the 7-(mono)methylguanosine (m(7)G) cap structure at the 2' position of the guanosine residue to convert a mono-methylated cap to a 2,2,7-trimethylguanosine cap structure. This type of cap modification occurs on small nuclear RNAs (snRNAs) and small nucleolar RNAs (snoRNAs) and is dependent on prior guanine-N7 methylation.
0	1	0	RNA (guanine-N7)-methylation	The addition of a methyl group to the N7 atom in the base portion of a guanine nucleotide residue in an RNA molecule.
0	0	1	swimming	Self-propelled movement of an organism from one location to another through water, often by means of active fin movement.
0	0	1	tubulobulbar complex	Actin-based structures involved in establishing close contact between Sertoli-Sertoli cells or Sertoli-spermatids in the seminiferous tubules of the testes.
1	2	4	peptidyl-serine autophosphorylation	The phosphorylation by a protein of one or more of its own serine amino acid residues, or a serine residue on an identical protein.
1	0	0	response to decreased oxygen levels	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus reflecting a decline in the level of oxygen.
1	0	0	cellular response to decreased oxygen levels	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus reflecting a decline in the level of oxygen.
2	0	0	cellular response to increased oxygen levels	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus reflecting an increase in the level of oxygen.
4	8	9	interstrand cross-link repair	Removal of a DNA interstrand crosslink (a covalent attachment of DNA bases on opposite strands of the DNA) and restoration of the DNA. DNA interstrand crosslinks occur when both strands of duplex DNA are covalently tethered together (e.g. by an exogenous or endogenous agent), thus preventing the strand unwinding necessary for essential DNA functions such as transcription and replication.
1	3	0	atrioventricular canal development	The progression of the atrioventricular canal over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The atrioventricular canal is the part of the heart connecting the atrium to the cardiac ventricle.
1	0	0	ameloblast differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an ameloblast, a cylindrical epithelial cell in the innermost layer of the enamel organ.
0	0	2	protein localization to M-band	Any process in which a protein is transported to, and/or maintained in, the M band. The M band is the midline of aligned thick filaments in a sarcomere.
1	4	0	annealing helicase activity	Catalysis of the ATP-dependent rewinding of single-stranded DNA (ssDNA) to reform base pairs between strands. Often acts on ssDNA bubbles bound by replication protein A (RPA).
4	3	0	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase regulatory subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a regulatory subunit of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase. The regulatory subunit associates with the catalytic subunit to regulate both its activity and subcellular location.
2	0	1	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase catalytic subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the catalytic subunit of a phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase. The catalytic subunit catalyzes the addition of a phosphate group to an inositol lipid at the 3' position of the inositol ring.
1	0	0	ghrelin secretion	The regulated release of ghrelin from a cell. Ghrelin is a 28 amino acid hunger-stimulating peptide hormone.
1	0	0	vascular endothelial growth factor receptor-2 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a vascular endothelial growth factor receptor-2 (VEGFR-2) located on the surface of the receiving cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	0	1	hepatocyte homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of the steady-state number of hepatocytes within a population of cells. Hepatocytes are specialized epithelial cells of the liver that are organized into interconnected plates called lobules.
1	1	0	intestinal stem cell homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of the steady-state number of intestinal stem cells within a population of cells.
1	1	1	dendritic cell migration	The movement of a dendritic cell within or between different tissues and organs of the body.
0	1	0	Fas signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a ligand to the receptor Fas on the surface of the cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Fas is a death domain-containing member of the tumor necrosis factor receptor (TNFR) superfamily.
0	4	0	post-anal tail morphogenesis	The process in which a post-anal tail is generated and organized. A post-anal tail is a muscular region of the body that extends posterior to the anus. The post-anal tail may aid locomotion and balance.
0	0	1	platelet morphogenesis	Generation and organization of a platelet, a non-nucleated disk-shaped cell formed by extrusion from megakaryocytes, found in the blood of all mammals, and mainly involved in blood coagulation.
1	1	0	renal potassium excretion	The elimination by an organism of potassium in the urine.
0	1	0	transcription factor catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a sequence-specific DNA-binding transcription factor by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of ubiquitin, and mediated by the proteasome.
0	0	1	protein localization to T-tubule	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, the T-tubule. The T-tubule is an invagination of the plasma membrane of a muscle cell that extends inward from the cell surface around each myofibril.
0	0	1	glutathione hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: glutathione + H2O = L-cysteinylglycine + L-glutamate.
1	0	7	sodium ion export across plasma membrane	The directed movement of sodium ions from inside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the extracellular region.
11	13	16	pre-replicative complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the pre-replicative complex, a protein-DNA complex that forms at the origin of replication during the initial step of DNA replication and allows the origin to become competent, or 'licensed', for replication.
2	2	4	RNA N6-methyladenosine methyltransferase complex	A RNA methyltransferase complex that catalyzes the post-transcriptional methylation of adenosine to form N6-methyladenosine (m6A). In budding yeast, the MIS complex consists of Mum2p, Ime4p and Slz1p. In vertebrates, the complex consists of METTL3, METTL14 and associated components WTAP, ZC3H13, VIRMA, CBLL1/HAKAI and in some cases of RBM15 (RBM15 or RBM15B).
0	0	1	TCR signalosome	A multi-protein complex containing at least the T-cell receptor complex and the LAT (linker for activation of T cells) scaffold protein. Also contains a variety of signaling proteins including co-receptors, kinases, phosphatases and adaptors such as CD8. Connects events on the plasma membrane to distal signaling cascades to ultimately modulate T cell biology.
0	2	0	proteasome-activating ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, which promotes unfolding of protein substrates, and channel opening of the core proteasome.
1	0	0	conversion of ds siRNA to ss siRNA	The process in which double-stranded small interfering RNA (ds siRNA) molecules are converted to single-stranded small interfering RNA (ss siRNA).
0	1	1	histone H3-K14 acetyltransferase complex	A protein complex that can catalyze the acetylation of lysine at position 14 in histone H3.
0	0	1	tRNA stabilization	Prevention of degradation of tRNA molecules.
2	2	2	K48-linked polyubiquitin modification-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon poly-ubiquitination formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 48 in the target protein.
1	0	1	maintenance of lens transparency	A homeostatic process in which the lens is maintained in a highly refractive, transparent state to allow for optimal focusing of light on the retina.
0	1	3	microtubule minus-end	The end of a microtubule that does not preferentially grow (polymerize).
1	2	0	keratohyalin granule	A cytoplasmic, non-membrane bound granule of, at least, keratinocyte. Associated to keratin intermediate filaments and partially crosslinked to the cell envelope.
0	1	0	TRAIL-activated apoptotic signaling pathway	An extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway initiated by the binding of the ligand TRAIL (tumor necrosis factor-related apoptosis-inducing ligand) to a death receptor on the cell surface.
7	19	21	cytoplasmic ribonucleoprotein granule	A ribonucleoprotein granule located in the cytoplasm.
1	0	3	synaptic vesicle recycling	The trafficking of synaptic vesicles from the pre-synaptic membrane so the vesicle can dock and prime for another round of exocytosis and neurotransmitter release. Recycling occurs after synaptic vesicle exocytosis, and is necessary to replenish presynaptic vesicle pools, sustain transmitter release and preserve the structural integrity of the presynaptic membrane. Recycling can occur following transient fusion with the presynaptic membrane (kiss and run), or via endocytosis of presynaptic membrane.
0	0	1	synaptic vesicle recycling via endosome	Synaptic vesicle recycling where vesicles endocytosed via clathrin-coated pits re-acidify and refill with neurotransmitters after passing through an endosomal intermediate.
0	1	0	tyrosine 3-monooxygenase activator activity	Interacts with and increases tyrosine 3-monooxygenase (tyrosine hydroxylase) activity.
0	1	0	cellular response to glyoxal	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glyoxal stimulus.
1	0	0	neuron death in response to oxidative stress	Any biological process that results in permanent cessation of all vital functions of a neuron upon exposure to an oxidative stress stimulus.
1	1	4	somatodendritic compartment	The region of a neuron that includes the cell body (cell soma) and dendrite(s), but excludes the axon.
0	1	0	L-dopa decarboxylase activator activity	Interacts with and increases L-dopa decarboxylase activity.
0	0	1	peroxidase inhibitor activity	Interacts with, and stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a peroxidase.
0	1	0	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to hydrogen peroxide	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway is induced in response to hydrogen peroxide (H2O2).
1	0	0	ventral trunk neural crest cell migration	The movement of trunk neural crest cells from the neural tube, travelling ventrally through the anterior half of each sclerotome. Trunk neural crest cells that remain in the sclerotome form the dorsal root ganglia containing the sensory neurons. Trunk neural crest cells that continue more ventrally form the sympathetic ganglia, the adrenal medulla, and the nerve clusters surrounding the aorta.
0	0	1	nitric-oxide synthase inhibitor activity	Interacts with, and stops, prevents or reduces the activity of nitric oxide synthase.
0	1	0	eiF2alpha phosphorylation in response to endoplasmic reticulum stress	The addition of a phosphate group on to the translation initiation factor eIF2alpha, as a result of endoplasmic reticulum stress.
0	2	2	positive regulation of translation in response to endoplasmic reticulum stress	Any process that activates, or increases the frequency, rate or extent of translation as a result of endoplasmic reticulum stress.
0	0	1	regulation of translational initiation by eIF2 alpha dephosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of translation initiation in response to stress by the dephosphorylation of eIF2 alpha.
7	5	12	IRE1-mediated unfolded protein response	A series of molecular signals mediated by the endoplasmic reticulum stress sensor IRE1 (Inositol-requiring transmembrane kinase/endonuclease). Begins with activation of IRE1 in response to endoplasmic reticulum (ER) stress, and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. One target of activated IRE1 is the transcription factor HAC1 in yeast, or XBP1 in mammals; IRE1 cleaves an intron of a mRNA coding for HAC1/XBP1 to generate an activated HAC1/XBP1 transcription factor, which controls the up regulation of UPR-related genes. At least in mammals, IRE1 can also signal through additional intracellular pathways including JNK and NF-kappaB.
1	1	1	PERK-mediated unfolded protein response	A series of molecular signals mediated by the endoplasmic reticulum membrane stress sensor PERK (PKR-like ER kinase). Begins with activation of PERK in response to endoplasmic reticulum (ER) stress and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. The main substrate of PERK is the translation initiation factor eIF2alpha. Serine-phosphorylation of eIF2alpha by PERK inactivates eIF2alpha and inhibits general protein translation. In addition, eIF2alpha phosphorylation preferentially increases the translation of selective mRNAs such as ATF4 (activating transcription factor 4), which up regulates a subset of UPR genes required to restore folding capacity.
0	0	3	ATF6-mediated unfolded protein response	A series of molecular signals mediated by the endoplasmic reticulum membrane stress sensor ATF6 (activating transcription factor 6). Begins with activation of ATF6 in response to endoplasmic reticulum (ER) stress, and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Under conditions of endoplasmic reticulum stress, ATF6 translocates to the Golgi where it is processed by proteases to release a cytoplasmic domain (ATF6f), which operates as a transcriptional activator of many genes required to restore folding capacity.
0	0	1	UFD1-NPL4 complex	A dimeric protein complex that contains the co-factors for the ATPase VCP/p97 (Cdc48p in budding yeast). In mammals, this complex consists of UFD1L (UFD1) and NPLOC4 (NPL4). In budding yeast, the complex is a dimer of Ufd1p and Npl4p.
1	0	0	Derlin-1-VIMP complex	A protein complex containing, in mammals, Derlin-1 and VCP-interacting membrane protein (VIMP). The complex links the p97/VCP-containing ATPase complex with Derlin-1 during translocation of protein substrates from the endoplasmic reticulum to the cytosol for degradation by the cytosolic proteasome.
2	0	2	ERAD pathway	The protein catabolic pathway which targets endoplasmic reticulum (ER)-resident proteins for degradation by the cytoplasmic proteasome. It begins with recognition of the ER-resident protein, includes retrotranslocation (dislocation) of the protein from the ER to the cytosol, protein modifications necessary for correct substrate transfer (e.g. ubiquitination), transport of the protein to the proteasome, and ends with degradation of the protein by the cytoplasmic proteasome.
0	0	1	prosaposin receptor activity	Combining with prosaposin to initiate a change in cell activity. Prosaposin is the glycoprotein precursor of four cleavage products (saposins A, B, C and D).
3	0	1	Derlin-1 retrotranslocation complex	A protein complex that functions in the retrotranslocation step of ERAD (ER-associated protein degradation), and includes at its core Derlin-1 oligomers forming a retrotranslocation channel.
0	1	0	protein deglycase activity	Catalysis of the removal of a sugar or dicarbonyl from a lysine residue of a glycated protein.
0	1	0	peptidyl-cysteine deglycation	The removal of a sugar or dicarbonyl from a cysteine residue of a glycated protein.
0	1	0	peptidyl-arginine deglycation	The removal of a sugar or dicarbonyl from an arginine residue of a glycated protein.
0	1	0	peptidyl-lysine deglycation	The removal of a sugar or dicarbonyl from a lysine residue of a glycated protein.
0	1	0	protein deglycation, glyoxal removal	The removal of glyoxal from a glycated protein, to form glycolate and a deglycated protein.
0	1	0	protein deglycation, methylglyoxal removal	The removal of methylglyoxal from a glycated protein, to form lactate and a deglycated protein.
0	1	0	glutathione deglycation	The removal of a sugar or dicarbonyl from glycated glutathione. Glutathione is the tripeptide glutamylcysteinylglycine.
0	2	1	netrin-activated signaling pathway	A series of molecular events initiated by the binding of a netrin protein to a receptor on the surface of the target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Netrins can act as chemoattractant signals for some cells and chemorepellent signals for others. Netrins also have roles outside of cell and axon guidance.
1	0	1	insulin receptor internalization	A receptor-mediated endocytosis process that results in the movement of an insulin receptor from the plasma membrane to the inside of the cell.
27	14	10	signaling receptor activity	Receiving a signal and transmitting it in the cell to initiate a change in cell activity. A signal is a physical entity or change in state that is used to transfer information in order to trigger a response.
4	2	2	cargo receptor activity	Binding specifically to a substance (cargo) to deliver it to a transport vesicle. Cargo receptors span a membrane (either the plasma membrane or a vesicle membrane), binding simultaneously to cargo molecules and coat adaptors, to efficiently recruit soluble proteins to nascent vesicles.
2	1	1	reelin-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of reelin (a secreted glycoprotein) to a receptor on the surface of a target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	0	apolipoprotein A-I-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of apolipoprotein A-I to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	1	insulin receptor signaling pathway via phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the insulin receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the signal is passed on via the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase cascade.
1	0	0	epidermal growth factor receptor signaling pathway via MAPK cascade	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an epidermal growth factor receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands, where the signal is passed on via the MAPKKK cascade.
1	0	0	non-canonical Wnt signaling pathway via JNK cascade	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, where the signal is passed on via the JNK cascade.
0	0	3	positive regulation of endothelial cell chemotaxis by VEGF-activated vascular endothelial growth factor receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) to a VEGFR on the surface of a cell, which activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell chemotaxis.
0	0	1	sphingosine-1-phosphate receptor activity	Combining with the sphingolipid sphingosine-1-phosphate (S1P), and transmitting the signal across the membrane by activating an associated G-protein.
0	0	1	G protein-coupled receptor heterodimeric complex	A protein complex that contains two G protein-coupled receptors (GPCRs) of different subtypes. Formation of a GPCR heterodimer may alter the functional property of the GPCR.
1	0	0	interleukin-5-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-5 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
11	9	11	NIK/NF-kappaB signaling	The process in which a signal is passed on to downstream components within the cell through the NIK-dependent processing and activation of NF-KappaB. Begins with activation of the NF-KappaB-inducing kinase (NIK), which in turn phosphorylates and activates IkappaB kinase alpha (IKKalpha). IKKalpha phosphorylates the NF-Kappa B2 protein (p100) leading to p100 processing and release of an active NF-KappaB (p52).
1	4	2	collagen-activated tyrosine kinase receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of collagen to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where the receptor possesses tyrosine kinase activity. The pathway ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	0	collagen receptor activity	Combining with a collagen and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	collagen-activated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by collagen binding to a cell surface receptor, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	5	0	p38MAPK cascade	An intracellular protein kinase cascade containing at least a p38 MAPK, a MAPKK and a MAP3K. The cascade can also contain an additional tier: the upstream MAP4K. The kinases in each tier phosphorylate and activate the kinases in the downstream tier to transmit a signal within a cell.
2	3	3	peptidyl-tyrosine autophosphorylation	The phosphorylation by a protein of one or more of its own tyrosine amino acid residues, or a tyrosine residue on an identical protein.
0	1	1	vascular endothelial growth factor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) to a receptor on the surface of the target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	2	0	positive regulation of cell migration by vascular endothelial growth factor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) to a receptor on the surface of a cell, which activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the orderly movement of a cell from one site to another.
1	1	0	Fc receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the Fc portion of an immunoglobulin to an Fc receptor on the surface of a signal-receiving cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. The Fc portion of an immunoglobulin is its C-terminal constant region.
0	1	0	Fc-gamma receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the Fc portion of immunoglobulin G (IgG) to an Fc-gamma receptor on the surface of a signal-receiving cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. The Fc portion of an immunoglobulin is its C-terminal constant region.
23	23	32	Fc-epsilon receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the Fc portion of immunoglobulin E (IgE) to an Fc-epsilon receptor on the surface of a signal-receiving cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. The Fc portion of an immunoglobulin is its C-terminal constant region.
16	25	29	Fc-gamma receptor signaling pathway involved in phagocytosis	An Fc-gamma receptor signaling pathway that contributes to the endocytic engulfment of external particulate material by phagocytes.
2	2	0	sequestering of BMP from receptor via BMP binding	Binding to a bone morphogenetic protein (BMP) in the extracellular region, and inhibiting BMP signaling by preventing BMP from binding to its cell surface receptor.
0	1	0	choriogonadotropin hormone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with choriogonadotropin hormone, a heterodimer, with an alpha subunit identical to that of luteinizing hormone (LH), follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH) and thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH), and a unique beta subunit.
2	0	0	Kit signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals that starts with the binding of stem cell factor to the tyrosine kinase receptor KIT on the surface of a cell, and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Stem cell factor (KIT ligand) binding to the receptor Kit mediates receptor dimerization, activation of its intrinsic tyrosine kinase activity and autophosphorylation. The activated receptor then phosphorylates various substrates, thereby activating distinct signaling cascades within the cell that trigger a change in state or activity of the cell.
3	3	0	interleukin-2-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-2 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
4	3	3	interleukin-7-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-7 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
4	0	1	interleukin-9-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-9 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
3	0	1	interleukin-21-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-21 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	0	2	chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 21 signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the C-C chemokine CCL21 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
2	0	0	toll-like receptor TLR1:TLR2 signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a heterodimeric TLR1:TLR2 complex to one of it's physiological ligands, followed by transmission of the signal by the activated receptor, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	0	toll-like receptor TLR6:TLR2 signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a heterodimeric TLR6:TLR2 complex to one of it's physiological ligands, followed by transmission of the signal by the activated receptor, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	2	1	ERBB signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a ligand to a member of the ERBB family of receptor tyrosine kinases on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
4	7	8	ERBB2 signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a ligand to a member of the ERBB family of receptors on the surface of a cell, where the signal is transmitted by ERBB2. The pathway ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. ERBB2 receptors are themselves unable to bind to ligands, but act as a signal-amplifying tyrosine kinase within a heterodimeric pair.
1	0	0	neuregulin receptor activity	Combining with a neuregulin, a member of the EGF family of growth factors, and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	neuregulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a neuregulin, a member of the EGF family of growth factors.
1	1	0	ERBB3:ERBB2 complex	A heterodimeric complex between the tyrosine kinase receptor ERBB2 and a ligand-activated receptor ERBB3. ERBB2, which does not bind any known ligand, is activated through formation of a heterodimer with another ligand-activated ERBB family member such as ERBB3.
1	0	1	macrophage colony-stimulating factor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the cytokine macrophage colony-stimulating factor (M-CSF) to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	0	2	chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 12 signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the chemokine CXCL12 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	0	C-X-C motif chemokine 12 receptor activity	Combining with the C-X-C motif chemokine 12 (CXCL12) and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
4	1	0	interleukin-23-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-23 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	2	0	interleukin-3-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-3 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	0	granulocyte colony-stimulating factor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the cytokine granulocyte colony-stimulating factor (G-CSF) to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. G-CSF binds to the receptor (CSF3R).
0	1	0	CXCL12-activated CXCR4 signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of the C-X-C chemokine CXCL12 to a C-X-C chemokine type 4 receptor (CXCR4) on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	0	erythropoietin-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of erythropoietin (EPO) to the erythropoietin receptor (EPO-R) on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	1	thrombopoietin-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a thrombopoietin to the thrombopoietin receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	0	oncostatin-M-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of oncostatin-M (OSM) to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. OSM can signal via at least two different receptors (a specific receptor and a LIF receptor) to activate different downstream signal transduction pathways.
2	2	1	angiotensin-activated signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of angiotensin II binding to an angiotensin receptor on the surface of the cell, and proceeding with the activated receptor transmitting the signal to a heterotrimeric G-protein complex to initiate a change in cell activity. Ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	0	interleukin-33-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-33 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	0	complement component C5a signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a the C5a component of the complement pathway binding to a complement receptor, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process. C5a is a peptide derived from the C5 complement factor.
0	4	2	nerve growth factor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of nerve growth factor (NGF) to a receptor on the surface of the target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	2	0	bile acid signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a bile acid to a receptor, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	0	neuropilin signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a neuropilin protein on the surface of a target cell, followed by transmission of the signal, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	1	1	neuropilin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a member of the neuropilin family.
2	2	3	TORC1 signaling	A series of intracellular molecular signals mediated by TORC1; TOR (target of rapamycin) in complex with at least Raptor (regulatory-associated protein of TOR), or orthologs of, and other signaling components.
0	4	1	TORC2 signaling	A series of intracellular molecular signals mediated by TORC2; TOR (rapamycin-insensitive companion of TOR) in complex with at least Rictor (regulatory-associated protein of TOR), or orthologs of, and other signaling components.
1	0	0	pronephric nephron tubule development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a pronephric nephron tubule over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The pronephric nephron tubule is an epithelial tube that is part of the pronephric nephron and connects the filtration unit (glomerulus or glomus) of the pronephros to the pronephric duct.
1	1	0	induction by virus of host autophagy	Any process in which a virus activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of autophagy in the host.
2	0	0	cytoplasmic pattern recognition receptor signaling pathway in response to virus	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a virus or viral RNA binding to a pattern recognition receptor (PRR) located in the cytoplasm. Cytosolic PRRs such as RIG-I (DDX58) and MDA-5 (IFIH1) detect RNA synthesized during active viral replication and trigger a signaling pathway to protect the host against viral infection, for example by inducing the expression of antiviral cytokines.
4	0	1	RIG-I signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the cytoplasmic pattern recognition receptor (PRR) RIG-1 (also known as DDX58) binding to viral RNA. RIG-I detects RNA synthesized during active viral replication and triggers a signaling pathway to protect the host against viral infection, for example by inducing the expression of antiviral cytokines.
2	0	0	MDA-5 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the cytoplasmic pattern recognition receptor (PRR) MDA-5 (also known as IFIH1) binding to viral RNA. MDA-5 detects RNA synthesized during active viral replication and triggers a signaling pathway to protect the host against viral infection, for example by inducing the expression of antiviral cytokines.
0	0	2	negative regulation of MDA-5 signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the cytoplasmic pattern recognition receptor (PRR) MDA-5 (also known as IFIH1) binding to viral RNA.
2	0	0	regulation of RIG-I signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the cytoplasmic pattern recognition receptor (PRR) RIG-1 (also known as DDX58) binding to viral RNA.
0	0	2	negative regulation of RIG-I signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the cytoplasmic pattern recognition receptor (PRR) RIG-1 (also known as DDX58) binding to viral RNA.
0	1	0	RIG-I binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with RIG-I, a cytosolic pattern recognition receptor that initiates an antiviral signaling pathway upon binding to viral RNA.
0	0	1	suppression by virus of host STAT1 activity	Any process in which a virus stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of host STAT1 (signal transducer and activator of transcription-1) activity. STATs are SH2 domain-containing proteins which lie downstream of many signaling receptors. Upon phosphorylation by JAKs, STAT proteins hetero- or homo-dimerize and translocate to the nucleus to activate transcription of target genes.
0	0	1	suppression by virus of host STAT2 activity	Any process in which a virus stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of host STAT2 (signal transducer and activator of transcription-2) activity. STATs are SH2 domain-containing proteins which lie downstream of many signaling receptors. Upon phosphorylation by JAKs, STAT proteins hetero- or homo-dimerize and translocate to the nucleus to activate transcription of target genes.
2	0	0	negative stranded viral RNA replication	A viral genome replication process where the template genome is negative stranded, single stranded RNA ((-)ssRNA).
1	0	0	single stranded viral RNA replication via double stranded DNA intermediate	A viral genome replication where the template is single-stranded RNA (ssRNA), and which proceeds via a double stranded DNA (dsDNA) intermediate molecule. Viral genomic RNA is first reverse transcribed into dsDNA, which integrates into the host chromosomal DNA, where it is transcribed by host RNA polymerase II.
2	0	4	viral RNA genome replication	The replication of a viral RNA genome.
0	1	0	DNA-templated viral transcription	A transcription process that uses a viral DNA as a template.
3	6	2	viral budding via host ESCRT complex	Viral budding which uses a host ESCRT protein complex, or complexes, to mediate the budding process.
0	1	1	co-receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a coreceptor. A coreceptor acts in cooperation with a primary receptor to transmit a signal within the cell.
1	2	2	establishment of mitotic spindle localization	The cell cycle process in which the directed movement of the mitotic spindle to a specific location in the cell occurs.
5	9	7	regulation of growth	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the growth of all or part of an organism so that it occurs at its proper speed, either globally or in a specific part of the organism's development.
0	0	1	positive regulation of growth rate	Any process that increases the rate of growth of all or part of an organism.
0	0	3	locomotion	Self-propelled movement of a cell or organism from one location to another.
0	0	1	regulation of locomotion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of locomotion of a cell or organism.
5	1	1	regulation of multicellular organism growth	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of growth of the body of an organism so that it reaches its usual body size.
0	1	0	negative regulation of multicellular organism growth	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of growth of an organism to reach its usual body size.
0	1	1	embryonic cleavage	The first few specialized divisions of an activated animal egg.
4	2	5	positive regulation of multicellular organism growth	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of growth of an organism to reach its usual body size.
1	1	3	positive regulation of embryonic development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of embryonic development.
0	2	1	regulation of meiotic nuclear division	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of meiotic nuclear division, the process in which the nucleus of a diploid cell divides twice forming four haploid cells, one or more of which usually function as gametes.
2	3	3	regulation of gene expression, epigenetic	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gene expression; the process is mitotically or meiotically heritable, or is stably self-propagated in the cytoplasm of a resting cell, and does not entail a change in DNA sequence.
0	0	1	snRNA modification	The covalent alteration of one or more nucleotides within snRNA, resulting in a change in the properties of the snRNA.
0	1	0		
2	2	0	negative regulation of fibroblast growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of fibroblast growth factor receptor signaling pathway activity.
1	1	1	polar body extrusion after meiotic divisions	The cell cycle process in which two small cells are generated, as byproducts destined to degenerate, as a result of the first and second meiotic divisions of a primary oocyte during its development to a mature ovum. One polar body is formed in the first division of meiosis and the other in the second division; at each division, the cytoplasm divides unequally, so that the polar body is of much smaller size than the developing oocyte. At the second division in which a polar body is formed, the polar body and the developing oocyte each contain a haploid set of chromosomes.
0	0	1	thermosensory behavior	Behavior that is dependent upon the sensation of temperature.
1	2	11	protein refolding	The process carried out by a cell that restores the biological activity of an unfolded or misfolded protein, using helper proteins such as chaperones.
1	1	1	ATPase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of any enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis of ATP to ADP and orthophosphate.
3	0	2	neurexin family protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with neurexins, synaptic cell surface proteins related to latrotoxin receptor, laminin and agrin. Neurexins act as cell recognition molecules at nerve terminals.
1	0	0	fluid transport	The directed movement of substances that are in liquid form in normal living conditions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
4	1	0	epithelial fluid transport	The directed movement of fluid across epithelia.
1	1	0	olfactory behavior	The behavior of an organism in response to an odor.
2	4	1	histone methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + histone = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + methyl-histone. Histone methylation generally occurs on either an arginine or lysine residue.
0	2	2	chemoattractant activity	Providing the environmental signal that initiates the directed movement of a motile cell or organism towards a higher concentration of that signal.
2	4	1	regulation of epidermal growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of epidermal growth factor receptor signaling pathway activity.
6	6	6	negative regulation of epidermal growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of epidermal growth factor receptor signaling pathway activity.
13	17	13	wound healing	The series of events that restore integrity to a damaged tissue, following an injury.
2	1	1	gliogenesis	The process that results in the generation of glial cells. This includes the production of glial progenitors and their differentiation into mature glia.
3	2	0	intraciliary transport	The bidirectional movement of large protein complexes along microtubules within a cilium, mediated by motor proteins.
1	1	0	cell migration involved in gastrulation	The migration of individual cells within the blastocyst to help establish the multi-layered body plan of the organism (gastrulation). For example, the migration of cells from the surface to the interior of the embryo (ingression).
0	1	1	T-helper 1 type immune response	An immune response which is associated with resistance to intracellular bacteria, fungi, and protozoa, and pathological conditions such as arthritis, and which is typically orchestrated by the production of particular cytokines by T-helper 1 cells, most notably interferon-gamma, IL-2, and lymphotoxin.
0	0	1	type 2 immune response	An immune response which is associated with resistance to extracellular organisms such as helminths and pathological conditions such as allergy, which is orchestrated by the production of particular cytokines, most notably IL-4, IL-5, IL-10, and IL-13, by any of a variety of cell types including T-helper 2 cells, eosinophils, basophils, mast cells, and nuocytes, resulting in enhanced production of certain antibody isotypes and other effects.
0	1	0	T-helper cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized thymocyte acquires specialized features of a T-helper cell.
1	5	3	T cell proliferation	The expansion of a T cell population by cell division. Follows T cell activation.
1	3	5	B cell proliferation	The expansion of a B cell population by cell division. Follows B cell activation.
3	2	0	T cell receptor complex	A protein complex that contains a disulfide-linked heterodimer of T cell receptor (TCR) chains, which are members of the immunoglobulin superfamily, and mediates antigen recognition, ultimately resulting in T cell activation. The TCR heterodimer is associated with the CD3 complex, which consists of the nonpolymorphic polypeptides gamma, delta, epsilon, zeta, and, in some cases, eta (an RNA splice variant of zeta) or Fc epsilon chains.
10	6	5	positive regulation of T cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of T cell proliferation.
3	1	2	positive regulation of activated T cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of activated T cell proliferation.
1	0	0	alpha-beta T cell receptor complex	A T cell receptor complex in which the TCR heterodimer comprises alpha and beta chains, associated with the CD3 complex; recognizes a complex consisting of an antigen-derived peptide bound to a class I or class II MHC protein.
6	6	5	T cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a mature or immature T cell resulting from exposure to a mitogen, cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or an antigen for which it is specific.
5	6	5	B cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a mature or immature B cell resulting from exposure to a mitogen, cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or an antigen for which it is specific.
1	1	0	macrophage activation	A change in morphology and behavior of a macrophage resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
1	2	0	monocyte activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a monocyte resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
2	0	1	endothelial cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of an endothelial cell resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
1	1	1	neutrophil activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a neutrophil resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
25	13	19	regulation of cell population proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell proliferation.
0	2	1	regulation of T cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of T cell proliferation.
9	3	4	negative regulation of T cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of T cell proliferation.
1	1	0	fructose 1,6-bisphosphate 1-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-fructose 1,6-bisphosphate + H2O = D-fructose 6-phosphate + phosphate.
1	0	0	neurotransmitter metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving neurotransmitters, any of a group of substances that are released on excitation from the axon terminal of a presynaptic neuron of the central or peripheral nervous system and travel across the synaptic cleft to either excite or inhibit the target cell.
0	0	1	rRNA primary transcript binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an unprocessed ribosomal RNA transcript.
0	0	1	neurotransmitter catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of any of a group of substances that are released on excitation from the axon terminal of a presynaptic neuron of the central or peripheral nervous system and travel across the synaptic cleft to either excite or inhibit the target cell.
2	2	0	neurotransmitter biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of any of a group of substances that are released on excitation from the axon terminal of a presynaptic neuron of the central or peripheral nervous system and travel across the synaptic cleft to either excite or inhibit the target cell.
0	1	0	meiotic DNA double-strand break formation	The cell cycle process in which double-strand breaks are generated at defined hotspots throughout the genome during meiosis I. This results in the initiation of meiotic recombination.
1	0	0	vacuole fusion, non-autophagic	The fusion of two vacuole membranes to form a single vacuole.
10	11	19	retrograde transport, endosome to Golgi	The directed movement of membrane-bounded vesicles from endosomes back to the trans-Golgi network where they are recycled for further rounds of transport.
10	8	8	cellular response to glucose starvation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of deprivation of glucose.
3	2	1	lipoprotein metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any conjugated, water-soluble protein in which the covalently attached nonprotein group consists of a lipid or lipids.
1	2	0	lipoprotein biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of any conjugated, water-soluble protein in which the covalently attached nonprotein group consists of a lipid or lipids.
1	1	2	lipoprotein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of any conjugated, water-soluble protein in which the covalently attached nonprotein group consists of a lipid or lipids.
4	3	7	telomeric DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a telomere, a specific structure at the end of a linear chromosome required for the integrity and maintenance of the end.
1	0	0	interleukin-12 beta subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the beta subunit of interleukin-12.
0	2	0	neurotransmitter binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a neurotransmitter, any chemical substance that is capable of transmitting (or inhibiting the transmission of) a nerve impulse from a neuron to another cell.
0	1	0	acetylcholine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with acetylcholine, an acetic acid ester of the organic base choline that functions as a neurotransmitter, released at the synapses of parasympathetic nerves and at neuromuscular junctions.
5	3	2	heme catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of heme, any compound of iron complexed in a porphyrin (tetrapyrrole) ring.
1	0	1	heme metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving heme, any compound of iron complexed in a porphyrin (tetrapyrrole) ring.
11	10	9	SH2 domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a SH2 domain (Src homology 2) of a protein, a protein domain of about 100 amino-acid residues and belonging to the alpha + beta domain class.
0	1	0	nuclear outer membrane-endoplasmic reticulum membrane network	The continuous network of membranes encompassing the nuclear outer membrane and the endoplasmic reticulum membrane.
2	1	3	regulation of protein catabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein by the destruction of the native, active configuration, with or without the hydrolysis of peptide bonds.
6	4	6	negative regulation of protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein by the destruction of the native, active configuration, with or without the hydrolysis of peptide bonds.
1	2	0	xenobiotic catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a xenobiotic compound, a compound foreign to living organisms. Used of chemical compounds, e.g. a xenobiotic chemical, such as a pesticide.
0	1	1	cellular ketone metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any of a class of organic compounds that contain the carbonyl group, CO, and in which the carbonyl group is bonded only to carbon atoms, as carried out by individual cells. The general formula for a ketone is RCOR, where R and R are alkyl or aryl groups.
0	1	0	terpene metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving terpenes, any of a large group of hydrocarbons that are made up of isoprene (C5H8) units which may be cyclic, acyclic or multicyclic, saturated or unsaturated, and may contain various functional groups.
2	5	3	response to cocaine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cocaine stimulus. Cocaine is a crystalline alkaloid obtained from the leaves of the coca plant.
2	1	3	tissue regeneration	The regrowth of lost or destroyed tissues.
0	0	1	establishment of planar polarity of follicular epithelium	Coordinated organization of groups of cells in the plane of a follicular epithelium, such that they all orient to similar coordinates.
2	6	3	ribosome biogenesis	A cellular process that results in the biosynthesis of constituent macromolecules, assembly, and arrangement of constituent parts of ribosome subunits; includes transport to the sites of protein synthesis.
0	2	2	ribosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of the mature ribosome and of its subunits.
0	2	1	mature ribosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of the large and small ribosomal subunits into a functional ribosome.
1	0	0	DNA protection	Any process in which DNA is protected from damage by, for example, oxidative stress.
0	0	1	peptidyl-aspartic acid hydroxylation	The hydroxylation of peptidyl-aspartic acid to form peptidyl-hydroxyaspartic acid.
3	0	4	natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity	The directed killing of a target cell by a natural killer cell through the release of granules containing cytotoxic mediators or through the engagement of death receptors.
1	0	0	regulation of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity.
1	1	1	protection from natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity	The process of protecting a cell from natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity.
0	1	0	susceptibility to natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity	The process of causing a cell to become susceptible to natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity.
1	0	0	nuclear RNA export factor complex	A protein complex that contains two proteins (know in several organisms, including Drosophila, as NXF1 and NXF2) and is required for the export of the majority of mRNAs from the nucleus to the cytoplasm; localized in the nucleoplasm and at both the nucleoplasmic and cytoplasmic faces of the nuclear pore complex; shuttles between the nucleus and the cytoplasm.
8	6	3	ribosomal large subunit biogenesis	A cellular process that results in the biosynthesis of constituent macromolecules, assembly, and arrangement of constituent parts of a large ribosomal subunit; includes transport to the sites of protein synthesis.
3	7	4	ribosomal small subunit biogenesis	A cellular process that results in the biosynthesis of constituent macromolecules, assembly, and arrangement of constituent parts of a small ribosomal subunit; includes transport to the sites of protein synthesis.
1	1	6	error-prone translesion synthesis	The conversion of DNA-damage induced single-stranded gaps into large molecular weight DNA after replication by using a specialized DNA polymerase or replication complex to insert a defined nucleotide across the lesion. This process does not remove the replication-blocking lesions and causes an increase in the endogenous mutation level. For example, in E. coli, a low fidelity DNA polymerase, pol V, copies lesions that block replication fork progress. This produces mutations specifically targeted to DNA template damage sites, but it can also produce mutations at undamaged sites.
8	6	3	peptide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with peptides, any of a group of organic compounds comprising two or more amino acids linked by peptide bonds.
1	0	0	MHC protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with major histocompatibility complex molecules; a set of molecules displayed on cell surfaces that are responsible for lymphocyte recognition and antigen presentation.
6	0	5	MHC class I protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with major histocompatibility complex class I molecules; a set of molecules displayed on cell surfaces that are responsible for lymphocyte recognition and antigen presentation.
0	2	0	MHC class II protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with major histocompatibility complex class II molecules; a set of molecules displayed on cell surfaces that are responsible for lymphocyte recognition and antigen presentation.
0	1	0	URM1 activating enzyme activity	Catalysis of the activation of the small ubiquitin-related modifier URM1, through the formation of an ATP-dependent high-energy thiolester bond.
1	0	0	ISG15 transferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of ISG15 from one protein to another via the reaction X-ISG15 + Y --> Y-ISG15 + X, where both X-ISG15 and Y-ISG15 are covalent linkages.
0	0	2	vocal learning	A behavioral process whose outcome is a relatively long-lasting behavioral change whereby an organism modifies innate vocalizations to imitate sounds produced by others.
2	0	2	phosphate ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphate.
3	2	1	regulation of fatty acid biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of fatty acids, any of the aliphatic monocarboxylic acids that can be liberated by hydrolysis from naturally occurring fats and oils.
0	1	1	regulation of protein import into nucleus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of movement of proteins from the cytoplasm to the nucleus.
5	11	9	positive regulation of protein import into nucleus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of movement of proteins from the cytoplasm into the nucleus.
1	0	0	homoiothermy	Any homoeostatic process in which an organism maintains its internal body temperature at a relatively constant value. This is achieved by using metabolic processes to counteract fluctuations in the temperature of the environment.
2	1	1	vasoconstriction	A decrease in the diameter of blood vessels, especially arteries, due to constriction of smooth muscle cells that line the vessels, and usually causing an increase in blood pressure.
5	1	2	vasodilation	An increase in the internal diameter of blood vessels, especially arterioles or capillaries, due to relaxation of smooth muscle cells that line the vessels, and usually resulting in a decrease in blood pressure.
5	2	2	regulation of phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of addition of phosphate groups into a molecule.
1	4	1	negative regulation of phosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents or decreases the rate of addition of phosphate groups to a molecule.
2	5	2	positive regulation of phosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of addition of phosphate groups to a molecule.
2	0	0	cuticle development	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a cuticle, the outer layer of some animals and plants, which acts to prevent water loss.
0	2	0	keratan sulfate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of keratan sulfate, a glycosaminoglycan with repeat units consisting of beta-1,4-linked D-galactopyranosyl-beta-(1,4)-N-acetyl-D-glucosamine 6-sulfate and with variable amounts of fucose, sialic acid and mannose units; keratan sulfate chains are covalently linked by a glycosidic attachment through the trisaccharide galactosyl-galactosyl-xylose to peptidyl-threonine or serine residues.
1	1	1	vitamin D metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving vitamin D, any of a group of related, fat-soluble compounds that are derived from delta-5,7 steroids and play a central role in calcium metabolism. Specific forms of vitamin D include calciferol (ergocalciferol; vitamin D2) and cholecalciferol (calciol; vitamin D3).
1	0	0	vitamin K biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of any of the forms of vitamin K, quinone-derived vitamins which are involved in the synthesis of blood-clotting factors in mammals.
1	1	0	vitamin K metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any of the forms of vitamin K, quinone-derived vitamins which are involved in the synthesis of blood-clotting factors in mammals. Vitamin K substances share a methylated naphthoquinone ring structure and vary in the aliphatic side chains attached to the molecule.
1	0	0	phylloquinone catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of phylloquinone, vitamin K1, a quinone-derived compound synthesized by green plants.
0	1	0	chemokine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any chemokine receptor.
1	0	4	paraspeckles	Discrete subnuclear bodies in the interchromatin nucleoplasmic space, often located adjacent to nuclear specks. 10-20 paraspeckles are typically found in human cell nuclei.
9	11	27	sarcolemma	The outer membrane of a muscle cell, consisting of the plasma membrane, a covering basement membrane (about 100 nm thick and sometimes common to more than one fiber), and the associated loose network of collagen fibers.
1	2	12	regulation of membrane potential	Any process that modulates the establishment or extent of a membrane potential, the electric potential existing across any membrane arising from charges in the membrane itself and from the charges present in the media on either side of the membrane.
1	1	1	sphingosine-1-phosphate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: sphingosine 1-phosphate + H2O = sphingosine + phosphate.
30	42	25	histone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone, any of a group of water-soluble proteins found in association with the DNA of eukaroytic chromosomes. They are involved in the condensation and coiling of chromosomes during cell division and have also been implicated in nonspecific suppression of gene activity.
0	1	0	thyroid hormone metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any of the compounds secreted by the thyroid gland, largely thyroxine and triiodothyronine.
0	4	5	nuclear inclusion body	An intranuclear focus at which aggregated proteins have been sequestered.
0	0	2	extrinsic component of endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The component of the endoplasmic reticulum membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
4	0	6	cristae formation	The assembly of cristae, the inwards folds of the inner mitochondrial membrane.
0	1	0	epinephrine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving epinephrine, a hormone produced by the medulla of the adrenal glands that increases heart activity, improves the power and prolongs the action of muscles, and increases the rate and depth of breathing. It is synthesized by the methylation of norepinephrine.
0	2	0	norepinephrine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving norepinephrine, a hormone secreted by the adrenal medulla, and a neurotransmitter in the sympathetic peripheral nervous system and in some tracts in the central nervous system. It is also the demethylated biosynthetic precursor of epinephrine.
0	1	0	dopamine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of dopamine, a catecholamine neurotransmitter and a metabolic precursor of noradrenaline and adrenaline.
2	1	2	dopamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving dopamine, a catecholamine neurotransmitter and a metabolic precursor of noradrenaline and adrenaline.
0	1	0	epinephrine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of epinephrine, a hormone produced by the medulla of the adrenal glands that increases heart activity, improves the power and prolongs the action of muscles, and increases the rate and depth of breathing. It is synthesized by the methylation of norepinephrine.
0	1	0	norepinephrine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of norepinephrine, a hormone secreted by the adrenal medulla, and a neurotransmitter in the sympathetic peripheral nervous system and in some tracts in the central nervous system. It is also the demethylated biosynthetic precursor of epinephrine.
1	1	0	catecholamine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of any of a group of physiologically important biogenic amines that possess a catechol (3,4-dihydroxyphenyl) nucleus and are derivatives of 3,4-dihydroxyphenylethylamine.
0	0	1	catecholamine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of any of a group of physiologically important biogenic amines that possess a catechol (3,4-dihydroxyphenyl) nucleus and are derivatives of 3,4-dihydroxyphenylethylamine.
2	0	0	choline catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of choline (2-hydroxyethyltrimethylammonium), an amino alcohol that occurs widely in living organisms as a constituent of certain types of phospholipids and in the neurotransmitter acetylcholine.
0	1	0	serotonin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving serotonin (5-hydroxytryptamine), a monoamine neurotransmitter occurring in the peripheral and central nervous systems, also having hormonal properties.
1	2	0	hormone metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any hormone, naturally occurring substances secreted by specialized cells that affects the metabolism or behavior of other cells possessing functional receptors for the hormone.
3	0	0	hormone biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of any hormone, naturally occurring substances secreted by specialized cells that affects the metabolism or behavior of other cells possessing functional receptors for the hormone.
0	1	0	hormone catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of any hormone, naturally occurring substances secreted by specialized cells that affects the metabolism or behavior of other cells possessing functional receptors for the hormone.
6	0	0	progesterone metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving progesterone, a steroid hormone produced in the ovary which prepares and maintains the uterus for pregnancy. Also found in plants.
1	0	0	arginine biosynthetic process via ornithine	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of arginine (2-amino-5-guanidinopentanoic acid) via the intermediate compound ornithine.
2	2	0	eye photoreceptor cell development	Development of a photoreceptor, a sensory cell in the eye that reacts to the presence of light. They usually contain a pigment that undergoes a chemical change when light is absorbed, thus stimulating a nerve.
19	23	30	melanosome	A tissue-specific, membrane-bounded cytoplasmic organelle within which melanin pigments are synthesized and stored. Melanosomes are synthesized in melanocyte cells.
0	0	1	ear morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the ear are generated and organized. The ear is the sense organ in vertebrates that is specialized for the detection of sound, and the maintenance of balance. Includes the outer ear and middle ear, which collect and transmit sound waves; and the inner ear, which contains the organs of balance and (except in fish) hearing. Also includes the pinna, the visible part of the outer ear, present in some mammals.
5	3	1	inner ear morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the inner ear are generated and organized. The inner ear is the structure in vertebrates that contains the organs of balance and hearing. It consists of soft hollow sensory structures (the membranous labyrinth) containing fluid (endolymph) surrounded by fluid (perilymph) and encased in a bony cavity (the bony labyrinth). It consists of two chambers, the sacculus and utriculus, from which arise the cochlea and semicircular canals respectively.
0	0	3	outer ear morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the outer ear are generated and organized. The outer ear is the part of the ear external to the tympanum (eardrum). It consists of a tube (the external auditory meatus) that directs sound waves on to the tympanum, and may also include the external pinna, which extends beyond the skull.
1	0	1	middle ear morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the middle ear are generated and organized. The middle ear is the air-filled cavity within the skull of vertebrates that lies between the outer ear and the inner ear. It is linked to the pharynx (and therefore to outside air) via the Eustachian tube and in mammals contains the three ear ossicles, which transmit auditory vibrations from the outer ear (via the tympanum) to the inner ear (via the oval window).
4	6	5	odontogenesis of dentin-containing tooth	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a dentin-containing tooth over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A dentin-containing tooth is a hard, bony organ borne on the jaw or other bone of a vertebrate, and is composed mainly of dentin, a dense calcified substance, covered by a layer of enamel.
2	5	1	odontogenesis	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a tooth or teeth over time, from formation to the mature structure(s). A tooth is any hard bony, calcareous, or chitinous organ found in the mouth or pharynx of an animal and used in procuring or masticating food.
1	0	0	regulation of odontogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the formation and development of a tooth or teeth.
0	1	0	positive regulation of odontogenesis of dentin-containing tooth	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the formation and development of teeth, the hard, bony appendages that are borne on the jaws, or on other bones in the walls of the mouth or pharynx of most vertebrates.
1	0	0	negative regulation of odontogenesis of dentin-containing tooth	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the formation and development of teeth, the hard, bony appendages which are borne on the jaws, or on other bones in the walls of the mouth or pharynx.
1	0	0	mechanoreceptor differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a mechanoreceptor, a cell specialized to transduce mechanical stimuli and relay that information centrally in the nervous system.
1	1	0	inner ear auditory receptor cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized inner cell acquires specialized features of an auditory hair cell.
1	1	0	gamma-delta T cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized hemopoietic cell acquires specialized features of a gamma-delta T cell. A gamma-delta T cell is a T cell that expresses a gamma-delta T cell receptor complex.
40	31	28	response to drug	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a drug stimulus. A drug is a substance used in the diagnosis, treatment or prevention of a disease.
2	1	0	aspartic endopeptidase activity, intramembrane cleaving	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of nonterminal peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain, occurring within a membrane.
0	1	0	serine phosphorylation of STAT protein	The process of introducing a phosphate group to a serine residue of a STAT (Signal Transducer and Activator of Transcription) protein.
10	5	6	positive regulation of tyrosine phosphorylation of STAT protein	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the introduction of a phosphate group to a tyrosine residue of a STAT (Signal Transducer and Activator of Transcription) protein.
3	5	1	negative regulation of tyrosine phosphorylation of STAT protein	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the introduction of a phosphate group to a tyrosine residue of a STAT (Signal Transducer and Activator of Transcription) protein.
10	12	12	response to hydrogen peroxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydrogen peroxide (H2O2) stimulus.
1	1	2	neuron maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for a neuron to attain its fully functional state.
6	7	3	myelination	The process in which myelin sheaths are formed and maintained around neurons. Oligodendrocytes in the brain and spinal cord and Schwann cells in the peripheral nervous system wrap axons with compact layers of their plasma membrane. Adjacent myelin segments are separated by a non-myelinated stretch of axon called a node of Ranvier.
5	1	0	superoxide anion generation	The enzymatic generation of superoxide, the superoxide anion O2- (superoxide free radical), or any compound containing this species, by a cell in response to environmental stress, thereby mediating the activation of various stress-inducible signaling pathways.
1	2	2	MCM complex	A hexameric protein complex required for the initiation and regulation of DNA replication.
1	0	2	hormone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any hormone, naturally occurring substances secreted by specialized cells that affect the metabolism or behavior of cells possessing functional receptors for the hormone. Hormones may be produced by the same, or different, cell as express the receptor.
0	0	1	NLS-dependent protein nuclear import complex	A dimer consisting of an alpha and a beta-subunit that imports proteins with an NLS into the nucleus through a nuclear pore.
0	1	0	RNA nuclear export complex	A complex which usually consists of three components, e.g. in Xenopus and yeast, the export receptor CRM1 (also known as exportin 1), the Ran protein and any RNA with a nuclear export sequence (NES). The complex acts to export RNA molecules with a NES from the nucleus through a nuclear pore.
1	1	0	insulin-like growth factor ternary complex	A complex of three proteins, which in animals is approximately 150kDa and consists of the insulin-like growth factor (IGF), the insulin-like growth factor binding protein-3 (IGFBP-3), or -5 (IGFBP-5) and an acid-labile subunit (ALS). The complex plays a role in growth and development.
3	3	13	immunoglobulin complex, circulating	An immunoglobulin complex that is secreted into extracellular space and found in mucosal areas or other tissues or circulating in the blood or lymph. In its canonical form, a circulating immunoglobulin complex is composed of two identical heavy chains and two identical light chains, held together by disulfide bonds. Some forms of are polymers of the basic structure and contain additional components such as J-chain and the secretory component.
2	3	4	retinol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving retinol, one of the three compounds that makes up vitamin A.
0	1	3	retinoic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving retinoic acid, one of the three components that makes up vitamin A.
3	0	0	retinal metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving retinal, a compound that plays an important role in the visual process in most vertebrates. In the retina, retinal combines with opsins to form visual pigments. Retinal is one of the forms of vitamin A.
3	1	1	lipid phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a phospholipid + H2O = a lipid + phosphate.
2	3	1	specific granule	Granule with a membranous, tubular internal structure, found primarily in mature neutrophil cells. Most are released into the extracellular fluid. Specific granules contain lactoferrin, lysozyme, vitamin B12 binding protein and elastase.
1	2	2	azurophil granule	Primary lysosomal granule found in neutrophil granulocytes. Contains a wide range of hydrolytic enzymes and is released into the extracellular fluid.
0	0	2	chromaffin granule	Specialized secretory vesicle found in the cells of adrenal glands and various other organs, which is concerned with the synthesis, storage, metabolism, and secretion of epinephrine and norepinephrine.
0	0	2	chromaffin granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a chromaffin granule, a specialized secretory vesicle found in the cells of adrenal glands and various other organs, which is concerned with the synthesis, storage, metabolism, and secretion of epinephrine and norepinephrine.
1	0	1	germinal vesicle	The enlarged, fluid filled nucleus of a primary oocyte, the development of which is suspended in prophase I of the first meiotic division between embryohood and sexual maturity.
0	1	4	glycogen granule	Cytoplasmic bead-like structures of animal cells, visible by electron microscope. Each granule is a functional unit with the biosynthesis and catabolism of glycogen being catalyzed by enzymes bound to the granule surface.
1	1	0	zymogen granule	A membrane-bounded, cytoplasmic secretory granule found in enzyme-secreting cells and visible by light microscopy. Contain zymogen, an inactive enzyme precursor, often of a digestive enzyme.
4	0	1	zymogen granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a zymogen granule.
0	3	1	antigen processing and presentation of exogenous peptide antigen via MHC class I	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses a peptide antigen of exogenous origin on its cell surface in association with an MHC class I protein complex. The peptide antigen is typically, but not always, processed from a whole protein. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
3	1	1	homeostatic process	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state.
19	13	9	glucose homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of glucose within an organism or cell.
3	8	5	response to starvation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a starvation stimulus, deprivation of nourishment.
0	1	0	behavioral response to starvation	Any process that results in a change in the behavior of an organism as a result of deprivation of nourishment.
1	0	0	fear response	The response of an organism to a perceived external threat.
0	1	0	lamellar body	A membrane-bounded organelle, specialized for the storage and secretion of various substances (surfactant phospholipids, glycoproteins and acid phosphates) which are arranged in the form of tightly packed, concentric, membrane sheets or lamellae. Has some similar properties to, but is distinct from, a lysosome.
1	0	0	riboflavin reductase (NADPH) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: reduced riboflavin + NADP+ = riboflavin + NADPH + 2 H+.
2	5	3	peptide antigen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an antigen peptide.
1	2	3	T cell receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a T cell receptor, the antigen-recognizing receptor on the surface of T cells.
0	3	2	CD4 receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a CD4, a receptor found on the surface of T cells, monocytes and macrophages.
0	2	1	CD8 receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a CD8, a receptor found on the surface of thymocytes and cytotoxic and suppressor T-lymphocytes.
1	2	2	MHC class I protein complex	A transmembrane protein complex composed of a MHC class I alpha chain and an invariant beta2-microglobin chain, and with or without a bound peptide antigen. Class I here refers to classical class I molecules.
0	2	1	MHC class II protein complex	A transmembrane protein complex composed of an MHC class II alpha and MHC class II beta chain, and with or without a bound peptide or polysaccharide antigen.
1	0	1	photoreceptor outer segment membrane	The membrane surrounding the outer segment of a vertebrate photoreceptor.
6	3	2	ATPase-coupled transmembrane transporter activity	Primary active transporter of a solute across a membrane, via the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, to directly drive the transport of a substance across a membrane. The transport protein may be transiently phosphorylated (P-type transporters), or not (ABC-type transporters and other families of transporters). Primary active transport occurs up the solute's concentration gradient and is driven by a primary energy source.
3	2	3	chylomicron	A large lipoprotein particle (diameter 75-1200 nm) composed of a central core of triglycerides and cholesterol surrounded by a protein-phospholipid coating. The proteins include one molecule of apolipoprotein B-48 and may include a variety of apolipoproteins, including APOAs, APOCs and APOE. Chylomicrons are found in blood or lymph and carry lipids from the intestines into other body tissues.
1	0	0	mating plug formation	The deposition of a plug of sperm or other gelatinous material into the opening of the vulva by a male at the termination of copulation. Probably acts to prevent subsequent matings by other males.
2	1	1	mast cell granule	Coarse, bluish-black staining cytoplasmic granules, bounded by a plasma membrane and found in mast cells and basophils. Contents include histamine, heparin, chondroitin sulfates, chymase and tryptase.
1	1	0	cellular response to water deprivation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of deprivation of water.
13	11	4	cholesterol homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of cholesterol within an organism or cell.
1	1	2	hair cycle	The cyclical phases of growth (anagen), regression (catagen), quiescence (telogen), and shedding (exogen) in the life of a hair; one of the collection or mass of filaments growing from the skin of an animal, and forming a covering for a part of the head or for any part or the whole of the body.
2	1	1	regulation of hair cycle	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the cyclical phases of growth (anagen), regression (catagen), quiescence (telogen), and shedding (exogen) in the life of a hair.
1	0	0	positive regulation of hair cycle	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the cyclical phases of growth (anagen), regression (catagen), quiescence (telogen), and shedding (exogen) in the life of a hair.
1	2	9	actomyosin	Any complex of actin, myosin, and accessory proteins.
3	6	12	mitochondrial nucleoid	The region of a mitochondrion to which the DNA is confined.
0	3	1	muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a muscle cell.
2	0	1	ovulation cycle	The type of sexual cycle seen in females, often with physiologic changes in the endometrium that recur at regular intervals during the reproductive years.
0	1	0	follicle-stimulating hormone signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals mediated by follicle-stimulating hormone.
0	1	0	luteinizing hormone signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals mediated by luteinizing hormone.
0	1	1	succinate-CoA ligase complex	A heterodimeric enzyme complex, usually composed of an alpha and beta chain. Functions in the TCA cycle, hydrolyzing succinyl-CoA into succinate and CoA, thereby forming ATP or GTP.
2	0	0	maternal behavior	Female behaviors associated with the care and rearing of offspring.
1	0	0	sperm ejaculation	The expulsion of seminal fluid, thick white fluid containing spermatozoa, from the male genital tract.
1	0	0	mitochondrial intermembrane space protein transporter complex	Soluble complex of the mitochondrial intermembrane space composed of various combinations of small Tim proteins; acts as a protein transporter to guide proteins to the Tim22 complex for insertion into the mitochondrial inner membrane.
5	3	4	fibrinolysis	A process that solubilizes fibrin in the bloodstream of a multicellular organism, chiefly by the proteolytic action of plasmin.
1	0	1	PH domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a PH domain (pleckstrin homology) of a protein, a domain of about 100 residues that occurs in a wide range of proteins involved in intracellular signaling or as constituents of the cytoskeleton.
1	1	0	D-xylose metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving D-xylose, a naturally occurring plant polysaccharide.
7	4	4	embryonic digit morphogenesis	The process, occurring in the embryo, by which the anatomical structures of the digit are generated and organized. A digit is one of the terminal divisions of an appendage, such as a finger or toe.
6	1	17	presynaptic membrane	A specialized area of membrane of the axon terminal that faces the plasma membrane of the neuron or muscle fiber with which the axon terminal establishes a synaptic junction; many synaptic junctions exhibit structural presynaptic characteristics, such as conical, electron-dense internal protrusions, that distinguish it from the remainder of the axon plasma membrane.
1	0	0	drug catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a drug, a substance used in the diagnosis, treatment or prevention of a disease.
3	1	0	exogenous drug catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a drug that has originated externally to the cell or organism.
10	17	22	defense response to bacterium	Reactions triggered in response to the presence of a bacterium that act to protect the cell or organism.
1	1	1	hydrogen peroxide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), a potentially harmful byproduct of aerobic cellular respiration which can cause damage to DNA.
5	6	6	hydrogen peroxide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2).
1	1	0	circadian sleep/wake cycle	The cycle from wakefulness through an orderly succession of sleep states and stages that occurs on an approximately 24 hour rhythm.
14	9	15	regulation of circadian rhythm	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a circadian rhythm. A circadian rhythm is a biological process in an organism that recurs with a regularity of approximately 24 hours.
1	0	1	positive regulation of circadian rhythm	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of a circadian rhythm behavior.
2	0	2	negative regulation of circadian rhythm	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a circadian rhythm behavior.
1	1	1	eating behavior	The specific behavior of an organism relating to the intake of food, any substance (usually solid) that can be metabolized by an organism to give energy and build tissue.
2	0	1	long-chain fatty acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of long-chain fatty acids, any fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
1	0	1	very long-chain fatty acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a fatty acid which has a chain length greater than C22.
0	1	1	nucleosome mobilization	The movement of nucleosomes along a DNA fragment.
4	9	10	DNA damage response, detection of DNA damage	The series of events required to receive a stimulus indicating DNA damage has occurred and convert it to a molecular signal.
2	3	0	signal transduction in response to DNA damage	A cascade of processes induced by the detection of DNA damage within a cell.
5	10	6	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage by p53 class mediator	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway is induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53, or an equivalent protein, in response to the detection of DNA damage, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
2	1	0	mitochondrial ATP synthesis coupled electron transport	The transfer of electrons through a series of electron donors and acceptors, generating energy that is ultimately used for synthesis of ATP, as it occurs in the mitochondrial inner membrane or chloroplast thylakoid membrane.
4	0	4	mitochondrial ATP synthesis coupled proton transport	The transport of protons across a mitochondrial membrane to generate an electrochemical gradient (proton-motive force) that powers ATP synthesis.
0	1	1	tRNA 3'-end processing	The process in which the 3' end of a pre-tRNA molecule is converted to that of a mature tRNA.
0	1	0	3'-tRNA processing endoribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of RNA, removing extra 3' nucleotides from tRNA precursor, generating 3' termini of tRNAs. A 3'-hydroxy group is left at the tRNA terminus and a 5'-phosphoryl group is left at the trailer molecule.
3	8	8	polysomal ribosome	A ribosome bound to mRNA that forms part of a polysome.
1	1	4	mRNA transcription by RNA polymerase II	The cellular synthesis of messenger RNA (mRNA) from a DNA template by RNA polymerase II, originating at an RNA polymerase II promoter.
0	0	1	nucleolar large rRNA transcription by RNA polymerase I	The synthesis of the large ribosomal RNA (rRNA) transcript which encodes several rRNAs, e.g. in mammals 28S, 18S and 5.8S, from a nuclear DNA template transcribed by RNA polymerase I.
0	2	2	5S class rRNA transcription by RNA polymerase III	The synthesis of 5S ribosomal RNA (rRNA), or an equivalent rRNA, from a DNA template by RNA polymerase III (Pol III), originating at a type 1 RNA polymerase III promoter.
8	11	7	snRNA transcription by RNA polymerase II	The synthesis of small nuclear RNA (snRNA) from a DNA template by RNA Polymerase II (Pol II), originating at a Pol II promoter.
3	2	0	snRNA transcription by RNA polymerase III	The synthesis of small nuclear RNA (snRNA) from a DNA template by RNA Polymerase III (Pol III), originating at a Pol III promoter.
0	2	2	tRNA transcription by RNA polymerase III	The synthesis of transfer RNA (tRNA) from a DNA template by RNA polymerase III (Pol III), originating at a Pol III promoter.
0	0	1	histone methyltransferase activity (H4-K20 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + histone H4 L-lysine (position 20) = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + histone H4 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 20). This reaction is the addition of a methyl group onto lysine at position 20 of the histone H4 protein.
2	1	4	histone methyltransferase activity (H3-K4 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + histone H3 L-lysine (position 4) = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + histone H3 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 4). This reaction is the addition of a methyl group onto lysine at position 4 of the histone H3 protein.
204	246	240	identical protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an identical protein or proteins.
98	81	88	protein homodimerization activity	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an identical protein to form a homodimer.
2	2	4	actinin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with actinin, any member of a family of proteins that crosslink F-actin.
0	5	3	vitamin D receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the vitamin D receptor, a nuclear receptor that mediates the action of vitamin D by binding DNA and controlling the transcription of hormone-sensitive genes.
2	0	0	Wnt-activated receptor activity	Combining with a Wnt protein and transmitting the signal across the plasma membrane to initiate a change in cell activity.
2	1	0	vitamin B6 metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving any of the vitamin B6 compounds: pyridoxal, pyridoxamine and pyridoxine and the active form, pyridoxal phosphate.
1	0	0	pyridoxal phosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of pyridoxal phosphate, pyridoxal phosphorylated at the hydroxymethyl group of C-5, the active form of vitamin B6.
1	1	3	MHC class I peptide loading complex	A large, multisubunit complex which consists of the MHC class I-beta 2 microglobulin dimer, the transporter associated with antigen presentation (TAP), tapasin (an MHC-encoded membrane protein), the chaperone calreticulin and the thiol oxidoreductase ERp57. Functions in the assembly of peptides with newly synthesized MHC class I molecules.
1	0	0	TAP complex	A heterodimer composed of the subunits TAP1 and TAP2 (transporter associated with antigen presentation). Functions in the transport of antigenic peptides from the cytosol to the lumen of the endoplasmic reticulum.
16	26	24	histone deacetylase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the enzyme histone deacetylase.
0	1	0	platelet dense granule	Electron-dense granule occurring in blood platelets that stores and secretes adenosine nucleotides and serotonin. They contain a highly condensed core consisting of serotonin, histamine, calcium, magnesium, ATP, ADP, pyrophosphate and membrane lysosomal proteins.
2	3	2	defense response to protozoan	Reactions triggered in response to the presence of a protozoan that act to protect the cell or organism.
2	2	1	peptidoglycan binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently, in a non-covalent manner, with peptidoglycan, any of a class of glycoconjugates found in bacterial cell walls.
0	1	0	L-alanine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving L-alanine, the L-enantiomer of 2-aminopropanoic acid, i.e. (2S)-2-aminopropanoic acid.
0	1	1	L-alanine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of L-alanine, the L-enantiomer of 2-aminopropanoic acid, i.e. (2S)-2-aminopropanoic acid.
0	0	2	pyruvate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of pyruvate, 2-oxopropanoate.
1	0	0	cysteine transport	The directed movement of cysteine into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	1	tubulin deacetylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-acetyl(alpha-tubulin) + H2O = alpha-tubulin + acetate.
1	4	1	xenobiotic transport	The directed movement of a xenobiotic, a compound foreign to living organisms, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	4	1	xenobiotic transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the directed movement of a xenobiotic from one side of a membrane to the other. A xenobiotic is a compound foreign the organim exposed to it. It may be synthesized by another organism (like ampicilin) or it can be a synthetic chemical.
0	1	3	glucocorticoid receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a glucocorticoid binding to its receptor.
1	0	0	neuropeptide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently and stoichiometrically with neuropeptides, peptides with direct synaptic effects (peptide neurotransmitters) or indirect modulatory effects on the nervous system (peptide neuromodulators).
0	1	0	dipeptide transport	The directed movement of a dipeptide, a combination of two amino acids by means of a peptide (-CO-NH-) link, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
4	2	2	lipoprotein transport	The directed movement of any conjugated, water-soluble protein in which the nonprotein group consists of a lipid or lipids, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
3	0	6	retinoic acid receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the retinoic acid receptor, a ligand-regulated transcription factor belonging to the nuclear receptor superfamily.
1	2	3	peroxisome proliferator activated receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any of the peroxisome proliferator activated receptors, alpha, beta or gamma.
2	1	0	activation of Janus kinase activity	The process of introducing a phosphate group to a tyrosine residue of a JAK (Janus Activated Kinase) protein, thereby activating it.
24	33	35	regulation of apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the occurrence or rate of cell death by apoptotic process.
1	3	1	amyloid precursor protein metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving amyloid precursor protein (APP), the precursor of amyloid-beta, a glycoprotein associated with Alzheimer's disease.
0	1	0	negative regulation of amyloid precursor protein biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of amyloid precursor protein (APP), the precursor of amyloid-beta.
2	0	1	positive regulation of amyloid precursor protein biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of amyloid precursor protein (APP), the precursor of amyloid-beta.
3	4	0	amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of amyloid precursor protein (APP), the precursor of amyloid-beta, a glycoprotein associated with Alzheimer's disease.
0	4	1	sequestering of actin monomers	The selective interaction of actin monomers with specific molecules that inhibit their polymerization by preventing their access to other monomers.
0	1	0	cytoplasmic sequestering of transcription factor	The selective interaction of a transcription factor with specific molecules in the cytoplasm, thereby inhibiting its translocation into the nucleus.
12	12	37	cell projection	A prolongation or process extending from a cell, e.g. a flagellum or axon.
1	0	2	positive regulation of Golgi to plasma membrane protein transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the transport of proteins from the Golgi to the plasma membrane.
0	0	2	Golgi to plasma membrane CFTR protein transport	The directed movement of Cystic Fibrosis Transmembrane conductance Regulator (CFTR) protein from the Golgi to the plasma membrane.
3	4	10	Golgi to plasma membrane protein transport	The directed movement of proteins from the Golgi to the plasma membrane in transport vesicles that move from the trans-Golgi network to the plasma membrane.
26	29	61	neuron projection	A prolongation or process extending from a nerve cell, e.g. an axon or dendrite.
0	0	1	activation of phospholipase A2 activity by calcium-mediated signaling	A series of molecular signals that leads to the upregulation of calcium-dependent phospholipase A2 activity in response to the signal.
0	2	3	ATP-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex (a complex of two or more proteins that may include other nonprotein molecules) using energy from the hydrolysis of ATP.
2	1	0	chordate embryonic development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the embryo over time, from zygote formation through a stage including a notochord and neural tube until birth or egg hatching.
5	4	2	camera-type eye development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the camera-type eye over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The camera-type eye is an organ of sight that receives light through an aperture and focuses it through a lens, projecting it on a photoreceptor field.
1	3	0	myeloid dendritic cell differentiation	The process in which a monocyte acquires the specialized features of a dendritic cell, an immunocompetent cell of the lymphoid and hemopoietic systems and skin.
1	12	3	alpha-tubulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the microtubule constituent protein alpha-tubulin.
4	4	10	gamma-tubulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the microtubule constituent protein gamma-tubulin.
4	1	0	NADPH oxidase complex	A enzyme complex of which the core is a heterodimer composed of a light (alpha) and heavy (beta) chain, and requires several other water-soluble proteins of cytosolic origin for activity. Functions in superoxide generation by the NADPH-dependent reduction of O2.
7	7	7	ribonucleoprotein complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any complex of RNA and protein.
11	12	11	ribosome binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any part of a ribosome.
1	5	2	ribosomal large subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any part of the larger ribosomal subunit.
2	4	3	ribosomal small subunit binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any part of the small ribosomal subunit.
35	42	57	neuronal cell body	The portion of a neuron that includes the nucleus, but excludes cell projections such as axons and dendrites.
3	2	3	cysteine-type endopeptidase inhibitor activity involved in apoptotic process	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a cysteine-type endopeptidase involved in the apoptotic process.
7	4	0	T cell homeostasis	The process of regulating the proliferation and elimination of T cells such that the total number of T cells within a whole or part of an organism is stable over time in the absence of an outside stimulus.
0	0	1	regulation of macrophage activation	Any process that modulates the frequency or rate of macrophage activation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of macrophage activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage activation.
2	3	3	positive regulation of macrophage activation	Any process that stimulates, induces or increases the rate of macrophage activation.
1	0	0	isoamylase complex	A protein complex whose composition varies amongst species; in rice it probably exists in a homo-tetramer to homo-hexamer form and in Gram-negative bacteria as a dimer. Functions in the hydrolysis of alpha-(1,6)-D-glucosidic branch linkages.
1	1	12	costamere	Regular periodic sub membranous arrays of vinculin in skeletal and cardiac muscle cells, these arrays link Z-discs to the sarcolemma and are associated with links to extracellular matrix.
0	1	0	chromatin insulator sequence binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently and stoichiometrically with a chromatin insulator sequence, a DNA sequence that prevents enhancer-mediated activation or repression of transcription.
1	0	0	tRNA aminoacylation	The chemical reactions and pathways by which the various amino acids become bonded to their corresponding tRNAs. The most common route for synthesis of aminoacyl tRNA is by the formation of an ester bond between the 3'-hydroxyl group of the most 3' adenosine of the tRNA and the alpha carboxylic acid  group of an amino acid, usually catalyzed by the cognate aminoacyl-tRNA ligase. A given aminoacyl-tRNA ligase aminoacylates all species of an isoaccepting group of tRNA molecules.
7	13	11	ATP-dependent chromatin remodeling	Dynamic structural changes to eukaryotic chromatin that require energy from the hydrolysis of ATP, ranging from local changes necessary for transcriptional regulation to global changes necessary for chromosome segregation, mediated by ATP-dependent chromatin-remodelling factors.
0	1	1	DNA methylation involved in embryo development	The covalent transfer of a methyl group to C-5 of cytosine that contributes to the epigenetic regulation of embryonic gene expression.
2	1	0	DNA methylation involved in gamete generation	The covalent transfer of a methyl group to C-5 of cytosine that contributes to the establishment of DNA methylation patterns in the gamete.
1	1	1	single-stranded telomeric DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with single-stranded telomere-associated DNA.
0	1	0	otic placode formation	The initial developmental process that will lead to the formation of the vertebrate inner ear. The otic placode forms as a thickening of the head ectoderm adjacent to the developing hindbrain.
1	0	0	intercellular bridge organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the intracellular bridge. An intracellular bridge is a direct link between the cytoplasms of sister cells that allows cells to communicate with one another.
43	63	59	positive regulation of apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell death by apoptotic process.
65	72	70	negative regulation of apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell death by apoptotic process.
0	1	2	regulation of programmed cell death	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of programmed cell death, cell death resulting from activation of endogenous cellular processes.
1	1	3	positive regulation of programmed cell death	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of programmed cell death, cell death resulting from activation of endogenous cellular processes.
3	1	3	negative regulation of programmed cell death	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of programmed cell death, cell death resulting from activation of endogenous cellular processes.
2	2	2	synaptic cleft	The narrow gap that separates the presynaptic and postsynaptic membranes, into which neurotransmitter is released.
1	0	0	penile erection	The hardening, enlarging and rising of the penis which often occurs in the sexually aroused male and enables sexual intercourse. Achieved by increased inflow of blood into the vessels of erectile tissue, and decreased outflow.
5	6	3	positive regulation of catalytic activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of an enzyme.
3	4	5	negative regulation of catalytic activity	Any process that stops or reduces the activity of an enzyme.
16	19	13	regulation of GTPase activity	Any process that modulates the rate of GTP hydrolysis by a GTPase.
2	2	1	pyrimidine nucleoside salvage	Any process that generates a pyrimidine nucleoside, one of a family of organic molecules consisting of a pyrimidine base covalently bonded to a sugar ribose, from derivatives of it, without de novo synthesis.
2	3	0	purine-containing compound salvage	Any process that generates a purine-containing compound, any nucleobase, nucleoside, nucleotide or nucleic acid that contains a purine base, from derivatives of them without de novo synthesis.
2	0	0	replication fork arrest	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA replication by impeding the progress of the DNA replication fork. Replication fork arrest is one of the 'quality control' processes ensuring that DNA-dependent DNA replication occurs correctly. DNA replication fork arrest during DNA-dependent DNA replication is not known to occur outside of cases where a replication error needs to be prevented or corrected.
4	6	7	receptor clustering	The receptor metabolic process that results in grouping of a set of receptors at a cellular location, often to amplify the sensitivity of a signaling response.
1	3	0	regulation of vascular permeability	Any process that modulates the extent to which blood vessels can be pervaded by fluid.
2	2	2	negative regulation of vascular permeability	Any process that reduces the extent to which blood vessels can be pervaded by fluid.
0	1	0	positive regulation of vascular permeability	Any process that increases the extent to which blood vessels can be pervaded by fluid.
0	2	0	tumor necrosis factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with tumor necrosis factor, a proinflammatory cytokine produced by monocytes and macrophages.
0	1	1	neurotrophin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a neurotrophin, any of a family of growth factors that prevent apoptosis in neurons and promote nerve growth.
4	2	5	regulation of I-kappaB kinase/NF-kappaB signaling	Any process that modulates I-kappaB kinase/NF-kappaB signaling.
18	26	21	positive regulation of I-kappaB kinase/NF-kappaB signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of I-kappaB kinase/NF-kappaB signaling.
9	8	5	negative regulation of I-kappaB kinase/NF-kappaB signaling	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of -kappaB kinase/NF-kappaB signaling.
1	3	0	ErbB-3 class receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the protein-tyrosine kinase receptor ErbB-3/HER3.
0	1	0	positive regulation of 1-phosphatidylinositol 4-kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of 1-phosphatidylinositol 4-kinase.
2	0	0	surfactant homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of a steady-state level of the surface-active lipoprotein mixture which coats the alveoli.
10	22	13	ubiquitin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ubiquitin, a protein that when covalently bound to other cellular proteins marks them for proteolytic degradation.
2	1	0	DNA replication, removal of RNA primer	Removal of the Okazaki RNA primer from the lagging strand of replicating DNA, by a combination of the actions of DNA polymerase, DNA helicase and an endonuclease.
2	5	0	3'-5' DNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; drives the unwinding of the DNA helix in the direction 3' to 5'.
1	1	1	5'-3' DNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate; drives the unwinding of the DNA helix in the direction 5' to 3'.
3	4	6	stress fiber assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a stress fiber. A stress fiber is a contractile actin filament bundle that consists of short actin filaments with alternating polarity.
0	0	2	induction of bacterial agglutination	Any process in which infecting bacteria are clumped together by a host organism.
4	4	4	entrainment of circadian clock by photoperiod	The synchronization of a circadian rhythm to photoperiod, the intermittent cycle of light (day) and dark (night).
10	5	8	negative regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in the apoptotic process.
23	27	26	proteasome-mediated ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of ubiquitin, and mediated by the proteasome.
2	7	1	ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process via the multivesicular body sorting pathway	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide covalently tagged with ubiquitin, via the multivesicular body (MVB) sorting pathway; ubiquitin-tagged proteins are sorted into MVBs, and delivered to a lysosome/vacuole for degradation.
0	1	0	cell envelope organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the cell envelope, everything external to, but not including, the cytoplasmic membrane of bacteria, encompassing the periplasmic space, cell wall, and outer membrane if present.
0	0	1	cation binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cations, charged atoms or groups of atoms with a net positive charge.
1	0	0	macromolecule metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving macromolecules, any molecule of high relative molecular mass, the structure of which essentially comprises the multiple repetition of units derived, actually or conceptually, from molecules of low relative molecular mass.
4	3	0	peptide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of peptides, compounds of 2 or more (but usually less than 100) amino acids where the alpha carboxyl group of one is bound to the alpha amino group of another.
0	0	1	RNA polymerase core enzyme binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA polymerase core enzyme, containing a specific subunit composition defined as the core enzyme.
0	4	3	organic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an organic acid, any acidic compound containing carbon in covalent linkage.
0	0	1	vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 1.
3	1	3	vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 2 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 2.
2	3	2	P granule	A small cytoplasmic, non-membranous RNA/protein complex aggregates in the primordial germ cells of many higher eukaryotes.
2	0	0	ATP-binding cassette (ABC) transporter complex	A complex for the transport of metabolites into and out of the cell, typically comprised of four domains; two membrane-associated domains and two ATP-binding domains at the intracellular face of the membrane, that form a central pore through the plasma membrane. Each of the four core domains may be encoded as a separate polypeptide or the domains can be fused in any one of a number of ways into multidomain polypeptides. In Bacteria and Archaebacteria, ABC transporters also include substrate binding proteins to bind substrate external to the cytoplasm and deliver it to the transporter.
1	0	5	axon initial segment	Portion of the axon proximal to the neuronal cell body, at the level of the axon hillock. The action potentials that propagate along the axon are generated at the level of this initial segment.
5	2	10	terminal bouton	Terminal inflated portion of the axon, containing the specialized apparatus necessary to release neurotransmitters. The axon terminus is considered to be the whole region of thickening and the terminal bouton is a specialized region of it.
1	0	1	varicosity	Non-terminal inflated portion of the axon, containing the specialized apparatus necessary to release neurotransmitters.
17	19	40	dendritic spine	A small, membranous protrusion from a dendrite that forms a postsynaptic compartment, typically receiving input from a single presynapse.  They function as partially isolated biochemical and an electrical compartments. Spine morphology is variable:they can be thin, stubby, mushroom, or  branched, with a continuum of intermediate morphologies. They typically terminate in a bulb shape, linked to the dendritic shaft by a restriction. Spine remodeling is though to be involved in synaptic plasticity.
7	1	7	dendritic shaft	Cylindric portion of the dendrite, directly stemming from the perikaryon, and carrying the dendritic spines.
0	1	0	sulfate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with sulfate, SO4(2-), a negatively charged small molecule.
3	4	4	response to amino acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an amino acid stimulus. An amino acid is a carboxylic acids containing one or more amino groups.
0	1	0	response to leucine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a leucine stimulus.
8	10	4	lysosomal lumen	The volume enclosed within the lysosomal membrane.
3	0	2	axon hillock	Portion of the neuronal cell soma from which the axon originates.
9	11	34	perikaryon	The portion of the cell soma (neuronal cell body) that excludes the nucleus.
0	0	1	glycosphingolipid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with glycosphingolipid, a compound with residues of sphingoid and at least one monosaccharide.
6	2	12	myelin sheath	An electrically insulating fatty layer that surrounds the axons of many neurons. It is an outgrowth of glial cells: Schwann cells supply the myelin for peripheral neurons while oligodendrocytes supply it to those of the central nervous system.
0	1	1	myelin maintenance	The process of preserving the structure and function of mature myelin. This includes maintaining the compact structure of myelin necessary for its electrical insulating characteristics as well as the structure of non-compact regions such as Schmidt-Lantermann clefts and paranodal loops. This does not include processes responsible for maintaining the nodes of Ranvier, which are not part of the myelin sheath.
0	0	2	compact myelin	The portion of the myelin sheath in which layers of cell membrane are tightly juxtaposed, completely excluding cytoplasm. The juxtaposed cytoplasmic surfaces form the major dense line, while the juxtaposed extracellular surfaces form the interperiod line visible in electron micrographs.
0	1	2	lateral loop	Non-compact myelin located adjacent to the nodes of Ranvier in a myelin segment. These non-compact regions include cytoplasm from the cell responsible for synthesizing the myelin. Lateral loops are found in the paranodal region adjacent to the nodes of Ranvier, while Schmidt-Lantermann clefts are analogous structures found within the compact myelin internode.
1	2	2	Schmidt-Lanterman incisure	Regions within compact myelin in which the cytoplasmic faces of the enveloping myelin sheath are not tightly juxtaposed, and include cytoplasm from the cell responsible for making the myelin. Schmidt-Lanterman incisures occur in the compact myelin internode, while lateral loops are analogous structures found in the paranodal region adjacent to the nodes of Ranvier.
0	1	0	membrane-bounded organelle	Organized structure of distinctive morphology and function, bounded by a single or double lipid bilayer membrane. Includes the nucleus, mitochondria, plastids, vacuoles, and vesicles. Excludes the plasma membrane.
1	1	1	intracellular organelle	Organized structure of distinctive morphology and function, occurring within the cell. Includes the nucleus, mitochondria, plastids, vacuoles, vesicles, ribosomes and the cytoskeleton. Excludes the plasma membrane.
123	131	116	intracellular membrane-bounded organelle	Organized structure of distinctive morphology and function, bounded by a single or double lipid bilayer membrane and occurring within the cell. Includes the nucleus, mitochondria, plastids, vacuoles, and vesicles. Excludes the plasma membrane.
32	17	12	receptor complex	Any protein complex that undergoes combination with a hormone, neurotransmitter, drug or intracellular messenger to initiate a change in cell function.
7	6	2	laminin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with laminins, glycoproteins that are major constituents of the basement membrane of cells.
2	0	0	laminin-1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with laminin-1, a glycoprotein trimer with the subunit composition alpha1, beta1, gamma1.
0	0	1	Fanconi anaemia nuclear complex	A protein complex composed of the Fanconi anaemia (FA) proteins including A, C, E, G and F (FANCA-F). Functions in the activation of the downstream protein FANCD2 by monoubiquitylation, and is essential for protection against chromosome breakage.
0	1	0	negative regulation of protein-containing complex disassembly	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein complex disassembly, the disaggregation of a protein complex into its constituent components.
2	0	1	positive regulation of protein-containing complex disassembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein complex disassembly, the disaggregation of a protein complex into its constituent components.
0	2	0	telomere maintenance in response to DNA damage	Any process that occur in response to the presence of critically short or damaged telomeres.
3	2	0	proteasome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a mature, active proteasome complex.
1	2	2	erythrocyte maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for an erythrocyte to attain its fully functional state.
0	2	0	sodium-independent organic anion transport	The directed, sodium-independent, movement of organic anions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
3	4	4	regulation of protein-containing complex assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein complex assembly.
1	1	0	laminin complex	A large, extracellular glycoprotein complex composed of three different polypeptide chains, alpha, beta and gamma. Provides an integral part of the structural scaffolding of basement membranes.
1	0	0	laminin-8 complex	A laminin complex composed of alpha4, beta1 and gamma1 polypeptide chains.
1	2	0	laminin-10 complex	A laminin complex composed of alpha5, beta1 and gamma1 polypeptide chains.
0	3	0	laminin-11 complex	A laminin complex composed of alpha5, beta2 and gamma1 polypeptide chains.
1	0	0	ectoplasm	Granule free cytoplasm, lying immediately below the plasma membrane.
0	0	1	regulation of potassium ion transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of potassium ions (K+) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	1	negative regulation of potassium ion transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of potassium ions (K+) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	6	positive regulation of potassium ion transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of potassium ions (K+) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	regulation of ion transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of charged atoms or small charged molecules into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	CTPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CTP + H2O = CDP + phosphate. May or may not be coupled to another reaction.
2	6	4	phospholipase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any phospholipase, enzymes that catalyze of the hydrolysis of a glycerophospholipid.
0	3	4	anoikis	Apoptosis triggered by inadequate or inappropriate adherence to substrate e.g. after disruption of the interactions between normal epithelial cells and the extracellular matrix.
3	3	2	apoptotic cell clearance	The recognition and removal of an apoptotic cell by a neighboring cell or by a phagocyte.
1	4	5	response to morphine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a morphine stimulus. Morphine is an opioid alkaloid, isolated from opium, with a complex ring structure.
1	1	2	response to alkaloid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an alkaloid stimulus. Alkaloids are a large group of nitrogenous substances found in naturally in plants, many of which have extracts that are pharmacologically active.
7	10	3	positive regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the activity of a cysteine-type endopeptidase involved in the apoptotic process.
1	2	0	regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the activity of a cysteine-type endopeptidase involved in apoptosis.
0	0	2	RAVE complex	A multisubunit complex that in Saccharomyces is composed of three subunits, Rav1p, Rav2p and Skp1p. Acts transiently to catalyze assembly of cytoplasmic V1, with membrane embedded V0 to form the V-ATPase holoenzyme.
0	0	1	contractile fiber	Fibers, composed of actin, myosin, and associated proteins, found in cells of smooth or striated muscle.
1	0	1	glutathione binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with glutathione; a tripeptide composed of the three amino acids cysteine, glutamic acid and glycine.
3	7	5	apical junction complex	A functional unit located near the cell apex at the points of contact between epithelial cells, which in vertebrates is composed of the tight junction, the zonula adherens, and desmosomes and in some invertebrates, such as Drosophila, is composed of the subapical complex (SAC), the zonula adherens and the septate junction. Functions in the regulation of cell polarity, tissue integrity and intercellular adhesion and permeability.
1	0	4	apical junction assembly	The formation of an apical junction, a functional unit located near the cell apex at the points of contact between epithelial cells composed of the tight junction, the zonula adherens junction and the desmosomes, by the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of its constituents.
0	1	0	leukocyte degranulation	The regulated exocytosis of secretory granules by a leukocyte.
4	3	2	mast cell degranulation	The regulated exocytosis of secretory granules containing preformed mediators such as histamine, serotonin, and neutral proteases by a mast cell.
1	2	3	regulation of mast cell degranulation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of mast cell degranulation.
1	1	0	negative regulation of mast cell degranulation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of mast cell degranulation.
2	1	3	positive regulation of mast cell degranulation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mast cell degranulation.
0	1	1	eosinophil degranulation	The regulated exocytosis of secretory granules containing preformed mediators such as major basic protein, eosinophil peroxidase, and eosinophil cationic protein by an eosinophil.
0	1	0	positive regulation of eosinophil degranulation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of eosinophil degranulation.
73	91	86	neutrophil degranulation	The regulated exocytosis of secretory granules containing preformed mediators such as proteases, lipases, and inflammatory mediators by a neutrophil.
1	1	0	regulation of neutrophil degranulation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of neutrophil degranulation.
0	2	0	positive regulation of neutrophil degranulation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neutrophil degranulation.
0	1	0	cytotoxic T cell degranulation	The regulated exocytosis of secretory granules containing preformed mediators such as perforin and granzymes by a cytotoxic T cell.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cytotoxic T cell degranulation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of cytotoxic T cell degranulation.
0	4	0	natural killer cell degranulation	The regulated exocytosis of secretory granules containing preformed mediators such as perforin and granzymes by a natural killer cell.
0	1	1	positive regulation of natural killer cell degranulation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell degranulation.
4	6	4	phosphatidylinositol-3,4-bisphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol-3,4-bisphosphate, a derivative of phosphatidylinositol in which the inositol ring is phosphorylated at the 3' and 4' positions.
1	0	0	protein transport to vacuole involved in ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process via the multivesicular body sorting pathway	The process of directing proteins towards the vacuole that contributes to protein catabolism via the multivesicular body (MVB) pathway.
1	2	4	response to exogenous dsRNA	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an exogenous double-stranded RNA stimulus.
1	0	0	2-octaprenyl-6-methoxy-1,4-benzoquinone methylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-octaprenyl-6-methoxy-1,4-benzoquinone + S-adenosyl-L-methionine = 2-octaprenyl-3-methyl-6-methoxy-1,4-benzoquinone + S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine.
0	0	2	protein unfolding	The process of assisting in the disassembly of non-covalent linkages in a protein or protein aggregate, often where the proteins are in a non-functional or denatured state.
0	1	0	enucleate erythrocyte differentiation	The process in which a myeloid precursor cell acquires specialized features of an erythrocyte without a nucleus. An example of this process is found in Mus musculus.
1	1	0	beta selection	The process in which successful recombination of a T cell receptor beta chain into a translatable protein coding sequence leads to rescue from apoptosis and subsequent proliferation of an immature T cell.
0	2	0	positive T cell selection	The process of sparing immature T cells which react with self-MHC protein complexes with low affinity levels from apoptotic death.
1	0	0	regulation of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation.
1	1	1	negative regulation of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation.
1	0	0	CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell lineage commitment	The process in which an immature T cell becomes committed to becoming a CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell.
2	1	0	positive regulation of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell differentiation.
0	1	0	memory T cell differentiation	The process in which a newly activated T cell acquires specialized features of a memory T cell.
0	0	1	regulation of memory T cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of memory T cell differentiation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of memory T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of memory T cell differentiation.
0	1	0	negative T cell selection	The process of elimination of immature T cells which react strongly with self-antigens.
7	2	5	positive regulation of DNA binding	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA binding. DNA binding is any process in which a gene product interacts selectively with DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid).
2	4	9	negative regulation of DNA binding	Any process that stops or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA binding. DNA binding is any process in which a gene product interacts selectively with DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid).
4	4	4	regulation of protein binding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein binding.
3	2	2	proteoglycan binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a proteoglycan, any glycoprotein in which the carbohydrate units are glycosaminoglycans.
5	0	2	heparan sulfate proteoglycan binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a heparan sulfate proteoglycan, any proteoglycan containing heparan sulfate as the glycosaminoglycan carbohydrate unit.
1	2	0	HLH domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with Helix Loop Helix, a domain of 40-50 residues that occurs in specific DNA-binding proteins that act as transcription factors. The domain is formed of two amphipathic helices joined by a variable length linker region that can form a loop and it mediates protein dimerization.
4	1	2	skeletal muscle tissue regeneration	The regrowth of skeletal muscle tissue to repair injured or damaged muscle fibers in the postnatal stage.
0	3	1	regulation of MAP kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of MAP kinase activity.
7	8	6	positive regulation of MAP kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of MAP kinase activity.
9	5	4	negative regulation of MAP kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of MAP kinase activity.
2	1	1	regulation of MAPK cascade	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the MAP kinase (MAPK) cascade.
3	5	3	negative regulation of MAPK cascade	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the MAPKKK cascade.
16	10	9	positive regulation of MAPK cascade	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the MAPK cascade.
1	0	0	positive regulation of skeletal muscle tissue regeneration	Any process that activates or increase the rate of skeletal muscle regeneration.
1	0	0	homocysteine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of homocysteine, the amino acid alpha-amino-gamma-mercaptobutanoic acid.
1	1	0	anthranilate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving anthranilate (2-aminobenzoate).
0	5	1	protein kinase B binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with protein kinase B, an intracellular kinase that is important in regulating glucose metabolism.
0	1	0	3-phosphoinositide-dependent protein kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a 3-phosphoinositide-dependent protein kinase.
5	4	0	bHLH transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any of the basic Helix-Loop-Helix (bHLH) superfamily of transcription factors, important regulatory components in transcriptional networks of many developmental pathways.
2	0	2	MRF binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with Myogenic Regulatory Factor (MRF), a member of the basic Helix-Loop-Helix (bHLH) superfamily of transcription factors.
1	0	0	2-decaprenyl-6-methoxy-1,4-benzoquinone methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-decaprenyl-6-methoxy-1,4-benzoquinone + S-adenosyl-L-methionine = 2-decaprenyl-3-methyl-6-methoxy-1,4-benzoquinone + S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine.
6	9	6	negative regulation of DNA-binding transcription factor activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of a transcription factor, any factor involved in the initiation or regulation of transcription.
11	7	6	response to peptide hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a peptide hormone stimulus. A peptide hormone is any of a class of peptides that are secreted into the blood stream and have endocrine functions in living animals.
0	0	2	regulation of pentose-phosphate shunt	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the pentose-phosphate shunt, the process in which glucose is oxidized, coupled to NADPH synthesis.
1	1	1	regulation of cellular respiration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular respiration, the enzymatic release of energy from organic compounds.
0	1	3	regulation of ATPase activity	Any process that modulates the rate of ATP hydrolysis by an ATPase.
4	5	1	pigmentation	The accumulation of pigment in an organism, tissue or cell, either by increased deposition or by increased number of cells.
0	2	0	cellular pigment accumulation	The aggregation of coloring matter in a particular location in a cell, occurring in response to some external stimulus.
7	8	12	regulation of RNA splicing	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of RNA splicing, the process of removing sections of the primary RNA transcript to remove sequences not present in the mature form of the RNA and joining the remaining sections to form the mature form of the RNA.
2	2	1	histone exchange	The replacement, within chromatin, of resident histones or histone subunits with alternative, sometimes variant, histones or subunits.
16	25	39	regulation of mRNA stability	Any process that modulates the propensity of mRNA molecules to degradation. Includes processes that both stabilize and destabilize mRNAs.
1	1	0	RNA stabilization	Prevention of degradation of RNA molecules.
6	4	5	protein kinase B signaling	A series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase B (also called AKT), which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
1	2	4	protein-membrane adaptor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that brings together a protein or a protein complex with a membrane, or bringing together two membranes, either via membrane lipid binding or by interacting with a membrane protein, to establish or maintain the localization of the protein, protein complex or organelle.
0	1	1	skeletal muscle fiber adaptation	Any process in which the skeletal muscle fibers change their phenotypic profiles in response to altered functional demands and a variety of signals. Muscle fibers are formed by the maturation of myotubes. They can be classed as slow, intermediate/fast or fast.
1	2	1	mitochondrial DNA repair	The process of restoring mitochondrial DNA after damage.
1	0	0	regulation of JUN kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of JUN kinase activity.
3	8	3	positive regulation of JUN kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of JUN kinase activity.
2	2	1	negative regulation of JUN kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of JUN kinase activity.
1	0	0	interleukin-12 complex	A protein complex that is composed of an interleukin-12 alpha (p35, product of the IL12A gene) and an interleukin-12 beta subunit (p40, product of the IL12B gene) and is secreted into the extracellular space.
2	1	1	kinetochore binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a kinetochore, a proteinaceous structure on a condensed chromosome, beside the centromere, to which the spindle fibers are attached.
1	1	0	regulation of DNA damage response, signal transduction by p53 class mediator	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the cascade of processes induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53, or an equivalent protein, in response to the detection of DNA damage.
1	2	2	positive regulation of DNA damage response, signal transduction by p53 class mediator	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of the cascade of processes induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53, or an equivalent protein, in response to the detection of DNA damage.
2	2	3	negative regulation of DNA damage response, signal transduction by p53 class mediator	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the cascade of processes induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53, or an equivalent protein, in response to the detection of DNA damage.
1	0	0	regulation of myosin II filament organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a bipolar filament composed of myosin II molecules.
2	1	2	leucine zipper domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a leucine zipper domain, a protein secondary structure exhibiting a periodic repetition of leucine residues at every seventh position over a distance covering eight helical turns.
1	3	3	regulation of neuron apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the occurrence or rate of cell death by apoptotic process in neurons.
18	20	13	negative regulation of neuron apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell death by apoptotic process in neurons.
7	10	6	positive regulation of neuron apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell death of neurons by apoptotic process.
0	1	0	tRNA methyltransferase complex	A multimeric protein complex involved in the methylation of specific nucleotides in tRNA.
0	0	1	adenosine 5'-monophosphoramidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: adenosine 5'-monophosphoramidate = AMP + NH2. Other substrates include AMP-morpholidate, AMP-N-alanine methyl ester and AMP-alpha-acetyl lysine methyl ester.
3	7	12	ADP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ADP, adenosine 5'-diphosphate.
0	0	3	angiostatin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with angiostatin, a proteolytic product of plasminogen or plasmin containing at least one intact kringle domain, and which is an inhibitor of angiogenesis.
0	0	2	inositol 1,3,4,5 tetrakisphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with inositol 1,3,4,5 tetrakisphosphate.
1	2	1	blood vessel endothelial cell migration	The orderly movement of an endothelial cell into the extracellular matrix in order to form new blood vessels during angiogenesis.
1	2	1	regulation of blood vessel endothelial cell migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the migration of the endothelial cells of blood vessels.
6	6	9	positive regulation of blood vessel endothelial cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the migration of the endothelial cells of blood vessels.
2	3	5	negative regulation of blood vessel endothelial cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the migration of the endothelial cells of blood vessels.
0	1	0	regulation of actin phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the transfer of one or more phosphate groups to an actin molecule.
1	6	9	protein serine/threonine kinase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a protein serine/threonine kinase.
5	3	3	endothelial cell migration	The orderly movement of an endothelial cell into the extracellular matrix to form an endothelium.
0	1	0	molybdopterin cofactor metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving the molybdopterin cofactor (Moco), essential for the catalytic activity of some enzymes, e.g. sulfite oxidase, xanthine dehydrogenase, and aldehyde oxidase. The cofactor consists of a mononuclear molybdenum (Mo-molybdopterin) or tungsten ion (W-molybdopterin) coordinated by one or two molybdopterin ligands.
1	0	1	molybdopterin cofactor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the molybdopterin cofactor (Moco), essential for the catalytic activity of some enzymes, e.g. sulfite oxidase, xanthine dehydrogenase, and aldehyde oxidase. The cofactor consists of a mononuclear molybdenum (Mo-molybdopterin) or tungsten ion (W-molybdopterin) coordinated by one or two molybdopterin ligands.
26	50	41	positive regulation of GTPase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of a GTPase.
5	4	5	phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase, any enzyme that catalyzes the addition of a phosphate group to an inositol lipid at the 3' position of the inositol ring.
1	0	0	regulation of kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of kinase activity, the catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a substrate molecule.
0	3	1	regulation of lipid kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of lipid kinase activity, the catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a simple or complex lipid.
1	2	0	regulation of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase activity, the catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to an inositol lipid at the 3' position of the inositol ring.
4	5	3	positive regulation of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase activity.
2	1	0	negative regulation of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase activity.
0	0	2	regulation of translation in response to stress	Modulation of the frequency, rate or extent of translation as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress. The stress is usually, but not necessarily, exogenous (e.g. temperature, humidity, ionizing radiation).
2	1	1	insulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with insulin, a polypeptide hormone produced by the islets of Langerhans of the pancreas in mammals, and by the homologous organs of other organisms.
4	2	2	insulin receptor substrate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any of the insulin receptor substrate (IRS) proteins, adaptor proteins that bind to the transphosphorylated insulin and insulin-like growth factor receptors, are themselves phosphorylated and in turn recruit SH2 domain-containing signaling molecules to form a productive signaling complex.
1	0	1	Ku70:Ku80 complex	Heterodimeric protein complex composed of a 70 kDa and a 80 kDa subunit, binds DNA through a channel formed by the heterodimer. Functions in DNA double stranded break repair, chromosome maintenance, transcription regulation, V(D)J recombination, and activation of DNA-PK.
32	31	12	sequence-specific DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with DNA of a specific nucleotide composition, e.g. GC-rich DNA binding, or with a specific sequence motif or type of DNA e.g. promotor binding or rDNA binding.
1	3	0	regulation of insulin-like growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of insulin-like growth factor receptor signaling.
1	1	1	positive regulation of insulin-like growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of insulin-like growth factor receptor signaling.
1	0	0	negative regulation of insulin-like growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of insulin-like growth factor receptor signaling.
1	1	0	maintenance of DNA repeat elements	Any process involved in sustaining the fidelity and copy number of DNA repeat elements.
1	0	0	regulation of respiratory gaseous exchange	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the process of gaseous exchange between an organism and its environment.
1	2	0	ear development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the ear over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The ear is the sense organ in vertebrates that is specialized for the detection of sound, and the maintenance of balance. Includes the outer ear and middle ear, which collect and transmit sound waves; and the inner ear, which contains the organs of balance and (except in fish) hearing. Also includes the pinna, the visible part of the outer ear, present in some mammals.
1	1	0	nose development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the nose over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The nose is the specialized structure of the face that serves as the organ of the sense of smell and as part of the respiratory system. Includes the nasi externus (external nose) and cavitas nasi (nasal cavity).
2	0	0	nose morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the nose are generated and organized. The nose is the specialized structure of the face that serves as the organ of the sense of smell and as part of the respiratory system. Includes the nasi externus (external nose) and cavitas nasi (nasal cavity).
2	0	1	tongue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the tongue over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The tongue is the movable, muscular organ on the floor of the mouth of most vertebrates, in many other mammals is the principal organ of taste, aids in the prehension of food, in swallowing, and in modifying the voice as in speech.
3	4	4	skin development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the skin over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The skin is the external membranous integument of an animal. In vertebrates the skin generally consists of two layers, an outer nonsensitive and nonvascular epidermis (cuticle or skarfskin) composed of cells which are constantly growing and multiplying in the deeper, and being thrown off in the superficial layers, as well as an inner vascular dermis (cutis, corium or true skin) composed mostly of connective tissue.
1	4	3	skin morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the skin are generated and organized. The skin is the external membranous integument of an animal. In vertebrates the skin generally consists of two layers, an outer nonsensitive and nonvascular epidermis (cuticle or skarfskin) composed of cells which are constantly growing and multiplying in the deeper, and being thrown off in the superficial layers, as well as an inner, sensitive and vascular dermis (cutis, corium or true skin) composed mostly of connective tissue.
3	3	1	nuclear replication fork	The Y-shaped region of a nuclear replicating DNA molecule, resulting from the separation of the DNA strands and in which the synthesis of new strands takes place. Also includes associated protein complexes.
1	0	0	cellular amide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving an amide, any derivative of an oxoacid in which an acidic hydroxy group has been replaced by an amino or substituted amino group, as carried out by individual cells.
1	0	0	amide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of an amide, any derivative of an oxoacid in which an acidic hydroxy group has been replaced by an amino or substituted amino group.
1	0	0	cellular amide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of an amide, any derivative of an oxoacid in which an acidic hydroxy group has been replaced by an amino or substituted amino group.
0	1	0	regulation of carbohydrate utilization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of carbohydrate utilization.
0	1	0	multi-eIF complex	A multifactor complex composed of multiple translation initiation factors and the initiatior tRNAiMet, which is ready to bind to the small (40S) ribosome to form the 43S preinitiation complex. In S. cerevisiae, this complex is composed of eIF1, eIF2, eIF3, and eIF5.
1	0	0	astrocyte cell migration	The orderly movement of an astrocyte, a class of large neuroglial (macroglial) cells in the central nervous system, the largest and most numerous neuroglial cells in the brain and spinal cord.
0	1	1	keratinocyte proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of keratinocytes, resulting in the expansion of a cell population. Keratinocytes are epidermal cells which synthesize keratin and undergo a characteristic change as they move upward from the basal layers of the epidermis to the cornified (horny) layer of the skin.
1	0	0	regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to stress	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress. The stress is usually, but not necessarily, exogenous (e.g. temperature, humidity, ionizing radiation).
1	1	1	regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to oxidative stress	Modulation of the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under oxidative stress, a state often resulting from exposure to high levels of reactive oxygen species, e.g. superoxide anions, hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), and hydroxyl radicals.
0	0	3	regulation of DNA-templated transcription in response to stress	Modulation of the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from a DNA template as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress. The stress is usually, but not necessarily, exogenous (e.g. temperature, humidity, ionizing radiation).
8	7	13	protein self-association	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a domain within the same polypeptide.
0	0	2	cortical microtubule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of structures formed of microtubules and associated proteins in the cell cortex, i.e. just beneath the plasma membrane of a cell.
0	1	0	delta DNA polymerase complex	A multimeric DNA polymerase enzyme complex which differs in composition amongst species; in humans it is a heterotetramer of four subunits of approximately 125, 50, 68 and 12kDa, while in S. cerevisiae, it has three different subunits which form a heterotrimer, and the active enzyme is a dimer of this heterotrimer. Functions in DNA replication, mismatch repair and excision repair.
0	0	1	PCNA complex	A protein complex composed of three identical PCNA monomers, each comprising two similar domains, which are joined in a head-to-tail arrangement to form a homotrimer. Forms a ring-like structure in solution, with a central hole sufficiently large to accommodate the double helix of DNA. Originally characterized as a DNA sliding clamp for replicative DNA polymerases and as an essential component of the replisome, and has also been shown to be involved in other processes including Okazaki fragment processing, DNA repair, translesion DNA synthesis, DNA methylation, chromatin remodeling and cell cycle regulation.
8	5	9	response to estrogen	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of stimulus by an estrogen, C18 steroid hormones that can stimulate the development of female sexual characteristics.
0	1	1	RNA polyadenylation	The enzymatic addition of a sequence of adenylyl residues at the 3' end of an RNA molecule.
7	3	7	inositol phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving inositol phosphate, 1,2,3,4,5,6-cyclohexanehexol, with one or more phosphate groups attached.
1	1	1	linoleic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving linoleic acid, an unsaturated omega-6 fatty acid that has the molecular formula C18H32O2.
2	1	2	engulfment of apoptotic cell	The removal of the apoptotic cell by phagocytosis, by a neighboring cell or by a phagocyte.
0	0	5	mitochondrial fragmentation involved in apoptotic process	The change in the morphology of the mitochondria in an apoptotic cell from a highly branched network to a fragmented vesicular form.
1	19	16	host cell	A cell within a host organism. Includes the host plasma membrane and any external encapsulating structures such as the host cell wall and cell envelope.
0	5	3	regulation of phosphoprotein phosphatase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of phosphoprotein phosphatase activity, the catalysis of the hydrolysis of phosphate from a phosphoprotein.
10	4	6	axon terminus	Terminal inflated portion of the axon, containing the specialized apparatus necessary to release neurotransmitters. The axon terminus is considered to be the whole region of thickening and the terminal button is a specialized region of it.
0	1	0	copper transmembrane transporter activity, phosphorylative mechanism	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + Cu2+(in) -> ADP + phosphate + Cu2+(out).
0	0	1	co-translational protein modification	The process of covalently altering one or more amino acids in a protein after translation has begun but before the protein has been released from the ribosome.
42	49	46	post-translational protein modification	The process of covalently altering one or more amino acids in a protein after the protein has been completely translated and released from the ribosome.
2	2	2	reverse cholesterol transport	The directed movement of peripheral cell cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol, towards the liver for catabolism.
0	0	1	cell dedifferentiation	The process in which a specialized cell loses the structural or functional features that characterize it in the mature organism, or some other relatively stable phase of the organism's life history. Under certain conditions, these cells can revert back to the features of the stem cells that were their ancestors.
0	0	1	5-amino-4-imidazole carboxylate lyase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5-aminoimidazole + CO2 = 5-amino-4-imidazole carboxylate.
1	0	0	oxidoreductase activity, oxidizing metal ions with flavin as acceptor	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction in which the oxidation state of metal ion is altered and flavin acts as an electron acceptor.
0	1	0	glyceraldehyde oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: A + D-glyceraldehyde + H2O = (R)-glycerate + AH2 + H(+).
0	1	1	phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate + H2O = phosphatidylinositol + orthophosphate.
0	2	0	glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase (NAD+) (non-phosphorylating) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate + NAD+ + H2O = 3-phospho-D-glycerate + NADH + H+.
0	1	0	modulation by host of viral transcription	Any process in which a host organism modulates the frequency, rate or extent of viral transcription.
2	2	4	negative regulation by host of viral transcription	Any process in which a host organism stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of viral transcription.
2	3	5	positive regulation by host of viral transcription	Any process in which a host organism activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of viral transcription, the synthesis of either RNA on a template of DNA or DNA on a template of RNA.
0	0	1	suramin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with suramin, a naphthalenesulfonic acid compound which is used in the treatment of diseases caused by trypanosomes and worms.
6	5	3	exonucleolytic catabolism of deadenylated mRNA	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the transcript body of a nuclear-transcribed mRNA that occurs when the ends are not protected by the 3'-poly(A) tail.
2	0	0	ossification involved in bone maturation	The formation of bone or of a bony substance, or the conversion of fibrous tissue or of cartilage into bone, involved in the progression of the skeleton from its formation to its mature state.
0	1	0	positive regulation by host of symbiont catalytic activity	Any process in which an organism activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of symbiont enzyme activity. The symbiont is defined as the smaller of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
0	3	3	regulation of cAMP-mediated signaling	Any process which modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cAMP-mediated signaling, a series of molecular signals in which a cell uses cyclic AMP to convert an extracellular signal into a response.
1	1	1	positive regulation of cAMP-mediated signaling	Any process which activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cAMP-mediated signaling, a series of molecular signals in which a cell uses cyclic AMP to convert an extracellular signal into a response.
0	3	3	negative regulation of cAMP-mediated signaling	Any process which stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cAMP-mediated signaling, a series of molecular signals in which a cell uses cyclic AMP to convert an extracellular signal into a response.
1	0	0	3-hydroxypropionyl-CoA dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-hydroxypropionyl-CoA = acrylyl-CoA + H2O.
6	10	2	histone H3 acetylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an acetyl group.
8	10	4	histone H4 acetylation	The modification of histone H4 by the addition of an acetyl group.
1	6	2	histone H2A acetylation	The modification of histone H2A by the addition of an acetyl group.
0	1	1	histone H2B acetylation	The modification of histone H2B by the addition of an acetyl group.
1	0	1	histone H3-K9 acetylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 9 of the histone.
0	3	0	histone H3-K23 acetylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 23 of the histone.
1	0	0	histone H3-K4 acetylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 4 of the histone.
0	0	1	histone H2A-K5 acetylation	The modification of histone H2A by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 5 of the histone.
0	0	1	histone H2B-K12 acetylation	The modification of histone H2B by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 12 of the histone.
2	4	3	histone H4-K5 acetylation	The modification of histone H4 by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 5 of the histone.
2	4	3	histone H4-K8 acetylation	The modification of histone H4 by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 8 of the histone.
0	2	1	histone H4-K12 acetylation	The modification of histone H4 by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 12 of the histone.
3	3	3	histone H4-K16 acetylation	The modification of histone H4 by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 16 of the histone.
2	1	0	histone H4-R3 methylation	The modification of histone H4 by addition of a methyl group to arginine at position 3 of the histone.
0	0	1	histone H3-S10 phosphorylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an phosphate group to a serine residue at position 10 of the histone.
0	0	1	histone H3-S28 phosphorylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an phosphate group to a serine residue at position 28 of the histone.
0	0	2	modulation by symbiont of host process	The process in which a symbiont organism effects a change in the structure or processes of its host organism.
0	1	0	H2B histone acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + histone H2B L-lysine = CoA + histone H2B N6-acetyl-L-lysine.
1	1	0	histone methyltransferase activity (H4-R3 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + (histone H4)-arginine (position 3) = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + (histone H4)-N-methyl-arginine (position 3). This reaction is the addition of a methyl group to arginine at position 3 of histone H4.
0	0	1	hypermethylation of CpG island	An increase in the epigenetic methylation of cytosine and adenosine residues in a CpG island in DNA. CpG islands are genomic regions that contain a high frequency of the CG dinucleotide and are often associated with the transcription start site of genes.
0	0	2	hypomethylation of CpG island	An decrease in the epigenetic methylation of cytosine and adenosine residues in a CpG island in DNA. CpG islands are genomic regions that contain a high frequency of the CG dinucleotide and are often associated with the transcription start site of genes.
4	4	1	regulation of DNA methylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent transfer of a methyl group to either N-6 of adenine or C-5 or N-4 of cytosine.
0	1	0	translocation of peptides or proteins into host cell cytoplasm	The directed movement of peptides or proteins produced by a symbiont organism to a location within the host cell cytoplasm.
0	0	1	regulation of excretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of excretion, the elimination by an organism of the waste products that arise as a result of metabolic activity.
3	1	0	regulation of anion transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of anions, atoms or small molecules with a net negative charge into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	regulation of vacuole organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a vacuole.
0	0	1	positive regulation of vacuole organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a vacuole.
0	0	1	membrane biogenesis	A cellular process that results in the biosynthesis of constituent macromolecules, assembly, and arrangement of constituent parts of a membrane.
0	1	0	L-xylulose reductase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: xylitol + NAD+ = L-xylulose + NADH + H+.
0	1	0	development involved in symbiotic interaction	The progression of an organism from an initial condition to a later condition, occurring when the organism is in a symbiotic interaction.
0	0	1	negative regulation of development of symbiont involved in interaction with host	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the progression of an organism from an initial condition to a later condition, occurring in, on or near the exterior of its host organism.
1	3	1	histone H3-K14 acetylation	The modification of histone H3 by the addition of an acetyl group to a lysine residue at position 14 of the histone.
4	7	14	protein folding chaperone	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex (a complex of two or more proteins that may include other nonprotein molecules) that contributes to the process of protein folding.
0	2	0	cytolytic granule	A specialized secretory lysosome that is present in cells with cytolytic capability such as cytotoxic T lymphocytes and natural killer cells. Cytolytic granules mediate the storage and regulated excretion of lytic molecules for killing of target cells.
0	1	1	'de novo' UMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of UMP, uridine monophosphate, starting with the synthesis of (S)-dihydroorotate from bicarbonate; UMP biosynthesis may either occur via reduction by quinone, NAD(+) or oxygen.
1	0	1	UMP salvage	Any process which produces UMP, uridine monophosphate, from derivatives of it (e.g. cytidine, uridine, cytosine) without de novo synthesis.
1	0	0	'de novo' AMP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of adenosine monophosphate (AMP) from inosine 5'-monophosphate (IMP).
0	1	0	AMP salvage	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of adenosine monophosphate (AMP) from derivatives of it (either adenine, ADP or adenosine 3',5'-bisphosphate) without de novo synthesis.
0	0	1	'de novo' CTP biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cytidine 5'-triphosphate (CTP) from simpler components.
1	0	1	CTP salvage	Any process which produces cytidine 5'-triphosphate (CTP) from derivatives of it, without de novo synthesis.
0	2	0	spanning component of plasma membrane	The component of the plasma membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that have some part that spans both leaflets of the membrane.
0	2	0	other organism cell	A cell of a secondary organism with which the first organism is interacting.
1	0	0	other organism cell membrane	The cell membrane of a secondary organism with which the first organism is interacting.
0	1	5	juxtaparanode region of axon	A region of an axon near a node of Ranvier that is between the paranode and internode regions.
1	0	0	host cell surface	The external part of the host cell wall and/or host plasma membrane.
2	1	2	organelle membrane contact site	A zone of apposition between the membranes of an organelle with another membrane, either another membrane of the same organelle, a membrane of another organelle, or the plasma membrane. Membrane contact sites (MCSs) are structured by bridging complexes. They are specialized for communication, including the efficient traffic of small molecules such as Ca2+ ions and lipids, as well as enzyme-substrate interactions.
2	5	2	mitochondria-associated endoplasmic reticulum membrane	A zone of apposition between endoplasmic-reticulum and mitochondrial membranes, structured by bridging complexes. These contact sites are thought to facilitate inter-organelle calcium and phospholipid exchange.
1	0	1	lipid digestion	The whole of the physical, chemical, and biochemical processes carried out by living organisms to break down ingested lipids into components that may be easily absorbed and directed into metabolism.
1	0	1	cellular lipid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of lipids, as carried out by individual cells.
1	1	0	polysaccharide digestion	The whole of the physical, chemical, and biochemical processes carried out by living organisms to break down ingested polysaccharides into components that may be easily absorbed and directed into metabolism.
3	3	0	cellular lipid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving lipids, as carried out by individual cells.
4	3	0	cellular protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein by individual cells.
1	0	0	intestinal lipid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown into fatty acids and monoglycerides of lipids in the small intestine. Lipids are broken down by lipases released by the pancreas.
0	0	1	cellular carbohydrate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving carbohydrates, any of a group of organic compounds based of the general formula Cx(H2O)y, as carried out by individual cells.
0	1	0	cellular macromolecule catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a macromolecule, any large molecule including proteins, nucleic acids and carbohydrates, as carried out by individual cells.
23	23	28	cellular protein metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a specific protein, rather than of proteins in general, occurring at the level of an individual cell. Includes cellular protein modification.
2	0	0	cell wall disruption in other organism	A process carried out by an organism that results in the breakdown of the cell wall of a second organism.
2	3	8	cell-cell contact zone	Extended zone of intimate apposition between two cells containing one or more types of intercellular junctions, e.g., the intercalated disk of muscle.
0	0	1	dendrite terminus	A structure at the distal end of a dendrite adapted to carry out a specific function, e.g. dendriole.
1	2	3	dendritic growth cone	The migrating motile tip of a growing nerve cell dendrite.
6	7	6	axonal growth cone	The migrating motile tip of a growing nerve cell axon.
7	13	23	cell body	The portion of a cell bearing surface projections such as axons, dendrites, cilia, or flagella that includes the nucleus, but excludes all cell projections.
0	0	1	cell body membrane	The plasma membrane of a cell that bears surface projections such as axons, dendrites, cilia, or flagella, excluding the plasma membrane on cell projections.
1	0	2	cerebellar mossy fiber	An axon arising from cerebellar projecting cells in the cochlea, vestibular nuclei, spinal cord, reticular formation, cerebellar nuclei and basilar pontine nuclei. Mossy fibers enter through all three cerebellar peduncles and send collaterals to the deep cerebellar nuclei, then branch in the white matter and terminate in the granule cell layer. Through this branching, a given mossy fiber can innervate several folia. Mossy fibers synapse on granule cells. The synaptic contacts are made at enlargements along the length of the mossy fiber called mossy fiber rosettes. The enlargements of the rosettes give the axons a mossy-looking appearance in Golgi stained preparations.
1	0	0	climbing fiber	The axon of inferior olive neuron that projects to the cerebellar cortex, largely via the inferior cerebellar peduncle. They range in diameter from 1-3 um and are myelinated until they enter the granule cell layer. They give off collaterals to the deep cerebellar nuclei. They synapse extensively with the dendrites of Purkinje cells in the molecular layer, where each fiber branches repeatedly to climb along the Purkinje cell dendritic tree. Each Purkinje cell is innervated by only a single climbing fiber.
0	1	1	main axon	The main axonal trunk, as opposed to the collaterals; i.e., excluding collaterals, terminal, spines, or dendrites.
3	0	3	calyx of Held	The terminal specialization of a calyciferous axon which forms large synapses in the mammalian auditory central nervous system.
2	2	4	neuron projection terminus	The specialized, terminal region of a neuron projection such as an axon or a dendrite.
0	0	2	dendritic branch	A dendrite arising from another dendrite.
0	0	2	neuron spine	A small membranous protrusion, often ending in a bulbous head and attached to the neuron by a narrow stalk or neck.
1	0	0	protein K6-linked deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a K6-linked ubiquitin chain, i.e. a polymer of ubiquitin formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 6 of the ubiquitin monomers, is removed from a protein.
1	0	0	protein K27-linked ubiquitination	A protein ubiquitination process in which a polymer of ubiquitin, formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 27 of the ubiquitin monomers, is added to a protein.
0	0	1	cone cell pedicle	A specialized axon terminus which is produced by retinal cone cells. Pedicles are large, conical, flat end-feet (8-10 micrometers diameter) of the retinal cone axon that lie more or less side by side on the same plane at the outer edge of the outer plexiform layer (OPL).
3	1	3	wound healing, spreading of cells	The migration of a cell along or through a wound gap that contributes to the reestablishment of a continuous surface.
1	0	1	cellular response to leptin stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a leptin stimulus. Leptin is a hormone manufactured primarily in the adipocytes of white adipose tissue, and the level of circulating leptin is directly proportional to the total amount of fat in the body. It plays a key role in regulating energy intake and energy expenditure, including appetite and metabolism.
1	1	1	response to leptin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a leptin stimulus. Leptin is a hormone manufactured primarily in the adipocytes of white adipose tissue, and the level of circulating leptin is directly proportional to the total amount of fat in the body. It plays a key role in regulating energy intake and energy expenditure, including appetite and metabolism].
2	1	5	endoplasmic reticulum quality control compartment	A subcompartment of the endoplasmic reticulum in which proteins with improper or incorrect folding accumulate. Enzymes in this compartment direct proteins with major folding problems to translocation to the cytosol and degradation, and proteins with minor folding problems to the ER, to interact with chaperon proteins.
8	16	42	ion channel binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with one or more specific sites on an ion channel, a protein complex that spans a membrane and forms a water-filled channel across the phospholipid bilayer allowing selective ion transport down its electrochemical gradient.
0	2	3	dendritic spine neck	Part of the dendritic spine that connects the dendritic shaft to the head of the dendritic spine.
0	2	4	dendritic spine head	Distal part of the dendritic spine, that carries the post-synaptic density.
1	0	0	canonical Wnt signaling pathway involved in positive regulation of endothelial cell migration	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes involved in the positive regulation of endothelial cell migration.
1	0	0	canonical Wnt signaling pathway involved in positive regulation of cell-cell adhesion	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes involved in the positive regulation of cell to cell adhesion.
1	0	0	canonical Wnt signaling pathway involved in positive regulation of wound healing	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes involved in positive regulation of wound healing.
1	0	3	cell-cell adhesion mediated by cadherin	The attachment of one cell to another cell via a cadherin, transmembrane proteins having repeating extracellular calcium ion binding domains.
1	0	1	canonical Wnt signaling pathway involved in positive regulation of epithelial to mesenchymal transition	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes involved in the positive regulation of epithelial cell to mesenchymal cell transition.
1	0	1	canonical Wnt signaling pathway involved in negative regulation of apoptotic process	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes involved in the negative regulation of apoptotic process.
2	3	0	type B pancreatic cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of pancreatic B cells, resulting in the expansion of an pancreatic B cell population. Pancreatic B cell are cells of the pancreas that secrete insulin.
2	7	3	cellular response to fibroblast growth factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an fibroblast growth factor stimulus.
1	2	0	fibroblast apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a fibroblast, a connective tissue cell which secretes an extracellular matrix rich in collagen and other macromolecules.
1	1	2	macropinocytosis	An endocytosis process that results in the uptake of liquid material by cells from their external environment by the 'ruffling' of the cell membrane to form heterogeneously sized intracellular vesicles called macropinosomes, which can be up to 5 micrometers in size.
1	2	1	macropinosome	A membrane-bounded, uncoated intracellular vesicle formed by the process of macropinocytosis.
0	1	0	non-sequence-specific DNA binding, bending	The activity of binding selectively and non-covalently to DNA in a sequence-independent manner and distorting the original structure of DNA, typically a straight helix, into a bend, or increasing the bend if the original structure was intrinsically bent due to its sequence.
0	0	1	protein localization to cytoskeleton	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the cytoskeleton.
1	0	0	glucose import in response to insulin stimulus	The directed movement of the hexose monosaccharide glucose into a cell as a result of an insulin stimulus.
2	0	2	negative regulation of protein kinase activity by regulation of protein phosphorylation	The stopping, prevention, or reduction in frequency, rate or extent of protein kinase activity as a result of regulating the phosphorylation status of that protein kinase.
0	2	0	small protein activating enzyme binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a small protein activating enzyme, such as ubiquitin-activating enzyme.
3	1	4	ubiquitin-like protein ligase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a ubiquitin-like protein ligase, such as ubiquitin-ligase.
1	1	1	ubiquitin-like protein conjugating enzyme binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a ubiquitin-like protein conjugating enzyme such as ubiquitin conjugating enzyme.
0	0	3	microspike	A dynamic, actin-rich projection extending from the surface of a migrating animal cell.
1	1	0	adhesion of symbiont to host	The attachment of a symbiont to its host via adhesion molecules, general stickiness etc., either directly or indirectly. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
0	1	1	entry into host	Entry of a symbiont into the body, tissues, or cells of a host organism as part of the symbiont life cycle. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
2	0	1	motile cilium assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a motile cilium.
0	0	3	supraspliceosomal complex	Multicomponent complex of RNA and proteins that is composed of four active spliceosomes, termed native spliceosomes, connected to each other by the pre-mRNA. The supraspliceosome is the nuclear machine where the pre-mRNA processing takes place, like the 5'-end capping, 3'-end cleavage, splicing and editing.
1	1	1	long-chain fatty acid import into cell	The directed movement of a long-chain fatty acid from outside of a cell into a cell. This may occur via transport across the plasma membrane or via endocytosis. A long-chain fatty acid is a fatty acid with a chain length between C13 and C22.
2	3	1	NSL complex	A histone acetyltransferase complex that catalyzes the acetylation of a histone H4 lysine residues at several positions. In human, it contains the catalytic subunit MOF, NSL1/KIAA1267, NSL2/KANSL2, NSL3/KANSL3, MCRS1, PHF20, OGT1, WDR5 and HCF1.
0	1	3	DNA topoisomerase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DNA topoisomerase.
1	1	6	S100 protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a S100 protein. S100 is a small calcium and zinc binding protein produced in astrocytes that is implicated in Alzheimer's disease, Down Syndrome and ALS.
1	0	0	dendritic cell proliferation	The expansion of a dendritic cell population by cell division. A dendritic cell is a cell of hematopoietic origin, typically resident in particular tissues, specialized in the uptake, processing, and transport of antigens to lymph nodes for the purpose of stimulating an immune response via T cell activation.
4	0	2	17-beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a 17-beta-hydroxysteroid + NAD+ = a 17-oxosteroid + NADH + H+.
5	2	0	daunorubicin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving daunorubicin, a chemotherapeutic of the anthracycline family that is given as a treatment for some types of cancer.
5	2	0	doxorubicin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving doxorubicin, an anthracycline antibiotic, used in cancer chemotherapy.
0	1	1	DBIRD complex	A protein complex that associates with mRNP particles and RNA polymerase II and is proposed to integrate transcript elongation with the regulation of alternative splicing. In humans it is composed of the proteins KIAA1967/DBC1 and ZNF326/ZIRD.
1	1	1	nuclear pore inner ring	A subcomplex of the nuclear pore complex (NPC) that forms the inner rings of the core scaffold, a lattice-like structure that gives the NPC its shape and strength. In S. cerevisiae, the two inner rings are each composed of Nup192p, Nup188p, Nup170p and Nup157p. In vertebrates, the two inner rings are each composed of Nup205, Nup188 and Nup155. Components are arranged in 8-fold symmetrical 'spokes' around the central transport channel. A single 'spoke', can be isolated and is sometimes referred to as the Nup170 complex.
0	3	0	nuclear pore central transport channel	The central substructure of the nuclear pore complex (NPC), through which nucleocytoplasmic transport of RNAs, proteins and small molecules occurs. The central transport channel is filled with FG-nucleoporins, which form a selective barrier and provide a series of binding sites for transporter proteins. Characterized S. cerevisiae FG-nucleoporins include Nup159p, Nup145Np, Nup116p, Nup100p, Nsp1p, Nup57p, Nup49p, Nup42p, Nup53p, Nup59p/Asm4p, Nup60p and Nup1. Characterized vertebrate FG-nucleoporins include Nup214, Nup98, Nup62, Nup54, Nup58/45, NLP1, and Nup153.
0	0	1	nuclear pore cytoplasmic filaments	Filamentous extensions on cytoplasmic face of the nuclear pore complex (NPC). In S. cerevisiae, Nup159p, Nup82p, and Nup42p contribute to the cytoplasmic filaments. In vertebrates, Nup358 is a major component.
0	3	4	nuclear pore nuclear basket	A filamentous, cage-like assembly on the nuclear face of the nuclear pore complex (NPC). In S. cerevisiae, Mlp1p and Mlp2p are two major components of the NPC nuclear basket. In vertebrates, Tpr is a major component.
0	1	4	histone H3-K4 dimethylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of two methyl groups to lysine at position 4 of the histone.
1	0	0	pore formation in membrane of other organism during symbiotic interaction	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components by an organism to form a pore complex in a membrane of another organism, occurring as part of a symbiotic interaction.
2	1	2	MLL3/4 complex	A protein complex that can methylate lysine-4 of histone H3, and which contains either of the protein subunits MLL3 or MLL4 in mammals, or equivalent in other species.
0	0	1	tooth eruption	The tooth development process in which the teeth enter the mouth and become visible.
1	0	0	8-oxo-dGDP phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction 8-oxo-dGDP + H2O = 8-oxo-dGMP + phosphate.
1	0	0	8-oxo-GDP phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction 8-oxo-GDP + H2O = 8-oxo-GMP + phosphate.
0	1	0	protein import into peroxisome matrix, substrate release	The process by which the cargo protein is released into the peroxisomal matrix, following translocation across the membrane.
0	1	0	hemi-methylated DNA-binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded hemi-methylated DNA at replication foci (one strand methylated, while the other strand is unmethylated). Methylation of cytosine or adenine in DNA is an important mechanism for establishing stable heritable epigenetic marks.
0	0	2	amphisome	Intermediate organelles formed during macroautophagy through the fusion between autophagosomes and endosomes.
2	2	3	autolysosome	A type of secondary lysosome in which a primary lysosome has fused with the outer membrane of an autophagosome. It is involved in the second step of autophagy in which it degrades contents with acidic lysosomal hydrolases.
2	0	2	cell cycle phase transition	The cell cycle process by which a cell commits to entering the next cell cycle phase.
4	1	0	mitotic cell cycle phase transition	The cell cycle process by which a cell commits to entering the next mitotic cell cycle phase.
2	0	0	mitotic DNA damage checkpoint	A mitotic cell cycle checkpoint that detects and negatively regulates progression through the cell cycle in response to DNA damage.
2	3	2	cilium organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a cilium, a specialized eukaryotic organelle that consists of a filiform extrusion of the cell surface. Each cilium is bounded by an extrusion of the cytoplasmic membrane, and contains a regular longitudinal array of microtubules, anchored basally in a centriole.
0	0	1	G1 DNA damage checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that detects and negatively regulates progression from G1 to S phase in the cell cycle in response to DNA damage.
0	1	0	negative regulation by host of viral release from host cell	A process in which a host organism stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the release of a virus with which it is infected, from its cells.
1	2	0	positive regulation by host of viral release from host cell	A process in which a host organism activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the release of a virus with which it is infected, from its cells.
0	2	0	negative regulation by host of viral process	A process in which a host organism stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a process being mediated by a virus with which it is infected.
2	0	4	positive regulation by host of viral process	A process in which a host organism activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the release of a process being mediated by a virus with which it is infected.
1	0	0	trans-Golgi network to recycling endosome transport	The directed movement of substances, in membrane-bounded vesicles, from the trans-Golgi network to the recycling endosomes.
0	0	1	multi-organism membrane organization	A process which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a membrane, involving more than one organism.
0	1	0	autophagy of nucleus	A form of autophagy, by which damaged or non-essential parts of the nucleus, or even an entire nucleus is degraded.
2	1	0	late nucleophagy	A type of nucleophagy, distinct from piecemeal microautophagy of the nucleus (PNM) where the nuclear material is delivered to the vacuole/lysosome for breakdown and recycling later than observed for PNM.
0	2	1	G-quadruplex DNA unwinding	The process by which G-quadruplex (also known as G4) DNA, which is a four-stranded DNA structure held together by guanine base pairing, is unwound or 'melted'.
0	2	2	mitotic G2/M transition checkpoint	A cell cycle checkpoint that detects and negatively regulates progression from G2 to M phase as part of a mitotic cell cycle.
0	4	0	negative regulation by host of viral genome replication	A process in which a host organism stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of viral genome replication.
1	3	3	positive regulation by host of viral genome replication	A process in which a host organism activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of  viral genome replication.
1	1	0	modulation by host of viral RNA genome replication	A process in which a host organism modulates the frequency, rate or extent of viral RNA genome replication.
0	1	0	cell cycle G2/M phase transition	The cell cycle process by which a cell in G2 phase commits to M phase.
0	1	0	cell cycle G1/S phase transition	The cell cycle process by which a cell in G1 phase commits to S phase.
0	2	2	estrous cycle	A type of ovulation cycle, which occurs in most mammalian therian females, where the endometrium is resorbed if pregnancy does not occur.
4	5	7	plasma membrane raft	A membrane raft that is part of the plasma membrane.
0	1	0	plasma membrane raft assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a plasma membrane raft.
0	0	1	plasma membrane raft distribution	The process that establishes the spatial arrangement of membrane rafts within a plasma membrane.
1	0	0	plasma membrane raft organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of plasma membrane rafts.
0	0	1	protein localization to plasma membrane raft	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a plasma membrane raft.
2	0	0	protein transport into plasma membrane raft	The directed movement of a protein into a plasma membrane raft.
0	1	0	negative regulation by host of viral exo-alpha-sialidase activity	The process in which a host organism decreases viral exo-alpha-sialidase activity, the catalysis of the hydrolysis of peptide bonds in a protein.
0	1	0	negative regulation by host of viral glycoprotein metabolic process	A process in which a host organism stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of viral glycoprotein metabolic process.
42	56	66	protein-containing complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a macromolecular complex.
1	2	0	mitotic cytokinesis checkpoint	A mitotic cell cycle checkpoint that detects a defect in cytokinesis and prevents further rounds of nuclear division until cytokinesis is completed.
2	0	0	DNA deamination	The removal of an amino group from a nucleotide base in DNA. An example is the deamination of cytosine to produce uracil.
0	2	3	depurination	The disruption of the bond between the sugar in the backbone and the A or G base, causing the base to be removed and leaving a depurinated sugar.
2	2	0	depyrimidination	The disruption of the bond between the sugar in the backbone and the C or T base, causing the base to be removed and leaving a depyrimidinated sugar.
3	4	1	actin nucleation	The initial step in the formation of an actin filament, in which actin monomers combine to form a new filament. Nucleation is slow relative to the subsequent addition of more monomers to extend the filament.
0	0	6	negative regulation of nitric oxide biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nitric oxide.
6	4	2	early endosome to late endosome transport	The directed movement of substances, in membrane-bounded vesicles, from the early sorting endosomes to the late sorting endosomes; transport occurs along microtubules and can be experimentally blocked with microtubule-depolymerizing drugs.
0	0	1	G0 to G1 transition	The mitotic cell cycle phase transition whose occurrence commits the cell from the G0 quiescent state to the G1 phase. Under certain conditions, cells exit the cell cycle during G1 and remain in the G0 state as nongrowing, non-dividing (quiescent) cells. Appropriate stimulation of such cells induces them to return to G1 and resume growth and division. The G0 to G1 transition is accompanied by many changes in the program of gene expression.
0	1	0	mitochondrial degradosome	A mitochondrial protein complex with 3' to 5' exoribonuclease activity that participates in intron-independent turnover and processing of mitochondrial transcripts. In humans, the mitochondrial degradosome is a pentameric complex, and in yeast it exists as a heterodimer.
0	0	1	plasma membrane fusion	The joining of the lipid bilayer membrane that surround a cell with that of another cell, producing a single cell.
1	0	0	DNA end binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the ends of DNA that are exposed by the creation of double-strand breaks (DSBs).
2	0	1	protein insertion into mitochondrial inner membrane	The processes mediating the insertion of proteins into the mitochondrial inner membrane. Mitochondrial inner membrane proteins can get inserted from the cytosol, by crossing the outer membrane and being guided by an inner membrane translocase complex into their final destination in the inner membrane. Some proteins present in the intermembrane space can get inserted into the inner mitochondrial membrane. Finally, some proteins are inserted into the inner membrane from the matrix side of the membrane.
0	0	2	protein insertion into mitochondrial outer membrane	The process comprising the insertion of proteins from outside the organelle into the mitochondrial outer membrane, mediated by large outer membrane translocase complexes.
0	0	2	protein import into mitochondrial intermembrane space	The import of proteins into the space between the inner and outer mitochondrial membranes.
0	2	2	protein import into peroxisome membrane	The targeting of proteins into the peroxisomal membrane. The process is not well understood, but both signals and mechanism differ from those involved in peroxisomal matrix protein import.
1	1	0	protein targeting to ER	The process of directing proteins towards the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) using signals contained within the protein. One common mechanism uses a 16- to 30-residue signal sequence, typically located at the N-terminus of the protein and containing positively charged amino acids followed by a continuous stretch of hydrophobic residues, which directs the ribosome to the ER membrane and initiates transport of the growing polypeptide across the ER membrane.
1	4	4	protein insertion into ER membrane	The process that results in incorporation of a protein into an endoplasmic reticulum (ER) membrane. It depends on specific topogenic sequences of amino acids that ensure that a protein acquires the proper orientation during its insertion into the ER membrane.
2	1	0	protein insertion into ER membrane by stop-transfer membrane-anchor sequence	A process of protein insertion into the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) membrane in which stop-transfer membrane-anchor sequences become an ER membrane spanning helix.
1	1	1	protein retention in Golgi apparatus	The retention of proteins within the Golgi apparatus. Golgi-localized carbohydrate-modifying enzymes have a short N-terminal domain that faces the cytosol, a single transmembrane alpha helix, and a large C-terminal domain that faces the Golgi lumen and that contains the catalytic site. How the membrane-spanning alpha helix in a Golgi enzyme causes its localization and prevents its movement to the plasma membrane is not known.
0	1	1	constitutive secretory pathway	A process of exocytosis found in all eukaryotic cells, in which transport vesicles destined for the plasma membrane leave the trans-Golgi network in a steady stream. Upon exocytosis, the membrane proteins and lipids in these vesicles provide new components for the plasma membrane, and the soluble proteins inside the vesicles are released into the extracellular space.
3	3	6	regulated exocytosis	A process of exocytosis in which soluble proteins and other substances are initially stored in secretory vesicles for later release. It is found mainly in cells that are specialized for secreting products such as hormones, neurotransmitters, or digestive enzymes rapidly on demand.
2	1	3	transcytosis	The directed movement of endocytosed material through the cell and its exocytosis from the plasma membrane at the opposite side.
1	1	4	positive thymic T cell selection	The process of sparing immature T cells in the thymus which react with self-MHC protein complexes with low affinity levels from apoptotic death.
2	0	2	negative thymic T cell selection	The process of elimination of immature T cells in the thymus which react strongly with self-antigens.
1	0	1	thymic T cell selection	The process of T cell selection that occurs in the thymus.
0	1	1	T-helper 1 cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized T cell acquires the specialized features of a T-helper 1 (Th1) cell. A Th1 cell is a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell that has the phenotype T-bet-positive and produces interferon-gamma.
0	1	0	T-helper 2 cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized T cell acquires specialized features of a T-helper 2 (Th2) cell. A Th2 cell is a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell that has the phenotype GATA-3-positive and produces interleukin-4.
1	0	1	regulation of viral genome replication	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of viral genome replication.
3	5	6	positive regulation of viral genome replication	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of viral genome replication.
4	8	4	negative regulation of viral genome replication	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of viral genome replication.
53	65	53	innate immune response	Innate immune responses are defense responses mediated by germline encoded components that directly recognize components of potential pathogens.
4	3	2	regulation of innate immune response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the innate immune response, the organism's first line of defense against infection.
4	4	0	positive regulation of innate immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the innate immune response, the organism's first line of defense against infection.
12	6	11	keratin filament	A filament composed of acidic and basic keratins (types I and II), typically expressed in epithelial cells. The keratins are the most diverse classes of IF proteins, with a large number of keratin isoforms being expressed. Each type of epithelium always expresses a characteristic combination of type I and type II keratins.
2	3	12	intermediate filament cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising intermediate filaments and their associated proteins.
0	0	1	intermediate filament polymerization or depolymerization	Assembly or disassembly of intermediate filaments by the addition or removal of component parts from a filament.
2	2	9	intermediate filament organization	Control of the spatial distribution of intermediate filaments; includes organizing filaments into meshworks, bundles, or other structures, as by cross-linking.
0	0	3	intermediate filament bundle assembly	The formation of the bundles of intermediate filaments. Intermediate filament-associated proteins (IFAPs) cross-link intermediate filaments with one another, forming a bundle or a network, and with other cell structures, including the plasma membrane. The organization of intermediate filaments and their supportive function in various cells types depends in large part on their linkage to other cell structures via IFAPs.
5	12	17	intermediate filament cytoskeleton	Cytoskeletal structure made from intermediate filaments, typically organized in the cytosol as an extended system that stretches from the nuclear envelope to the plasma membrane. Some intermediate filaments run parallel to the cell surface, while others traverse the cytosol; together they form an internal framework that helps support the shape and resilience of the cell.
0	1	0	regulation of integrin biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of integrins.
1	2	0	protein neddylation	Covalent attachment of the ubiquitin-like protein NEDD8 (RUB1) to another protein.
1	1	1	pronucleus	The nucleus of either the ovum or the spermatozoon following fertilization. Thus, in the fertilized ovum, there are two pronuclei, one originating from the ovum, the other from the spermatozoon that brought about fertilization; they approach each other, but do not fuse until just before the first cleavage, when each pronucleus loses its membrane to release its contents.
33	36	45	membrane raft	Any of the small (10-200 nm), heterogeneous, highly dynamic, sterol- and sphingolipid-enriched membrane domains that compartmentalize cellular processes. Small rafts can sometimes be stabilized to form larger platforms through protein-protein and protein-lipid interactions.
0	1	0	cellular extravasation	The migration of a leukocyte from the blood vessels into the surrounding tissue.
1	2	1	regulation of bone resorption	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of bone tissue loss (resorption).
0	0	1	N-acetylglucosamine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-acetyl-D-glucosamine + ATP = N-acetyl-D-glucosamine 6-phosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
1	0	0	pre-mRNA branch point binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a pre-mRNA branch point sequence, located upstream of the 3' splice site.
0	2	1	meiotic chromosome segregation	The process in which genetic material, in the form of chromosomes, is organized into specific structures and then physically separated and apportioned to two or more sets during M phase of the meiotic cell cycle.
0	1	0	development of secondary sexual characteristics	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the secondary sexual characteristics over time, from their formation to the mature structures. In humans, these include growth of axillary, chest, and pubic hair, voice changes, testicular/penile enlargement, breast development and menstrual periods. Development occurs in response to sex hormone secretion.
0	0	1	meiotic telomere clustering	The cell cycle process in which the dynamic reorganization of telomeres occurs in early meiotic prophase, during which meiotic chromosome ends are gathered in a bouquet arrangement at the inner surface of the nuclear envelope proximal to the spindle pole body. This plays an important role in progression through meiosis and precedes synapsis.
0	1	0	triplex DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DNA triple helix. The formation of triple helical DNA has been evoked in several cellular processes including transcription, replication, and recombination.
3	1	2	homologous chromosome segregation	The cell cycle process in which replicated homologous chromosomes are organized and then physically separated and apportioned to two sets during the first division of the meiotic cell cycle. Each replicated chromosome, composed of two sister chromatids, aligns at the cell equator, paired with its homologous partner; this pairing off, referred to as synapsis, permits genetic recombination. One homolog (both sister chromatids) of each morphologic type goes into each of the resulting chromosome sets.
1	0	0	single-stranded DNA 5'-3' exodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of nucleotides (such as mononucleotides or dinucleotides) from a free 5' terminus of a single-stranded DNA molecule.
1	0	0	tripeptide aminopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the release of the N-terminal residue from a tripeptide.
2	2	3	myosin II binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a class II myosin, any member of the class of 'conventional' double-headed myosins that includes muscle myosin.
0	0	1	neuronal ion channel clustering	The process in which voltage-gated ion channels become localized to distinct subcellular domains in the neuron. Specific targeting, clustering, and maintenance of these channels in their respective domains are essential to achieve high conduction velocities of action potential propagation.
1	0	0	clustering of voltage-gated sodium channels	The process in which voltage-gated sodium channels become localized together in high densities. In animals, nodes of Ranvier differ dramatically from internodal axonal regions in very high densities of voltage-dependent sodium (Nav) channels responsible for the rapid, inward ionic currents that produce membrane depolarization.
6	2	4	cell fate commitment	The commitment of cells to specific cell fates and their capacity to differentiate into particular kinds of cells. Positional information is established through protein signals that emanate from a localized source within a cell (the initial one-cell zygote) or within a developmental field.
14	7	11	intercellular bridge	A direct connection between the cytoplasm of two cells that is formed following the completion of cleavage furrow ingression during cell division. They are usually present only briefly prior to completion of cytokinesis. However, in some cases, such as the bridges between germ cells during their development, they become stabilised.
0	1	0	glutathione dehydrogenase (ascorbate) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dehydroascorbate + 2 glutathione = L-ascorbate + glutathione disulfide.
0	0	1	basal protein localization	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, basal regions of the cell.
1	4	2	apical protein localization	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, apical regions of the cell.
11	7	6	apical part of cell	The region of a polarized cell that forms a tip or is distal to a base. For example, in a polarized epithelial cell, the apical region has an exposed surface and lies opposite to the basal lamina that separates the epithelium from other tissue.
3	0	4	basal part of cell	The region of a cell situated near the base. For example, in a polarized epithelial cell, the basal surface rests on the basal lamina that separates the epithelium from other tissue.
3	1	0	apical cortex	The region that lies just beneath the plasma membrane on the apical edge of a cell.
0	3	2	basal cortex	The region that lies just beneath the plasma membrane on the basal edge of a cell.
0	9	3	translation regulator activity	Any molecular function involved in the initiation, activation, perpetuation, repression or termination of polypeptide synthesis at the ribosome.
9	9	5	establishment of protein localization	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location.
0	0	1	maintenance of protein location	Any process in which a protein is maintained in a location and prevented from moving elsewhere. These include sequestration, stabilization to prevent transport elsewhere and the active retrieval of proteins that do move away.
0	1	1	zonula adherens assembly	Assembly of the zonula adherens, a cell-cell adherens junction which forms a continuous belt near the apex of epithelial cells.
1	0	0	regulation of circadian sleep/wake cycle, sleep	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of sleep; a readily reversible state of reduced awareness and metabolic activity that occurs periodically in many animals.
1	2	1	isotype switching	The switching of activated B cells from IgM biosynthesis to biosynthesis of other isotypes of immunoglobulin, accomplished through a recombination process involving an intrachromosomal deletion involving switch regions that reside 5' of each constant region gene segment in the immunoglobulin heavy chain locus.
1	0	0	regulation of isotype switching	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of isotype switching.
2	5	5	establishment or maintenance of epithelial cell apical/basal polarity	Any cellular process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of the apicobasal polarity of an epithelial cell.
1	1	4	establishment of epithelial cell apical/basal polarity	The specification and formation of the apicobasal polarity of an epithelial cell.
0	1	3	maintenance of epithelial cell apical/basal polarity	The maintenance of the apicobasal polarity of an epithelial cell.
0	1	1	establishment of neuroblast polarity	The specification and formation of the apicobasal polarity of a neuroblast cell, a progenitor of the central nervous system.
29	38	76	synapse	The junction between an axon of one neuron and a dendrite of another neuron, a muscle fiber or a glial cell. As the axon approaches the synapse it enlarges into a specialized structure, the presynaptic terminal bouton, which contains mitochondria and synaptic vesicles. At the tip of the terminal bouton is the presynaptic membrane; facing it, and separated from it by a minute cleft (the synaptic cleft) is a specialized area of membrane on the receiving cell, known as the postsynaptic membrane. In response to the arrival of nerve impulses, the presynaptic terminal bouton secretes molecules of neurotransmitters into the synaptic cleft. These diffuse across the cleft and transmit the signal to the postsynaptic membrane.
2	0	0	MAPK export from nucleus	The directed movement of a MAP kinase from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
1	0	0	MAPK phosphatase export from nucleus, leptomycin B sensitive	Leptomycin B-sensitive movement of a MAPK phosphatase from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
8	7	23	postsynaptic membrane	A specialized area of membrane facing the presynaptic membrane on the tip of the nerve ending and separated from it by a minute cleft (the synaptic cleft). Neurotransmitters cross the synaptic cleft and transmit the signal to the postsynaptic membrane.
0	1	0	neurotransmitter receptor metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving neurotransmitter receptors.
6	3	12	sarcomere organization	The myofibril assembly process that results in the organization of muscle actomyosin into sarcomeres. The sarcomere is the repeating unit of a myofibril in a muscle cell, composed of an array of overlapping thick and thin filaments between two adjacent Z discs.
5	5	4	cell-cell junction organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a cell-cell junction. A cell-cell junction is a specialized region of connection between two cells.
1	1	1	cell-cell junction maintenance	The maintenance of junctions between cells.
0	1	2	zonula adherens maintenance	Maintaining the zonula adherens junction, the cell-cell adherens junction formed near the apex of epithelial cells.
1	0	0	negative regulation of FasL production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of FasL.
1	2	0	CXCR chemokine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a chemokine receptor in the CXCR family.
1	0	0	tricarboxylic acid cycle enzyme complex	Any of the heteromeric enzymes that act in the TCA cycle.
0	1	0	succinate-CoA ligase complex (GDP-forming)	A heterodimeric enzyme complex, usually composed of an alpha and beta chain. Functions in the TCA cycle, hydrolyzing succinyl-CoA into succinate and CoA, thereby forming GTP.
0	0	1	oxoglutarate dehydrogenase complex	A complex of multiple copies of three enzymatic components: oxoglutarate dehydrogenase (lipoamide) ; EC:1.2.4.2 (E1), dihydrolipoamide S-succinyltransferase ; EC:2.3.1.61 (E2) and dihydrolipoamide dehydrogenase ; EC:1.8.1.4 (E3); catalyzes the overall conversion of 2-oxoglutarate to succinyl-CoA and carbon dioxide (CO2).
0	1	1	pyruvate dehydrogenase complex	Complex that carries out the oxidative decarboxylation of pyruvate to form acetyl-CoA; comprises subunits possessing three catalytic activities: pyruvate dehydrogenase (E1), dihydrolipoamide S-acetyltransferase (E2), and dihydrolipoamide dehydrogenase (E3).
0	0	2	proton-transporting ATP synthase complex	A proton-transporting two-sector ATPase complex that catalyzes the phosphorylation of ADP to ATP during oxidative phosphorylation. The complex comprises a membrane sector (F0) that carries out proton transport and a cytoplasmic compartment sector (F1) that catalyzes ATP synthesis by a rotational mechanism; the extramembrane sector (containing 3 a and 3 b subunits) is connected via the d-subunit to the membrane sector by several smaller subunits. Within this complex, the g and e subunits and the 9-12 c subunits rotate by consecutive 120 degree angles and perform parts of ATP synthesis. This movement is driven by the hydrogen ion electrochemical potential gradient.
0	0	3	proton-transporting ATP synthase complex, catalytic core F(1)	The sector of a hydrogen-transporting ATP synthase complex in which the catalytic activity resides; it comprises the catalytic core and central stalk, and is peripherally associated with a membrane, such as the plasma membrane or the mitochondrial inner membrane, when the entire ATP synthase is assembled.
1	0	0	proton-transporting ATP synthase complex, coupling factor F(o)	All non-F1 subunits of a hydrogen-transporting ATP synthase, including integral and peripheral membrane proteins.
0	1	0	respiratory chain complex IV	A part of the respiratory chain, containing the 13 polypeptide subunits of cytochrome c oxidase, including cytochrome a and cytochrome a3. Catalyzes the oxidation of reduced cytochrome c by dioxygen (O2).
3	1	3	mRNA cis splicing, via spliceosome	The joining together, after removal of an intervening sequence composed of one or more introns, of two segments of the same RNA molecule via spliceosomal catalysis to produce an mRNA composed only of exon sequences that all came from the same primary transcript.
1	1	5	alpha-catenin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the alpha subunit of the catenin complex.
4	2	1	gamma-catenin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the gamma subunit of the catenin complex.
23	78	132	cadherin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cadherin, a type I membrane protein involved in cell adhesion.
0	0	1	tubulin complex	A heterodimer of tubulins alpha and beta that constitutes the protomer for microtubule assembly.
0	1	1	protein phosphorylated amino acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a phosphorylated amino acid residue within a protein.
0	1	1	leukocyte activation	A change in morphology and behavior of a leukocyte resulting from exposure to a specific antigen, mitogen, cytokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
1	3	2	unmethylated CpG binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with unmethylated CpG motifs. Unmethylated CpG dinucleotides are often associated with gene promoters.
1	3	1	late endosome to vacuole transport	The directed movement of substances from late endosomes to the vacuole. In yeast, after transport to the prevacuolar compartment, endocytic content is delivered to the late endosome and on to the vacuole. This pathway is analogous to endosome to lysosome transport.
1	1	0	carnitine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of carnitine (hydroxy-trimethyl aminobutyric acid), a compound that participates in the transfer of acyl groups across the inner mitochondrial membrane.
2	3	3	phospholipid translocation	The movement of a phospholipid molecule from one leaflet of a membrane bilayer to the opposite leaflet.
2	1	0	cellular respiration	The enzymatic release of energy from inorganic and organic compounds (especially carbohydrates and fats) which either requires oxygen (aerobic respiration) or does not (anaerobic respiration).
0	2	5	clathrin-coated endocytic vesicle	A clathrin-coated, membrane-bounded intracellular vesicle formed by invagination of the plasma membrane around an extracellular substance.
8	15	12	phagocytic vesicle	A membrane-bounded intracellular vesicle that arises from the ingestion of particulate material by phagocytosis.
0	1	0	mercury ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with mercury (Hg) ions.
0	1	0	negative regulation of MHC class I biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of MHC class I.
0	1	0	positive regulation of MHC class I biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of MHC class I.
0	3	1	negative regulation of MHC class II biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of MHC class II.
1	1	0	positive regulation of MHC class II biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of MHC class II.
2	0	2	regulation of nitric oxide biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nitric oxide.
6	5	5	positive regulation of nitric oxide biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of nitric oxide.
5	6	9	fat cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an adipocyte, an animal connective tissue cell specialized for the synthesis and storage of fat.
2	1	3	myoblast differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a myoblast. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into striated muscle fibers.
1	2	0	endothelial cell differentiation	The process in which a mesodermal, bone marrow or neural crest cell acquires specialized features of an endothelial cell, a thin flattened cell. A layer of such cells lines the inside surfaces of body cavities, blood vessels, and lymph vessels, making up the endothelium.
1	2	2	bone resorption	The process in which specialized cells known as osteoclasts degrade the organic and inorganic portions of bone, and endocytose and transport the degradation products.
9	8	5	cell redox homeostasis	Any process that maintains the redox environment of a cell or compartment within a cell.
16	19	9	response to ethanol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an ethanol stimulus.
0	1	0	response to ether	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a ether stimulus.
1	2	1	locomotor rhythm	The rhythm of the locomotor activity of an organism during its 24 hour activity cycle.
5	4	0	photoreceptor cell maintenance	Any process preventing the degeneration of the photoreceptor, a specialized cell type that is sensitive to light.
0	1	0	pole plasm	Differentiated cytoplasm associated with a pole (animal, vegetal, anterior, or posterior) of an oocyte, egg or early embryo.
6	1	1	chemorepellent activity	Providing the environmental signal that initiates the directed movement of a motile cell or organism towards a lower concentration of that signal.
0	0	2	dynein light chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a light chain of the dynein complex.
0	0	4	dynein heavy chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a heavy chain of the dynein complex.
4	2	5	dynein intermediate chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an intermediate chain of the dynein complex.
0	1	0	interleukin-27 receptor activity	Combining with interleukin-27 and transmitting the signal from one side of the membrane to the other to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	0	0	interleukin-27 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with interleukin-27.
1	3	0	regulation of cholesterol biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cholesterol.
3	1	0	negative regulation of cholesterol biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cholesterol.
0	2	0	positive regulation of cholesterol biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of cholesterol.
1	1	1	syndecan binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with syndecan, an integral membrane proteoglycan (250-300 kDa) associated largely with epithelial cells.
1	1	0	geranylgeranyl reductase activity	Catalysis of the formation of phytyl group from the stepwise reduction of a geranylgeranyl group.
0	0	3	mast cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a mast cell resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, soluble factor, or to (at least in mammals) an antigen which the mast cell has specifically bound via IgE bound to Fc-epsilonRI receptors.
1	3	1	regulation of B cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of B cell differentiation.
3	2	1	positive regulation of B cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of B cell differentiation.
2	1	1	regulation of T cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of T cell differentiation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of T cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T cell differentiation.
3	1	0	positive regulation of T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T cell differentiation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cytotoxic T cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cytotoxic T cell differentiation.
2	2	1	positive regulation of gamma-delta T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of gamma-delta T cell differentiation.
1	3	1	regulation of regulatory T cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of differentiation of regulatory T cells.
4	0	1	positive regulation of regulatory T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of differentiation of regulatory T cells.
7	4	3	regulation of cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell differentiation, the process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and functional features.
3	1	3	negative regulation of cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell differentiation.
3	3	4	positive regulation of cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell differentiation.
2	2	0	regulation of fat cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of adipocyte differentiation.
8	6	5	negative regulation of fat cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of adipocyte differentiation.
3	5	4	positive regulation of fat cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of adipocyte differentiation.
1	0	0	regulation of endothelial cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell differentiation.
1	1	0	negative regulation of endothelial cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell differentiation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of endothelial cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell differentiation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of epidermal cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of epidermal cell differentiation.
3	0	0	positive regulation of epidermal cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of epidermal cell differentiation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of inner ear auditory receptor cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of auditory hair cell differentiation.
3	5	2	regulation of keratinocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of keratinocyte differentiation.
2	2	1	negative regulation of keratinocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of keratinocyte differentiation.
1	4	4	positive regulation of keratinocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of keratinocyte differentiation.
0	1	0	regulation of lymphocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of lymphocyte differentiation.
0	1	1	positive regulation of lymphocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of lymphocyte differentiation.
0	0	1	regulation of T-helper cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper cell differentiation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of T-helper cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper cell differentiation.
1	0	1	negative regulation of T-helper 1 cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 1 cell differentiation.
0	1	1	positive regulation of T-helper 1 cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 1 cell differentiation.
0	0	2	negative regulation of T-helper 2 cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 2 cell differentiation.
1	0	1	positive regulation of T-helper 2 cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 2 cell differentiation.
2	0	0	positive regulation of melanocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of melanocyte differentiation.
1	2	2	regulation of myeloid cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of myeloid cell differentiation.
1	2	3	negative regulation of myeloid cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of myeloid cell differentiation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of myeloid cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of myeloid cell differentiation.
0	1	2	regulation of erythrocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of erythrocyte differentiation.
2	5	0	negative regulation of erythrocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of erythrocyte differentiation.
6	8	6	positive regulation of erythrocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of erythrocyte differentiation.
3	1	0	negative regulation of macrophage differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage differentiation.
0	5	2	positive regulation of macrophage differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage differentiation.
5	15	12	regulation of megakaryocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of megakaryocyte differentiation.
0	2	1	negative regulation of megakaryocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of megakaryocyte differentiation.
1	2	0	positive regulation of megakaryocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of megakaryocyte differentiation.
1	0	0	regulation of monocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of monocyte differentiation.
1	1	1	negative regulation of monocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of monocyte differentiation.
0	1	3	positive regulation of monocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of monocyte differentiation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of neutrophil differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neutrophil differentiation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of neutrophil differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neutrophil differentiation.
1	1	0	regulation of myoblast differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of myoblast differentiation. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
3	2	0	negative regulation of myoblast differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of myoblast differentiation. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
2	6	1	positive regulation of myoblast differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of myoblast differentiation. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
1	4	4	regulation of neuron differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neuron differentiation.
5	3	7	negative regulation of neuron differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neuron differentiation.
9	8	6	positive regulation of neuron differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neuron differentiation.
3	1	2	regulation of osteoblast differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of osteoblast differentiation.
4	4	2	negative regulation of osteoblast differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of osteoblast differentiation.
6	13	5	positive regulation of osteoblast differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of osteoblast differentiation.
1	2	1	regulation of osteoclast differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of osteoclast differentiation.
1	2	3	negative regulation of osteoclast differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of osteoclast differentiation.
2	3	1	positive regulation of osteoclast differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of osteoclast differentiation.
1	2	1	regulation of epidermis development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of epidermis development.
0	0	2	positive regulation of epidermis development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of epidermis development.
0	1	0	regulation of glial cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of glia cell differentiation.
1	0	0	ketoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reduction of a ketone group to form the corresponding alcohol.
4	1	1	negative regulation of fatty acid biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of fatty acids.
1	1	2	negative regulation of glycogen biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycogen.
2	1	1	negative regulation of gluconeogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of gluconeogenesis.
4	2	1	positive regulation of gluconeogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of gluconeogenesis.
2	1	0	positive regulation of fatty acid biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of fatty acids.
0	3	4	positive regulation of cilium assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the formation of a cilium.
1	2	4	positive regulation of glycogen biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycogen.
15	25	14	positive regulation of translation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of proteins by the translation of mRNA or circRNA.
0	1	0	respiratory burst after phagocytosis	A phase of elevated metabolic activity, during which oxygen consumption increases, that occurs in neutrophils, monocytes, and macrophages shortly after phagocytosing material. An enhanced uptake of oxygen leads to the production, by an NADH dependent system, of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), superoxide anions and hydroxyl radicals, which play a part in microbiocidal activity.
2	3	1	respiratory burst	A phase of elevated metabolic activity, during which oxygen consumption increases; this leads to the production, by an NADH dependent system, of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), superoxide anions and hydroxyl radicals.
14	11	9	positive regulation of protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein by the destruction of the native, active configuration, with or without the hydrolysis of peptide bonds.
3	5	1	negative regulation of cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity.
2	5	5	positive regulation of cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CDK activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of DNA repair	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA repair.
4	7	6	positive regulation of DNA repair	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA repair.
6	3	6	positive regulation of DNA replication	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA replication.
2	2	0	positive regulation of epidermal growth factor-activated receptor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of EGF-activated receptor activity.
4	6	3	positive regulation of epidermal growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of epidermal growth factor receptor signaling pathway activity.
1	0	1	positive regulation of fibroblast growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of fibroblast growth factor receptor signaling pathway activity.
1	0	2	negative regulation of G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway.
2	0	1	positive regulation of G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway activity.
4	4	5	negative regulation of Notch signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the Notch signaling pathway.
8	7	6	positive regulation of Notch signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the Notch signaling pathway.
1	0	1	positive regulation of action potential	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination. This typically occurs via modulation of the activity or expression of voltage-gated ion channels.
0	0	2	regulation of adenylate cyclase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of adenylate cyclase activity.
2	2	2	positive regulation of adenylate cyclase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of adenylate cyclase activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cellular amino acid metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving amino acid.
2	6	4	regulation of angiogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of angiogenesis.
18	18	15	positive regulation of angiogenesis	Any process that activates or increases angiogenesis.
3	5	10	positive regulation of axon extension	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of axon extension.
2	0	0	negative regulation of blood pressure	Any process in which the force of blood traveling through the circulatory system is decreased.
2	1	1	positive regulation of blood pressure	Any process in which the force of blood traveling through the circulatory system is increased.
0	2	1	positive regulation of ossification	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ossification, the formation of bone or of a bony substance or the conversion of fibrous tissue or of cartilage into bone or a bony substance.
1	2	3	negative regulation of bone resorption	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of bone resorption.
3	1	4	positive regulation of bone resorption	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of bone resorption.
7	11	6	positive regulation of cell adhesion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell adhesion.
5	10	1	negative regulation of cell cycle	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of progression through the cell cycle.
3	7	2	positive regulation of cell cycle	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of progression through the cell cycle.
0	3	3	negative regulation of cell size	Any process that reduces cell size.
1	1	3	positive regulation of cell size	Any process that increases cell size.
0	0	2	negative regulation of cell volume	Any process that decreases cell volume.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cell volume	Any process that increases cell volume.
4	2	2	negative regulation of endocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of endocytosis.
5	3	2	positive regulation of endocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endocytosis.
4	8	8	negative regulation of gene expression, epigenetic	Any epigenetic process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate of gene expression.
3	8	8	positive regulation of gene expression, epigenetic	Any epigenetic process that activates or increases the rate of gene expression.
0	0	1	positive regulation of glycogen catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glycogen.
1	2	4	negative regulation of glycolytic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glycolysis.
3	3	1	positive regulation of glycolytic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glycolysis.
1	0	4	negative regulation of heart contraction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of heart contraction.
1	0	3	positive regulation of heart contraction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of heart contraction.
3	2	2	negative regulation of innate immune response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the innate immune response.
0	1	1	positive regulation of isotype switching	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of isotype switching.
2	0	0	negative regulation of lipid metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving lipids.
0	0	1	negative regulation of meiotic nuclear division	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of meiosis.
0	0	1	positive regulation of meiotic nuclear division	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of meiosis.
0	1	1	negative regulation of membrane potential	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of establishment or extent of a membrane potential, the electric potential existing across any membrane arising from charges in the membrane itself and from the charges present in the media on either side of the membrane.
1	0	1	positive regulation of membrane potential	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of establishment or extent of a membrane potential, the electric potential existing across any membrane arising from charges in the membrane itself and from the charges present in the media on either side of the membrane.
1	2	1	negative regulation of mitotic nuclear division	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of mitosis. Mitosis is the division of the eukaryotic cell nucleus to produce two daughter nuclei that, usually, contain the identical chromosome complement to their mother.
4	2	2	positive regulation of mitotic nuclear division	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitosis.
0	1	0	negative regulation of mitotic metaphase/anaphase transition	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the cell cycle process in which a cell progresses from metaphase to anaphase during mitosis, triggered by the activation of the anaphase promoting complex by Cdc20/Sleepy homolog which results in the degradation of Securin.
4	3	0	positive regulation of mitotic metaphase/anaphase transition	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the cell cycle process in which a cell progresses from metaphase to anaphase during mitosis, triggered by the activation of the anaphase promoting complex by Cdc20/Sleepy homolog which results in the degradation of Securin.
0	0	1	negative regulation of striated muscle tissue development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of striated muscle development.
0	0	1	positive regulation of striated muscle tissue development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of striated muscle development.
1	0	0	pH reduction	Any process that reduces the internal pH of an organism, part of an organism or a cell, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
0	0	1	pH elevation	Any process that increases the internal pH of an organism, part of an organism or a cell, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
2	6	2	regulation of protein kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein kinase activity.
8	8	10	positive regulation of protein kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein kinase activity.
2	4	5	negative regulation of proteolysis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the hydrolysis of a peptide bond or bonds within a protein.
4	3	3	positive regulation of proteolysis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the hydrolysis of a peptide bond or bonds within a protein.
1	1	5	negative regulation of single stranded viral RNA replication via double stranded DNA intermediate	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of single stranded viral RNA replication via double stranded DNA intermediate.
0	0	2	positive regulation of single stranded viral RNA replication via double stranded DNA intermediate	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of retroviral genome replication.
1	0	1	negative regulation of sister chromatid cohesion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of sister chromatid cohesion.
1	1	1	positive regulation of sister chromatid cohesion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of sister chromatid cohesion.
4	1	4	negative regulation of smoothened signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of smoothened signaling.
6	2	2	positive regulation of smoothened signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of smoothened signaling.
1	0	0	positive regulation of synaptic growth at neuromuscular junction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic growth at neuromuscular junction.
73	78	66	negative regulation of transcription, DNA-templated	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular DNA-templated transcription.
69	77	69	positive regulation of transcription, DNA-templated	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cellular DNA-templated transcription.
0	0	1	regulation of RNA polymerase II transcription preinitiation complex assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of RNA polymerase II transcriptional preinitiation complex assembly.
0	3	3	positive regulation of RNA polymerase II transcription preinitiation complex assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of RNA polymerase II transcriptional preinitiation complex assembly.
0	3	1	positive regulation of translational elongation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of translational elongation.
0	3	0	positive regulation of translational fidelity	Any process that increases the ability of the translational apparatus to interpret the genetic code.
0	3	0	positive regulation of translational termination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of translational termination.
0	1	0	negative regulation of vasoconstriction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vasoconstriction.
5	2	7	positive regulation of vasoconstriction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vasoconstriction.
0	3	8	negative regulation of DNA recombination	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA recombination.
2	0	0	negative regulation of complement activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of complement activation.
2	0	0	positive regulation of complement activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of complement activation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cytolysis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cytolysis.
0	0	1	negative regulation of exocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of exocytosis.
4	4	7	positive regulation of exocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of exocytosis.
0	0	1	negative regulation of fatty acid metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving fatty acids.
2	0	0	positive regulation of fatty acid metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving fatty acids.
0	1	0	positive regulation of female receptivity	Any process that activates or increases the receptiveness of a female to male advances.
5	0	0	negative regulation of growth	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of growth, the increase in size or mass of all or part of an organism.
1	1	0	positive regulation of growth	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of growth, the increase in size or mass of all or part of an organism.
3	3	4	negative regulation of mitotic cell cycle	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of progression through the mitotic cell cycle.
3	6	5	positive regulation of mitotic cell cycle	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of progression through the mitotic cell cycle.
0	0	1	positive regulation of muscle contraction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of muscle contraction.
2	3	1	positive regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase I	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription mediated by RNA polymerase I.
117	162	104	positive regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase II	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter.
2	4	2	positive regulation of transcription by RNA polymerase III	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription mediated by RNA polymerase III.
0	4	3	negative regulation of translational initiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of translational initiation.
3	4	3	positive regulation of translational initiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of translational initiation.
1	0	1	negative regulation of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of natural killer mediated cytotoxicity.
2	4	1	positive regulation of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer cell mediated cytotoxicity.
2	1	1	negative regulation of calcium ion-dependent exocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion-dependent exocytosis.
0	2	6	positive regulation of calcium ion-dependent exocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion-dependent exocytosis.
1	0	0	negative regulation of complement activation, alternative pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of complement activation by the alternative pathway.
2	0	0	negative regulation of complement activation, classical pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of complement activation by the classical pathway.
0	2	0	negative regulation of dopamine metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving dopamine.
0	1	0	negative regulation of growth rate	Any process that reduces the rate of growth of all or part of an organism.
0	1	0	positive regulation of translation, ncRNA-mediated	Any process, mediated by small non-coding RNAs, that activates or increases the rate that mRNAs are effectively translated into protein.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mitotic cell cycle, embryonic	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of progression through the embryonic mitotic cell cycle.
1	0	0	positive regulation of mitotic cell cycle, embryonic	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of progression through the embryonic mitotic cell cycle.
4	1	2	positive regulation of smooth muscle contraction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle contraction.
0	2	1	negative regulation of striated muscle contraction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of striated muscle contraction.
0	0	1	positive regulation of striated muscle contraction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of striated muscle contraction.
0	1	0	carbon catabolite regulation of transcription	A transcription regulation process in which the presence of one carbon source leads to the modulation of the frequency, rate, or extent of transcription of specific genes involved in the metabolism of other carbon sources.
0	1	0	negative regulation of embryonic development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of embryonic development.
3	6	4	regulation of embryonic development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of embryonic development.
0	1	0	regulation of activated T cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of activated T cell proliferation.
4	1	2	negative regulation of activated T cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of activated T cell proliferation.
0	1	0	regulation of T cell homeostatic proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of resting T cell proliferation.
0	0	1	regulation of transcription by glucose	Any process involving glucose that modulates the frequency, rate or extent or transcription.
0	0	1	positive regulation of transcription by glucose	Any process involving glucose that activates or increases the rate of transcription.
0	1	0	ADP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ADP, adenosine 5'-diphosphate.
1	0	0	ADP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of ADP, adenosine 5'-diphosphate.
3	2	0	AMP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving AMP, adenosine monophosphate.
6	4	9	ATP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ATP, adenosine triphosphate, a universally important coenzyme and enzyme regulator.
1	2	2	GTP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving GTP, guanosine triphosphate.
2	0	0	IMP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving IMP, inosine monophosphate.
1	0	0	ITP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ITP, inosine triphosphate.
1	0	0	UTP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving UTP, uridine (5'-)triphosphate.
0	1	0	cAMP metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving the nucleotide cAMP (cyclic AMP, adenosine 3',5'-cyclophosphate).
0	0	1	dATP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of dATP, deoxyadenosine triphosphate (2'-deoxyadenosine 5'-triphosphate).
1	0	0	dTMP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of dTMP, deoxyribosylthymine monophosphate.
0	1	0	dUTP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of dUTP, deoxyuridine (5'-)triphosphate.
0	0	1	adenine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of adenine, 6-aminopurine, one of the five main bases found in nucleic acids and a component of numerous important derivatives of its corresponding ribonucleoside, adenosine.
1	0	0	adenosine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving adenosine, adenine riboside, a ribonucleoside found widely distributed in cells of every type as the free nucleoside and in combination in nucleic acids and various nucleoside coenzymes.
0	0	1	guanine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving guanine, 2-amino-6-hydroxypurine, a purine that is one of the five main bases found in nucleic acids and a component of a number of phosphorylated guanosine derivatives whose metabolic or regulatory functions are important.
0	1	0	hypoxanthine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hypoxanthine, 6-hydroxy purine, an intermediate in the degradation of adenylate. Its ribonucleoside is known as inosine and its ribonucleotide as inosinate.
0	1	0	thymidine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving thymidine, deoxyribosylthymine thymine 2-deoxyriboside, a deoxynucleoside very widely distributed but occurring almost entirely as phosphoric esters in deoxynucleotides and deoxyribonucleic acid, DNA.
0	1	1	pyrimidine nucleoside biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of one of a family of organic molecules consisting of a pyrimidine base covalently bonded to a sugar ribose (a ribonucleoside) or deoxyribose (a deoxyribonucleoside).
1	0	0	pyrimidine nucleoside catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of one of a family of organic molecules consisting of a pyrimidine base covalently bonded to a sugar ribose (a ribonucleoside) or deoxyribose (a deoxyribonucleoside).
2	1	3	tetrahydrobiopterin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving tetrahydrobiopterin, the reduced form of biopterin (2-amino-4-hydroxy-6-(1,2-dihydroxypropyl)-pteridine). It functions as a hydroxylation coenzyme, e.g. in the conversion of phenylalanine to tyrosine.
0	1	0	alcohol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of alcohols, any of a class of compounds containing one or more hydroxyl groups attached to a saturated carbon atom.
0	0	2	glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate, an important intermediate in glycolysis.
0	1	0	glycerol-3-phosphate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glycerol-3-phosphate, a phosphoric monoester of glycerol.
0	1	0	D-gluconate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of D-gluconate, the anion of D-gluconic acid, the aldonic acid derived from glucose.
0	0	1	nitric oxide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving nitric oxide, nitrogen monoxide (NO), a colorless gas only slightly soluble in water.
3	0	0	aflatoxin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving aflatoxin, a fungal metabolite found as a contaminant in moldy grains that induces liver cancer. Aflatoxin induces a G to T transversion at codon 249 of p53, leading to its inactivation. Aflatoxin is converted to a chemical carcinogen by P450.
1	0	0	aflatoxin catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of aflatoxin, a fungal metabolite found as a contaminant in moldy grains that induces liver cancer. Aflatoxin induces a G to T transversion at codon 249 of p53, leading to its inactivation. Aflatoxin is converted to a chemical carcinogen by P450.
1	0	0	coumarin catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of coumarins, compounds derived from the phenylacrylic skeleton of cinnamic acids.
1	0	0	formaldehyde biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of formaldehyde (methanal, H2C=O), the simplest aldehyde.
1	2	0	formaldehyde catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of formaldehyde (methanal, H2C=O), the simplest aldehyde.
0	1	0	glycolate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycolate, the anion of hydroxyethanoic acid (glycolic acid).
0	2	2	phosphocreatine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phosphocreatine, a phosphagen of creatine which is synthesized and broken down by creatine phosphokinase.
0	1	0	negative regulation of glucosylceramide biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glucosylceramide.
2	0	0	regulation of fatty acid oxidation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of fatty acid oxidation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of fatty acid oxidation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of fatty acid oxidation.
1	0	1	negative regulation of fatty acid oxidation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of fatty acid oxidation.
2	1	0	glucose import	The directed movement of the hexose monosaccharide glucose into a cell or organelle.
1	2	1	regulation of glucose import	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the import of the hexose monosaccharide glucose into a cell or organelle.
1	1	2	negative regulation of glucose import	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the import of the hexose monosaccharide glucose into a cell or organelle.
5	8	7	positive regulation of glucose import	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the import of the hexose monosaccharide glucose into a cell or organelle.
1	0	0	glycerol biosynthetic process from pyruvate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycerol, 1,2,3-propanetriol, from other compounds, including pyruvate.
2	1	3	regulation of JNK cascade	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the JNK cascade.
5	1	4	negative regulation of JNK cascade	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the JNK cascade.
13	12	6	positive regulation of JNK cascade	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the JNK cascade.
1	0	0	lateral inhibition	Signaling between cells of equivalent developmental potential that results in these cells adopting different developmental fates. An example is the suppression by cells with a particular fate of the adoption of the same fate by surrounding cells.
8	7	13	SMAD binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a SMAD signaling protein.
0	1	0	phosphatidylethanolamine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phosphatidylethanolamine, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which a phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of ethanolamine. It is a major structural phospholipid in mammalian systems. It tends to be more abundant than phosphatidylcholine in the internal membranes of the cell and is an abundant component of prokaryotic membranes.
4	0	1	diacylglycerol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving diacylglycerol, a glyceride in which any two of the R groups (positions not specified) are acyl groups while the remaining R group can be either H or an alkyl group.
0	1	1	diacylglycerol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of diacylglycerol, a glyceride in which any two of the R groups (positions not specified) are acyl groups while the remaining R group can be either H or an alkyl group.
0	1	0	acetyl-CoA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of acetyl-CoA, a derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is acetylated.
0	0	1	butyrate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of butyrate, the anion of butyric acid.
0	1	0	fructose biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of fructose, the ketohexose arabino-2-hexulose.
0	1	0	deoxyribose phosphate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of deoxyribose phosphate, the phosphorylated sugar 2-deoxy-erythro-pentose.
0	0	2	ribose phosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ribose phosphate, any phosphorylated ribose sugar.
1	0	1	polynucleotide 3'-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3'-phosphopolynucleotide + H2O = a polynucleotide + phosphate. Hydrolyzes the free 3'-phosphate resulting from single strand breaks in DNA due to oxidative damage.
0	1	1	ATP-dependent polydeoxyribonucleotide 5'-hydroxyl-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 5'-dephospho-DNA = ADP + 5'-phospho-DNA.
0	0	1	urate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving urate, the anion of uric acid, 2,6,8-trioxypurine, the end product of purine metabolism in certain mammals and the main excretory product in uricotelic animals.
4	1	1	regulation of receptor signaling pathway via JAK-STAT	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of receptor signaling via JAK-STAT.
1	2	1	negative regulation of receptor signaling pathway via JAK-STAT	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a receptor signaling pathway via JAK-STAT.
4	4	0	positive regulation of receptor signaling pathway via JAK-STAT	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the JAK-STAT signaling pathway activity.
0	1	0	creatinine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving creatinine, 2-amino-1,5-dihydro-1-methyl-4H-imidazol-4-one, an end product of creatine metabolism and a normal constituent of urine.
0	1	0	dihydrofolate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving dihydrofolate, the dihydroxylated derivative of folate.
1	0	0	icosanoid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of icosanoids, any of a group of C20 polyunsaturated fatty acids.
0	3	1	phosphatidylcholine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phosphatidylcholines, any of a class of glycerophospholipids in which the phosphatidyl group is esterified to the hydroxyl group of choline. They are important constituents of cell membranes.
1	2	0	phosphatidic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phosphatidic acid, any derivative of glycerol phosphate in which both the remaining hydroxyl groups of the glycerol moiety are esterified with fatty acids.
2	2	1	glycerophospholipid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glycerophospholipids, any derivative of glycerophosphate that contains at least one O-acyl, O-alkyl, or O-alkenyl group attached to the glycerol residue.
1	3	2	glycerophospholipid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of glycerophospholipids, any derivative of glycerophosphate that contains at least one O-acyl, O-alkyl, or O-alkenyl group attached to the glycerol residue.
0	1	0	ether lipid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ether lipids, lipids that contain (normally) one lipid alcohol in ether linkage to one of the carbon atoms (normally C-1) of glycerol.
1	0	1	glycerolipid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glycerolipids, any lipid with a glycerol backbone. Diacylglycerol and phosphatidate are key lipid intermediates of glycerolipid biosynthesis.
1	1	1	glyoxylate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glyoxylate, the anion of glyoxylic acid, HOC-COOH.
3	1	3	phosphatidylinositol metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phosphatidylinositol, any glycophospholipid in which a sn-glycerol 3-phosphate residue is esterified to the 1-hydroxyl group of 1D-myo-inositol.
1	0	0	nicotinamide nucleotide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving nicotinamide nucleotides, any nucleotide that contains combined nicotinamide.
0	1	0	protoporphyrinogen IX metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving protoporphyrinogen IX, the specific substrate for the enzyme ferrochelatase, which catalyzes the insertion of iron to form protoheme. It is probably also the substrate for chlorophyll formation.
1	0	1	sphingosine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of sphingosine (sphing-4-enine), trans-D-erytho-2-amino-octadec-4-ene-1,3-diol, a long chain amino diol sphingoid base that occurs in most sphingolipids in animal tissues.
2	1	0	ceramide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ceramides, any N-acylated sphingoid.
1	0	0	negative regulation of photoreceptor cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of photoreceptor cell differentiation. An example of this process is found in Drosophila melanogaster.
0	0	1	2,3-bisphosphoglycerate-dependent phosphoglycerate mutase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-phospho-D-glycerate = 3-phospho-D-glycerate; this reaction requires the cofactor 2,3-bisphosphoglycerate.
5	2	4	U4/U6 x U5 tri-snRNP complex	A ribonucleoprotein complex formed by the association of the U4/U6 and U5 small nuclear ribonucleoproteins.
0	1	0	saliva secretion	The regulated release of saliva from the salivary glands. In man, the saliva is a turbid and slightly viscous fluid, generally of an alkaline reaction, and is secreted by the parotid, submaxillary, and sublingual glands. In the mouth the saliva is mixed with the secretion from the buccal glands. In man and many animals, saliva is an important digestive fluid on account of the presence of the peculiar enzyme, ptyalin.
1	1	0	development of secondary female sexual characteristics	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the secondary female sexual characteristics over time, from their formation to the mature structures. In female humans, these include growth of axillary and pubic hair, breast development and menstrual periods. Their development occurs in response to sex hormone secretion.
1	0	0	development of secondary male sexual characteristics	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the secondary male sexual characteristics over time, from their formation to the mature structures. In male humans, these include growth of axillary, chest, and pubic hair, voice changes, and testicular/penile enlargement. Development occurs in response to sex hormone secretion.
0	1	0	retinal rod cell development	Development of a rod cell, one of the sensory cells in the eye that reacts to the presence of light. Rod cells contain the photopigment rhodopsin or porphyropsin and are responsible for vision in dim light.
0	3	0	retinal cone cell development	Development of a cone cell, one of the sensory cells in the eye that reacts to the presence of light. Cone cells contain the photopigment iodopsin or cyanopsin and are responsible for photopic (daylight) vision.
0	0	1	malate dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (S)-malate + NADP+ = oxaloacetate + NADPH + H+.
0	0	1	methylthioribulose 1-phosphate dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-methyl-5-thio-D-ribulose 1-phosphate = 5-(methylthio)-2,3-dioxopentyl phosphate + H(2)O.
0	2	1	regulation of Ras protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Ras protein signal transduction.
4	6	4	positive regulation of Ras protein signal transduction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Ras protein signal transduction.
7	4	1	negative regulation of Ras protein signal transduction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Ras protein signal transduction.
2	0	1	intercellular canaliculus	An extremely narrow tubular channel located between adjacent cells. An instance of this is the secretory canaliculi occurring between adjacent parietal cells in the gastric mucosa of vertebrates.
1	0	0	positive regulation of calcium-dependent cell-cell adhesion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of calcium-dependent cell-cell adhesion.
2	4	0	regulation of viral entry into host cell	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the viral entry into the host cell.
2	2	1	negative regulation of viral entry into host cell	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the entry of viral entry into a host cell.
1	2	2	positive regulation of viral entry into host cell	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the introduction of viral entry into the host cell.
1	0	3	regulation of centriole replication	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the formation of a daughter centriole of an existing centriole.
2	2	1	negative regulation of centriole replication	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of centriole replication.
1	2	0	regulation of mitotic centrosome separation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the separation of duplicated centrosome components at the beginning of mitosis.
1	1	1	positive regulation of mitotic centrosome separation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of centrosome separation.
1	0	1	regulation of centrosome cycle	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the centrosome cycle, the processes of centrosome duplication and separation.
1	0	0	drug export	The directed movement of a drug, a substance used in the diagnosis, treatment or prevention of a disease, out of a cell or organelle.
0	1	0	optic placode formation involved in camera-type eye formation	Establishment and formation of the optic placode, paired ectodermal placodes that become invaginated to form the embryonic lens vesicles.
3	1	0	regulation of organ growth	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of growth of an organ of an organism.
1	3	1	negative regulation of organ growth	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of growth of an organ of an organism.
1	0	2	positive regulation of organ growth	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of growth of an organ of an organism.
1	0	0	sphingolipid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with sphingolipids, a class of lipids containing the long-chain amine diol sphingosine or a closely related base (a sphingoid).
2	1	3	regulation of insulin receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of insulin receptor signaling.
5	7	10	negative regulation of insulin receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of insulin receptor signaling.
2	3	6	positive regulation of insulin receptor signaling pathway	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of insulin receptor signaling.
0	1	0	gamma-delta T cell activation	The change in morphology and behavior of a gamma-delta T cell resulting from exposure to a mitogen, cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or an antigen for which it is specific.
0	3	1	alpha-beta T cell differentiation	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of an alpha-beta T cell. An alpha-beta T cell is a T cell that expresses an alpha-beta T cell receptor complex.
0	0	1	alpha-beta T cell proliferation	The expansion of an alpha-beta T cell population by cell division.
1	0	0	negative regulation of alpha-beta T cell activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of alpha-beta T cell activation.
2	2	1	positive regulation of alpha-beta T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of alpha-beta T cell differentiation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of alpha-beta T cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of alpha-beta T cell differentiation.
1	2	1	positive regulation of alpha-beta T cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of alpha-beta T cell proliferation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of alpha-beta T cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of alpha-beta T cell proliferation.
1	0	0	lymphocyte activation	A change in morphology and behavior of a lymphocyte resulting from exposure to a specific antigen, mitogen, cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
1	0	1	lymphocyte proliferation	The expansion of a lymphocyte population by cell division.
0	1	0	tetrahydrofolate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving tetrahydrofolate, 5,6,7,8-tetrahydrofolic acid, a folate derivative bearing additional hydrogens on the pterin group.
0	1	1	tetrahydrofolate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of tetrahydrofolate, 5,6,7,8-tetrahydrofolic acid, a folate derivative bearing additional hydrogens on the pterin group.
0	2	0	folic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving folic acid, pteroylglutamic acid. Folic acid is widely distributed as a member of the vitamin B complex and is essential for the synthesis of purine and pyrimidines.
3	1	0	anchored component of plasma membrane	The component of the plasma membrane consisting of the gene products that are tethered to the membrane only by a covalently attached anchor, such as a lipid group, that is embedded in the membrane. Gene products with peptide sequences that are embedded in the membrane are excluded from this grouping.
1	0	0	negative regulation of retinal cell programmed cell death	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of programmed cell death that occurs in the retina.
4	1	3	negative regulation of insulin secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of insulin.
6	4	1	response to antibiotic	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an antibiotic stimulus. An antibiotic is a chemical substance produced by a microorganism which has the capacity to inhibit the growth of or to kill other microorganisms.
1	1	0	response to organophosphorus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an organophosphorus stimulus. Organophosphorus is a compound containing phosphorus bound to an organic molecule; several organophosphorus compounds are used as insecticides, and they are highly toxic cholinesterase inhibitors.
0	1	0	response to pyrethroid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a pyrethroid stimulus. Pyrethroids are a group of growth regulators, analogous to insect juvenile hormones, that interfere with the development of insect larvae and are used in the control of insects that are harmful in the adult stage.
4	2	2	response to arsenic-containing substance	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an arsenic stimulus from compounds containing arsenic, including arsenates, arsenites, and arsenides.
4	3	4	response to cadmium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cadmium (Cd) ion stimulus.
2	0	1	response to copper ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a copper ion stimulus.
0	1	2	response to mercury ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a mercury ion stimulus.
0	1	0	response to tellurium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a tellurium ion stimulus.
1	0	0	intracellular canaliculus	An apical plasma membrane part that forms a narrow enfolded luminal membrane channel, lined with numerous microvilli, that appears to extend into the cytoplasm of the cell. A specialized network of intracellular canaliculi is a characteristic feature of parietal cells of the gastric mucosa in vertebrates.
1	0	1	SLIK (SAGA-like) complex	A SAGA-type histone acetyltransferase complex that contains Rtg2 and a smaller form of Spt7 than the fungal SAGA complex, and lacks Spt8. The complex is involved in the yeast retrograde response pathway, which is important for gene expression changes during mitochondrial dysfunction.
1	0	1	lipopolysaccharide receptor complex	A multiprotein complex that consists of at least three proteins, CD14, TLR4, and MD-2, each of which is glycosylated and which functions as a lipopolysaccharide (LPS) receptor that primes the innate immune response against bacterial pathogens.
1	1	4	decidualization	The cellular and vascular changes occurring in the endometrium of the pregnant uterus just after the onset of blastocyst implantation. This process involves the proliferation and differentiation of the fibroblast-like endometrial stromal cells into large, polyploid decidual cells that eventually form the maternal component of the placenta.
1	0	0	natural killer cell lectin-like receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a lectin-like natural killer cell receptor.
1	0	0	IDP catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of IDP, inosine 5'-diphosphate.
1	0	0	borate transport	The directed movement of borate into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Borate is the anion (BO3)3-; boron is a group 13 element, with properties which are borderline between metals and non-metals.
1	0	0	active borate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transport of borate across a membrane against the concentration gradient.
1	2	4	muscle cell cellular homeostasis	The cellular homeostatic process that preserves a muscle cell in a stable functional or structural state.
7	7	4	viral entry into host cell	The process that occurs after viral attachment by which a virus, or viral nucleic acid, breaches the plasma membrane or cell envelope and enters the host cell. The process ends when the viral nucleic acid is released into the host cell cytoplasm.
1	0	0	citric acid secretion	The controlled release of citric acid, 2-hydroxy-1,2,3-propanetricarboxylic acid, by a cell or a tissue.
0	1	0	oxalic acid secretion	The controlled release of oxalic acid, ethanedioic acid, by a cell or a tissue.
0	1	1	negative regulation by virus of viral protein levels in host cell	Any process where the infecting virus reduces the levels of viral proteins in a cell.
1	1	1	positive regulation by virus of viral protein levels in host cell	Any process where the infecting virus increases the levels of viral proteins in a cell.
2	5	0	viral budding	A viral process by which enveloped viruses acquire a host-derived membrane enriched in viral proteins to form their external envelope. The process starts when nucleocapsids, assembled or in the process of being built, induce formation of a membrane curvature in the host plasma or organelle membrane and wrap up in the forming bud. The process ends when the bud is eventually pinched off by membrane scission to release the enveloped particle into the lumenal or extracellular space.
26	40	36	protein autophosphorylation	The phosphorylation by a protein of one or more of its own amino acid residues (cis-autophosphorylation), or residues on an identical protein (trans-autophosphorylation).
0	2	0	modification by virus of host mRNA processing	Any viral process that interferes with the processing of mRNA in the host cell.
1	0	0	regulation of viral transcription	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the transcription of the viral genome.
0	3	2	viral mRNA export from host cell nucleus	The directed movement of intronless viral mRNA from the host nucleus to the cytoplasm for translation.
1	2	2	microtubule polymerization	The addition of tubulin heterodimers to one or both ends of a microtubule.
0	0	1	viral replication complex formation and maintenance	The process of organizing and assembling viral replication proteins in preparation for viral replication.
1	3	4	virion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a virion, either by binding to components of the capsid or the viral envelope.
1	0	0	histone deacetylase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of histone deacetylase, which catalyzes of the removal of acetyl groups from histones, proteins complexed to DNA in chromatin and chromosomes.
2	1	0	receptor-mediated virion attachment to host cell	The process by which a virion attaches to a host cell by binding to a receptor on the host cell surface.
0	1	0	coreceptor-mediated virion attachment to host cell	The process by which a virion attaches to a host cell by binding to a co-receptor on the host cell surface.
0	1	4	regulation of nucleocytoplasmic transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of substances between the nucleus and the cytoplasm.
0	1	0	positive regulation of nucleocytoplasmic transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of substances between the nucleus and the cytoplasm.
0	2	0	regulation of protein export from nucleus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of proteins from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
1	2	1	negative regulation of protein export from nucleus	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of proteins from the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
4	4	7	positive regulation of protein export from nucleus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of directed movement of proteins from the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
0	0	1	regulation of RNA export from nucleus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of RNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm.
0	0	2	negative regulation of RNA export from nucleus	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of RNA from the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
1	1	2	positive regulation of RNA export from nucleus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of directed movement of RNA from the nucleus into the cytoplasm.
4	0	1	lipid phosphorylation	The process of introducing one or more phosphate groups into a lipid, any member of a group of substances soluble in lipid solvents but only sparingly soluble in aqueous solvents.
0	0	2	carbohydrate phosphorylation	The process of introducing a phosphate group into a carbohydrate, any organic compound based on the general formula Cx(H2O)y.
1	0	0	glycolipid transport	The directed movement of glycolipids, compounds containing (usually) 1-4 linked monosaccharide residues joined by a glycosyl linkage to a lipid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
3	1	2	phospholipid dephosphorylation	The process of removing one or more phosphate groups from a phosphorylated lipid, any member of a group of substances soluble in lipid solvents but only sparingly soluble in aqueous solvents.
4	5	5	filopodium assembly	The assembly of a filopodium, a thin, stiff protrusion extended by the leading edge of a motile cell such as a crawling fibroblast or amoeba, or an axonal growth cone.
2	2	1	bone remodeling	The continuous turnover of bone matrix and mineral that involves first, an increase in resorption (osteoclastic activity) and later, reactive bone formation (osteoblastic activity). The process of bone remodeling takes place in the adult skeleton at discrete foci. The process ensures the mechanical integrity of the skeleton throughout life and plays an important role in calcium homeostasis. An imbalance in the regulation of bone resorption and bone formation results in many of the metabolic bone diseases, such as osteoporosis.
0	1	1	regulation of bone remodeling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of bone remodeling, the processes of bone formation and resorption that combine to maintain skeletal integrity.
0	1	0	negative regulation of bone remodeling	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of bone remodeling.
2	8	9	phosphatidylinositol phosphorylation	The process of introducing one or more phosphate groups into a phosphatidylinositol, any glycerophosphoinositol having one phosphatidyl group esterified to one of the hydroxy groups of inositol.
3	0	3	inositol phosphate dephosphorylation	The process of removing a phosphate group from any mono- or polyphosphorylated inositol.
7	6	4	phosphatidylinositol dephosphorylation	The process of removing one or more phosphate groups from a phosphatidylinositol.
247	263	165	metal ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any metal ion.
0	0	1	metal ion transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of metal ions from one side of a membrane to the other.
3	7	7	ephrin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an ephrin receptor.
1	0	0	positive regulation of saliva secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of saliva.
1	0	0	hormone secretion	The regulated release of hormones, substances with a specific regulatory effect on a particular organ or group of cells.
0	0	2	regulation of hormone secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a hormone from a cell.
0	1	0	follicle-stimulating hormone secretion	The regulated release of follicle-stimulating hormone, a gonadotropic glycoprotein hormone secreted by the anterior pituitary.
1	0	0	positive regulation of hormone biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hormones.
0	1	1	positive regulation of hormone secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a hormone from a cell.
1	0	0	negative regulation of hormone secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a hormone from a cell.
1	3	3	positive regulation of lipid biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of lipids.
1	1	0	regulation of lipid biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of lipids.
1	0	0	nucleoside triphosphate adenylate kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nucleoside triphosphate + AMP = nucleoside diphosphate + ADP.
1	0	0	tetrahydrofolylpolyglutamate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving tetrahydrofolylpolyglutamate, a folate derivative comprising tetrahydrofolate attached to a chain of glutamate residues.
3	1	5	regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the passage or uptake of molecules by the mitochondrial membrane.
0	1	2	secretion	The controlled release of a substance by a cell or a tissue.
1	0	0	calcium oxalate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with calcium oxalate, CaC2O4, a salt of oxalic acid. In animals, it may be excreted in urine or retained in the form of urinary calculi.
1	0	0	tetrapyrrole binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a tetrapyrrole, a compound containing four pyrrole nuclei variously substituted and linked to each other through carbons at the alpha position.
2	5	2	intracellular transport	The directed movement of substances within a cell.
1	0	0	metal chelating activity	The formation of bonds from two or more atoms within the same ligand to a metal atom in complexes in which the metal is part of a ring.
4	2	1	transition metal ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a transition metal ions; a transition metal is an element whose atom has an incomplete d-subshell of extranuclear electrons, or which gives rise to a cation or cations with an incomplete d-subshell. Transition metals often have more than one valency state. Biologically relevant transition metals include vanadium, manganese, iron, copper, cobalt, nickel, molybdenum and silver.
4	1	3	regulation of neurotransmitter secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a neurotransmitter from a cell.
0	1	0	negative regulation of neurotransmitter secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of a neurotransmitter.
2	2	4	pore complex	Any small opening in a membrane that allows the passage of gases and/or liquids.
0	3	4	pore complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a pore complex. A pore complex is a small opening in a membrane that allows the passage of liquids and/or gases.
2	0	3	proton-transporting ATP synthase activity, rotational mechanism	Enables the synthesis of ATP from ADP and phosphate by the transfer of protons from one side of a membrane to the other by a rotational mechanism driven by a gradient according to the reaction: ADP + H2O + phosphate + H+(in) = ATP + H+(out).
1	0	2	phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 4,5-bisphosphate + ATP = a 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
2	2	0	1-phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of the enzyme 1-phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase activity.
0	0	1	nucleotide phosphorylation	The process of introducing one or more phosphate groups into a nucleotide to produce a phosphorylated nucleoside.
1	0	0	nucleoside monophosphate phosphorylation	The process of introducing one or more phosphate groups into a nucleoside monophosphate to produce a polyphosphorylated nucleoside.
0	1	1	carboxylic acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of carboxylic acids from one side of a membrane to the other. Carboxylic acids are organic acids containing one or more carboxyl (COOH) groups or anions (COO-).
1	0	0	hydroxylysine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hydroxylysine (5-hydroxy-2,6-diaminohexanoic acid), a chiral alpha-amino acid.
2	1	3	fatty-acyl-CoA biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a fatty-acyl-CoA, any derivative of coenzyme A in which the sulfhydryl group is in thiolester linkage with a fatty-acyl group.
0	4	0	ketone body biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ketone bodies, any one of the three substances: acetoacetate, D-3-hydroxybutyrate (beta-hydroxybutyrate) or acetone. Biosynthesis involves the formation of hydroxymethylglutaryl-CoA, which is cleaved to acetate and acetyl-CoA.
0	2	0	ketone body catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of ketone bodies, any one of the three substances: acetoacetate, D-3-hydroxybutyrate (beta-hydroxybutyrate) or acetone. Ketone bodies can be used as an energy source as an alternative to glucose. Utilization of ketone bodies in peripheral tissues involves conversion of acetoacetate to acetoacetyl-CoA, which is then converted to two molecules of acetyl-CoA.
1	0	0	habituation	A decrease in a behavioral response to a repeated stimulus. This is exemplified by the failure of a person to show a startle response to a loud noise that has been repeatedly presented.
3	0	1	proton-transporting ATPase activity, rotational mechanism	Enables the transfer of protons from one side of a membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + H+(in) = ADP + phosphate + H+(out), by a rotational mechanism.
0	1	0	3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate transport	The directed movement of 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate, a naturally occurring mixed anhydride synthesized from adenosine 5'-phosphosulfate, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate, a naturally occurring mixed anhydride synthesized from adenosine 5'-phosphosulfate, from one side of a membrane to the other.
4	1	4	retinoid X receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a retinoid X receptor.
2	8	7	thyroid hormone receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a thyroid hormone receptor.
1	0	0	cytosol to endoplasmic reticulum transport	The directed movement of substances from the cytosol to the endoplasmic reticulum of a cell.
1	0	0	peptide antigen transport	The directed movement of a peptide antigen into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. The peptide antigen is typically, but not always, processed from an endogenous or exogenous protein.
0	2	0	NAD-dependent histone deacetylase activity (H3-K9 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: histone H3 N6-acetyl-L-lysine (position 9) + H2O = histone H3 L-lysine (position 9) + acetate. This reaction requires the presence of NAD, and represents the removal of an acetyl group from lysine at position 9 of the histone H3 protein.
0	0	1	NAD-dependent histone deacetylase activity (H4-K16 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: histone H4 N6-acetyl-L-lysine (position 16) + H2O = histone H4 L-lysine (position 16) + acetate. This reaction requires the presence of NAD, and represents the removal of an acetyl group from lysine at position 16 of the histone H4 protein.
0	1	0	histone acetyltransferase activity (H4-K16 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + histone H4 L-lysine (position 16) = CoA + histone H4 N6-acetyl-L-lysine (position 16). This reaction represents the addition of an acetyl group to the lysine at position 16 of histone H4.
5	3	0	histone methyltransferase activity (H3-K9 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + histone H3 L-lysine (position 9) = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + histone H3 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 9). This reaction is the addition of a methyl group onto lysine at position 9 of the histone H3 protein.
1	3	1	histone methyltransferase activity (H3-K36 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + histone H3 L-lysine (position 36) = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + histone H3 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 36). This reaction is the addition of a methyl group onto lysine at position 36 of the histone H3 protein.
1	1	1	histone methyltransferase activity (H3-K27 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + histone H3 L-lysine (position 27) = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + histone H3 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 27). This reaction is the addition of a methyl group onto lysine at position 27 of the histone H3 protein.
0	2	1	TAP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with TAP protein, transporter associated with antigen processing protein. TAP protein is a heterodimeric peptide transporter consisting of the subunits TAP1 and TAP2.
1	0	0	TAP1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the TAP1 subunit of TAP (transporter associated with antigen processing) protein.
1	0	0	tapasin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with tapasin, a member of the MHC class I loading complex which bridges the TAP peptide transporter to class I molecules.
55	51	40	protein heterodimerization activity	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a nonidentical protein to form a heterodimer.
14	11	5	protein dimerization activity	The formation of a protein dimer, a macromolecular structure consists of two noncovalently associated identical or nonidentical subunits.
1	1	0	positive regulation of hemoglobin biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hemoglobin, an oxygen carrying, conjugated protein containing four heme groups and globin.
1	0	0	17-alpha,20-alpha-dihydroxypregn-4-en-3-one dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)+ + 17-alpha,20-alpha-dihydroxypregn-4-en-3-one = NAD(P)H + H+ + 17-alpha-hydroxyprogesterone.
0	0	1	3-hydroxy-2-methylbutyryl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD+ + 2-methyl-3-hydroxybutyryl-CoA = NADH + H+ + 2-methylaceto-acetyl-CoA.
1	0	0	prostaglandin-F synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP+ + (5Z,13E)-(15S)-9-alpha,11-alpha,15-trihydroxyprosta-5,13-dienoate = NADPH + H+ + (5Z,13E)-(15S)-9-alpha,15-dihydroxy-11-oxoprosta-5,13-dienoate.
1	1	0	15-hydroxyprostaglandin-D dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP+ + (5Z,13E)-(15S)-9-alpha,15-dihydroxy-11-oxoprosta-5,13-dienoate = NADPH + H+ + (5Z,13E)-9-alpha-hydroxy-11,15-dioxoprosta-5,13-dienoate.
0	1	0	15-hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP(+) + prostaglandin E(1) = 15-dehydro-prostaglandin E1 + H(+) + NADPH.
4	0	0	androsterone dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)+ + androsterone = NAD(P)H + H+ + 5-alpha-androstane-3,17-dione.
4	0	0	5alpha-androstane-3beta,17beta-diol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5alpha-androstane-3beta,17beta-diol + NADP(+) = 17beta-hydroxy-5alpha-androstan-3-one + H(+) + NADPH.
2	0	1	testosterone dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: testosterone + NAD+ = androst-4-ene-3,17-dione + NADH.
1	0	0	androsterone dehydrogenase (B-specific) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)+ + androsterone = NAD(P)H + H+ + 5-alpha-androstane-3,17-dione. The reaction is B-specific (i.e. the pro-S hydrogen is transferred from the 4-position of reduced nicotinamide cofactor) with respect to NAD(P)+.
4	0	1	androstan-3-alpha,17-beta-diol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD+ + androstan-3-alpha,17-beta-diol = 17-beta-hydroxyandrostan-3-one + NADH + H+.
4	0	0	testosterone 17-beta-dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP+ + testosterone = NADPH + H+ + androst-4-ene-3,17-dione.
1	0	0	phospholipid-hydroperoxide glutathione peroxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a lipid hydroperoxide + 2 reduced glutathione = 2 H2O + lipid + 2 oxidized glutathione.
4	0	0	ketosteroid monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: O2 + NADPH + progesterone = H2O + NADP+ + testosterone acetate.
0	1	0	4-trimethylammoniobutyraldehyde dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD+ + 4-trimethylammoniobutanal = NADH + 4-trimethylammoniobutanoate.
2	0	0	trans-1,2-dihydrobenzene-1,2-diol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP+ + trans-1,2-dihydrobenzene-1,2-diol = NADPH + catechol.
0	0	1	enoyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] reductase (NADPH, A-specific) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + NADP+ = trans-D2-enoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] + NADPH + H+.
0	0	1	protein-disulfide reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein-dithiol + NAD(P)+ = protein-disulfide + NAD(P)H + H+.
1	0	0	betaine-homocysteine S-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-homocysteine + betaine = N,N-dimethylglycine + L-methionine.
0	1	0	1-alkenylglycerophosphocholine O-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-alkenylglycerophosphocholine + acyl-CoA = 1-alkenyl-2-acylglycerophosphocholine + CoA.
0	0	1	platelet-activating factor acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-radyl-2-acyl-sn-glycero-3-phospholipid + 1-alkyl-2-acetyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine = 1-alkyl-2-lyso-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + 1-radyl-2-acetyl-sn-glycero-3-phospholipid.
0	1	1	1-acylglycerophosphocholine O-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-acyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + acyl-CoA = phosphatidylcholine + CoA.
0	1	0	1-alkylglycerophosphocholine O-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-alkyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + acetyl-CoA = 1-alkyl-2-acetyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + CoA.
1	0	0	N-acylsphingosine galactosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ceramide + UDP-galactose = D-galactosylceramide + UDP.
0	1	0	monosialoganglioside sialyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-galactosyl-N-acetyl-D-galactosaminyl-(N-acetylneuraminyl)-D-galactosyl-D-glucosylceramide + CMP-N-acetylneuraminate = N-acetylneuraminyl-D-galactosyl-N-acetyl-D-galactosaminyl-(N-acetylneuraminyl)-D-galactosyl-D-glucosylceramide + CMP.
1	1	0	[hydroxymethylglutaryl-CoA reductase (NADPH)] kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: [3-hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl-CoA reductase (NADPH)] + ATP = [3-hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl-CoA reductase (NADPH)] phosphate + ADP.
0	0	1	[3-methyl-2-oxobutanoate dehydrogenase (acetyl-transferring)] kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 3-methyl-2-oxobutanoate dehydrogenase (acetyl-transferring) = ADP + 3-methyl-2-oxobutanoate dehydrogenase (acetyl-transferring) phosphate.
4	1	0	acylglycerol lipase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + acylglycerol = a fatty acid + glycerol.
0	2	0	methylumbelliferyl-acetate deacetylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 4-methylumbelliferyl acetate + H(2)O = 4-methylumbelliferone + acetate + H(+).
0	1	0	all-trans-retinyl-palmitate hydrolase, all-trans-retinol forming activity	Catalysis of the reaction: all-trans-retinyl palmitate + H2O = all-trans-retinol + H+ + palmitate.
1	0	0	glycerophosphocholine cholinephosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + H(2)O = choline phosphate + glycerol + H(+).
0	0	1	alkylglycerophosphoethanolamine phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + 1-alkyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphoethanolamine = ethanolamine + 1-alkyl-sn-glycerol 3-phosphate.
1	2	1	nucleoside-triphosphate diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + a nucleoside triphosphate = diphosphate + a nucleotide.
1	0	0	17-alpha-hydroxyprogesterone aldolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 17-alpha-hydroxyprogesterone = acetaldehyde + 4-androstene-3,17-dione.
0	0	1	N-acylneuraminate-9-phosphate synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + phosphoenolpyruvate + N-acyl-D-mannosamine 6-phosphate = phosphate + N-acylneuraminate 9-phosphate.
0	0	1	3-hydroxyoctanoyl-[acyl-carrier-protein] dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (3R)-3-hydroxyoctanoyl-[acyl-carrier protein] = H2O + 2-octenoyl-[acyl-carrier protein].
19	13	25	protein N-terminus binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein N-terminus, the end of any peptide chain at which the 2-amino (or 2-imino) function of a constituent amino acid is not attached in peptide linkage to another amino-acid residue.
1	0	0	ceramide cholinephosphotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: CDP-choline + ceramide = CMP + H(+) + sphingomyelin.
3	3	3	vesicle transport along microtubule	The directed movement of a vesicle along a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins. This process begins with the attachment of a vesicle to a microtubule, and ends when the vesicle reaches its final destination.
1	0	4	mitochondrion transport along microtubule	The directed movement of a mitochondrion along a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins.
0	2	1	calcium-dependent phospholipase A2 activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phosphatidylcholine + H2O = 1-acylglycerophosphocholine + a carboxylate. This reaction requires Ca2+.
0	1	2	calcium-independent phospholipase A2 activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phosphatidylcholine + H2O = 1-acylglycerophosphocholine + a carboxylate. This reaction does not require Ca2+.
1	1	0	15-oxoprostaglandin 13-oxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (5Z)-(15S)-11-alpha-hydroxy-9,15-dioxoprostanoate + NAD(P)+ -> (5Z)-(15S)-11-alpha-hydroxy-9,15-dioxoprosta-13-enoate + NAD(P)H + H+.
1	0	0	3-dehydrosphinganine reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP(+) + sphinganine = 3-dehydrosphinganine + H(+) + NADPH.
1	0	0	7-dehydrocholesterol reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: cholesterol + NADP+ = cholesta-5,7-dien-3-beta-ol + NADPH + H+.
0	0	1	acyl-CoA hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + H2O = CoA + a carboxylate.
2	0	0	ADP-ribose diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ADP-ribose + H2O = AMP + D-ribose 5-phosphate.
1	2	0	allyl-alcohol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: allyl alcohol + NADP(+) = acrolein + H(+) + NADPH.
2	0	2	arachidonate-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: arachidonate + ATP + CoA = AMP + arachidonoyl-CoA + diphosphate + H(+).
2	1	0	beta-adrenergic receptor kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + beta-adrenergic receptor = ADP + phospho-beta-adrenergic receptor.
0	1	0	bile-salt sulfotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate + taurolithocholate = adenosine 3',5'-bisphosphate + taurolithocholate sulfate.
1	0	0	galactolipase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1,2-diacyl-3-beta-D-galactosyl-sn-glycerol + 2 H2O = 3-beta-D-galactosyl-sn-glycerol + 2 carboxylates.
2	1	0	indanol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: indan-1-ol + NAD(P)+ = indanone + NAD(P)H + H+.
1	0	0	chlordecone reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: chlordecone alcohol + NADP(+) = chlordecone + H(+) + NADPH.
1	0	0	chondroitin 4-sulfotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate + chondroitin = adenosine 3',5'-bisphosphate + chondroitin 4'-sulfate.
1	3	0	butyrate-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + an acid + CoA = AMP + diphosphate + an acyl-CoA.
0	0	1	citrate dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: citrate = cis-aconitate + H2O.
1	0	0	delta4-3-oxosteroid 5beta-reductase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: (1) 5beta-cholestan-3-one + NADP+ = cholest-4-en-3-one + NADPH + H+ and (2) 17,21-dihydroxy-5beta-pregnane-3,11,20-trione + NADP+ = cortisone + NADPH + H+.
0	1	0	L-cysteine:2-oxoglutarate aminotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-cysteine + 2-oxoglutarate = mercaptopyruvate + L-glutamate.
6	3	0	D-threo-aldose 1-dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a D-threo-aldose + NAD+ = a D-threo-aldono-1,5-lactone + NADH.
0	0	1	diiodophenylpyruvate reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-(3,5-diiodo-4-hydroxyphenyl)lactate + NAD(+) = 3-(3,5-diiodo-4-hydroxyphenyl)pyruvate + H(+) + NADH.
1	0	0	farnesol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-trans,6-trans-farnesol + NADP(+) = 2-trans,6-trans-farnesal + H(+) + NADPH.
0	2	0	flavonol 3-sulfotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3'-phospho-5'-adenylyl sulfate + quercetin = adenosine 3',5'-diphosphate + H(+) + quercetin 3-sulfate.
0	0	1	glucosamine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + D-glucosamine = ADP + D-glucosamine phosphate.
0	0	1	glucose-1,6-bisphosphate synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-phospho-D-glyceroyl phosphate + alpha-D-glucose 1-phosphate = 3-phospho-D-glycerate + alpha-D-glucose 1,6-bisphosphate + H(+).
0	1	0	glycerol dehydrogenase [NADP+] activity	Catalysis of the reaction: glycerol + NADP+ = D-glyceraldehyde + NADPH.
0	1	0	glycine N-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + glycine = CoA + N-acylglycine.
0	1	0	glycine N-benzoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: benzoyl-CoA + glycine = N-benzoylglycine + CoA + H(+).
1	0	0	antigen processing and presentation of peptide antigen	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses peptide antigen in association with an MHC protein complex on its cell surface, including proteolysis and transport steps for the peptide antigen both prior to and following assembly with the MHC protein complex. The peptide antigen is typically, but not always, processed from an endogenous or exogenous protein.
0	0	2	antigen processing and presentation, exogenous lipid antigen via MHC class Ib	The process in which an antigen-presenting cell expresses lipid antigen of exogenous origin in association with an MHC class Ib protein complex on its cell surface. Class Ib here refers to non-classical class I molecules, such as those of the CD1 family.
4	7	3	platelet-derived growth factor receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a platelet-derived growth factor receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
1	1	5	insulin-like growth factor receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the insulin-like growth factor receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
10	17	13	vascular endothelial growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of an extracellular ligand to a vascular endothelial growth factor receptor (VEGFR) located on the surface of the receiving cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
2	5	2	neurotrophin TRK receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a neurotrophin to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where the receptor possesses tyrosine kinase activity, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	4	hepatocyte growth factor receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of the hepatocyte growth factor receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
13	21	19	ephrin receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an ephrin receptor binding to an ephrin.
7	8	14	phosphatidylinositol-mediated signaling	A series of molecular signals in which a cell uses a phosphatidylinositol-mediated signaling to convert a signal into a response. Phosphatidylinositols include phosphatidylinositol (PtdIns) and its phosphorylated derivatives.
0	1	0	inositol phosphate-mediated signaling	Any intracellular signal transduction in which the signal is passed on within the cell via an inositol phosphate. Includes production of the inositol phosphate, and downstream effectors that further transmit the signal within the cell. Inositol phosphates are a group of mono- to poly-phosphorylated inositols, and include inositol monophosphate (IP), inositol trisphosphate (IP3), inositol pentakisphosphate (IP5) and inositol hexaphosphate (IP6).
1	0	1	inositol lipid-mediated signaling	A series of molecular signals in which a cell uses an inositol-containing lipid to convert a signal into a response. Inositol lipids include the phosphoinositides (phosphatidylinositol and its phosphorylated derivatives), ceramides containing inositol, and inositol glycolipids.
1	3	1	receptor ligand activity	The activity of a gene product that interacts with a receptor to effect a change in the activity of the receptor. Ligands may be produced by the same, or different, cell that expresses the receptor. Ligands may diffuse extracellularly from their point of origin to the receiving cell, or remain attached to an adjacent cell surface (e.g. Notch ligands).
0	2	0	receptor antagonist activity	The activity of a gene product that interacts with a receptor to decrease the ability of the receptor agonist to bind and activate the receptor.
1	0	0	regulation of melanin biosynthetic process	Any process that alters the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of melanin.
0	0	1	negative regulation of melanin biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of melanin.
2	2	0	positive regulation of melanin biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of melanin.
3	6	5	regulation of mRNA splicing, via spliceosome	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA splicing via a spliceosomal mechanism.
1	3	13	negative regulation of mRNA splicing, via spliceosome	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of mRNA splicing via a spliceosomal mechanism.
0	3	11	positive regulation of mRNA splicing, via spliceosome	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of mRNA splicing via a spliceosomal mechanism.
4	5	8	mRNA 5'-UTR binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the 5' untranslated region of an mRNA molecule.
2	3	2	monosaccharide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any monosaccharide. Monosaccharides are the simplest carbohydrates; they are polyhydroxy aldehydes H[CH(OH)]nC(=O)H or polyhydroxy ketones H[CHOH]nC(=O)[CHOH]mH with three or more carbon atoms. They form the constitutional repeating units of oligo- and polysaccharides.
4	0	0	quinone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a quinone, any member of a class of diketones derivable from aromatic compounds by conversion of two CH groups into CO groups with any necessary rearrangement of double bonds.
1	0	0	ubiquinone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ubiquinone, a quinone derivative with a tail of isoprene units.
5	10	7	focal adhesion assembly	The aggregation and bonding together of a set of components to form a focal adhesion, a complex of intracellular signaling and structural proteins that provides a structural link between the internal actin cytoskeleton and the ECM, and also function as a locus of signal transduction activity.
0	2	0	embryonic eye morphogenesis	The process occurring in the embryo by which the anatomical structures of the post-embryonic eye are generated and organized.
0	1	0	post-embryonic eye morphogenesis	The process, occurring after embryonic development, by which the anatomical structures of the eye are generated and organized. The eye is the organ of sight.
1	0	0	developmental pigmentation	The developmental process that results in the deposition of coloring matter in an organism, tissue or cell.
0	1	0	positive regulation of eye pigmentation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of a pattern of pigment in the eye of an organism.
1	2	1	chromatin-mediated maintenance of transcription	Maintenance of transcription by remodelling of chromatin into an 'open configuration'. Once established, this regulation is mitotically stable and is maintained over many cell divisions. It is also heritable.
0	0	1	calcium- and calmodulin-regulated 3',5'-cyclic-GMP phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: guanosine 3',5'-cyclic phosphate + H2O = guanosine 5'-phosphate. The reaction is calmodulin and calcium-sensitive.
0	2	1	autophagic cell death	A form of programmed cell death that is accompanied by the formation of autophagosomes. Autophagic cell death is characterized by lack of chromatin condensation and massive vacuolization of the cytoplasm, with little or no uptake by phagocytic cells.
1	1	0	somatic stem cell division	The self-renewing division of a somatic stem cell, a stem cell that can give rise to cell types of the body other than those of the germ-line.
1	0	1	establishment of body hair planar orientation	Orientation of body hairs, projections from the surface of an organism, such that the hairs all point in a uniform direction along the surface.
0	2	2	astrocyte activation	A change in morphology and behavior of an astrocyte resulting from exposure to a cytokine, chemokine, cellular ligand, or soluble factor.
0	0	2	regulation of fibroblast proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of multiplication or reproduction of fibroblast cells.
3	7	4	positive regulation of fibroblast proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of multiplication or reproduction of fibroblast cells.
4	6	3	negative regulation of fibroblast proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of multiplication or reproduction of fibroblast cells.
1	2	1	behavioral response to cocaine	Any process that results in a change in the behavior of an organism as a result of a cocaine stimulus.
1	0	1	behavioral response to ethanol	Any process that results in a change in the behavior of an organism as a result of an ethanol stimulus.
3	8	22	tau protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with tau protein. tau is a microtubule-associated protein, implicated in Alzheimer's disease, Down Syndrome and ALS.
2	6	12	regulation of synaptic plasticity	A process that modulates synaptic plasticity, the ability of synapses to change as circumstances require. They may alter function, such as increasing or decreasing their sensitivity, or they may increase or decrease in actual numbers.
1	0	3	regulation of neuronal synaptic plasticity	A process that modulates neuronal synaptic plasticity, the ability of neuronal synapses to change as circumstances require. They may alter function, such as increasing or decreasing their sensitivity, or they may increase or decrease in actual numbers.
1	2	5	regulation of long-term neuronal synaptic plasticity	A process that modulates long-term neuronal synaptic plasticity, the ability of neuronal synapses to change long-term as circumstances require. Long-term neuronal synaptic plasticity generally involves increase or decrease in actual synapse numbers.
1	0	1	positive regulation of long-term neuronal synaptic plasticity	A process that increases long-term neuronal synaptic plasticity, the ability of neuronal synapses to change long-term as circumstances require. Long-term neuronal synaptic plasticity generally involves increase or decrease in actual synapse numbers.
1	0	6	regulation of short-term neuronal synaptic plasticity	A process that modulates short-term neuronal synaptic plasticity, the ability of neuronal synapses to change in the short-term as circumstances require. Short-term neuronal synaptic plasticity generally involves increasing or decreasing synaptic sensitivity.
1	0	0	activin receptor complex	A protein complex that acts as an activin receptor. Heterodimeric activin receptors, comprising one Type I activin receptor and one Type II receptor polypeptide, and heterotrimeric receptors have been observed.
4	0	0	activin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with activin, a dimer of inhibin-beta subunits.
2	2	2	Set1C/COMPASS complex	A conserved protein complex that catalyzes methylation of histone H3. In Saccharomyces the complex contains Shg1p, Sdc1p, Swd1p, Swd2p, Swd3p, Spp1p, Bre2p, and the trithorax-related Set1p; in mammals it contains the catalytic subunit (SETD1A or SETD1B), WDR5, WDR82, RBBP5, ASH2L/ASH2, CXXC1/CFP1, HCFC1 and DPY30.
1	2	2	Golgi vesicle transport	The directed movement of substances into, out of or within the Golgi apparatus, mediated by vesicles.
0	1	1	Golgi vesicle budding	The evagination of the Golgi membrane, resulting in formation of a vesicle.
1	0	0	vesicle targeting, to, from or within Golgi	The process in which vesicles are directed to specific destination membranes during transport to, from or within the Golgi apparatus; mediated by the addition of specific coat proteins, including COPI and COPII proteins and clathrin, to the membrane during vesicle formation.
0	1	0	vesicle targeting, trans-Golgi to endosome	The process in which vesicles are directed to specific destination membranes during transport from the trans-Golgi to the endosome.
3	0	2	COPI coating of Golgi vesicle	The addition of COPI proteins and adaptor proteins to Golgi membranes during the formation of transport vesicles, forming a vesicle coat.
8	12	8	COPII vesicle coating	The addition of COPII proteins and adaptor proteins to ER membranes during the formation of transport vesicles, forming a vesicle coat.
1	0	0	regulation of vesicle targeting, to, from or within Golgi	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or destination of vesicle-mediated transport to, from or within the Golgi apparatus.
1	1	0	Golgi vesicle fusion to target membrane	The joining of the lipid bilayer membrane around a Golgi transport vesicle to the target lipid bilayer membrane.
0	0	2	Golgi vesicle docking	The initial attachment of a Golgi transport vesicle membrane to a target membrane, mediated by proteins protruding from the membrane of the Golgi vesicle and the target membrane.
0	1	0	Golgi vesicle prefusion complex stabilization	The binding of specific proteins to the t-SNARE/v-SNARE/SNAP25 complex, by which the Golgi vesicle prefusion complex is stabilized.
1	0	0	inter-Golgi cisterna vesicle-mediated transport	The directed movement of substances from one Golgi cisterna to another, mediated by small transport vesicles.
1	2	0	plasma membrane to endosome transport	Transport of a vesicle from the plasma membrane to the endosome.
0	1	0	rough endoplasmic reticulum lumen	The volume enclosed by the membranes of the rough endoplasmic reticulum.
1	2	6	negative regulation of DNA recombination at telomere	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of genetic recombination within the telomere.
1	1	1	sperm capacitation	A process required for sperm to reach fertilization competence. Sperm undergo an incompletely understood series of morphological and molecular maturational processes, termed capacitation, involving, among other processes, protein tyrosine phosphorylation and increased intracellular calcium.
1	0	0	norepinephrine secretion	The regulated release of norepinephrine by a cell. Norepinephrine is a catecholamine and it acts as a hormone and as a neurotransmitter of most of the sympathetic nervous system.
1	0	0	phytanoyl-CoA dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-oxoglutarate + O(2) + phytanoyl-CoA = 2-hydroxyphytanoyl-CoA + CO(2) + succinate.
0	2	1	eosinophil chemotaxis	The movement of an eosinophil in response to an external stimulus.
1	1	0	macrophage chemotaxis	The movement of a macrophage in response to an external stimulus.
1	0	0	lymphocyte chemotaxis	The directed movement of a lymphocyte in response to an external stimulus.
0	1	0	CXCR3 chemokine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a the CXCR3 chemokine receptor.
1	1	1	elastic fiber assembly	Assembly of the extracellular matrix fibers that enables the matrix to recoil after transient stretching.
0	1	2	snoRNA localization	Any process in which small nucleolar RNA is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location.
1	4	9	mRNA stabilization	Prevention of degradation of mRNA molecules. In the absence of compensating changes in other processes, the slowing of mRNA degradation can result in an overall increase in the population of active mRNA molecules.
2	0	0	flap endonuclease activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of a flap structure in DNA, but not other DNA structures; processes the ends of Okazaki fragments in lagging strand DNA synthesis.
0	1	0	3'-flap endonuclease activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of a 3' flap structure in DNA, but not other DNA structures; processes the 3' ends of Okazaki fragments in lagging strand DNA synthesis.
0	2	0	regulation of receptor-mediated endocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of receptor mediated endocytosis, the uptake of external materials by cells, utilizing receptors to ensure specificity of transport.
3	3	8	positive regulation of receptor-mediated endocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of receptor mediated endocytosis, the uptake of external materials by cells, utilizing receptors to ensure specificity of transport.
2	0	2	negative regulation of receptor-mediated endocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of receptor mediated endocytosis, the uptake of external materials by cells, utilizing receptors to ensure specificity of transport.
0	1	0	determination of dorsal identity	Determination of the identity of part of an organism or organ where those parts are of the type that occur in the dorsal region. Identity is considered to be the aggregate of characteristics by which a structure is recognized.
1	0	1	response to pain	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a pain stimulus. Pain stimuli cause activation of nociceptors, peripheral receptors for pain, include receptors which are sensitive to painful mechanical stimuli, extreme heat or cold, and chemical stimuli.
0	2	0	behavioral response to pain	Any process that results in a change in the behavior of an organism as a result of a pain stimulus. Pain stimuli cause activation of nociceptors, peripheral receptors for pain, include receptors which are sensitive to painful mechanical stimuli, extreme heat or cold, and chemical stimuli.
2	1	7	clathrin coat assembly	The process that results in the assembly of clathrin triskelia into the ordered structure known as a clathrin cage.
0	1	0	methionine adenosyltransferase complex	A multimeric enzyme complex composed of variable numbers of catalytic alpha subunits, and noncatalytic beta subunits. The beta subunits are believed to have a regulatory function. The enzyme complex catalyzes the synthesis of S-adenosylmethionine (AdoMet), which is the major methyl group donor, participating in the methylation of proteins, DNA, RNA, phospholipids, and other small molecules.
0	2	0	mitogen-activated protein kinase p38 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with mitogen-activated protein kinase p38, an enzyme that catalyzes the transfer of phosphate from ATP to hydroxyl side chains on proteins in response to mitogen activation.
1	4	3	vesicle docking	The initial attachment of a transport vesicle membrane to the target membrane, mediated by proteins protruding from the membrane of the vesicle and the target membrane. Docking requires only that the two membranes come close enough for these proteins to interact and adhere.
1	2	2	vesicle fusion with Golgi apparatus	The joining of the lipid bilayer membrane around a vesicle to the lipid bilayer membrane around the Golgi.
0	1	0	organelle fusion	The creation of a single organelle from two or more organelles.
3	4	1	lung alveolus development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the alveolus over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The alveolus is a sac for holding air in the lungs; formed by the terminal dilation of air passageways.
0	0	1	isotype switching to IgG isotypes	The switching of activated B cells from IgM biosynthesis to biosynthesis of an IgG isotype, accomplished through a recombination process involving an intrachromosomal deletion between switch regions that reside 5' of the IgM and one of the IgG constant region gene segments in the immunoglobulin heavy chain locus.
0	0	1	negative regulation of isotype switching to IgE isotypes	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of isotype switching to IgE isotypes.
0	1	0	negative regulation of isotype switching to IgA isotypes	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of isotype switching to IgA isotypes.
0	1	0	positive regulation of isotype switching to IgA isotypes	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of isotype switching to IgA isotypes.
0	0	1	positive regulation of isotype switching to IgG isotypes	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of isotype switching to IgG isotypes.
7	12	14	calcium-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex (a complex of two or more proteins that may include other nonprotein molecules), in the presence of calcium.
3	2	0	mitochondrion distribution	Any process that establishes the spatial arrangement of mitochondria between and within cells.
2	0	3	intracellular distribution of mitochondria	Any process that establishes the spatial arrangement of mitochondria within the cell.
0	1	0	axial mesoderm formation	The process that gives rise to the axial mesoderm. This process pertains to the initial formation of the structure from unspecified parts.
0	2	0	mesoderm morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the mesoderm are generated and organized.
2	3	1	mesodermal cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a mesoderm cell.
0	1	1	paraxial mesoderm development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the paraxial mesoderm over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The paraxial mesoderm is the mesoderm located bilaterally adjacent to the notochord and neural tube.
0	0	1	paraxial mesoderm formation	The process that gives rise to the paraxial mesoderm. This process pertains to the initial formation of the structure from unspecified parts.
0	0	1	lateral mesoderm development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the lateral mesoderm over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	1	0	mesendoderm development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the mesendoderm over time, from its formation to the mature structure. In animal embryos, mesendoderm development gives rise to both mesoderm and endoderm tissues.
1	1	4	retinoic acid receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a retinoic acid receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
1	0	1	regulation of retinoic acid receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of retinoic acid receptor signaling pathway activity.
3	1	0	positive regulation of retinoic acid receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of retinoic acid receptor signaling pathway activity.
0	0	2	negative regulation of retinoic acid receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of retinoic acid receptor signaling pathway activity.
0	1	0	brain-derived neurotrophic factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with brain-derived neurotrophic factor.
1	1	0	nerve growth factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with nerve growth factor (NGF).
0	2	4	platelet-derived growth factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with platelet-derived growth factor.
0	2	2	epidermal growth factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with epidermal growth factor.
3	2	1	cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cell development does not include the steps involved in committing a cell to a specific fate.
5	0	1	cell maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for a cell to attain its fully functional state.
87	128	148	perinuclear region of cytoplasm	Cytoplasm situated near, or occurring around, the nucleus.
0	2	0	Holliday junction resolvase complex	An endodeoxyribonuclease complex that resolves the 4-way DNA intermediates of a Holliday junction into two separate duplex DNA molecules. Can be branch-migration associated.
2	3	2	oogenesis	The complete process of formation and maturation of an ovum or female gamete from a primordial female germ cell. Examples of this process are found in Mus musculus and Drosophila melanogaster.
4	2	0	replication fork protection	Any process that prevents the collapse of stalled replication forks.
2	0	1	enteric nervous system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the enteric nervous system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The enteric nervous system is composed of two ganglionated neural plexuses in the gut wall which form one of the three major divisions of the autonomic nervous system. The enteric nervous system innervates the gastrointestinal tract, the pancreas, and the gall bladder. It contains sensory neurons, interneurons, and motor neurons. Thus the circuitry can autonomously sense the tension and the chemical environment in the gut and regulate blood vessel tone, motility, secretions, and fluid transport. The system is itself governed by the central nervous system and receives both parasympathetic and sympathetic innervation.
2	2	0	sympathetic nervous system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the sympathetic nervous system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The sympathetic nervous system is one of the two divisions of the vertebrate autonomic nervous system (the other being the parasympathetic nervous system). The sympathetic preganglionic neurons have their cell bodies in the thoracic and lumbar regions of the spinal cord and connect to the paravertebral chain of sympathetic ganglia. Innervate heart and blood vessels, sweat glands, viscera and the adrenal medulla. Most sympathetic neurons, but not all, use noradrenaline as a post-ganglionic neurotransmitter.
1	10	6	beta-tubulin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the microtubule constituent protein beta-tubulin.
3	2	11	synaptic vesicle endocytosis	A vesicle-mediated transport process, in which the synaptic vesicle membrane constituents are retrieved from the presynaptic membrane on the axon terminal after neurotransmitter secretion by exocytosis. Synaptic vesicle endocytosis can occur via clathrin-dependent and clathrin-independent mechanisms.
0	5	4	synaptic vesicle transport	The directed movement of synaptic vesicles.
1	1	3	anterograde synaptic vesicle transport	The directed movement of synaptic vesicle along axonal microtubules from the cell body to the presynapse.
0	0	2	Roundabout binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the Roundabout (ROBO) receptor, a transmembrane receptor.
1	0	1	maintenance of animal organ identity	The process in which the identity of an animal organ is maintained. Identity is considered to be the aggregate of characteristics by which a structure is recognized.
0	0	2	synaptic vesicle membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the membrane surrounding a synaptic vesicle.
0	1	2	signal recognition particle	A complex of protein and RNA which facilitates translocation of proteins across membranes.
1	0	0	regulation of timing of cell differentiation	The process controlling the activation and/or rate at which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized features. Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the XXX at a consistent predetermined time point during its development.
17	11	15	rhythmic process	Any process pertinent to the generation and maintenance of rhythms in the physiology of an organism.
1	1	0	circadian behavior	The specific behavior of an organism that recurs with a regularity of approximately 24 hours.
3	0	0	animal organ development	Development of a tissue or tissues that work together to perform a specific function or functions. Development pertains to the process whose specific outcome is the progression of a structure over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Organs are commonly observed as visibly distinct structures, but may also exist as loosely associated clusters of cells that work together to perform a specific function or functions.
2	3	1	blood vessel morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of blood vessels are generated and organized. The blood vessel is the vasculature carrying blood.
0	1	0	spermatid differentiation	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a spermatid over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
1	0	2	positive regulation of viral process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of a multi-organism process in which a virus is a participant.
0	1	0	negative regulation of viral process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a multi-organism process in which a virus is a participant.
1	4	0	lymph node development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of lymph nodes over time, from their formation to the mature structure. A lymph node is a round, oval, or bean shaped structure localized in clusters along the lymphatic vessels, with a distinct internal structure including specialized vasculature and B- and T-zones for the activation of lymphocytes.
4	7	2	spleen development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the spleen over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The spleen is a large vascular lymphatic organ composed of white and red pulp, involved both in hemopoietic and immune system functions.
4	10	6	thymus development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the thymus over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The thymus is a symmetric bi-lobed organ involved primarily in the differentiation of immature to mature T cells, with unique vascular, nervous, epithelial, and lymphoid cell components.
1	1	1	bone marrow development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the bone marrow over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	Peyer's patch development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of Peyer's patches over time, from their formation to the mature structure. Peyer's patches are typically found as nodules associated with gut epithelium with distinct internal structures including B- and T-zones for the activation of lymphocytes.
3	2	3	response to steroid hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a steroid hormone stimulus.
3	0	0	digestive tract morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the digestive tract are generated and organized. The digestive tract is the anatomical structure through which food passes and is processed.
4	0	0	positive regulation of pinocytosis	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of pinocytosis. Pinocytosis is the process in which cells take in liquid material from their external environment; literally 'cell drinking'. Liquid is enclosed in vesicles, formed by invagination of the plasma membrane. These vesicles then move into the cell and pass their contents to endosomes.
0	0	2	negative regulation of pinocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of pinocytosis. Pinocytosis is the process in which cells take in liquid material from their external environment; literally 'cell drinking'. Liquid is enclosed in vesicles, formed by invagination of the plasma membrane. These vesicles then move into the cell and pass their contents to endosomes.
1	1	1	embryonic digestive tract morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the digestive tract are generated and organized during embryonic development. The digestive tract is the anatomical structure through which food passes and is processed.
1	0	0	embryonic organ morphogenesis	Morphogenesis, during the embryonic phase, of a tissue or tissues that work together to perform a specific function or functions. Morphogenesis is the process in which anatomical structures are generated and organized. Organs are commonly observed as visibly distinct structures, but may also exist as loosely associated clusters of cells that work together to perform a specific function or functions.
1	0	0	post-embryonic animal organ morphogenesis	Morphogenesis, during the post-embryonic phase, of an animal tissue or tissues that work together to perform a specific function or functions. Morphogenesis pertains to process in which anatomical structures are generated and organized. Organs are commonly observed as visibly distinct structures, but may also exist as loosely associated clusters of cells that work together to perform a specific function or functions.
3	2	2	digestive tract development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the digestive tract over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The digestive tract is the anatomical structure through which food passes and is processed.
3	0	0	embryonic digestive tract development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the gut over time, from its formation to the mature structure during embryonic development. The gut is the region of the digestive tract extending from the beginning of the intestines to the anus.
1	6	2	embryonic organ development	Development, taking place during the embryonic phase, of a tissue or tissues that work together to perform a specific function or functions. Development pertains to the process whose specific outcome is the progression of a structure over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Organs are commonly observed as visibly distinct structures, but may also exist as loosely associated clusters of cells that work together to perform a specific function or functions.
0	0	1	post-embryonic animal organ development	Development, taking place during the post-embryonic phase of an animal tissue or tissues that work together to perform a specific function or functions. Development pertains to the process whose specific outcome is the progression of a structure over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Organs are commonly observed as visibly distinct structures, but may also exist as loosely associated clusters of cells that work together to perform a specific function or functions.
4	3	3	developmental growth	The increase in size or mass of an entire organism, a part of an organism or a cell, where the increase in size or mass has the specific outcome of the progression of the organism over time from one condition to another.
0	0	1	eye morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the eye are generated and organized.
4	2	0	camera-type eye morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the eye are generated and organized. The camera-type eye is an organ of sight that receives light through an aperture and focuses it through a lens, projecting it on a photoreceptor field.
1	4	0	embryonic camera-type eye morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the eye are generated and organized during embryonic development.
1	0	0	post-embryonic camera-type eye morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the eye are generated and organized during post-embryonic development.
2	2	3	embryonic morphogenesis	The process in which anatomical structures are generated and organized during the embryonic phase. The embryonic phase begins with zygote formation. The end of the embryonic phase is organism-specific. For example, it would be at birth for mammals, larval hatching for insects and seed dormancy in plants.
2	1	1	oocyte development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an oocyte over time, from initial commitment of the cell to its specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
0	0	1	reproductive structure development	The reproductive developmental process whose specific outcome is the progression of structures that will be used in the process of creating new individuals from one or more parents, from their formation to the mature structures.
0	1	0	multicellular organismal reproductive process	The process, occurring above the cellular level, that is pertinent to the reproductive function of a multicellular organism. This includes the integrated processes at the level of tissues and organs.
0	1	0	embryonic ectodermal digestive tract development	The process, occurring during the embryonic phase, whose specific outcome is the progression of the ectodermal gut over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	myoblast fate commitment	The process in which the developmental fate of a cell becomes restricted such that it will develop into a myoblast. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
0	1	0	myoblast development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the myoblast over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
1	3	0	positive regulation of skeletal muscle tissue growth	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of skeletal muscle growth.
1	0	0	negative regulation of muscle organ development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of muscle development.
0	0	1	regulation of developmental growth	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of developmental growth.
1	1	1	positive regulation of developmental growth	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of developmental growth.
0	0	1	regulation of skeletal muscle tissue development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle tissue development.
1	0	1	negative regulation of skeletal muscle tissue development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle tissue development.
0	3	0	positive regulation of skeletal muscle tissue development	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of skeletal muscle tissue development.
0	1	0	muscle organ morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of muscle are generated and organized.
0	1	0	animal organ formation	The process pertaining to the initial formation of an animal organ from unspecified parts. The process begins with the specific processes that contribute to the appearance of the discrete structure, such as inductive events, and ends when the structural rudiment of the organ is recognizable, such as a condensation of mesenchymal cells into the organ rudiment. Organs are a natural part or structure in an animal or a plant, capable of performing some special action (termed its function), which is essential to the life or well-being of the whole. The heart and lungs are organs of animals, and the petal and leaf are organs of plants. In animals the organs are generally made up of several tissues, one of which usually predominates, and determines the principal function of the organ.
1	0	0	anatomical structure formation involved in morphogenesis	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of an anatomical structure from unspecified parts. This process begins with the specific processes that contribute to the appearance of the discrete structure and ends when the structural rudiment is recognizable. An anatomical structure is any biological entity that occupies space and is distinguished from its surroundings. Anatomical structures can be macroscopic such as a carpel, or microscopic such as an acrosome.
0	1	0	smooth muscle cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of smooth muscle cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population.
3	1	2	regulation of smooth muscle cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle cell proliferation.
6	8	6	positive regulation of smooth muscle cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of smooth muscle cell proliferation.
4	3	1	negative regulation of smooth muscle cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of smooth muscle cell proliferation.
1	1	0	neuron fate commitment	The process in which the developmental fate of a cell becomes restricted such that it will develop into a neuron.
1	0	0	neuron fate determination	The process in which a cell becomes capable of differentiating autonomously into a neuron regardless of its environment; upon determination, the cell fate cannot be reversed.
2	0	0	neuron fate specification	The process in which a cell becomes capable of differentiating autonomously into a neuron in an environment that is neutral with respect to the developmental pathway. Upon specification, the cell fate can be reversed.
9	5	8	neuron development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a neuron over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
1	3	0	cell morphogenesis involved in neuron differentiation	The process in which the structures of a neuron are generated and organized. This process occurs while the initially relatively unspecialized cell is acquiring the specialized features of a neuron.
1	2	0	collateral sprouting	The process in which outgrowths develop from the shafts of existing axons.
1	2	0	negative regulation of collateral sprouting	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of collateral sprouting.
0	1	0	positive regulation of collateral sprouting	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of collateral sprouting.
4	5	7	axon extension	Long distance growth of a single axon process involved in cellular development.
0	1	0	axon extension involved in regeneration	Long distance growth of a single axon process involved in regeneration of the neuron.
4	1	4	response to axon injury	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an axon injury stimulus.
0	1	1	regulation of axon regeneration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of axon regeneration.
0	1	1	positive regulation of axon regeneration	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of axon regeneration.
2	1	0	negative regulation of axon regeneration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of axon regeneration.
0	0	1	negative regulation of collateral sprouting of intact axon in response to injury	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of collateral sprouting of an intact axon as a result of injury to an axon.
1	0	0	positive regulation of axon extension involved in regeneration	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of axon extension involved in regeneration.
0	0	1	negative regulation of axon extension involved in regeneration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of axon extension involved in regeneration.
1	0	0	positive regulation of collateral sprouting of injured axon	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of collateral sprouting of an injured axon.
0	1	2	generation of neurons	The process in which nerve cells are generated. This includes the production of neuroblasts and their differentiation into neurons.
6	3	0	embryonic cranial skeleton morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the cranial skeleton are generated and organized during the embryonic phase.
1	2	0	embryonic neurocranium morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the neurocranium are generated and organized during the embryonic phase. The neurocranium is the portion of the vertebrate skull surrounding the brain.
0	1	1	embryonic viscerocranium morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the viscerocranium are generated and organized during the embryonic phase. The viscerocranium is the part of the skull comprising the facial bones.
2	1	1	embryonic skeletal system morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the skeleton are generated and organized during the embryonic phase.
4	5	1	skeletal system morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the skeleton are generated and organized.
4	2	2	embryonic skeletal system development	The process, occurring during the embryonic phase, whose specific outcome is the progression of the skeleton over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
2	1	0	astrocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of an astrocyte. An astrocyte is the most abundant type of glial cell. Astrocytes provide support for neurons and regulate the environment in which they function.
5	2	3	oligodendrocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of an oligodendrocyte. An oligodendrocyte is a type of glial cell involved in myelinating the axons of neurons in the central nervous system.
1	0	0	regulation of astrocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of astrocyte differentiation.
2	2	2	positive regulation of astrocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of astrocyte differentiation.
0	1	1	negative regulation of astrocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of astrocyte differentiation.
1	0	2	regulation of oligodendrocyte differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of oligodendrocyte differentiation.
4	2	2	positive regulation of oligodendrocyte differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of oligodendrocyte differentiation.
1	1	1	negative regulation of oligodendrocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of oligodendrocyte differentiation.
2	0	0	epidermis morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the epidermis are generated and organized. The epidermis is the outer epithelial layer of an animal, it may be a single layer that produces an extracellular material (e.g. the cuticle of arthropods) or a complex stratified squamous epithelium, as in the case of many vertebrate species.
0	1	0	sebaceous gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the sebaceous gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
3	0	0	cardiac muscle tissue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of cardiac muscle over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	3	cardiac muscle fiber development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of cardiac muscle fiber over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
6	1	2	skeletal muscle fiber development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the skeletal muscle fiber over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Muscle fibers are formed by the maturation of myotubes. They can be classed as slow, intermediate/fast or fast.
1	1	1	regulation of skeletal muscle fiber development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle fiber development. Muscle fibers are formed by the maturation of myotubes. They can be classed as slow, intermediate/fast or fast.
1	0	1	positive regulation of skeletal muscle fiber development	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of skeletal muscle fiber development. Muscle fibers are formed by the maturation of myotubes. They can be classed as slow, intermediate/fast or fast.
1	2	1	smooth muscle tissue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of smooth muscle over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	2	muscle fiber development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the muscle fiber over time, from its formation to the mature structure. In skeletal muscle, fibers are formed by the maturation of myotubes. They can be classed as slow, intermediate/fast or fast.
0	1	0	semicircular canal morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the semicircular canals are generated and organized.
1	0	0	pigment granule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a pigment granule.
5	4	2	branching morphogenesis of an epithelial tube	The process in which the anatomical structures of branches in an epithelial tube are generated and organized. A tube is a long hollow cylinder.
1	1	0	branching morphogenesis of a nerve	The process in which the anatomical structures of branches in a nerve are generated and organized. This term refers to an anatomical structure (nerve) not a cell (neuron).
0	0	2	mesenchymal cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a mesenchymal cell. A mesenchymal cell is a loosely associated cell that is part of the connective tissue in an organism. Mesenchymal cells give rise to more mature connective tissue cell types.
2	1	1	calcium-induced calcium release activity	Enables transmembrane transfer of calcium ions from an intracellular store to the cytosol on induction by increased calcium concentration.
0	0	1	sarcomerogenesis	The process in which sarcomeres are added in series within a fiber.
1	1	0	tissue remodeling	The reorganization or renovation of existing tissues. This process can either change the characteristics of a tissue such as in blood vessel remodeling, or result in the dynamic equilibrium of a tissue such as in bone remodeling.
4	5	16	presynaptic active zone	A specialized region of the plasma membrane and cell cortex of a presynaptic neuron; encompasses a region of the plasma membrane where synaptic vesicles dock and fuse, and a specialized cortical cytoskeletal matrix.
0	1	5	presynaptic active zone membrane	The membrane portion of the presynaptic active zone; it is the site where docking and fusion of synaptic vesicles occurs for the release of neurotransmitters.
0	1	5	cytoskeleton of presynaptic active zone	The specialized cytoskeletal matrix of the presynaptic active zone. It has specialized functions in organizing synaptic events such as immobilisation or translocation of synaptic vesicles, and assembling active zone components. It is believed to form a molecular scaffold that organizes neurotransmitter release sites.
0	1	2	maintenance of presynaptic active zone structure	A process which maintains the organization and the arrangement of proteins at the active zone to ensure the fusion and docking of vesicles and the release of neurotransmitters.
0	0	4	calcium ion-regulated exocytosis of neurotransmitter	The release of a neurotransmitter into the synaptic cleft by exocytosis of synaptic vesicles, where the release step is dependent on a rise in cytosolic calcium ion levels.
2	0	0	pronephros development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the pronephros over time, from its formation to the mature structure. In mammals, the pronephros is the first of the three embryonic kidneys to be established and exists only transiently. In lower vertebrates such as fish and amphibia, the pronephros is the fully functional embryonic kidney and is indispensable for larval life.
1	2	0	genitalia development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the genitalia over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	1	0	female genitalia morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of female genitalia are generated and organized.
0	1	0	male genitalia morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of male genitalia are generated and organized.
11	8	19	neuron projection morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a neuron projection are generated and organized. A neuron projection is any process extending from a neural cell, such as axons or dendrites.
3	5	7	dendrite morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a dendrite are generated and organized.
2	2	6	regulation of dendrite morphogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of dendrite morphogenesis.
0	1	1	hair follicle maturation	A developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for a hair follicle to attain its fully functional state.
2	1	7	erythrocyte development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an erythrocyte over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	1	enucleate erythrocyte development	The process aimed at the progression of an enucleate erythrocyte over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
2	5	2	inner ear development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the inner ear over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	regulation of axon extension involved in axon guidance	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of axon extension involved in axon guidance.
1	1	0	positive regulation of axon extension involved in axon guidance	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of axon extension involved in axon guidance.
4	0	1	negative regulation of axon extension involved in axon guidance	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of axon extension involved in axon guidance.
3	2	0	artery morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of arterial blood vessels are generated and organized. Arteries are blood vessels that transport blood from the heart to the body and its organs.
1	2	0	venous blood vessel morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of venous blood vessels are generated and organized. Veins are blood vessels that transport blood from the body and its organs to the heart.
2	0	0	axon extension involved in axon guidance	The long distance growth of a single cell process, that is involved in the migration of an axon growth cone, where the migration is directed to a specific target site by a combination of attractive and repulsive cues.
0	1	0	forebrain morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the forebrain are generated and organized. The forebrain is the anterior of the three primary divisions of the developing chordate brain or the corresponding part of the adult brain (in vertebrates, includes especially the cerebral hemispheres, the thalamus, and the hypothalamus and especially in higher vertebrates is the main control center for sensory and associative information processing, visceral functions, and voluntary motor functions).
3	3	3	brain morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the brain are generated and organized. The brain is one of the two components of the central nervous system and is the center of thought and emotion. It is responsible for the coordination and control of bodily activities and the interpretation of information from the senses (sight, hearing, smell, etc.).
5	7	2	anatomical structure development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of an anatomical structure from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of the structure and ends with the mature structure, whatever form that may be including its natural destruction. An anatomical structure is any biological entity that occupies space and is distinguished from its surroundings. Anatomical structures can be macroscopic such as a carpel, or microscopic such as an acrosome.
0	0	1	cell projection morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a cell projection are generated and organized.
1	1	0	leukemia inhibitory factor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of leukemia inhibitory factor to a receptor on the surface of the target cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
3	4	3	stem cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a stem cell. A stem cell is a cell that retains the ability to divide and proliferate throughout life to provide progenitor cells that can differentiate into specialized cells.
0	1	1	stem cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the stem cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cell development does not include the steps involved in committing a cell to its specific fate.
5	7	11	cell motility	Any process involved in the controlled self-propelled movement of a cell that results in translocation of the cell from one place to another.
0	1	1	multicellular organismal homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state at the level of the multicellular organism.
1	1	2	homeostasis of number of cells	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of the steady-state number of cells within a population of cells.
6	2	2	homeostasis of number of cells within a tissue	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of the steady-state number of cells within a population of cells in a tissue.
1	0	0	chemical homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of a chemical.
1	1	0	peripheral nervous system neuron development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a neuron whose cell body is located in the peripheral nervous system, from initial commitment of the cell to a neuronal fate, to the fully functional differentiated neuron.
0	0	1	peripheral nervous system neuron axonogenesis	Generation of a long process from a neuron whose cell body resides in the peripheral nervous system. The axon carries action potential from the cell body towards target cells.
0	1	0	L-xylulose reductase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP(+) + xylitol = L-xylulose + H(+) + NADPH.
1	0	0	m7G(5')pppN diphosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 7-methylguanosine 5'-triphospho-5'-polynucleotide + H2O = 7-methylguanosine 5'-phosphate + polynucleotide.
0	0	1	myosin-light-chain-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: myosin light-chain phosphate + H2O = myosin light chain + phosphate.
1	0	0	N-acylglucosamine 2-epimerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-acyl-D-glucosamine = N-acyl-D-mannosamine.
0	1	0	NAD(P)+ nucleosidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(P)+ + H2O = ADP-ribose(P) + nicotinamide.
0	1	0	NADH dehydrogenase (quinone) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADH + H+ + a quinone = NAD+ + a quinol.
0	1	0	omega-amidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a monoamide of a dicarboxylic acid + H2O = a dicarboxylate + NH3.
0	1	0	plasmalogen synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + 1-O-alk-1-enyl-glycero-3-phosphocholine = CoA + plasmenylcholine.
1	0	0	procollagen galactosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-galactose + procollagen 5-hydroxy-L-lysine = UDP + procollagen 5-(D-galactosyloxy)-L-lysine.
0	0	1	propionate-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + propanoate + CoA = AMP + diphosphate + propanoyl-CoA.
0	0	1	prostaglandin-E synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: prostaglandin H(2) = prostaglandin E(2).
0	1	0	prostaglandin-E2 9-reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (5Z,13E)-(15S)-9-alpha,11-alpha,15-trihydroxyprosta-5,13-dienoate + NADP+ = (5Z,13E)-(15S)-11-alpha,15-dihydroxy-9-oxoprosta-5,13-dienoate + NADPH.
0	2	0	retinyl-palmitate esterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: retinyl palmitate + H2O = retinol + palmitate + H+.
1	0	1	RNA uridylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UTP + RNA(n) = diphosphate + RNA(n+1).
0	1	0	sphingomyelin phosphodiesterase D activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H(2)O + sphingomyelin = ceramide 1-phosphate + choline + H(+).
1	0	0	sphingosine N-acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + sphingosine = CoA + N-acylsphingosine.
1	2	0	steroid sulfotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate + a phenolic steroid = adenosine 3',5'-bisphosphate + steroid O-sulfate.
1	0	0	sulfur dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: sulfur + O2 + H2O = sulfite.
3	6	10	tau-protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + tau-protein = ADP + O-phospho-tau-protein.
0	0	1	triokinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-glyceraldehyde + ATP = D-glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
1	1	0	[acetyl-CoA carboxylase] kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + [acetyl-CoA carboxylase] = ADP + [acetyl-CoA carboxylase] phosphate.
1	0	0	nitrite reductase (NO-forming) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: nitric oxide + H2O + ferricytochrome c = nitrite + ferrocytochrome c + 2 H+.
2	3	1	3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate, a naturally occurring mixed anhydride. It is an intermediate in the formation of a variety of sulfo compounds in biological systems.
2	2	0	3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate, a naturally occurring mixed anhydride. It is an intermediate in the formation of a variety of sulfo compounds in biological systems.
2	0	0	calcium-dependent phospholipase C activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a phosphatidylcholine + H2O = 1,2-diacylglycerol + choline phosphate. This reaction requires Ca2+.
5	2	1	transforming growth factor beta binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with TGF-beta, transforming growth factor beta, a multifunctional peptide that controls proliferation, differentiation and other functions in many cell types.
1	4	4	positive regulation of viral transcription	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of viral transcription.
1	3	0	amyloid-beta metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving amyloid-beta, a glycoprotein associated with Alzheimer's disease, and its precursor, amyloid precursor protein (APP).
1	0	1	microfibril binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a microfibril, any small fibril occurring in biological material.
0	0	1	N-acetylneuraminate synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: phosphoenolpyruvate + N-acetyl-D-mannosamine + H2O = phosphate + N-acetylneuraminate.
1	1	2	arachidonic acid secretion	The controlled release of arachidonic acid from a cell or a tissue.
1	0	0	GMP 5'-nucleotidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5'-GMP + H2O = guanosine + phosphate.
1	0	0	icosatetraenoic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with icosatetraenoic acid, any straight-chain fatty acid with twenty carbon atoms and four double bonds per molecule.
1	2	0	arachidonic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with arachidonic acid, a straight chain fatty acid with 20 carbon atoms and four double bonds per molecule. Arachidonic acid is the all-Z-(5,8,11,14)-isomer.
1	0	0	aspartate-tRNA(Asn) ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: tRNA(Asx) + L-aspartate + ATP = aspartyl-tRNA(Asx) + diphosphate + AMP.
0	0	1	protein-glutamine glutaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein L-glutamine + H2O = protein L-glutamate + NH3.
0	1	0	methylarsonate reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 glutathione + H(+) + methylarsonate = glutathione disulfide + H(2)O + methylarsonous acid.
0	0	1	delta14-sterol reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP+ + 4,4-dimethyl-5-alpha-cholesta-8,24-dien-3-beta-ol = NADPH + H+ + 4,4-dimethyl-5-alpha-cholesta-8,14,24-trien-3-beta-ol.
0	2	0	acetyl-CoA C-myristoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: myristoyl-CoA + acetyl-CoA = 3-oxopalmitoyl-CoA + CoA.
1	0	0	chondroitin sulfate proteoglycan biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of chondroitin sulfate proteoglycan, any glycoprotein whose glycosaminoglycan units are chondroitin sulfate. Chondroitin sulfates are a group of 10-60 kDa glycosaminoglycans, widely distributed in cartilage and other mammalian connective tissues; the repeat units consist of beta-(1,4)-linked D-glucuronyl beta-(1,3)-N-acetyl-D-galactosamine sulfate.
1	2	0	3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate (PAPS), a naturally occurring mixed anhydride. It is an intermediate in the formation of a variety of sulfo compounds in biological systems.
3	1	3	RNA transport	The directed movement of RNA, ribonucleic acids, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
8	6	4	flavin adenine dinucleotide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with FAD, flavin-adenine dinucleotide, the coenzyme or the prosthetic group of various flavoprotein oxidoreductase enzymes, in either the oxidized form, FAD, or the reduced form, FADH2.
5	4	2	NADP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with nicotinamide-adenine dinucleotide phosphate, a coenzyme involved in many redox and biosynthetic reactions; binding may be to either the oxidized form, NADP+, or the reduced form, NADPH.
5	1	0	hydrogen peroxide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), a potentially harmful byproduct of aerobic cellular respiration which can cause damage to DNA.
1	0	0	regulation of homocysteine metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving homocysteine, the amino acid alpha-amino-gamma-mercaptobutanoic acid.
1	1	1	homocysteine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving homocysteine, the amino acid alpha-amino-gamma-mercaptobutanoic acid. Homocysteine is an important intermediate in the metabolic reactions of its S-methyl derivative, methionine.
2	0	0	positive regulation of lymphocyte proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of lymphocyte proliferation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of lymphocyte proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of lymphocyte proliferation.
1	1	1	epithelial cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of epithelial cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population. Epithelial cells make up the epithelium, the covering of internal and external surfaces of the body, including the lining of vessels and other small cavities. It consists of cells joined by small amounts of cementing substances.
3	2	0	regulation of epithelial cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell proliferation.
5	7	2	positive regulation of epithelial cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of epithelial cell proliferation.
8	5	4	negative regulation of epithelial cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of epithelial cell proliferation.
4	1	13	androgen receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an androgen receptor.
1	4	5	regulation of mRNA processing	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA processing, those processes involved in the conversion of a primary mRNA transcript into a mature mRNA prior to its translation into polypeptide.
0	2	2	negative regulation of defense response to virus	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of antiviral mechanisms, thereby facilitating viral replication.
1	0	0	regulation of defense response to virus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the antiviral response of a cell or organism.
1	0	0	negative regulation of defense response to virus by host	Any host process that results in the inhibition of antiviral immune response mechanisms, thereby facilitating viral replication. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
1	6	7	regulation of defense response to virus by virus	Any viral process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of the antiviral response of the host cell or organism.
0	2	0	regulation of defense response to virus by host	Any host process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of the antiviral response of a host cell or organism.
1	1	0	DNA binding domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the DBD, DNA binding domain, of a protein.
1	1	1	LBD domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the LBD, the ligand binding domain found in nuclear receptors. In general, the LBDs consist of three layers comprised of twelve alpha-helices and several beta-strands that are organized around a lipophilic ligand-binding pocket.
4	6	4	WW domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a WW domain of a protein, a small module composed of 40 amino acids and plays a role in mediating protein-protein interactions via proline-rich regions.
1	2	2	CARD domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a CARD (N-terminal caspase recruitment) domain, a protein-protein interaction domain that belongs to the death domain-fold superfamily. These protein molecule families are similar in structure with each consisting of six or seven anti-parallel alpha-helices that form highly specific homophilic interactions between signaling partners. CARD exists in the N-terminal prodomains of several caspases and in apoptosis-regulatory proteins and mediates the assembly of CARD-containing proteins that participate in activation or suppression of CARD carrying members of the caspase family.
1	2	4	regulation of protein secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the controlled release of a protein from a cell.
2	2	3	negative regulation of protein secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the controlled release of a protein from a cell.
9	5	10	positive regulation of protein secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the controlled release of a protein from a cell.
11	10	9	regulation of inflammatory response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the inflammatory response, the immediate defensive reaction (by vertebrate tissue) to infection or injury caused by chemical or physical agents.
9	7	5	negative regulation of inflammatory response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the inflammatory response.
7	12	5	positive regulation of inflammatory response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the inflammatory response.
2	3	2	regulation of peptidyl-tyrosine phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation of peptidyl-tyrosine.
8	15	6	positive regulation of peptidyl-tyrosine phosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation of peptidyl-tyrosine.
3	0	3	negative regulation of peptidyl-tyrosine phosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the phosphorylation of peptidyl-tyrosine.
0	2	0	RS domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RS domain of a protein; RS domains are usually highly phosphorylated and characterized by the presence of arginine (R)/serine (S) dipeptides. The RS domain promotes protein-protein interactions and directs subcellular localization and, in certain situations, nucleocytoplasmic shuttling of individual SR proteins. They also play a role in splicing.
1	1	0	negative regulation of lipoprotein metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving lipoproteins, any conjugated, water-soluble protein in which the nonprotein group consists of a lipid or lipids.
2	6	6	low-density lipoprotein particle receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a low-density lipoprotein receptor.
1	3	3	regulation of phagocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of phagocytosis, the process in which phagocytes engulf external particulate material.
3	0	2	negative regulation of phagocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of phagocytosis.
9	4	5	positive regulation of phagocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of phagocytosis.
6	3	3	regulation of neurogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neurogenesis, the generation of cells in the nervous system.
2	1	2	negative regulation of neurogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neurogenesis, the generation of cells within the nervous system.
4	2	5	positive regulation of neurogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neurogenesis, the generation of cells within the nervous system.
1	1	8	regulation of axonogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of axonogenesis, the generation of an axon, the long process of a neuron.
1	4	3	negative regulation of axonogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of axonogenesis.
5	6	5	positive regulation of axonogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of axonogenesis.
1	4	4	regulation of dendrite development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of dendrite development.
0	0	2	negative regulation of dendrite morphogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dendrite morphogenesis.
4	2	0	positive regulation of dendrite morphogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dendrite morphogenesis.
22	13	15	regulation of immune response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the immune response, the immunological reaction of an organism to an immunogenic stimulus.
1	0	3	negative regulation of immune response	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the immune response, the immunological reaction of an organism to an immunogenic stimulus.
1	1	0	positive regulation of immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the immune response, the immunological reaction of an organism to an immunogenic stimulus.
0	0	1	RNA destabilization	Any process that decreases the stability of an RNA molecule, making it more vulnerable to degradative processes.
0	0	1	dopamine receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a dopamine receptor.
1	3	2	RAGE receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the RAGE receptor, the receptor for advanced glycation end-products.
0	1	0	detoxification of mercury ion	Any process that reduce or remove the toxicity of mercuric ion. These include transport of mercury away from sensitive areas and to compartments or complexes whose purpose is sequestration of mercury ion and/or reduction of mercury ion (Hg[II]) to metallic mercury (Hg[0]).
2	8	7	regulation of catalytic activity	Any process that modulates the activity of an enzyme.
2	2	1	regulation of viral process	Any process that modulates the rate or extent of the viral life cycle, the set of processes by which a virus reproduces and spreads among hosts.
0	1	1	regulation of cellular process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a cellular process, any of those that are carried out at the cellular level, but are not necessarily restricted to a single cell. For example, cell communication occurs among more than one cell, but occurs at the cellular level.
8	6	11	regulation of insulin secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of insulin.
0	2	0	activated T cell proliferation	The expansion of a T cell population following activation by an antigenic stimulus.
2	3	7	ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of ions within an organism or cell.
3	0	3	regulation of synapse structure or activity	Any process that modulates the physical form or the activity of a synapse, the junction between a neuron and a target (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell).
6	3	11	modulation of chemical synaptic transmission	Any process that modulates the frequency or amplitude of synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to a target (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell) across a synapse.  Amplitude, in this case, refers to the change in postsynaptic membrane potential due to a single instance of synaptic transmission.
2	1	2	negative regulation of synaptic transmission	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to a target (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell) across a synapse.
1	0	3	positive regulation of synaptic transmission	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to a target (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell) across a synapse.
3	2	4	regulation of synapse organization	Any process that modulates the physical form of a synapse, the junction between a neuron and a target (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell).
4	5	14	synapse organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a synapse, the junction between a neuron and a target (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell).
1	0	0	regulation of steroid biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of steroids, compounds with a 1,2,cyclopentanoperhydrophenanthrene nucleus.
0	2	3	GABA receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA, 4-aminobutyrate) receptor.
0	2	2	phosphoserine residue binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a phosphorylated serine residue within a protein.
0	2	0	phosphothreonine residue binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a phosphorylated threonine residue within a protein.
0	0	1	negative regulation of coagulation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of coagulation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of coagulation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of coagulation.
31	31	40	protein stabilization	Any process involved in maintaining the structure and integrity of a protein and preventing it from degradation or aggregation.
10	5	9	defense response to Gram-negative bacterium	Reactions triggered in response to the presence of a Gram-negative bacterium that act to protect the cell or organism.
8	13	10	defense response to Gram-positive bacterium	Reactions triggered in response to the presence of a Gram-positive bacterium that act to protect the cell or organism.
6	3	2	defense response to fungus	Reactions triggered in response to the presence of a fungus that act to protect the cell or organism.
2	0	0	pyruvate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of pyruvate, 2-oxopropanoate, from one side of a membrane to the other.
8	9	12	cell adhesion molecule binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a cell adhesion molecule.
6	5	3	extracellular matrix binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a component of the extracellular matrix.
2	4	1	progesterone receptor signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a progesterone binding to its receptor.
2	1	1	regulation of calcium-mediated signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of calcium-mediated signaling, the process in which a cell uses calcium ions to convert an extracellular signal into a response.
2	0	0	negative regulation of calcium-mediated signaling	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of calcium-mediated signaling.
2	1	0	positive regulation of calcium-mediated signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of calcium-mediated signaling.
1	3	0	antigen receptor-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a B or T cell.
21	34	32	T cell receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a T cell.
8	12	19	B cell receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a B cell.
1	3	1	regulation of B cell receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signaling pathways initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a B cell.
0	2	0	regulation of T cell receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signaling pathways initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a T cell.
0	0	1	positive regulation of antigen receptor-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signaling pathways initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a B- or T cell.
1	0	1	negative regulation of B cell receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signaling pathways initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a B cell.
6	4	2	negative regulation of T cell receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signaling pathways initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a T cell.
1	2	1	positive regulation of B cell receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signaling pathways initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a B cell.
1	3	4	positive regulation of T cell receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signaling pathways initiated by the cross-linking of an antigen receptor on a T cell.
1	3	0	regulation of T cell activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of T cell activation.
1	0	0	regulation of B cell activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of B cell activation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of activation.
3	1	0	negative regulation of T cell activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T cell activation.
2	1	0	negative regulation of B cell activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of B cell activation.
1	4	3	positive regulation of T cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T cell activation.
3	5	14	positive regulation of B cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of B cell activation.
4	1	0	white fat cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a white adipocyte, an animal connective tissue cell involved in energy storage. White adipocytes have cytoplasmic lipids arranged in a unique vacuole.
5	2	1	brown fat cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a brown adipocyte, an animal connective tissue cell involved in adaptive thermogenesis. Brown adipocytes contain multiple small droplets of triglycerides and a high number of mitochondria.
0	1	0	nervous system process	A organ system process carried out by any of the organs or tissues of neurological system.
0	0	1	regulation of body fluid levels	Any process that modulates the levels of body fluids.
1	2	2	voluntary musculoskeletal movement	The movement of an organism or part of an organism using mechanoreceptors, the nervous system, striated muscle and/or the skeletal system that can be controlled at will.
0	0	3	neuromuscular process controlling posture	Any process in which an organism voluntarily modulates its posture, the alignment of its anatomical parts.
3	4	5	neuromuscular process controlling balance	Any process that an organism uses to control its balance, the orientation of the organism (or the head of the organism) in relation to the source of gravity. In humans and animals, balance is perceived through visual cues, the labyrinth system of the inner ears and information from skin pressure receptors and muscle and joint receptors.
3	12	4	cognition	The operation of the mind by which an organism becomes aware of objects of thought or perception; it includes the mental activities associated with thinking, learning, and memory.
2	0	1	multicellular organismal water homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of water within a tissue, organ, or a multicellular organism.
3	3	1	intestinal absorption	Any process in which nutrients are taken up from the contents of the intestine.
7	1	3	response to stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus. The process begins with detection of the stimulus and ends with a change in state or activity or the cell or organism.
0	1	1	cobalt ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a cobalt (Co) ion.
31	30	27	leukocyte migration	The movement of a leukocyte within or between different tissues and organs of the body.
1	4	2	leukocyte tethering or rolling	Transient adhesive interactions between leukocytes and endothelial cells lining blood vessels. Carbohydrates on circulating leukocytes bind selectins on the vessel wall causing the leukocytes to slow down and roll along the inner surface of the vessel wall. During this rolling motion, transitory bonds are formed and broken between selectins and their ligands. Typically the first step in cellular extravasation (the movement of leukocytes out of the circulatory system, towards the site of tissue damage or infection).
0	1	0	leukocyte adhesive activation	The activation of loosely bound or rolling leukocytes by signals displayed on blood vessel endothelial cells, which is typically the second step in cellular extravasation.
2	1	0	diapedesis	The passage of a leukocyte between the tight junctions of endothelial cells lining blood vessels, typically the fourth and final step of cellular extravasation.
1	1	3	neuromuscular process	Any process pertaining to the functions of the nervous and muscular systems of an organism.
3	0	1	detection of light stimulus involved in visual perception	The series of events involved in visual perception in which a light stimulus is received and converted into a molecular signal.
2	0	2	sensory perception of taste	The series of events required for an organism to receive a gustatory stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. Gustation involves the direct detection of chemical composition, usually through contact with chemoreceptor cells. This is a neurological process.
2	0	0	detection of mechanical stimulus involved in sensory perception of sound	The series of events involved in the perception of sound vibration in which the vibration is received and converted into a molecular signal.
0	0	1	sensory perception of bitter taste	The series of events required to receive a bitter taste stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. This is a neurological process.
0	0	1	sensory perception of sweet taste	The series of events required to receive a sweet taste stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. This is a neurological process.
0	0	1	sensory perception of umami taste	The series of events required to receive an umami taste stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. Umami taste is the savory taste of meats and other foods that are rich in glutamates. This is a neurological process.
3	3	3	positive chemotaxis	The directed movement of a motile cell or organism towards a higher concentration of a chemical.
4	2	1	negative chemotaxis	The directed movement of a motile cell or organism towards a lower concentration of a chemical.
0	2	1	regulation of chemotaxis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a motile cell or organism in response to a specific chemical concentration gradient.
2	3	0	positive regulation of chemotaxis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a motile cell or organism in response to a specific chemical concentration gradient.
0	2	0	negative regulation of chemotaxis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a motile cell or organism in response to a specific chemical concentration gradient.
1	0	0	regulation of negative chemotaxis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a motile cell or organism towards a lower concentration in a concentration gradient of a specific chemical.
0	1	0	negative regulation of negative chemotaxis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a motile cell or organism towards a lower concentration in a concentration gradient of a specific chemical.
1	1	1	positive regulation of positive chemotaxis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a motile cell or organism towards a higher concentration in a concentration gradient of a specific chemical.
0	0	2	induction of positive chemotaxis	Any process that initiates the directed movement of a motile cell or organism towards a higher concentration in a concentration gradient of a specific chemical.
1	1	0	sensory perception of light stimulus	The series of events required for an organism to receive a sensory light stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. This is a neurological process.
1	1	0	equilibrioception	The series of events required for an organism to receive an orientational stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. Equilibrioception refers to a combination of processes by which an organism can perceive its orientation with respect to gravity. In animals, stimuli come from labyrinth system of the inner ears, monitoring the direction of motion; visual stimuli, with information on orientation and motion; pressure receptors, which tell the organism which body surfaces are in contact with the ground; and proprioceptive cues, which report which parts of the body are in motion.
1	1	0	detection of temperature stimulus involved in sensory perception of pain	The series of events involved in the perception of pain in which a temperature stimulus is received and converted into a molecular signal.
1	2	0	detection of mechanical stimulus involved in sensory perception of pain	The series of events involved in the perception of pain in which a mechanical stimulus is received and converted into a molecular signal.
1	0	0	detection of mechanical stimulus involved in sensory perception	The series of events in which a mechanical stimulus is received and converted into a molecular signal as part of sensory perception.
0	0	1	sensory perception of touch	The series of events required for an organism to receive a touch stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal. This is a neurological process. The perception of touch in animals is mediated by mechanoreceptors in the skin and mucous membranes and is the sense by which contact with objects gives evidence as to certain of their qualities. Different types of touch can be perceived (for example, light, coarse, pressure and tickling) and the stimulus may be external or internal (e.g. the feeling of a full stomach).
0	1	2	detection of mechanical stimulus	The series of events by which a mechanical stimulus is received and converted into a molecular signal.
3	3	1	negative regulation of lipid catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of lipids.
1	0	2	positive regulation of lipid catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of lipids.
1	0	7	nitric-oxide synthase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the enzyme nitric-oxide synthase.
5	2	5	regulation of nitric-oxide synthase activity	Any process that modulates the activity of the enzyme nitric-oxide synthase.
2	1	4	positive regulation of nitric-oxide synthase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of the enzyme nitric-oxide synthase.
1	1	2	negative regulation of nitric-oxide synthase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the activity of the enzyme nitric-oxide synthase.
2	1	0	negative regulation of lipoprotein lipase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the activity of the enzyme lipoprotein lipase.
0	1	1	positive regulation of lipoprotein lipase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of the enzyme lipoprotein lipase.
2	4	10	microtubule plus-end binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the plus end of a microtubule.
3	1	4	microtubule minus-end binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the minus end of a microtubule.
0	0	1	microtubule sliding	The movement of one microtubule along another microtubule.
1	2	0	microtubule severing	The process in which a microtubule is broken down into smaller segments. Severing enzymes remove dimers from the middle of the filament to create new ends, unlike depolymerizing kinesins that use ATP to uncap microtubules at their ends.
0	4	6	actin filament severing	The process in which an actin filament is broken down into smaller filaments.
33	39	71	actin filament binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an actin filament, also known as F-actin, a helical filamentous polymer of globular G-actin subunits.
1	5	10	barbed-end actin filament capping	The binding of a protein or protein complex to the barbed (or plus) end of an actin filament, thus preventing the addition, exchange or removal of further actin subunits.
4	3	16	actin filament bundle assembly	The assembly of actin filament bundles; actin filaments are on the same axis but may be oriented with the same or opposite polarities and may be packed with different levels of tightness.
4	4	9	protein kinase A binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any subunit of protein kinase A.
4	6	5	mitogen-activated protein kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a mitogen-activated protein kinase.
1	9	14	GTPase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a GTPase, any enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis of GTP.
0	0	1	GDP-dissociation inhibitor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a GDP-dissociation inhibitor protein.
1	0	1	Rho GDP-dissociation inhibitor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a Rho GDP-dissociation inhibitor protein.
0	1	0	chiasma assembly	The cell cycle process in which a connection between chromatids assembles, indicating where an exchange of homologous segments has taken place by the crossing-over of non-sister chromatids.
2	13	11	mRNA transport	The directed movement of mRNA, messenger ribonucleic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	rRNA transport	The directed movement of rRNA, ribosomal ribonucleic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	tRNA transport	The directed movement of tRNA, transfer ribonucleic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	nucleic acid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of nucleic acids from one side of a membrane to the other. Nucleic acids are single or double-stranded polynucleotides involved in the storage, transmission and transfer of genetic information.
1	0	0	RNA transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of RNA, ribonucleic acid, from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	1	regulation of endosome size	Any process that modulates the volume of an endosome, a membrane-bounded organelle that carries materials newly ingested by endocytosis.
6	1	2	positive regulation of membrane protein ectodomain proteolysis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of membrane protein ectodomain peptidolysis.
3	2	0	negative regulation of membrane protein ectodomain proteolysis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of membrane protein ectodomain proteolysis.
1	0	0	regulation of secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the controlled release of a substance from a cell or a tissue.
0	0	1	positive regulation of secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the controlled release of a substance from a cell or a tissue.
2	0	0	negative regulation of secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the controlled release of a substance from a cell or a tissue.
1	0	0	regulation of transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of substances (such as macromolecules, small molecules, ions) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	1	negative regulation of transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of substances (such as macromolecules, small molecules, ions) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	1	negative regulation of DNA metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving DNA.
2	0	0	negative regulation of lipid biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of lipids.
25	36	35	regulation of small GTPase mediated signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of small GTPase mediated signal transduction.
0	2	1	positive regulation of small GTPase mediated signal transduction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of small GTPase mediated signal transduction.
0	3	3	negative regulation of small GTPase mediated signal transduction	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of small GTPase mediated signal transduction.
5	5	6	NF-kappaB binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with NF-kappaB, a transcription factor for eukaryotic RNA polymerase II promoters.
0	0	1	dihydrobiopterin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a dihydrobiopterin, a reduced pteridine derivative related to folic acid; it acts as an electron carrier in tyrosine biosynthesis and its quinoid form is produced by oxidation of tetrahydrobiopterin in several biological hydroxylation reactions.
1	0	1	nuclear envelope disassembly	The controlled breakdown of the nuclear envelope in the context of a normal process.
12	22	31	unfolded protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an unfolded protein.
1	1	0	'de novo' cotranslational protein folding	The process of assisting in the correct noncovalent assembly of the ribosome-bound nascent chains of a multidomain protein whilst other parts of the protein are still being translated.
1	6	9	chaperone cofactor-dependent protein refolding	The process of assisting in the correct posttranslational noncovalent assembly of proteins, which is dependent on additional protein cofactors. This process occurs over one or several cycles of nucleotide hydrolysis-dependent binding and release.
0	0	1	chaperone mediated protein folding independent of cofactor	The process of assisting in the correct noncovalent assembly of posttranslational proteins and does not depend on additional protein cofactors. This function occurs over one or more cycles of nucleotide-dependent binding and release.
14	14	25	chaperone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a chaperone protein, a class of proteins that bind to nascent or unfolded polypeptides and ensure correct folding or transport.
0	1	0	constitutive protein ectodomain proteolysis	The proteolytic cleavage of transmembrane proteins and release of their ectodomain that occurs constantly, regardless of environmental conditions or demands.
5	8	4	regulation of DNA-binding transcription factor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of a transcription factor, any factor involved in the initiation or regulation of transcription.
16	15	16	positive regulation of DNA-binding transcription factor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of activity of a transcription factor, any factor involved in the initiation or regulation of transcription.
21	24	27	positive regulation of NF-kappaB transcription factor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of activity of the transcription factor NF-kappaB.
1	1	1	positive regulation of helicase activity	Any process that activates or increases the activity of a helicase.
0	2	0	negative regulation of helicase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the activity of a helicase.
1	1	0	positive regulation of binding	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of binding, the selective interaction of a molecule with one or more specific sites on another molecule.
0	2	1	regulation of DNA binding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of DNA binding. DNA binding is any process in which a gene product interacts selectively with DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid).
1	0	0	DNA ligation involved in DNA repair	The re-formation of a broken phosphodiester bond in the DNA backbone, carried out by DNA ligase, that contributes to DNA repair.
0	0	1	positive regulation of DNA ligation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA ligation, the re-formation of a broken phosphodiester bond in the DNA backbone, carried out by DNA ligase.
6	11	21	ATPase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an ATPase, any enzyme that catalyzes the hydrolysis of ATP.
0	1	0	hepoxilin biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hepoxilins, a class of bioactive icosanoids with roles in the regulation of cell physiology.
0	1	1	RNA polymerase II preinitiation complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins on an RNA polymerase II promoter DNA to form the transcriptional preinitiation complex (PIC), the formation of which is a prerequisite for transcription by RNA polymerase.
0	1	1	synaptic growth at neuromuscular junction	The growth of a synapse at a neuromuscular junction, the site of apposition of a motor end plate and the subneural cleft of the skeletal muscle fiber that it innervates.
1	1	0	regulation of actin nucleation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of actin nucleation, the initial step in the formation of an actin filament in which actin monomers combine to form a new filament.
0	1	0	negative regulation of actin nucleation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of actin nucleation, the initial step in the formation of an actin filament in which actin monomers combine to form a new filament.
1	0	1	positive regulation of actin nucleation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of actin nucleation, the initial step in the formation of an actin filament in which actin monomers combine to form a new filament.
0	1	0	regulation of cellular component organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process involved in the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cell structures, including the plasma membrane and any external encapsulating structures such as the cell wall and cell envelope.
2	0	8	chaperone-mediated protein complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a protein complex, mediated by chaperone molecules that do not form part of the finished complex.
1	1	0	positive regulation of NK T cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer T cell activation.
0	1	0	regulation of NK T cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer T cell differentiation.
1	0	2	positive regulation of NK T cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer T cell differentiation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of NK T cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of natural killer T cell proliferation.
2	2	1	smooth muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a smooth muscle cell; smooth muscle lacks transverse striations in its constituent fibers and are almost always involuntary.
2	3	2	striated muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a striated muscle cell; striated muscle fibers are divided by transverse bands into striations, and cardiac and voluntary muscle are types of striated muscle.
1	1	0	regulation of muscle cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of muscle cell differentiation.
1	1	1	negative regulation of muscle cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of muscle cell differentiation.
4	6	5	positive regulation of muscle cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of muscle cell differentiation.
0	0	1	regulation of smooth muscle cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle cell differentiation.
1	1	1	negative regulation of smooth muscle cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle cell differentiation.
0	2	0	positive regulation of smooth muscle cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle cell differentiation.
0	1	0	regulation of striated muscle cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of striated muscle cell differentiation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of striated muscle cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of striated muscle cell differentiation.
0	1	3	glucose 6-phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glucose 6-phosphate, a monophosphorylated derivative of glucose with the phosphate group attached to C-6.
1	4	2	nuclear export	The directed movement of substances out of the nucleus.
1	0	2	nuclear transport	The directed movement of substances into, out of, or within the nucleus.
3	3	3	import into nucleus	The directed movement of substances into the nucleus.
1	1	0	meiotic sister chromatid cohesion	The cell cycle process in which sister chromatids of a replicated chromosome are joined along the entire length of the chromosome during meiosis.
0	3	0	vitamin transport	The directed movement of vitamins into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. A vitamin is one of a number of unrelated organic substances that occur in many foods in small amounts and that are necessary in trace amounts for the normal metabolic functioning of the body.
0	2	1	protein insertion into membrane	The process that results in the incorporation of a protein into a biological membrane.  Incorporation in this context means having some part or covalently attached group that is inserted into the the hydrophobic region of one or both bilayers.
0	1	2	sequestering of calcium ion	The process of binding or confining calcium ions such that they are separated from other components of a biological system.
5	4	3	release of sequestered calcium ion into cytosol	The process in which calcium ions sequestered in the endoplasmic reticulum, Golgi apparatus or mitochondria are released into the cytosolic compartment.
3	3	1	dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction in which both atoms of oxygen from one molecule of O2 are incorporated into the (reduced) product(s) of the reaction. The two atoms of oxygen may be distributed between two different products.
7	7	2	cartilage development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a cartilage element over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cartilage elements are skeletal elements that consist of connective tissue dominated by extracellular matrix containing collagen type II and large amounts of proteoglycan, particularly chondroitin sulfate.
4	8	9	phosphoprotein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a phosphorylated protein.
0	1	3	cytoplasmic sequestering of protein	The selective interaction of a protein with specific molecules in the cytoplasm, thereby inhibiting its transport into other areas of the cell.
1	1	0	positive regulation of protein transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a protein into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	3	2	regulation of protein transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a protein into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	1	0	negative regulation of protein transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a protein into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
7	5	6	spindle assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the spindle, the array of microtubules and associated molecules that serves to move duplicated chromosomes apart.
0	1	1	mitotic spindle disassembly	The controlled breakdown of the spindle during a mitotic cell cycle.
8	4	3	spindle midzone	The area in the center of the spindle where the spindle microtubules from opposite poles overlap.
2	0	2	regulation of protein metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving a protein.
2	2	0	positive regulation of protein metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving a protein.
2	0	1	negative regulation of protein metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chemical reactions and pathways involving a protein.
0	1	0	regulation of lymphocyte activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of lymphocyte activation.
2	0	0	negative regulation of lymphocyte activation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of lymphocyte activation.
2	1	4	regulation of RNA metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving RNA.
0	1	0	spindle midzone assembly	The cell cycle process in which aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the spindle midzone. The spindle midzone is the area in the center of the spindle where the spindle microtubules from opposite poles overlap.
0	5	0	mitotic spindle midzone assembly	The cell cycle process in which the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components forms the spindle midzone.
0	0	1	meiotic spindle midzone assembly	The formation of the spindle midzone, the area in the center of the spindle where the spindle microtubules from opposite poles overlap, as a part of the process of meiosis.
2	1	6	protein polymerization	The process of creating protein polymers, compounds composed of a large number of component monomers; polymeric proteins may be made up of different or identical monomers. Polymerization occurs by the addition of extra monomers to an existing poly- or oligomeric protein.
1	3	3	protein complex oligomerization	The process of creating protein oligomers, compounds composed of a small number, usually between three and ten, of component monomers; protein oligomers may be composed of different or identical monomers. Oligomers may be formed by the polymerization of a number of monomers or the depolymerization of a large protein polymer.
8	14	18	protein homooligomerization	The process of creating protein oligomers, compounds composed of a small number, usually between three and ten, of identical component monomers. Oligomers may be formed by the polymerization of a number of monomers or the depolymerization of a large protein polymer.
0	0	1	protein depolymerization	The process in which protein polymers, compounds composed of a large number of component monomers, are broken down. Depolymerization occurs by the successive removal of monomers from an existing poly- or oligomeric protein.
1	6	4	protein tetramerization	The formation of a protein tetramer, a macromolecular structure consisting of four noncovalently associated identical or nonidentical subunits.
0	0	1	regulation of cellular component movement	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the movement of a cellular component.
2	0	2	negative regulation of cellular component movement	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the movement of a cellular component.
1	2	4	positive regulation of cellular component movement	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the movement of a cellular component.
4	3	2	chromosome organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level that results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of chromosomes, structures composed of a very long molecule of DNA and associated proteins that carries hereditary information. This term covers covalent modifications at the molecular level as well as spatial relationships among the major components of a chromosome.
2	3	5	regulation of release of sequestered calcium ion into cytosol	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the release into the cytosolic compartment of calcium ions sequestered in the endoplasmic reticulum or mitochondria.
1	0	0	negative regulation of release of sequestered calcium ion into cytosol	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the release into the cytosolic compartment of calcium ions sequestered in the endoplasmic reticulum or mitochondria.
3	4	3	positive regulation of release of sequestered calcium ion into cytosol	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the release into the cytosolic compartment of calcium ions sequestered in the endoplasmic reticulum or mitochondria.
0	1	0	negative regulation of sequestering of calcium ion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the binding or confining calcium ions such that they are separated from other components of a biological system.
0	0	1	positive regulation of sequestering of calcium ion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the binding or confining calcium ions such that they are separated from other components of a biological system.
0	0	3	cell tip	The region at the end of the longest axis of a cylindrical or elongated cell.
5	6	5	NAD binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide, a coenzyme involved in many redox and biosynthetic reactions; binding may be to either the oxidized form, NAD+, or the reduced form, NADH.
5	9	10	protein homotetramerization	The formation of a protein homotetramer, a macromolecular structure consisting of four noncovalently associated identical subunits.
1	2	5	protein heterotetramerization	The formation of a protein heterotetramer, a macromolecular structure consisting of four noncovalently associated subunits, of which not all are identical.
0	1	0	protein heterooligomerization	The process of creating protein oligomers, compounds composed of a small number, usually between three and ten, of component monomers that are not all identical. Oligomers may be formed by the polymerization of a number of monomers or the depolymerization of a large protein polymer.
1	2	5	nuclear pore complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a nuclear pore complex.
1	0	2	establishment of spindle localization	The directed movement of the spindle to a specific location in the cell.
1	0	2	establishment of spindle orientation	Any process that set the alignment of spindle relative to other cellular structures.
0	1	2	establishment of meiotic spindle localization	The cell cycle process in which the directed movement of the meiotic spindle to a specific location in the cell occurs.
2	7	3	centrosome duplication	The replication of a centrosome, a structure comprised of a pair of centrioles and peri-centriolar material from which a microtubule spindle apparatus is organized.
0	1	0	centrosome separation	The process in which duplicated centrosome components move away from each other. The centriole pair within each centrosome becomes part of a separate microtubule organizing center that nucleates a radial array of microtubules called an aster. The two asters move to opposite sides of the nucleus to form the two poles of the mitotic spindle.
47	71	71	cell division	The process resulting in division and partitioning of components of a cell to form more cells; may or may not be accompanied by the physical separation of a cell into distinct, individually membrane-bounded daughter cells.
2	1	3	regulation of cell division	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the physical partitioning and separation of a cell into daughter cells.
0	1	0	establishment of chromosome localization	The directed movement of a chromosome to a specific location.
2	1	0	chromosome separation	The cell cycle process in which paired chromosomes are detached from each other. Chromosome separation begins with the release of cohesin complexes from chromosomes; in budding yeast, this includes the cleavage of cohesin complexes along the chromosome arms, followed by the separation of the centromeric regions. Chromosome separation also includes formation of chromatid axes mediated by condensins, and ends with the disentangling of inter-sister catenation catalyzed by topoisomerase II (topo II).
1	1	1	mitotic sister chromatid separation	The process in which sister chromatids are physically detached from each other during mitosis.
1	0	0	meiotic chromosome separation	The process in which chromosomes are physically detached from each other during meiosis.
1	0	0	male meiosis chromosome separation	The process in which paired chromosomes are physically detached from each other during male meiosis.
0	1	0	female meiosis chromosome separation	The process in which paired chromosomes are physically detached from each other during female meiosis.
2	2	3	metaphase plate congression	The alignment of chromosomes at the metaphase plate (spindle equator), a plane halfway between the poles of the spindle.
1	3	2	attachment of mitotic spindle microtubules to kinetochore	The cell cycle process in which spindle microtubules become physically associated with the proteins making up the kinetochore complex as part of mitotic metaphase plate congression.
9	11	5	meiotic cell cycle	Progression through the phases of the meiotic cell cycle, in which canonically a cell replicates to produce four offspring with half the chromosomal content of the progenitor cell via two nuclear divisions.
0	0	4	positive regulation of cyclic-nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity, the catalysis of the reaction: nucleotide 3',5'-cyclic phosphate + H2O = nucleotide 5'-phosphate.
3	0	0	negative regulation of cyclic-nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity, the catalysis of the reaction: nucleotide 3',5'-cyclic phosphate + H2O = nucleotide 5'-phosphate.
1	1	0	positive regulation of hydrolase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hydrolase activity, the catalysis of the hydrolysis of various bonds.
1	0	2	negative regulation of hydrolase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of hydrolase activity, the catalysis of the hydrolysis of various bonds.
0	1	0	negative regulation of lyase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of lyase activity, the catalysis of the cleavage of C-C, C-O, C-N and other bonds by other means than by hydrolysis or oxidation, or conversely adding a group to a double bond.
2	1	0	positive regulation of ligase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ligase activity, the catalysis of the ligation of two substances with concomitant breaking of a diphosphate linkage, usually in a nucleoside triphosphate.
0	4	0	positive regulation of oxidoreductase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of oxidoreductase activity, the catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction, a reversible chemical reaction in which the oxidation state of an atom or atoms within a molecule is altered.
0	2	3	negative regulation of oxidoreductase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of oxidoreductase activity, the catalysis of an oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction, a reversible chemical reaction in which the oxidation state of an atom or atoms within a molecule is altered.
0	0	1	cellular response to potassium ion starvation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of deprivation of potassium ions.
1	4	7	muscle alpha-actinin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with muscle isoforms of actinin. Muscle alpha-actinin isoforms are found in skeletal and cardiac muscle and are localized to the Z-disc.
0	1	1	FATZ binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a member of the FATZ family of proteins, filamin-, actinin-, and telethonin-binding proteins of the Z-disc of striated muscle. FATZ proteins are located in the Z-disc of the sarcomere and are involved in a complex network of interactions with other Z-band components.
1	0	0	serotonin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with serotonin (5-hydroxytryptamine), a monoamine neurotransmitter occurring in the peripheral and central nervous systems, also having hormonal properties.
1	0	0	epinephrine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with epinephrine, a hormone produced by the medulla of the adrenal glands that increases heart activity, improves the power and prolongs the action of muscles, and increases the rate and depth of breathing. It is synthesized by the methylation of norepinephrine.
1	0	0	norepinephrine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with norepinephrine, (3,4-dihydroxyphenyl-2-aminoethanol), a hormone secreted by the adrenal medulla and a neurotransmitter in the sympathetic peripheral nervous system and in some tracts of the CNS. It is also the biosynthetic precursor of epinephrine.
3	2	2	kinetochore assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the kinetochore, a multisubunit complex that is located at the centromeric region of DNA and provides an attachment point for the spindle microtubules.
1	1	1	kinetochore organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the kinetochore, a multisubunit complex that is located at the centromeric region of DNA and provides an attachment point for the spindle microtubules.
8	6	3	response to glucocorticoid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glucocorticoid stimulus. Glucocorticoids are hormonal C21 corticosteroids synthesized from cholesterol with the ability to bind with the cortisol receptor and trigger similar effects. Glucocorticoids act primarily on carbohydrate and protein metabolism, and have anti-inflammatory effects.
0	1	0	response to mineralocorticoid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a mineralocorticoid stimulus. Mineralocorticoids are hormonal C21 corticosteroids synthesized from cholesterol and characterized by their similarity to aldosterone. Mineralocorticoids act primarily on water and electrolyte balance.
1	1	0	negative regulation of neurotrophin TRK receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the neurotrophin TRK receptor signaling pathway.
0	1	1	positive regulation of neurotrophin TRK receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the neurotrophin TRK receptor signaling pathway.
1	0	0	inactivation of MAPKK activity	Any process that terminates the activity of the active enzyme MAP kinase kinase (MAPKK).
1	0	0	tRNA acetylation	The modification of tRNA structure by addition of an acetyl group to tRNA. An acetyl group is CH3CO-, derived from acetic [ethanoic] acid.
4	0	2	alpha-actinin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with alpha-actinin, one of a family of proteins that cross-link F-actin as antiparallel homodimers. Alpha-actinin has a molecular mass of 93-103 KDa; at the N-terminus there are two calponin homology domains, at the C-terminus there are two EF-hands. These two domains are connected by the rod domain. This domain is formed by triple-helical spectrin repeats.
2	0	0	BH domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the Bcl-2 homology (BH) domain of a protein. Bcl-2-related proteins share homology in one to four conserved regions designated the Bcl-2 homology (BH) domains BH1, BH2, BH3 and BH4. These domains contribute at multiple levels to the function of these proteins in cell death and survival. Anti-apoptotic members of the Bcl-2 family have four BH domains (BH1-BH4). Pro-apoptotic members have fewer BH domains.
7	9	6	neuron apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a neuron, the basic cellular unit of nervous tissue. Each neuron consists of a body, an axon, and dendrites. Their purpose is to receive, conduct, and transmit impulses in the nervous system.
4	8	8	stress-activated MAPK cascade	A series of molecular signals in which a stress-activated MAP kinase cascade relays one or more of the signals; MAP kinase cascades involve at least three protein kinase activities and culminate in the phosphorylation and activation of a MAP kinase.
1	0	1	response to nitrosative stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nitrosative stress stimulus. Nitrosative stress is a state often resulting from exposure to high levels of nitric oxide (NO) or the highly reactive oxidant peroxynitrite, which is produced following interaction of NO with superoxide anions.
2	1	3	response to corticosterone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a corticosterone stimulus. Corticosterone is a 21 carbon steroid hormone of the corticosteroid type, produced in the cortex of the adrenal glands. In many species, corticosterone is the principal glucocorticoid, involved in regulation of fuel metabolism, immune reactions, and stress responses.
1	0	1	response to cortisol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cortisol stimulus. Cortisol is the major natural glucocorticoid synthesized in the zona fasciculata of the adrenal cortex; it affects the metabolism of glucose, protein, and fats and has appreciable mineralocorticoid activity. It also regulates the immune system and affects many other functions.
0	0	1	microtubule nucleation by microtubule organizing center	The 'de novo' formation of a microtubule, mediated by the microtubule organizing center.
1	0	0	corticotropin-releasing hormone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with corticotropin-releasing hormone, a polypeptide hormone involved in the stress response. It is released by the hypothalamus and stimulates the release of corticotropin by the anterior pituitary gland.
1	0	0	PTB domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a phosphotyrosine-binding (PTB) domain of a protein.
2	0	0	hormone receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a receptor for hormones.
1	2	0	peptide hormone receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a receptor for peptide hormones.
0	1	1	corticotropin-releasing hormone receptor 1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the corticotropin-releasing hormone receptor 1 (CRHR1). CRHR1 is the major subtype in the pituitary corticotroph, and mediates the stimulatory actions of corticotropin-releasing hormone on corticotropin hormone secretion. CRHR1 are also located in cortical areas of the brain, cerebellum and limbic system.
0	0	1	BH2 domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the BH2 domain of a protein of the Bcl-2 family. Proteins that act as inhibitors of apoptosis harbour at least three BH domains: BH1, BH2 and BH3; the BH1 and BH2 domains are found in all death antagonists of the Bcl-2 family but only in one class of death agonists.
1	0	1	BH3 domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the BH3 domain of a protein of the Bcl-2 family. The BH3 domain is a potent death domain and has an important role in protein-protein interactions and in cell death.
4	4	3	positive regulation of ubiquitin-protein transferase activity	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the rate of ubiquitin transferase activity.
0	4	0	negative regulation of ubiquitin-protein transferase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin transferase activity.
1	0	0	regulation of meiotic cell cycle	Any process that modulates the rate or extent of progression through the meiotic cell cycle.
0	0	1	negative regulation of meiotic cell cycle	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of progression through the meiotic cell cycle.
1	0	0	myoblast proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of myoblasts, resulting in the expansion of a myoblast cell population. A myoblast is a mononucleate cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
1	3	0	myoblast migration	The orderly movement of a myoblast from one site to another, often during the development of a multicellular organism. A myoblast is a cell type that, by fusion with other myoblasts, gives rise to the myotubes that eventually develop into skeletal muscle fibers.
7	2	7	regulation of intracellular pH	Any process that modulates the internal pH of a cell, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
0	1	0	intracellular pH elevation	Any process that increases the internal pH of a cell, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
0	0	1	monopolar spindle attachment to meiosis I kinetochore	The process in which spindle microtubules become physically associated with the proteins making up the kinetochore complex during meiosis I. During meiosis I sister kinetochores are lying next to each other facing the same spindle pole and monopolar attachment of the chromatid to the spindle occurs.
1	4	2	maintenance of protein location in nucleus	Any process in which a protein is maintained in the nucleus and prevented from moving elsewhere. These include sequestration within the nucleus, protein stabilization to prevent transport elsewhere and the active retrieval of proteins that escape the nucleus.
1	0	0	regulation of corticotropin secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of corticotropic hormone from a cell.
1	0	0	negative regulation of corticotropin secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of corticotropic hormone from a cell.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cortisol secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of cortisol from a cell.
5	1	8	regulation of cytosolic calcium ion concentration	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of calcium ions within the cytosol of a cell or between the cytosol and its surroundings.
1	1	2	negative regulation of cytosolic calcium ion concentration	Any process that decreases the concentration of calcium ions in the cytosol.
4	0	1	positive regulation of cytosolic calcium ion concentration involved in phospholipase C-activating G protein-coupled signaling pathway	Any process that increases the concentration of calcium ions in the cytosol that occurs as part of a PLC-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway. G-protein-activated PLC hydrolyses phosphatidylinositol-bisphosphate (PIP2) to release diacylglycerol (DAG) and inositol trisphosphate (IP3). IP3 then binds to calcium release channels in the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) to trigger calcium ion release into the cytosol.
4	2	3	regulation of filopodium assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of a filopodium, a thin, stiff protrusion extended by the leading edge of a motile cell such as a crawling fibroblast or amoeba, or an axonal growth cone.
1	0	2	negative regulation of filopodium assembly	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of a filopodium, a thin, stiff protrusion extended by the leading edge of a motile cell such as a crawling fibroblast or amoeba, or an axonal growth cone.
2	6	8	positive regulation of filopodium assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of a filopodium, a thin, stiff protrusion extended by the leading edge of a motile cell such as a crawling fibroblast or amoeba, or an axonal growth cone.
1	5	6	regulation of stress fiber assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of a stress fiber, a bundle of microfilaments and other proteins found in fibroblasts.
4	8	9	regulation of cytoskeleton organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures.
0	1	0	positive regulation of cytoskeleton organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures.
6	16	7	positive regulation of stress fiber assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly of a stress fiber, a bundle of microfilaments and other proteins found in fibroblasts.
2	9	9	negative regulation of stress fiber assembly	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the assembly a stress fiber, a bundle of microfilaments and other proteins found in fibroblasts.
0	0	1	D-tyrosyl-tRNA(Tyr) deacylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-tyrosyl-tRNA(Tyr) = D-tyrosine + tRNA(Tyr). Hydrolysis of the removal of D-tyrosine from tyrosine residues in charged tRNA.
0	0	1	adenine nucleotide transport	The directed movement of adenine nucleotides, ATP, ADP, and/or AMP, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	NFAT protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with NFAT (nuclear factor of activated T cells) proteins, a family of transcription factors. NFAT proteins have crucial roles in the development and function of the immune system.
0	2	1	iron-sulfur cluster binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an iron-sulfur cluster, a combination of iron and sulfur atoms.
3	3	0	2 iron, 2 sulfur cluster binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a 2 iron, 2 sulfur (2Fe-2S) cluster; this cluster consists of two iron atoms, with two inorganic sulfur atoms found between the irons and acting as bridging ligands.
3	6	2	4 iron, 4 sulfur cluster binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a 4 iron, 4 sulfur (4Fe-4S) cluster; this cluster consists of four iron atoms, with the inorganic sulfur atoms found between the irons and acting as bridging ligands.
0	1	0	elastin biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of elastin, a fibrous glycoprotein found in elastic tissues such as the walls of arteries.
0	0	2	keratinocyte migration	The directed movement of a keratinocyte, epidermal cells which synthesize keratin, from one site to another.
0	0	1	negative regulation of keratinocyte migration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of keratinocyte migration.
1	2	3	positive regulation of keratinocyte migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of keratinocyte migration.
1	2	2	mitochondrial calcium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of calcium ions within the cytoplasm of a cell or between mitochondria and their surroundings.
0	1	2	positive regulation of mitochondrial calcium ion concentration	Any process that increases the concentration of calcium ions in mitochondria.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mitochondrial calcium ion concentration	Any process that decreases the concentration of calcium ions in mitochondria.
0	1	0	smooth endoplasmic reticulum calcium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of calcium ions within the smooth endoplasmic reticulum of a cell or between the smooth endoplasmic reticulum and its surroundings.
0	1	0	histone H3-K9 methylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of one or more methyl groups to lysine at position 9 of the histone.
2	2	4	histone H3-K4 methylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of one or more methyl groups to lysine at position 4 of the histone.
1	0	2	regulation of histone H3-K4 methylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of a methyl group to the lysine at position 4 of histone H3.
1	3	6	positive regulation of histone H3-K4 methylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of a methyl group to the lysine at position 4 of histone H3.
0	2	2	negative regulation of histone H3-K4 methylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of a methyl group to the lysine at position 4 of histone H3.
1	1	2	negative regulation of histone H3-K9 methylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of a methyl group to the lysine at position 9 of histone H3.
0	3	1	positive regulation of histone H3-K9 methylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of a methyl group to the lysine at position 9 of histone H3.
0	0	3	5'-deoxyribose-5-phosphate lyase activity	Catalysis of the beta-elimination of the 5' deoxyribose-5-phosphate at an abasic site in DNA where a DNA-(apurinic or apyrimidinic site) lyase has already cleaved the C-O-P bond 3' to the apurinic or apyrimidinic site.
0	1	0	regulation of neurotransmitter uptake	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a neurotransmitter into a neuron or glial cell.
0	1	0	dopamine uptake involved in synaptic transmission	The directed movement of dopamine into a presynaptic neuron or glial cell. In this context, dopamine is a catecholamine neurotransmitter and a metabolic precursor of noradrenaline and adrenaline.
6	4	5	response to cAMP	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cAMP (cyclic AMP, adenosine 3',5'-cyclophosphate) stimulus.
5	8	13	response to calcium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a calcium ion stimulus.
0	0	2	response to folic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a folic acid stimulus.
0	0	1	response to methylglyoxal	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a methylglyoxal stimulus. Methylglyoxal is a 2-oxoaldehyde derived from propanal.
1	1	1	response to methylmercury	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a methylmercury stimulus.
1	0	0	meiotic recombination checkpoint	A checkpoint that acts during late prophase I (pachytene) and prevents segregation of homologous chromosomes until recombination is completed, ensuring proper distribution of the genetic material to the gametes.
0	1	2	response to hydrostatic pressure	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydrostatic pressure stimulus. Hydrostatic pressure is the force acting on an object in a system where the fluid is at rest (as opposed to moving). The weight of the fluid above the object creates pressure on it.
1	1	0	exocyst localization	Any process in which an exocyst is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location. An exocyst is a protein complex peripherally associated with the plasma membrane that determines where vesicles dock and fuse.
3	6	5	response to electrical stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an electrical stimulus.
5	4	1	proteolysis involved in cellular protein catabolic process	The hydrolysis of a peptide bond or bonds within a protein as part of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein by individual cells.
3	3	2	protein maturation	Any process leading to the attainment of the full functional capacity of a protein.
23	20	22	defense response to virus	Reactions triggered in response to the presence of a virus that act to protect the cell or organism.
1	0	0	regulation of serotonin uptake	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of the monoamine neurotransmitter serotonin into a cell.
0	1	0	negative regulation of serotonin uptake	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of serotonin into a cell.
0	0	1	regulation of norepinephrine uptake	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of the neurotransmitter norepinephrine into a cell.
0	0	1	positive regulation of norepinephrine uptake	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of norepinephrine into a cell.
0	0	1	barbed-end actin filament uncapping	The removal of capping protein from the barbed (or plus) end of actin filaments to free the ends for addition, exchange or removal of further actin subunits.
1	5	3	actin filament network formation	The assembly of a network of actin filaments; actin filaments on different axes and with differing orientations are crosslinked together to form a mesh of filaments.
0	0	2	organelle localization	Any process in which an organelle is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location.
4	5	4	centrosome localization	Any process in which a centrosome is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location within the cell.
1	1	2	Golgi localization	Any process in which the Golgi is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location within the cell.
0	3	2	mitochondrion localization	Any process in which a mitochondrion or mitochondria are transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location within the cell.
0	1	1	nucleus localization	Any process in which the nucleus is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location within the cell.
1	0	0	vesicle localization	Any process in which a vesicle or vesicles are transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location.
0	2	0	establishment of vesicle localization	The directed movement of a vesicle to a specific location.
1	0	0	maintenance of location in cell	Any process in which a substance or cellular entity, such as a protein complex or organelle, is maintained in a specific location within, or in the membrane of, a cell, and is prevented from moving elsewhere.
0	4	0	spindle localization	Any process in which is the spindle is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location.
0	1	1	establishment of mitochondrion localization	The directed movement of the mitochondrion to a specific location.
1	1	0	establishment of organelle localization	The directed movement of an organelle to a specific location.
0	1	1	maintenance of mitochondrion location	Any process in which a mitochondrion is maintained in a specific location within a cell and prevented from moving elsewhere.
2	2	3	establishment of centrosome localization	The directed movement of the centrosome to a specific location.
1	0	0	maintenance of centrosome location	Any process in which a centrosome is maintained in a specific location within a cell and prevented from moving elsewhere.
0	1	0	nuclear pore localization	Any process in which nuclear pores are transported to, or maintained in, a specific location.
0	0	1	localization within membrane	Any process in which a substance or cellular entity, such as a protein complex or organelle, is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location within a membrane.
3	1	0	membrane disruption in other organism	The disruption of the membranes of another organism, leading to damage to its cells and possibly death of that organism.
2	2	3	establishment of Golgi localization	The directed movement of the Golgi to a specific location.
1	0	1	maintenance of Golgi location	Any process in which the Golgi is maintained in a specific location within a cell and prevented from moving elsewhere.
0	1	0	maintenance of ER location	Any process in which the endoplasmic reticulum is maintained in a specific location within a cell and prevented from moving elsewhere.
1	2	5	actin filament capping	The binding of a protein or protein complex to the end of an actin filament, thus preventing the addition, exchange or removal of further actin subunits.
2	0	1	pointed-end actin filament capping	The binding of a protein or protein complex to the pointed (or minus) end of an actin filament, thus preventing the addition, exchange or removal of further actin subunits.
0	0	1	actin filament uncapping	The removal of capping protein from the end of actin filaments to free the ends for addition, exchange or removal of further actin subunits.
1	0	0	protein delipidation	The breakage of covalent bonds to detach lipid groups from a protein.
0	1	0	interaction with host	An interaction between two organisms living together in more or less intimate association. The term host is used for the larger (macro) of the two members of a symbiosis; the various forms of symbiosis include parasitism, commensalism and mutualism.
2	1	2	interaction with symbiont	An interaction between two organisms living together in more or less intimate association. The term symbiont is used for the smaller (macro) of the two members of a symbiosis; the various forms of symbiosis include parasitism, commensalism and mutualism.
0	1	3	response to other organism	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus from another living organism.
1	2	0	positive regulation of killing of cells of other organism	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the killing by an organism of cells in another organism.
3	7	9	protein phosphatase 2A binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the enzyme protein phosphatase 2A.
0	0	1	protein C-terminal methylesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: C-terminal protein amino acid methyl ester + H2O = protein amino acid + methanol.
0	0	1	protein methylesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein amino acid methyl ester + H2O = protein amino acid + methanol.
19	23	15	regulation of cell cycle	Any process that modulates the rate or extent of progression through the cell cycle.
0	1	0	germline cell cycle switching, mitotic to meiotic cell cycle	The process in which a germline cell switches cell cycle mode from mitotic to meiotic division.
1	0	0	delta3,5-delta2,4-dienoyl-CoA isomerase activity	Catalysis of the isomerization of 3,5-dienoyl-CoA to 2,4-dienoyl-CoA.
1	0	1	meiotic sister chromatid cohesion, centromeric	The cell cycle process in which centromeres of sister chromatids are joined during meiosis.
0	0	1	homologous chromosome movement towards spindle pole in meiosis I anaphase	The directed movement of homologous chromosomes from the center of the spindle towards the spindle poles, mediated by the shortening of microtubules attached to the chromosomes, during meiosis I anaphase.
1	2	7	actin crosslink formation	The process in which two or more actin filaments are connected together by proteins that act as crosslinks between the filaments. The crosslinked filaments may be on the same or differing axes.
1	1	3	positive regulation of nitric-oxide synthase biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a nitric oxide synthase enzyme.
0	1	0	negative regulation of nitric-oxide synthase biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of a nitric-oxide synthase enzyme.
4	0	2	response to redox state	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating redox state. Redox state refers to the balance of oxidized versus reduced forms of electron donors and acceptors in an organelle, cell or organ; plastoquinone, glutathione (GSH/GSSG), and nicotinamide nucleotides (NAD+/NADH and NADP+/NADPH) are among the most important.
0	0	1	behavioral response to nutrient	Any process that results in a change in the behavior of an organism as a result of a nutrient stimulus.
5	3	3	positive regulation of cell division	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell division.
0	4	0	negative regulation of cell division	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell division.
5	3	10	misfolded protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a misfolded protein.
1	1	1	response to misfolded protein	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a misfolded protein stimulus.
1	2	0	medium-chain fatty acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving medium-chain fatty acids, any fatty acid with a chain length of between C6 and C12.
1	0	0	medium-chain fatty acid catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of any fatty acid with a chain length of between C6 and C12.
0	0	2	positive regulation of hair follicle development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hair follicle development.
0	1	0	negative regulation of hair follicle development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hair follicle development.
0	0	3	regulation of synapse structural plasticity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synapse structural plasticity. Synapse structural plasticity is a type of cytoskeletal remodeling; this remodeling is induced by stimuli that can lead to long term potentiation and it can be activity-dependent or -independent. Examples of cytoskeletal changes include the formation of new spines and increase in spine size; this can be accompanied by the insertion of greater numbers of glutamate (or other neurotransmitter) receptors into the post-synaptic membrane.
1	0	1	positive regulation of synapse structural plasticity	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic structural plasticity.
1	3	1	cytolysis by host of symbiont cells	The killing by an organism of a cell in its symbiont organism by means of the rupture of cell membranes and the loss of cytoplasm. The symbiont is defined as the smaller of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
1	0	1	glycolipid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a glycolipid, any compound containing one or more monosaccharide residues bound by a glycosidic linkage to a hydrophobic group such as an acylglycerol, a sphingoid, a ceramide (N-acylsphingoid) or a prenyl phosphate.
1	3	0	histone demethylase activity (H3-K36 specific)	Catalysis of the reaction: histone H3 N6-methyl-L-lysine (position 36) + alpha-ketoglutarate + O2 = succinate + CO2 + formaldehyde + lysine. This reaction is the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 36 of the histone H3 protein.
5	15	1	protein autoubiquitination	The ubiquitination by a protein of one or more of its own amino acid residues, or residues on an identical protein. Ubiquitination occurs on the lysine residue by formation of an isopeptide crosslink.
2	1	1	killing by host of symbiont cells	Any process mediated by an organism that results in the death of cells in the symbiont organism. The symbiont is defined as the smaller of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
4	6	7	Hsp90 protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with Hsp90 proteins, any of a group of heat shock proteins around 90kDa in size.
1	3	0	G-quadruplex DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with G-quadruplex DNA structures, in which groups of four guanines adopt a flat, cyclic Hoogsteen hydrogen-bonding arrangement known as a guanine tetrad. The stacking of guanine tetrads results in G-quadruplex DNA structures. G-quadruplex DNA can form under physiological conditions from some G-rich sequences, such as those found in telomeres, immunoglobulin switch regions, gene promoters, fragile X repeats, and the dimerization domain in the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) genome.
3	3	5	regulation of mitochondrial membrane potential	Any process that modulates the establishment or extent of the mitochondrial membrane potential, the electric potential existing across the mitochondrial membrane arising from charges in the membrane itself and from the charges present in the media on either side of the membrane.
0	1	1	mitochondrial depolarization	The process in which the potential difference across the mitochondrial membrane is reduced from its steady state level.
0	0	1	positive regulation of timing of anagen	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of timing of anagen, the growth phase of the hair cycle.
4	6	9	regulation of focal adhesion assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of focal adhesion formation, the establishment and maturation of focal adhesions.
4	8	3	positive regulation of focal adhesion assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of focal adhesion assembly, the establishment and maturation of focal adhesions.
5	7	2	negative regulation of focal adhesion assembly	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of focal adhesion assembly, the establishment and maturation of focal adhesions.
1	2	2	regulation of protein kinase B signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein kinase B signaling, a series of reactions mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase B.
25	21	16	positive regulation of protein kinase B signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein kinase B signaling, a series of reactions mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase B.
9	5	7	negative regulation of protein kinase B signaling	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein kinase B signaling, a series of reactions mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase B.
1	1	5	membrane depolarization	The process in which membrane potential decreases with respect to its steady-state potential, usually from negative potential to a more positive potential. For example, the initial depolarization during the rising phase of an action potential is in the direction from the negative steady-state resting potential towards the positive membrane potential that will be the peak of the action potential.
0	0	1	regulation of mitochondrial depolarization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the change in the membrane potential of the mitochondria from negative to positive.
0	2	1	positive regulation of mitochondrial depolarization	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the change in the membrane potential of the mitochondria from negative to positive.
2	2	0	negative regulation of mitochondrial depolarization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the change in the membrane potential of the mitochondria from negative to positive.
1	1	0	S-(hydroxymethyl)glutathione dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-(hydroxymethyl)glutathione + NAD(P)+ = S-formylglutathione + NAD(P)H + H+.
1	0	0	pigment granule transport	The directed movement of pigment granules into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	double-stranded DNA 5'-3' exodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the sequential cleavage of mononucleotides from a free 5' terminus of a double-stranded DNA molecule.
0	0	1	induction of synaptic plasticity by chemical substance	The process in which a chemical substance activates synaptic plasticity, the ability of synapses to change as circumstances require.
1	0	0	granulocyte colony-stimulating factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with granulocyte colony-stimulating factor, G-CSF.
0	0	1	regulation of fibrinolysis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of fibrinolysis, an ongoing process that solubilizes fibrin, resulting in the removal of small blood clots.
2	4	1	negative regulation of fibrinolysis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of fibrinolysis, an ongoing process that solubilizes fibrin, resulting in the removal of small blood clots.
1	1	0	positive regulation of fibrinolysis	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of fibrinolysis, an ongoing process that solubilizes fibrin, resulting in the removal of small blood clots.
1	1	2	peroxiredoxin activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 R'-SH + ROOH = R'-S-S-R' + H2O + ROH.
1	3	0	sulfation	The addition of a sulfate group to a molecule.
2	3	8	regulation of calcium ion transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of calcium ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
5	0	2	negative regulation of calcium ion transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of calcium ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	4	4	positive regulation of calcium ion transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of calcium ions into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
4	0	1	regulation of sensory perception of pain	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the sensory perception of pain, the series of events required for an organism to receive a painful stimulus, convert it to a molecular signal, and recognize and characterize the signal.
0	0	1	synaptic transmission, GABAergic	The vesicular release of  gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA). from a presynapse, across a chemical synapse, the subsequent activation of GABA receptors at the postsynapse of a target cell (neuron, muscle, or secretory cell) and the effects of this activation on the postsynaptic membrane potential and ionic composition of the postsynaptic cytosol. This process encompasses both spontaneous and evoked release of neurotransmitter and all parts of synaptic vesicle exocytosis. Evoked transmission starts with the arrival of an action potential at the presynapse.
1	0	0	L-glutamate import	The directed movement of L-glutamate, the L-enantiomer of the anion of 2-aminopentanedioic acid, into a cell or organelle.
0	0	1	gamma-aminobutyric acid import	The directed movement of gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA, 4-aminobutyrate) into a cell or organelle.
0	0	1	regulation of glutamate uptake involved in transmission of nerve impulse	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of L-glutamate into a neuron or glial cell.
0	1	0	positive regulation of glutamate uptake involved in transmission of nerve impulse	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of L-glutamate into a neuron or glial cell.
1	1	0	negative regulation of amino acid transport	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of amino acids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	positive regulation of amino acid transport	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of amino acids into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
5	2	4	dynein light intermediate chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a light intermediate chain of the dynein complex.
0	2	3	regulation of synapse assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synapse assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a synapse.
1	0	0	negative regulation of synapse assembly	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of synapse assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a synapse.
3	3	2	positive regulation of synapse assembly	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of synapse assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a synapse.
5	3	4	regulation of synaptic transmission, glutamatergic	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of glutamatergic synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to another neuron across a synapse using the neurotransmitter glutamate.
0	1	0	negative regulation of synaptic transmission, glutamatergic	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glutamatergic synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to another neuron across a synapse using the neurotransmitter glutamate.
1	2	5	positive regulation of synaptic transmission, glutamatergic	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glutamatergic synaptic transmission, the process of communication from a neuron to another neuron across a synapse using the neurotransmitter glutamate.
1	0	0	regulation of transmission of nerve impulse	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transmission of a nerve impulse, the sequential electrochemical polarization and depolarization that travels across the membrane of a neuron in response to stimulation.
1	0	2	positive regulation of transmission of nerve impulse	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transmission of a nerve impulse, the sequential electrochemical polarization and depolarization that travels across the membrane of a neuron in response to stimulation.
0	1	0	regulation of telomerase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of telomerase activity, the catalysis of the reaction: deoxynucleoside triphosphate + DNA(n) = diphosphate + DNA(n+1). Telomerases catalyze extension of the 3'- end of a DNA strand by one deoxynucleotide at a time using an internal RNA template that encodes the telomeric repeat sequence.
4	10	11	positive regulation of telomerase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of telomerase activity, the catalysis of the reaction: deoxynucleoside triphosphate + DNA(n) = diphosphate + DNA(n+1).
1	2	2	negative regulation of telomerase activity	Any process that stops or reduces the activity of the enzyme telomerase, which catalyzes of the reaction: deoxynucleoside triphosphate + DNA(n) = diphosphate + DNA(n+1).
0	1	5	regulation of chromosome segregation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chromosome segregation, the process in which genetic material, in the form of chromosomes, is organized and then physically separated and apportioned to two or more sets.
1	3	1	positive regulation of chromosome segregation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of chromosome segregation, the process in which genetic material, in the form of chromosomes, is organized and then physically separated and apportioned to two or more sets.
0	1	1	positive regulation of attachment of spindle microtubules to kinetochore	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the attachment of spindle microtubules to the kinetochore.
2	3	0	regulation of attachment of spindle microtubules to kinetochore	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the attachment of spindle microtubules to the kinetochore.
0	0	5	modulation by symbiont of host defense response	Any process in which an organism modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the defense response of its host, the response mounted by the host in response to the presence of the organism. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
0	1	0	phytoalexin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phytoalexins, any of a range of substances produced by plants as part of their defense response.
0	0	1	catabolism by host of symbiont protein	The chemical reactions and pathways performed by an organism resulting in the breakdown of protein macromolecules within the symbiont organism. The symbiont is defined as the smaller of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
1	0	0	tRNA dimethylallyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dimethylallyl diphosphate + tRNA = diphosphate + tRNA containing 6-dimethylallyladenosine.
0	0	1	negative regulation by host of symbiont molecular function	Any process in which an organism stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the functional activity of symbiont proteins. The symbiont is defined as the smaller of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
0	0	1	regulation of peptidase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of peptidase activity, the hydrolysis of peptide bonds within proteins.
0	0	4	regulation of endopeptidase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of endopeptidase activity, the endohydrolysis of peptide bonds within proteins.
2	3	1	phosphatidylinositol-3,5-bisphosphate 3-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3,5-bisphosphate + H2O = a 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 5-phosphate + phosphate + 2 H+.
2	2	0	NADP-retinol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: all-trans-retinol + NADP+ = all-trans-retinal + NADPH + H+.
2	0	0	monoacylglycerol catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of monoacylglycerol, any ester of glycerol in which any one of its hydroxyl groups has been acylated with a fatty acid, the other being non-esterified.
0	1	0	cyclic purine nucleotide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a cyclic nucleotide, a nucleotide in which the phosphate group is in diester linkage to two positions on the sugar residue and the base is a purine.
1	0	1	inositol-1,4,5-trisphosphate 5-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1D-myo-inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate + H2O = 1D-myo-inositol 1,4-bisphosphate + phosphate.
1	0	1	inositol-1,3,4,5-tetrakisphosphate 5-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1D-myo-inositol 1,3,4,5-tetrakisphosphate + H2O = 1D-myo-inositol 1,3,4-trisphosphate + phosphate.
0	1	0	tRNA (cytosine-2'-O-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing 2'-O-methylcytosine.
0	2	0	carboxylic ester hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a carboxylic ester bond.
0	1	1	inositol hexakisphosphate 1-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 1D-myo-inositol hexakisphosphate = ADP + 1-diphospho-1D-myo-inositol (2,3,4,5,6)pentakisphosphate.
0	1	1	inositol hexakisphosphate 3-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + 1D-myo-inositol hexakisphosphate = ADP + 3-diphospho-1D-myo-inositol (1,2,4,5,6)pentakisphosphate.
0	1	0	tRNA (cytosine-3-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + tRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + tRNA containing 3-methylcytosine.
1	0	0	(R)-limonene 6-monooxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (4R)-limonene + H+ + NADPH + O2 = (1R,5S)-carveol + H2O + NADP+.
1	1	4	phosphatidylinositol kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a phosphatidylinositol = ADP + a phosphatidylinositol phosphate.
1	0	0	inositol phosphate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: inositol phosphate(n) + H2O = inositol phosphate(n-1) + phosphate. This reaction is the removal of a phosphate group from an inositol phosphate.
0	1	0	1-phosphatidylinositol-5-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol + ATP = a 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 5-phosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
0	0	2	phosphatidylinositol-3,4-bisphosphate 5-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3,4-bisphosphate + ATP = a 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate + ADP + 2 H(+).
2	0	0	inositol-3,4-bisphosphate 4-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1D-myo-inositol 3,4-bisphosphate + H2O = 1D-myo-inositol 3-phosphate + phosphate.
0	1	1	inositol monophosphate 3-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: myo-inositol 3-phosphate + H2O = myo-inositol + phosphate.
0	1	1	inositol monophosphate 4-phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: myo-inositol 4-phosphate + H2O = myo-inositol + phosphate.
0	0	1	inositol monophosphate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: myo-inositol phosphate + H2O = myo-inositol + phosphate.
1	0	0	NADHX epimerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (R)-NADHX = (S)-NADHX.
1	0	0	NADPHX epimerase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (R)-NADPHX = (S)-NADPHX.
1	0	0	tRNA (guanine(37)-N(1))-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + guanine(37) in tRNA = N(1)-methylguanine(37) in tRNA + S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine.
1	0	0	23S rRNA (adenine(1618)-N(6))-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + adenine(1618) in 23S rRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + rRNA containing N(6)-methyladenine(1618) in 23S rRNA.
1	0	0	dol-P-Man:Man(5)GlcNAc(2)-PP-Dol alpha-1,3-mannosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: an alpha-D-man-(1->2)-alpha-D-Man-(1->2)-alpha-D-Man-(1->3)-(alpha-D-Man-(1->6))-beta-D-Man-(1->4)-beta-D-GlcNAc-(1->4)-D-GlcNAc-diphosphodolichol + dolichyl D-mannosyl phosphate = H(+) + alpha-D-Man-(1->2)-alpha-D-Man-(1->2)-alpha-D-Man-(1->3)-(alpha-D-Man-(1->3)-alpha-D-Man-(1->6))-beta-D-Man-(1->4)-beta-D-GlcNAc-(1->4)-D-GlcNAc-diphosphodolichol + dolichyl phosphate.
0	0	1	muscle cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a muscle cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Muscle cell development does not include the steps involved in committing an unspecified cell to the muscle cell fate.
0	1	0	striated muscle cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a striated muscle cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Striated muscle cells contain fibers that are divided by transverse bands into striations, and cardiac and skeletal muscle are types of striated muscle.
1	0	4	cardiac myofibril assembly	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cardiac myofibril over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A cardiac myofibril is a myofibril specific to cardiac muscle cells.
0	2	0	ventricular cardiac myofibril assembly	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the ventricular cardiac myofibril over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A cardiac myofibril is a myofibril specific to cardiac muscle cells.
1	1	3	cardiac muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a cardiac muscle precursor cell acquires specialized features of a cardiac muscle cell. Cardiac muscle cells are striated muscle cells that are responsible for heart contraction.
1	0	2	cardiac muscle tissue morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of cardiac muscle tissue are generated and organized.
1	1	1	atrial cardiac muscle tissue morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of cardiac atrium muscle is generated and organized.
3	1	4	ventricular cardiac muscle tissue morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of cardiac ventricle muscle is generated and organized.
0	1	0	ventricular cardiac muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a ventricular cardiac muscle cell. Cardiac muscle cells are striated muscle cells that are responsible for heart contraction. The ventricle is the part of the heart that pumps blood out of the organ.
1	1	2	cardiac muscle cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a cardiac muscle cell over time, from its formation to the mature state.
1	0	1	positive regulation of cardiac muscle tissue development	Any process that activates, maintains or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle tissue development.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cardiac muscle tissue development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle tissue development.
0	0	1	cortical microtubule	Arrays of microtubules underlying and connected to the plasma membrane in the cortical cytosol.
15	23	17	recycling endosome	An organelle consisting of a network of tubules that functions in targeting molecules, such as receptors transporters and lipids, to the plasma membrane.
16	17	13	recycling endosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a recycling endosome.
0	0	1	anastral spindle assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the spindle, the array of microtubules and associated molecules that serves to move duplicated chromosomes apart, in the absence of centrosomes. Formation is initiated by the nucleation of microtubules (MTs) in the vicinity of condensed chromatin. MTs then attach to and congress around the chromatin due to activity of microtubule motors. A bipolar spindle is formed by focusing of the terminal ends of the MT array into spindle poles by molecular motors and cross-linking proteins.
0	1	0	D-glucose transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of the D-enantiomer of the hexose monosaccharide glucose from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	1	1	asymmetric neuroblast division	The process resulting in the physical partitioning and separation of a neuroblast into two daughter cells with different developmental potentials.
1	0	0	phosphate ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of phosphate ions within an organism or cell.
2	2	3	chloride ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of chloride ions within an organism or cell.
1	0	1	metal ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of metal ions within an organism or cell.
0	1	0	zinc ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of zinc ions within an organism or cell.
1	0	0	manganese ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of manganese ions within an organism or cell.
1	3	4	iron ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of iron ions within an organism or cell.
3	3	2	calcium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of calcium ions within an organism or cell.
4	2	3	potassium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of potassium ions within an organism or cell.
0	0	1	gap junction hemi-channel activity	A wide pore channel activity that enables the transport of a solute across a membrane via a gap junction hemi-channel. Two gap junction hemi-channels coupled together form a complete gap junction.
3	0	1	sodium ion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of sodium ions within an organism or cell.
1	0	0	cation homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of cations within an organism or cell.
1	0	1	anion homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of anions within an organism or cell.
1	0	0	cellular chemical homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of a chemical at the level of the cell.
19	17	29	transmembrane transport	The process in which a solute is transported across a lipid bilayer, from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	0	1	Ski complex	A protein complex that regulates RNA degradation by the exosome complex. In Saccharomyces the complex has a heterotetrameric stoichiometry consisting of one copy each of Ski2p and Ski3 and two copies of Ski8p.
3	4	3	lipid homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of lipid within an organism or cell.
3	3	0	fatty acid homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of fatty acid within an organism or cell.
2	2	0	phospholipid homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of phospholipid within an organism or cell.
2	0	3	response to hyperoxia	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating increased oxygen tension.
1	1	1	lipase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a lipase, an enzyme that catalyzes of the hydrolysis of a lipid.
1	0	0	Golgi to secretory granule transport	The directed movement of proteins from the Golgi to a secretory granule. The secretory granule is a membrane-bounded particle, usually protein, formed in the granular endoplasmic reticulum and the Golgi complex.
0	1	0	Golgi to transport vesicle transport	The directed movement of proteins from the Golgi to a transport vesicle. Continuously secreted proteins are sorted into transport vesicles that fuse with the plasma membrane, releasing their contents by exocytosis.
0	0	7	regulation of cardiac muscle contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle contraction.
1	0	6	relaxation of cardiac muscle	The process in which the extent of cardiac muscle contraction is reduced.
0	2	0	L-proline biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of L-proline, an L-enantiomer of a chiral, cyclic, nonessential alpha-amino acid found in peptide linkage in proteins.
0	1	3	C3HC4-type RING finger domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a C3HC4-type zinc finger domain of a protein. The C3HC4-type zinc finger is a variant of RING finger, is a cysteine-rich domain of 40 to 60 residues that coordinates two zinc ions, and has the consensus sequence: C-X2-C-X(9-39)-C-X(1-3)-H-X(2-3)-C-X2-C-X(4-48)-C-X2-C, where X is any amino acid. Many proteins containing a C3HC4-type RING finger play a key role in the ubiquitination pathway.
1	0	0	minus-end directed microfilament motor activity	Catalysis of movement along a microfilament towards the minus end, coupled to the hydrolysis of a nucleoside triphosphate (usually ATP). The minus end of an actin filament is the end that does not preferentially add actin monomers.
1	1	0	plus-end directed microfilament motor activity	Catalysis of movement along a microfilament towards the plus end, coupled to the hydrolysis of a nucleoside triphosphate (usually ATP). The plus end of an actin filament is the end that preferentially adds actin monomers.
0	1	0	copper ion export	The directed movement of copper ions out of a cell or organelle.
1	0	0	linear vestibuloocular reflex	A vestibular reflex by which a response to a linear acceleration stimulus begins with an afferent nerve impulse from a receptor in the otolith and ends with the compensatory action of eye muscles. Signaling never reaches a level of consciousness.
1	0	1	Sertoli cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized structural and/or functional features of a Sertoli cell. A Sertoli cell is a supporting cell projecting inward from the basement membrane of seminiferous tubules.
1	1	2	Sertoli cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a Sertoli cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cell development does not include the steps involved in committing a cell to a Sertoli cell fate.
1	0	0	Sertoli cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of Sertoli cells, resulting in the expansion of the Sertoli cell population. A Sertoli cell is a supporting cell projecting inward from the basement membrane of seminiferous tubules.
1	0	0	righting reflex	A reflex process in which an animal immediately tries to turn over after being placed in a supine position.
0	2	0	parathyroid gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the parathyroid gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The parathyroid gland is an organ specialised for secretion of parathyroid hormone.
1	0	0	astrocyte fate commitment	The commitment of a cells to a specific astrocyte fate and its restriction to develop only into an astrocyte.
2	0	0	radial glial cell differentiation	The process in which neuroepithelial cells of the neural tube give rise to radial glial cells, specialized bipotential progenitors cells of the brain. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
0	2	4	Bergmann glial cell differentiation	The process in which neuroepithelial cells of the neural tube give rise to Brgmann glial cells, specialized bipotential progenitors cells of the cerebellum. Differentiation includes the processes involved in commitment of a cell to a specific fate.
6	7	2	roof of mouth development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of the roof of the mouth from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of the structure and ends with the mature structure. The roof of the mouth is the partition that separates the nasal and oral cavities.
0	0	1	hard palate development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of the hard palate from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of the structure and ends with the mature structure, whatever form that may be including its natural destruction. The hard palate is the anterior portion of the palate consisting of bone and mucous membranes.
1	0	0	soft palate development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of the soft palate from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of the structure and ends with the mature structure, whatever form that may be including its natural destruction. The soft palate is the posterior portion of the palate extending from the posterior edge of the hard palate.
0	0	1	rhythmic synaptic transmission	Any process involved in the generation of rhythmic, synchronous synaptic inputs in a neural circuit.
0	1	1	regulation of synaptic activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic activity, the controlled release of neurotransmitters into the synaptic cleft and their subsequent detection by a postsynaptic cell.
1	0	0	convergent extension involved in gastrulation	The morphogenetic process in which an epithelium narrows along one axis and lengthens in a perpendicular axis usually resulting in the formation of the three primary germ layers, ectoderm, mesoderm and endoderm.
0	0	1	convergent extension involved in axis elongation	The morphogenetic process in which an epithelium narrows along one axis and lengthens in a perpendicular axis contributing to the lengthening of the axis of an organism.
2	0	0	notochord regression	The developmental process in which the stucture of the notochord is destroyed in an embryo.
0	1	0	anatomical structure regression	The developmental process in which an anatomical stucture is destroyed as a part of its normal progression.
0	1	0	notochord cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a notochord cell over time, from its formation to its mature structure. Cell development does not include the steps involved in committing a cell to a specific fate.
1	0	0	pharyngeal system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the pharyngeal system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The pharyngeal system is a transient embryonic complex that is specific to vertebrates. It comprises the pharyngeal arches, bulges of tissues of mesoderm and neural crest derivation through which pass nerves and pharyngeal arch arteries. The arches are separated internally by pharyngeal pouches, evaginations of foregut endoderm, and externally by pharyngeal clefts, invaginations of surface ectoderm. The development of the system ends when the stucture it contributes to are forming: the thymus, thyroid, parathyroids, maxilla, mandible, aortic arch, cardiac outflow tract, external and middle ear.
2	1	1	cardiac muscle cell proliferation	The expansion of a cardiac muscle cell population by cell division.
0	2	0	pericardium development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the pericardium over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The pericardium is a double-walled sac that contains the heart and the roots of the aorta, vena cava and the pulmonary artery.
1	0	0	retinal bipolar neuron differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a bipolar cell, the last neuron to be generated in the retina.
7	4	3	retina development in camera-type eye	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the retina over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The retina is the innermost layer or coating at the back of the eyeball, which is sensitive to light and in which the optic nerve terminates.
2	1	0	retina morphogenesis in camera-type eye	The process in which the anatomical structure of the retina is generated and organized.
0	1	0	regulation of cardiac muscle cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle cell proliferation.
4	1	1	negative regulation of cardiac muscle cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle cell proliferation.
3	2	2	positive regulation of cardiac muscle cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle cell proliferation.
0	1	0	regulation of acrosome reaction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the acrosome reaction.
4	0	3	heart contraction	The multicellular organismal process in which the heart decreases in volume in a characteristic way to propel blood through the body.
9	5	7	cardiac muscle contraction	Muscle contraction of cardiac muscle tissue.
1	0	0	regulation of protein glycosylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein glycosylation. Protein glycosylation is the addition of a carbohydrate or carbohydrate derivative unit to a protein amino acid, e.g. the addition of glycan chains to proteins.
1	0	0	positive regulation of protein glycosylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the glycosylation of one or more amino acid residues within a protein. Protein glycosylation is the addition of a carbohydrate or carbohydrate derivative unit to a protein amino acid, e.g. the addition of glycan chains to proteins.
1	0	3	neurofilament cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising neurofilaments and their associated proteins.
0	0	1	neurofilament cytoskeleton	Intermediate filament cytoskeletal structure that is made up of neurofilaments. Neurofilaments are specialized intermediate filaments found in neurons.
0	1	0	positive regulation of epithelial cell proliferation involved in wound healing	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of epithelial cell proliferation, contributing to the restoration of integrity to a damaged tissue following an injury.
4	2	1	angiogenesis involved in wound healing	Blood vessel formation when new vessels emerge from the proliferation of pre-existing blood vessels and contribute to the series of events that restore integrity to a damaged tissue, following an injury.
3	0	1	mammary gland involution	The tissue remodeling that removes differentiated mammary epithelia during weaning.
0	0	1	positive regulation of apoptotic process involved in mammary gland involution	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell death by apoptotic process of mammary epithelial cells during mammary gland involution.
1	3	0	embryonic retina morphogenesis in camera-type eye	The process in which the anatomical structure of the retina is generated and organized in a camera-type eye during the embryonic life stage.
0	1	0	Spemann organizer formation	Formation of the specialized region on the dorsalmost side of the embryo that acts as the main signaling center establishing the vertebrate body plan.
1	1	0	uterus development	The reproductive developmental process whose specific outcome is the progression of the uterus over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
4	0	1	vagina development	The reproductive developmental process whose specific outcome is the progression of the vagina over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
7	5	5	canonical Wnt signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes. In this pathway, the activated receptor signals via downstream effectors that result in the inhibition of beta-catenin phosphorylation, thereby preventing degradation of beta-catenin. Stabilized beta-catenin can then accumulate and travel to the nucleus to trigger changes in transcription of target genes.
12	12	14	Wnt signaling pathway, planar cell polarity pathway	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where activated receptors signal via downstream effectors including C-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK) to modulate cytoskeletal elements and control cell polarity.
0	0	1	large conductance calcium-activated potassium channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of potassium by a channel with a unit conductance of 100 to 220 picoSiemens that opens in response to stimulus by concerted actions of internal calcium ions and membrane potential. Large conductance calcium-activated potassium channels are less sensitive to calcium than are small or intermediate conductance calcium-activated potassium channels. Transport by a channel involves catalysis of facilitated diffusion of a solute (by an energy-independent process) involving passage through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel, without evidence for a carrier-mediated mechanism.
2	0	1	micturition	The regulation of body fluids process in which parasympathetic nerves stimulate the bladder wall muscle to contract and expel urine from the body.
1	0	3	synapse maturation	The process that organizes a synapse so that it attains its fully functional state. Synaptic maturation plays a critical role in the establishment of effective synaptic connections in early development.
0	1	1	regulation of resting membrane potential	Any process that modulates the establishment or extent of a resting potential, the electrical charge across the plasma membrane, with the interior of the cell negative with respect to the exterior. The resting potential is the membrane potential of a cell that is not stimulated to be depolarized or hyperpolarized.
2	2	8	excitatory synapse	A synapse in which an action potential in the presynaptic cell increases the probability of an action potential occurring in the postsynaptic cell.
3	0	1	inhibitory synapse	A synapse in which an action potential in the presynaptic cell reduces the probability of an action potential occurring in the postsynaptic cell.
0	2	9	excitatory postsynaptic potential	A process that leads to a temporary increase in postsynaptic potential due to the flow of positively charged ions into the postsynaptic cell. The flow of ions that causes an EPSP is an excitatory postsynaptic current (EPSC) and makes it easier for the neuron to fire an action potential.
0	0	1	inhibitory postsynaptic potential	A process that causes a temporary decrease in postsynaptic membrane potential due to the flow of negatively charged ions into the postsynaptic cell. The flow of ions that causes an IPSP is an inhibitory postsynaptic current (IPSC) and makes it more difficult for the neuron to fire an action potential.
1	1	1	membrane hyperpolarization	The process in which membrane potential increases with respect to its steady-state potential, usually from negative potential to a more negative potential. For example, during the repolarization phase of an action potential the membrane potential often becomes more negative or hyperpolarized before returning to the steady-state resting potential.
0	0	1	smooth muscle contraction involved in micturition	The process leading to shortening and/or development of tension in the urinary bladder smooth muscle tissue involved in the expulsion urine from the body.
1	1	2	relaxation of vascular associated smooth muscle	A negative regulation of smooth muscle contraction resulting in relaxation of vascular smooth muscle. The relaxation is mediated by a decrease in the phosphorylation state of myosin light chain. This can be achieved by removal of calcium from the cytoplasm to the sarcoplasmic reticulum lumen through the action of Ca2+ ATPases leading to a decrease myosin light chain kinase activity, and through calcium-independent pathways leading to a increase in myosin light chain phosphatase activity.
6	1	1	auditory receptor cell stereocilium organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a stereocilium. A stereocilium is an actin-based protrusion from the apical surface of auditory hair cells.
14	13	25	molecular adaptor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that brings together two or more molecules through a selective, non-covalent, often stoichiometric interaction, permitting those molecules to function in a coordinated way.
2	0	0	kinocilium	A nonmotile primary cilium that is found at the apical surface of auditory receptor cells. The kinocilium is surrounded by actin-based stereocilia.
4	0	1	positive regulation of phagocytosis, engulfment	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the internalization of bacteria, immune complexes and other particulate matter or of an apoptotic cell by phagocytosis.
0	1	0	auditory receptor cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an auditory receptor cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cell development does not include the steps involved in committing a cell to a specific fate.
1	0	0	vestibular receptor cell stereocilium organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a stereocilium. A stereocilium is an actin-based protrusion from the apical surface of vestibular hair cells.
2	2	0	inner ear receptor cell stereocilium organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a stereocilium. A stereocilium is an actin-based protrusion from the apical surface of inner ear receptor cells.
0	1	0	regulation of growth hormone secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of growth hormone from a cell.
0	0	1	positive regulation of growth hormone secretion	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of growth hormone from a cell.
1	1	0	negative regulation of growth hormone secretion	Any process that decreases or stops the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of growth hormone from a cell.
0	1	1	prepulse inhibition	The process in which a startle magnitude is reduced when the startling stimulus is preceded by a low-intensity prepulse.
3	4	0	maternal process involved in female pregnancy	A reproductive process occurring in the mother that allows an embryo or fetus to develop within it.
0	0	1	embryonic process involved in female pregnancy	A reproductive process occurring in the embryo or fetus that allows the embryo or fetus to develop within the mother.
1	0	0	maternal process involved in parturition	A reproductive process occurring in the mother that results in birth.
0	1	0	positive regulation of apoptotic process by virus	Any viral process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell death by apoptotic process.
0	1	0	microtubule-based peroxisome localization	The microtubule-based process in which a peroxisome is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location. A peroxisome is a small membrane-bounded organelle that uses dioxygen (O2) to oxidize organic molecules.
2	0	1	platelet dense granule organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a platelet dense granule. A platelet dense granule is an electron-dense granule occurring in blood platelets that stores and secretes adenosine nucleotides and serotonin. They contain a highly condensed core consisting of serotonin, histamine, calcium, magnesium, ATP, ADP, pyrophosphate and membrane lysosomal proteins.
1	0	0	urinary bladder development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the urinary bladder over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The urinary bladder is an elastic, muscular sac situated in the anterior part of the pelvic cavity in which urine collects before excretion.
1	0	1	phospholipase C-activating dopamine receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a dopamine receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation of phospholipase C (PLC) and a subsequent release of inositol trisphosphate (IP3) and diacylglycerol (DAG).
1	0	1	regulation of dopamine receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a dopamine receptor signaling pathway activity. A dopamine receptor signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a dopamine receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
0	0	1	negative regulation of dopamine receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dopamine receptor protein signaling pathway activity. A dopamine receptor signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a dopamine receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
1	0	2	positive regulation of dopamine receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the dopamine receptor protein signaling pathway. A dopamine receptor signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a dopamine receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
1	0	0	regulation of timing of neuron differentiation	The process controlling the activation and/or rate at which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires features of a neuron.
5	3	4	ciliary membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a cilium.
0	2	0	stereocilium membrane	The portion of the plasma membrane surrounding a stereocilium.
4	7	0	limb development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a limb over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A limb is an appendage of an animal used for locomotion or grasping. Examples include legs, arms or some types of fin.
3	1	0	limb bud formation	The process pertaining to the initial formation of a limb bud from unspecified parts. This process begins with the formation of a local condensation of mesenchyme cells within the prospective limb field, and ends when a limb bud is recognizable.
1	1	1	male mating behavior	The specific behavior of a male organism that is associated with reproduction.
0	0	1	apelin receptor activity	Combining with the peptide apelin to initiate a change in cell activity.
0	0	1	apelin receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an apelin receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
0	0	1	cell pole	Either of two different areas at opposite ends of an axis of a cell.
0	2	1	negative regulation of lipase activity	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of lipase activity, the hydrolysis of a lipid or phospholipid.
1	1	0	positive regulation of lipase activity	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of lipase activity, the hydrolysis of a lipid or phospholipid.
0	1	0	cloacal septation	The separation of the single opening of the digestive, urinary, and reproductive tracts, the cloaca, into multiple isolated openings during development.
0	0	1	clathrin-sculpted acetylcholine transport vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a clathrin-sculpted acetylcholine transport vesicle.
1	0	2	clathrin-sculpted glutamate transport vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a clathrin-sculpted glutamate transport vesicle.
0	1	0	negative regulation of nuclear-transcribed mRNA poly(A) tail shortening	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of poly(A) tail shortening of a nuclear-transcribed mRNA. Poly(A) tail shortening is the decrease in length of the poly(A) tail of an mRNA from full length to an oligo(A) length.
1	6	2	positive regulation of nuclear-transcribed mRNA poly(A) tail shortening	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of poly(A) tail shortening of a nuclear-transcribed mRNA. Poly(A) tail shortening is the decrease in length of the poly(A) tail of an mRNA from full length to an oligo(A) length.
0	2	0	endocardium formation	Formation of the endocardium of the heart. The endocardium is an anatomical structure comprised of an endothelium and an extracellular matrix that forms the innermost layer of tissue of the heart, and lines the heart chambers.
0	1	2	primitive hemopoiesis	A first transient wave of blood cell production that, in vertebrates, gives rise to erythrocytes (red blood cells) and myeloid cells.
2	2	1	definitive hemopoiesis	A second wave of blood cell production that, in vertebrates, generates long-term hemopoietic stem cells that continously provide erythroid, myeloid and lymphoid lineages throughout adulthood.
2	2	1	hematopoietic stem cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a hematopoietic stem cell. A stem cell is a cell that retains the ability to divide and proliferate throughout life to provide progenitor cells that can differentiate into specialized cells.
1	0	0	camera-type eye photoreceptor cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a photoreceptor cell in a camera-type eye.
1	0	0	retinal rod cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a retinal rod cell.
1	1	1	phosphatidylcholine-sterol O-acyltransferase activator activity	Increases the activity of phosphatidylcholine-sterol O-acyltransferase, an enzyme that converts cholesterol and phosphatidylcholine (lecithins) to cholesteryl esters and lyso-phosphatidylcholines.
0	0	1	lipoprotein lipase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a lipoprotein lipase, an enzyme that catalyzes of the hydrolysis of a lipid within a lipoprotein.
0	0	1	mesenchymal to epithelial transition	A transition where a mesenchymal cell establishes apical/basolateral polarity, forms intercellular adhesive junctions, synthesizes basement membrane components and becomes an epithelial cell.
0	0	1	delamination	The process of negative regulation of cell adhesion that results in a cell or sheet of cells splitting off from an existing epithelial sheet.
0	0	1	neuroblast delamination	The negative regulation of cell adhesion process in which a neuroblast splits off of a neurectodermal sheet.
0	2	0	lens induction in camera-type eye	Signaling at short range between the head ectoderm and the optic vesicle that results in the head ectoderm forming a lens.
1	2	5	regulation of mitotic spindle organization	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the microtubule spindle during a mitotic cell cycle.
1	0	1	contact inhibition	The series of events in which information about the density of cells in a population is received by direct cell-cell contact and is converted into a molecular signal, resulting in the cessation of cell growth or proliferation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cell proliferation involved in contact inhibition	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of cell proliferation in response to cell density.
0	0	1	regulation of glial cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of glial cell proliferation.
1	5	3	positive regulation of glial cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of glial cell proliferation.
2	0	0	negative regulation of glial cell proliferation	Any process that stops or decreases the rate or extent of glial cell proliferation.
2	1	0	regulation of feeding behavior	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the behavior associated with the intake of food.
6	10	8	regulation of transcription initiation from RNA polymerase II promoter	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of a process involved in starting transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter.
3	4	3	positive regulation of transcription initiation from RNA polymerase II promoter	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of a process involved in starting transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter.
0	0	2	regulation of respiratory burst	Any process that modulates the rate frequency or extent of a phase of elevated metabolic activity, during which oxygen consumption increases; this leads to the production, by an NADH dependent system, of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), superoxide anions and hydroxyl radicals.
1	0	0	positive regulation of respiratory burst involved in inflammatory response	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of a phase of elevated metabolic activity, during which oxygen consumption increases made as a defense response ; this leads to the production, by an NADH dependent system, of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), superoxide anions and hydroxyl radicals.
1	0	0	negative regulation of respiratory burst involved in inflammatory response	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of a phase of elevated metabolic activity, during which oxygen consumption increases made as a defense response ; this leads to the production, by an NADH dependent system, of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), superoxide anions and hydroxyl radicals.
3	0	1	positive regulation of respiratory burst	Any process that increases the rate frequency or extent of a phase of elevated metabolic activity, during which oxygen consumption increases; this leads to the production, by an NADH dependent system, of hydrogen peroxide (H2O2), superoxide anions and hydroxyl radicals.
25	29	15	cilium assembly	The assembly of a cilium, a specialized eukaryotic organelle that consists of a filiform extrusion of the cell surface. Each cilium is bounded by an extrusion of the cytoplasmic membrane, and contains a regular longitudinal array of microtubules, anchored basally in a centriole.
0	1	0	embryonic skeletal joint morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of skeletal joints are generated and organized during the embryonic phase. A skeletal joint is the connecting structure between the bones of the skeleton.
0	1	0	positive regulation of oocyte development	Any process that increases the rate or extent of the process whose specific outcome is the progression of an oocyte over time, from initial commitment of the cell to its specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
4	0	1	cilium-dependent cell motility	Cell motility due to the motion of one or more eukaryotic cilia. A eukaryotic cilium is a specialized organelle that consists of a filiform extrusion of the cell surface. Each cilium is bounded by an extrusion of the cytoplasmic (plasma) membrane, and contains a regular longitudinal array of microtubules, anchored basally in a centriole.
2	1	0	epithelial cilium movement involved in determination of left/right asymmetry	The movement of cilia of epithelial cells of the Left Right Organizer (LRO), also referred to as the node in mouse or the Kupffer's vesicle in zebrafish, resulting in the leftward fluid flow across the LRO and generation or transport of a signal which determines asymmetry in an organism's body plan with respect to the left and right halves.
0	1	0	transdifferentiation	The conversion of a differentiated cell of one fate into a differentiated cell of another fate without first undergoing cell division or reversion to a more primitive or stem cell-like fate.
4	3	12	long-term synaptic potentiation	A process that modulates synaptic plasticity such that synapses are changed resulting in the increase in the rate, or frequency of synaptic transmission at the synapse.
0	3	3	long-term synaptic depression	A process that modulates synaptic plasticity such that synapses are changed resulting in the decrease in the rate, or frequency of synaptic transmission at the synapse.
2	0	0	cilium movement involved in cell motility	Movement of cilia mediated by motor proteins that contributes to the movement of a cell.
0	1	0	regulation of cilium beat frequency involved in ciliary motility	Any process that modulates the frequency of cilium beating involved in ciliary motility.
0	0	1	regulation of sarcomere organization	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of myofibril assembly by organization of muscle actomyosin into sarcomeres. The sarcomere is the repeating unit of a myofibril in a muscle cell, composed of an array of overlapping thick and thin filaments between two adjacent Z discs.
0	1	0	positive regulation of sarcomere organization	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of myofibril assembly by organization of muscle actomyosin into sarcomeres. The sarcomere is the repeating unit of a myofibril in a muscle cell, composed of an array of overlapping thick and thin filaments between two adjacent Z discs.
1	0	0	regulation of cytokine activity	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the activity of a molecule that controls the survival, growth, differentiation and effector function of tissues and cells.
2	1	1	regulation of phosphatidylinositol dephosphorylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reaction involving the removal of one or more phosphate groups from a phosphatidylinositol.
1	0	0	regulation of cell diameter	Any process that modulates the diameter of a cell, the length of a line segment that crosses through the center of a circular section through a cell.
2	1	2	regulation of membrane repolarization	Any process that modulates the establishment or extent of a membrane potential in the polarizing direction towards the resting potential, usually from positive to negative.
3	0	3	regulation of ventricular cardiac muscle cell membrane repolarization	Any process that modulates the establishment or extent of a membrane potential in the polarizing direction towards the resting potential in a ventricular cardiomyocyte.
1	0	0	regulation of blood vessel remodeling	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of blood vessel remodeling, the reorganization or renovation of existing blood vessels.
3	0	7	regulation of ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel activity	Any process that modulates the activity of a ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel. The ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel catalyzes the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a channel that opens when a ryanodine class ligand has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
0	2	3	negative regulation of ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel activity	Any process that decreases the activity of a ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel. The ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel catalyzes the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a channel that opens when a ryanodine class ligand has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
0	2	4	positive regulation of ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel activity	Any process that increases the activity of a ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel. The ryanodine-sensitive calcium-release channel catalyzes the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a channel that opens when a ryanodine class ligand has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
1	1	1	cardiac epithelial to mesenchymal transition	A transition where a cardiac epithelial cell loses apical/basolateral polarity, severs intercellular adhesive junctions, degrades basement membrane components and becomes a migratory mesenchymal cell.
2	0	0	definitive erythrocyte differentiation	Erythrocyte differentiation which occurs as part of the process of definitive hemopoiesis.
1	0	0	primitive erythrocyte differentiation	Erythrocyte differentiation which occurs as part of the process of primitive hemopoiesis.
2	2	0	head development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of a head from an initial condition to its mature state. The head is the anterior-most division of the body.
1	0	0	head morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the head are generated and organized. The head is the anterior-most division of the body.
1	2	5	face development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of a face from an initial condition to its mature state. The face is the ventral division of the head.
5	4	4	face morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the face are generated and organized. The face is the ventral division of the head.
8	9	4	cell chemotaxis	The directed movement of a motile cell guided by a specific chemical concentration gradient. Movement may be towards a higher concentration (positive chemotaxis) or towards a lower concentration (negative chemotaxis).
0	2	1	cytoplasmic actin-based contraction involved in cell motility	The actin filament-based movement by which cytoplasmic actin filaments slide past one another resulting in a contraction that propels the cell from one place to another.
7	14	13	interferon-gamma-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interferon-gamma to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Interferon gamma is the only member of the type II interferon found so far.
1	2	2	regulation of interferon-gamma-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of interferon-gamma binding to a cell surface receptor.
0	0	2	positive regulation of interferon-gamma-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of interferon-gamma binding to a cell surface receptor.
3	1	0	negative regulation of interferon-gamma-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of interferon-gamma binding to a cell surface receptor.
6	6	6	type I interferon signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a type I interferon to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Type I interferons include the interferon-alpha, beta, delta, episilon, zeta, kappa, tau, and omega gene families.
1	2	1	regulation of type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of a type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway. A type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway is the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of a type I interferon binding to a cell surface receptor.
6	3	3	negative regulation of type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of a type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway. A type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway is the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of a type I interferon binding to a cell surface receptor.
1	1	2	positive regulation of type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of a type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway. A type I interferon-mediated signaling pathway is the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of a type I interferon binding to a cell surface receptor.
0	3	1	regulation of cellular localization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process in which a cell, a substance, or a cellular entity is transported to, or maintained in a specific location within or in the membrane of a cell.
0	0	2	photoreceptor inner segment membrane	The membrane surrounding the inner segment of a vertebrate photoreceptor. The photoreceptor inner segment contains mitochondria, ribosomes and membranes where opsin molecules are assembled and passed to be part of the outer segment discs.
0	1	2	bone trabecula formation	The process of creating a trabecula in the bone. A trabecula is a tissue element in the form of a small beam, strut or rod.
3	1	1	heart trabecula formation	The process of creating a trabecula in the heart. A trabecula is a tissue element in the form of a small beam, strut or rod.
5	7	6	bone development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of bone over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Bone is the hard skeletal connective tissue consisting of both mineral and cellular components.
3	1	0	bone morphogenesis	The process in which bones are generated and organized.
0	1	0	endochondral bone morphogenesis	The process in which bones are generated and organized as a result of the conversion of initial cartilaginous anlage into bone.
0	1	1	cartilage development involved in endochondral bone morphogenesis	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cartilage that will provide a scaffold for mineralization of endochondral bones.
0	0	1	cell adhesion molecule production	The appearance of a cell adhesion molecule due to biosynthesis or secretion.
1	1	0	negative regulation of cell adhesion molecule production	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of cell adhesion molecule production. Cell adhesion molecule production is the appearance of a cell adhesion molecule as a result of its biosynthesis or a decrease in its catabolism.
1	1	1	positive regulation of cell adhesion molecule production	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of cell adhesion molecule production. Cell adhesion molecule production is the appearance of a cell adhesion molecule as a result of its biosynthesis or a decrease in its catabolism.
1	1	0	negative regulation of leucine import	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of leucine import. Leucine import is the directed movement of leucine into a cell or organelle.
1	0	0	frontal suture morphogenesis	The process in which the frontal suture is generated and organized.
1	0	0	lambdoid suture morphogenesis	The process in which the lambdoid suture is generated and organized.
1	0	0	sagittal suture morphogenesis	The process in which the sagittal suture is generated and organized.
0	0	1	positive regulation of Fc receptor mediated stimulatory signaling pathway	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the Fc receptor mediated stimulatory signaling pathway. The Fc receptor mediated stimulatory signaling pathway is a series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a the binding of the Fc portion of an immunoglobulin by an Fc receptor capable of activating or perpetuating an immune response. The Fc portion of an immunoglobulin is its C-terminal constant region.
0	1	0	susceptibility to T cell mediated cytotoxicity	The process of causing a cell to become susceptible to T cell mediated cytotoxicity.
1	0	0	regulation of atrial cardiac muscle cell membrane repolarization	Any process that modulates the establishment or extent of a membrane potential in the polarizing direction towards the resting potential in an atrial cardiomyocyte.
0	1	0	regulation of ventricular cardiac muscle cell membrane depolarization	Any process that modulates the establishment or extent of a membrane potential in the depolarizing direction away from the resting potential in a ventricular cardiomyocyte.
1	0	0	mast cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized myeloid precursor cell acquires the specialized features of a mast cell. A mast cell is a cell that is found in almost all tissues containing numerous basophilic granules and capable of releasing large amounts of histamine and heparin upon activation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mast cell differentiation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of mast cell differentiation, the process in which a relatively unspecialized myeloid precursor cell acquires the specialized features of a mast cell. A mast cell is a cell that is found in almost all tissues containing numerous basophilic granules and capable of releasing large amounts of histamine and heparin upon activation.
1	0	0	cardiac muscle cell myoblast differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a cardiac myoblast. A cardiac myoblast is a precursor cell that has been committed to a cardiac muscle cell fate but retains the ability to divide and proliferate throughout life.
0	1	0	positive regulation of single-stranded telomeric DNA binding	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of single-stranded telomeric DNA binding.
0	0	1	regulation of DNA strand elongation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of DNA strand elongation. DNA strand elongation is the DNA metabolic process in which an existing DNA strand is extended by activities including the addition of nucleotides to the 3' end of the strand.
2	1	1	innervation	The process in which a nerve invades a tissue and makes functional synaptic connection within the tissue.
0	1	0	axonogenesis involved in innervation	The neurite development process that generates a long process of a neuron, as it invades a target tissue.
2	0	1	pathway-restricted SMAD protein phosphorylation	The process of introducing a phosphate group on to a pathway restricted SMAD protein. A pathway restricted SMAD protein is an effector protein that acts directly downstream of the transforming growth factor family receptor.
0	2	1	regulation of SMAD protein signal transduction	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of SMAD protein signal transduction. Pathway-restricted SMAD proteins and common-partner SMAD proteins are involved in the transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathways.
1	1	2	positive regulation of SMAD protein signal transduction	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of SMAD protein signal transduction. Pathway-restricted SMAD proteins and common-partner SMAD proteins are involved in the transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathways.
0	1	0	regulation of pathway-restricted SMAD protein phosphorylation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of pathway-restricted SMAD protein phosphorylation. Pathway-restricted SMAD proteins and common-partner SMAD proteins are involved in the transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathways.
1	1	0	negative regulation of pathway-restricted SMAD protein phosphorylation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of pathway-restricted SMAD protein phosphorylation. Pathway-restricted SMAD proteins and common-partner SMAD proteins are involved in the transforming growth factor beta receptor signaling pathways.
4	2	7	SMAD protein signal transduction	The cascade of processes by which a signal interacts with a receptor, causing a change in the activity of a SMAD protein, and ultimately effecting a change in the functioning of the cell.
2	2	1	growth hormone receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of growth hormone receptor binding to its physiological ligand.
5	1	1	growth hormone receptor signaling pathway via JAK-STAT	The process in which STAT proteins (Signal Transducers and Activators of Transcription) are activated by members of the JAK (janus activated kinase) family of tyrosine kinases, following the binding of physiological ligands to the growth hormone receptor. Once activated, STATs dimerize and translocate to the nucleus and modulate the expression of target genes.
0	1	0	regulation of growth hormone receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the growth hormone receptor signaling pathway. The growth hormone receptor signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of growth hormone receptor binding to its physiological ligand.
1	0	0	positive regulation of growth hormone receptor signaling pathway	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the growth hormone receptor signaling pathway. The growth hormone receptor signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of growth hormone receptor binding to its physiological ligand.
1	0	3	calcium ion transport into cytosol	The directed movement of calcium ions (Ca2+) into the cytosol.
1	0	0	positive regulation of penile erection	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of penile erection. Penile erection is the hardening, enlarging and rising of the penis which often occurs in the sexually aroused male and enables sexual intercourse. Achieved by increased inflow of blood into the vessels of erectile tissue, and decreased outflow.
0	2	0	cardiac septum morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of a cardiac septum is generated and organized. A cardiac septum is a partition that separates parts of the heart.
6	4	2	ventricular septum morphogenesis	The developmental process in which a ventricular septum is generated and organized. A ventricular septum is an anatomical structure that separates the lower chambers (ventricles) of the heart from one another.
1	2	0	atrial septum morphogenesis	The developmental process in which atrial septum is generated and organized. The atrial septum separates the upper chambers (the atria) of the heart from one another.
0	1	1	aorta smooth muscle tissue morphogenesis	The process in which the structure of the smooth muscle tissue surrounding the aorta is generated and organized. An aorta is an artery that carries blood from the heart to other parts of the body.
1	3	2	response to growth hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a growth hormone stimulus. Growth hormone is a peptide hormone that binds to the growth hormone receptor and stimulates growth.
0	0	3	regulation of heart growth	Any process that modulates the rate or extent of heart growth. Heart growth is the increase in size or mass of the heart.
0	1	1	positive regulation of heart growth	Any process that increases the rate or extent of heart growth. Heart growth is the increase in size or mass of the heart.
1	0	0	peptidyl-dipeptidase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a peptidyl-dipeptidase. Peptidyl-dipeptidase activity catalyzes the release of C-terminal dipeptides from a polypeptide chain.
1	0	4	lung morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the lung are generated and organized.
0	1	0	lung vasculature development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of a lung vasculature from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of the lung vasculature and ends with the mature structure. The lung vasculature is composed of the tubule structures that carry blood or lymph in the lungs.
0	1	0	lung epithelium development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of the lung epithelium from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of lung epithelium and ends with the mature structure. The lung epithelium is the specialized epithelium that lines the inside of the lung.
0	1	0	epithelium development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an epithelium over time, from its formation to the mature structure. An epithelium is a tissue that covers the internal or external surfaces of an anatomical structure.
1	0	1	lung saccule development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of a lung saccule from an initial condition to its mature state. The lung saccule is the primitive gas exchange portion of the lung composed of type I and type II cells.
1	0	0	bronchus morphogenesis	The process in which the bronchus is generated and organized. The bronchus is the portion of the airway that connects to the lungs.
1	0	3	trachea formation	The process pertaining to the initial formation of a trachea from unspecified parts. The process begins with the specific processes that contribute to the appearance of the discrete structure and ends when the trachea is recognizable. The trachea is the portion of the airway that attaches to the bronchi as it branches.
3	1	0	epithelial tube branching involved in lung morphogenesis	The process in which a highly ordered sequence of patterning events generates the branched epithelial tubes of the lung, consisting of reiterated combinations of bud outgrowth, elongation, and dichotomous subdivision of terminal units.
1	0	0	mammary gland morphogenesis	The process in which anatomical structures of the mammary gland are generated and organized. Morphogenesis refers to the creation of shape. The mammary gland is a large compound sebaceous gland that in female mammals is modified to secrete milk.
1	3	1	branching involved in mammary gland duct morphogenesis	The process in which the branching structure of the mammary gland duct is generated and organized. The mammary gland is a large compound sebaceous gland that in female mammals is modified to secrete milk.
1	1	1	branching involved in salivary gland morphogenesis	The process in which the branching structure of the salivary gland is generated and organized.
0	0	1	bud outgrowth involved in lung branching	The process in which a region of the lung epithelium initiates an outgrowth.
1	0	0	dichotomous subdivision of terminal units involved in lung branching	The process in which a lung bud bifurcates.
1	0	1	bud elongation involved in lung branching	The process in which a bud in the lung grows out from the point where it is formed.
3	0	1	positive regulation of cardiac muscle contraction	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle contraction.
1	0	0	regulation of gastric acid secretion	Any process that modulates the rate frequency or extent of gastric secretion. Gastric secretion is the regulated release of gastric acid (hydrochloric acid) by parietal or oxyntic cells during digestion.
2	0	0	lung lobe morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a lung lobe are generated and organized. A lung lobe is a projection that extends from the lung.
1	1	0	pharynx development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of a pharynx from an initial condition to its mature state. The pharynx is the part of the digestive system immediately posterior to the mouth.
0	0	1	activation of meiosis involved in egg activation	Any process that starts the inactive process of meiosis in an egg after the egg has been fertilized or physiologically activated. Eggs generally arrest in meiosis and complete the process after activation.
1	0	1	cortical granule exocytosis	The process of secretion by a cell that results in the release of intracellular molecules contained within a cortical granule by fusion of the vesicle with the plasma membrane of a cell. A cortical granule is a specialized secretory vesicle that is released during egg activation that changes the surface of the egg to prevent polyspermy.
1	0	2	cortical granule	A secretory vesicle that is stored under the cell membrane of an egg. These vesicles fuse with the egg plasma membrane as part of egg activation and are part of the block to polyspermy.
1	0	0	positive regulation of flagellated sperm motility involved in capacitation	The process in which the controlled movement of a flagellated sperm cell is initiated as part of the process required for flagellated sperm to reach fertilization competence.
2	0	2	acrosomal vesicle exocytosis	The calcium ion regulated exocytosis which results in fusion of the acrosomal vesicle with the plasma membrane of the sperm as part of the acrosome reaction.
0	0	1	club cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a club cell. A club cell is an unciliated epithelial cell found in the respiratory and terminal bronchioles.
4	0	1	lung epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an epithelial cell that contributes to the epithelium of the lung.
0	1	0	regulation of cell projection assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of cell projection assembly.
1	0	1	positive regulation of epithelial cell proliferation involved in lung morphogenesis	Any process that increases the rate or frequency of epithelial cell proliferation that results in the lung attaining its shape.
0	0	1	epithelial cell proliferation involved in lung morphogenesis	The multiplication or reproduction of epithelial cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population that contributes to the shaping of the lung.
0	0	2	type I pneumocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a type I pneumocyte. A type I pneumocyte is a flattened cell with greatly attenuated cytoplasm and a paucity of organelles.
0	0	1	type II pneumocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a type II pneumocyte. A type II pneumocyte is a surfactant secreting cell that contains abundant cytoplasm containing numerous lipid-rich multilamellar bodies.
1	0	0	prostate gland morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a prostate gland are generated and organized.
1	1	0	prostatic bud formation	The morphogenetic process in which a region of the fetal urogenital sinus epithelium is specified to become the prostate, resulting in prostate bud outgrowth.
1	0	0	epithelial cell proliferation involved in prostatic bud elongation	The multiplication of epithelial cells, contributing to the expansion of the primary prostatic bud.
1	1	0	secretory columnal luminar epithelial cell differentiation involved in prostate glandular acinus development	The process in which a relatively unspecialized epithelial cell acquires specialized features of a secretory columnal luminar epithelial cell of the prostate.
0	1	0	squamous basal epithelial stem cell differentiation involved in prostate gland acinus development	The process in which a relatively unspecialized epithelial cell acquires specialized features of a squamous basal epithelial stem cell of the prostate.
1	0	1	bronchus cartilage development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of lung cartilage over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cartilage is a connective tissue dominated by extracellular matrix containing collagen type II and large amounts of proteoglycan, particularly chondroitin sulfate.
1	0	1	trachea cartilage development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the tracheal cartilage over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cartilage is a connective tissue dominated by extracellular matrix containing collagen type II and large amounts of proteoglycan, particularly chondroitin sulfate.
1	0	1	muscle tissue development	The progression of muscle tissue over time, from its initial formation to its mature state. Muscle tissue is a contractile tissue made up of actin and myosin fibers.
0	1	0	skeletal muscle organ development	The progression of a skeletal muscle organ over time from its initial formation to its mature state. A skeletal muscle organ includes the skeletal muscle tissue and its associated connective tissue.
0	0	1	diaphragm development	The progression of the diaphragm over time from its initial formation to the mature structure. The diaphragm is a skeletal muscle that is responsible for contraction and expansion of the lungs.
1	5	3	regulation of necroptotic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of a necroptotic process, a necrotic cell death process that results from the activation of endogenous cellular processes, such as signaling involving death domain receptors or Toll-like receptors.
1	2	0	positive regulation of necroptotic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of a necroptotic process, a necrotic cell death process that results from the activation of endogenous cellular processes, such as signaling involving death domain receptors or Toll-like receptors.
2	2	4	negative regulation of necroptotic process	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of a necroptotic process, a necrotic cell death process that results from the activation of endogenous cellular processes, such as signaling involving death domain receptors or Toll-like receptors.
2	7	10	negative regulation of cell death	Any process that decreases the rate or frequency of cell death. Cell death is the specific activation or halting of processes within a cell so that its vital functions markedly cease, rather than simply deteriorating gradually over time, which culminates in cell death.
1	0	0	positive regulation of calcidiol 1-monooxygenase activity	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of calcidiol 1-monooxygenase activity. Calcidiol 1-monooxygenase activity is the catalysis of the reaction: calcidiol + NADPH + H+ + O2 = calcitriol + NADP+ + H2O.
1	0	0	developmental growth involved in morphogenesis	The increase in size or mass of an anatomical structure that contributes to the structure attaining its shape.
0	1	2	apoptotic process involved in morphogenesis	Any apoptotic process that contributes to the shaping of an anatomical structure.
1	1	0	neuroepithelial cell differentiation	The process in which epiblast cells acquire specialized features of neuroepithelial cells.
0	1	0	positive regulation of DNA-templated transcription, termination	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of DNA-templated transcription termination, the process in which transcription is completed; the formation of phosphodiester bonds ceases, the RNA-DNA hybrid dissociates, and RNA polymerase releases the DNA.
1	0	0	intestinal epithelial cell maturation	The developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for a columna/cuboidal epithelial cell of the intestine to attain its fully functional state. A columnar/cuboidal epithelial cell of the intestine mature as they migrate from the intestinal crypt to the villus.
2	0	1	intestinal epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a columnar/cuboidal epithelial cell of the intestine.
0	2	2	intestinal epithelial cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a columnar/cuboidal epithelial cell of the intestine over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	1	ATPase regulator activity	Modulates the rate of ATP hydrolysis by an ATPase.
1	0	0	mammary gland specification	The regionalization process in which the mammary line is specified. The mammary line is a ridge of epidermal cells that will form the mammary placodes.
1	1	0	mammary placode formation	The developmental process in which the mammary placode forms. The mammary placode is a transient lens shaped structure that will give rise to the mammary bud proper.
1	0	2	mammary gland duct morphogenesis	The process in which anatomical structures of the mammary ducts are generated and organized. Mammary ducts are epithelial tubes that transport milk.
2	3	3	adipose tissue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of adipose tissue over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Adipose tissue is specialized tissue that is used to store fat.
0	2	1	fat pad development	The progression of a fat pad from its initial formation to its mature structure. A fat pad is an accumulation of adipose tissue.
0	1	0	regulation of cholesterol import	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of cholesterol import. Cholesterol import is the directed movement of cholesterol into a cell or organelle.
1	0	1	negative regulation of cholesterol import	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of cholesterol import. Cholesterol import is the directed movement of cholesterol into a cell or organelle.
0	0	1	regulation of chromosome condensation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of chromosome condensation, the progressive compaction of dispersed interphase chromatin into threadlike chromosomes prior to mitotic or meiotic nuclear division, or during apoptosis, in eukaryotic cells.
1	2	1	regulation of vesicle-mediated transport	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of vesicle-mediated transport, the directed movement of substances, either within a vesicle or in the vesicle membrane, into, out of or within a cell.
0	0	2	regulation of ER to Golgi vesicle-mediated transport	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of ER to Golgi vesicle-mediated transport, the directed movement of substances from the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) to the Golgi, mediated by COP II vesicles. Small COP II coated vesicles form from the ER and then fuse directly with the cis-Golgi. Larger structures are transported along microtubules to the cis-Golgi.
1	0	0	regulation of meiosis I	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of meiosis I, a cell cycle process comprising the steps by which a cell progresses through the first phase of meiosis, in which cells divide and homologous chromosomes are paired and segregated from each other, producing two daughter cells.
0	1	0	regulation of microtubule-based movement	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of microtubule-based movement, the movement of organelles, other microtubules and other particles along microtubules, mediated by motor proteins.
1	0	0	negative regulation of transcription initiation from RNA polymerase II promoter	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of a process involved in starting transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter.
1	3	1	mammary gland epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized epithelial cell becomes a more specialized epithelial cell of the mammary gland.
1	0	0	submandibular salivary gland formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of a submandibular salivary gland. This process begins with a thickening of the epithelium next to the tongue and ends when a bud linked to the oral surface is formed.
0	0	1	salivary gland cavitation	The process in which the solid core of salivary epithelium gives rise to the hollow tube of the gland.
0	1	1	embryonic placenta morphogenesis	The process in which the embryonic placenta is generated and organized.
1	0	0	epithelial cell morphogenesis involved in placental branching	The change in form (cell shape and size) that occurs when a trophoblast cell elongates to contribute to the branching of the placenta.
1	2	2	placenta blood vessel development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a blood vessel of the placenta over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	ureteric bud morphogenesis	The process in which the ureteric bud is generated and organized.
0	1	0	ureteric bud formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of the ureteric bud from the Wolffian duct. This process begins when the bud protrudes from the duct and ends when it is a recognizable bud.
0	1	0	primary ureteric bud growth	The process in which the primary ureteric bud grows along its axis dorsally toward the metanephric blastema.
1	0	0	cell differentiation involved in salivary gland development	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the cells of the salivary gland.
1	0	0	regulation of cholesterol transporter activity	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of cholesterol transporter activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cholesterol transporter activity	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of cholesterol transporter activity.
0	0	1	regulation of endoribonuclease activity	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within ribonucleic acid by creating internal breaks.
1	1	0	regulation of ribonuclease activity	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of ribonuclease activity, catalysis of the hydrolysis of phosphodiester bonds in chains of RNA.
0	1	0	deoxyribonuclease inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of deoxyribonuclease.
0	2	3	cell differentiation involved in embryonic placenta development	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of the embryonic placenta.
1	2	0	trophoblast giant cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a trophoblast giant cell of the placenta. Trophoblast giant cells are the cell of the placenta that line the maternal decidua.
1	0	0	spongiotrophoblast differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell of the ectoplacental cone acquires specialized features of a spongiotrophoblast of the placenta. A spongiotrophoblast cell is a basophilic cell.
0	0	1	glycogen cell differentiation involved in embryonic placenta development	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a glycogen cell of the placenta. A glycogen cell is a vacuolated glycogen-rich cell that appears in compact cell islets of the spongiotrophoblast layer.
0	1	0	chorio-allantoic fusion	The cell-cell adhesion process in which the cells of the chorion fuse to the cells of the allantois.
0	1	2	labyrinthine layer development	The process in which the labyrinthine layer of the placenta progresses, from its formation to its mature state.
1	2	1	spongiotrophoblast layer development	The process in which the spongiotrophoblast layer of the placenta progresses from its formation to its mature state.
0	1	0	labyrinthine layer morphogenesis	The process in which the labyrinthine layer of the placenta is generated and organized.
1	1	3	labyrinthine layer blood vessel development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a blood vessel of the labyrinthine layer of the placenta over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The embryonic vessels grow through the layer to come in close contact with the maternal blood supply.
1	1	0	chorionic trophoblast cell differentiation	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells of the ectoplacental cone acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize chorionic trophoblasts. These cells will migrate towards the spongiotrophoblast layer and give rise to syncytiotrophoblasts of the labyrinthine layer.
0	1	0	regulation of spongiotrophoblast cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of spongiotrophoblast cell proliferation.
3	0	0	intestinal epithelial structure maintenance	A tissue homeostatic process required for the maintenance of the structure of the intestinal epithelium.
2	0	0	positive regulation of inositol phosphate biosynthetic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of inositol phosphate biosynthesis. Inositol phosphate biosynthetic processes are the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of an inositol phosphate, 1,2,3,4,5,6-cyclohexanehexol, with one or more phosphate groups attached.
0	0	1	regulation of eIF2 alpha phosphorylation by dsRNA	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of eIF2 alpha phosphorylation as a cellular response to double-stranded RNA.
1	1	0	prostate gland growth	The increase in size or mass of the prostate gland where the increase in size or mass has the specific outcome of the progression of the gland, from its formation to its mature state.
1	0	0	epithelial-mesenchymal signaling involved in prostate gland development	Any process that results in the transfer of information from an epithelial cell to a mesenchymal cell where it is interpreted and contributes to the progression of the prostate gland over time.
0	0	1	mesenchymal-epithelial cell signaling involved in prostate gland development	Any process that mediates the transfer of information from a mesenchymal cell to an epithelial cell where it is received and interpreted contributing to the progression of the prostate gland over time.
1	0	1	prostate gland epithelium morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of epithelia of the prostate gland are generated and organized. An epithelium consists of closely packed cells arranged in one or more layers, that covers the outer surfaces of the body or lines any internal cavity or tube.
1	1	0	prostate gland stromal morphogenesis	The process in which the prostate gland stroma is generated and organized. The prostate gland stroma is made up of the mesenchymal or fibroblast cells of the prostate gland.
0	1	0	epithelial cell differentiation involved in prostate gland development	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an epithelial cell of the prostate gland.
1	0	0	epithelial cell maturation involved in prostate gland development	The developmental process, independent of morphogenetic (shape) change, that is required for an epithelial cell of the prostate gland to attain its fully functional state. An epithelial cell is a cell usually found in a two-dimensional sheet with a free surface.
1	0	1	mammary gland branching involved in thelarche	The process in which the branching structure of the mammary gland duct is generated and organized during the period of sexual maturity in mammals. The mammary gland is a large compound sebaceous gland that in female mammals is modified to secrete milk.
0	0	1	mammary gland branching involved in pregnancy	The process in which the branching structure of the mammary gland duct is generated and organized as a part of pregnancy.
2	0	0	mammary gland alveolus development	The progression of the mammary gland alveolus over time, from its formation to its mature state. The mammary gland alveolus is a sac-like structure that is found in the mature gland.
0	0	1	epithelial cell proliferation involved in mammary gland duct elongation	The multiplication or reproduction of mammary gland branch epithelial cells, resulting in the elongation of the branch. The mammary gland branch differs from the bud in that it is not the initial curved portion of the outgrowth.
0	0	1	regulation of mast cell chemotaxis	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of mast cell chemotaxis. Mast cell chemotaxis is the movement of a mast cell in response to an external stimulus.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mast cell chemotaxis	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of mast cell chemotaxis. Mast cell chemotaxis is the movement of a mast cell in response to an external stimulus.
3	1	1	positive regulation of response to cytokine stimulus	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of a response to cytokine stimulus.
2	1	0	negative regulation of response to cytokine stimulus	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of a response to cytokine stimulus.
1	0	0	regulation of branching involved in mammary gland duct morphogenesis	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of branching involved in mammary gland duct morphogenesis.
1	0	0	mammary duct terminal end bud growth	The morphogenetic growth of the large, club-shaped terminal end of a mammary gland duct during prepubertal growth and during puberty.
0	6	6	regulation of androgen receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the androgen receptor signaling pathway.
2	1	6	negative regulation of androgen receptor signaling pathway	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the androgen receptor signaling pathway.
1	1	1	negative regulation of epithelial cell proliferation involved in prostate gland development	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of epithelial cell proliferation that contributes to the progression of the prostate gland over time.
1	0	0	regulation of cell proliferation involved in tissue homeostasis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell proliferation resulting in the maintenance of a steady-state number of cells within a tissue.
0	0	1		
0	1	2	hair follicle placode formation	The developmental process in which a hair placode forms. An hair follicle placode is a thickening of the ectoderm that will give rise to the hair follicle bud.
0	1	1	regulation of cell differentiation involved in embryonic placenta development	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of cell differentiation that contributes to the progression of the placenta over time, from its initial condition to its mature state.
0	1	1	mesodermal to mesenchymal transition involved in gastrulation	The epithelial to mesenchymal transition process in which a mesodermal cell loses apical/basolateral polarity, severs intercellular adhesive junctions, degrades basement membrane components and becomes a migratory mesenchymal cell as part of the process of gastrulation.
0	0	1	random inactivation of X chromosome	Compensating for the two-fold variation in X-chromosome:autosome ratios between sexes by a global inactivation of all, or most of, the genes on either the paternal or maternal X-chromosome in the XX sex.
1	0	0	inactivation of X chromosome by heterochromatin assembly	Compensating for the two-fold variation in X-chromosome:autosome ratios between sexes by a global inactivation of all, or most of, the genes on one of the X-chromosomes in the XX sex by the mechanism of heterochromatin formation.
1	0	0	inactivation of X chromosome by DNA methylation	Compensating for the two-fold variation in X-chromosome:autosome ratios between sexes by a global inactivation of all, or most of, the genes on one of the X-chromosomes in the XX sex by a mechanism of DNA methylation.
3	2	7	regulation of canonical Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the Wnt signaling pathway through beta-catenin, the series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes.
2	0	0	smoothened signaling pathway involved in dorsal/ventral neural tube patterning	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of activation of the transmembrane protein Smoothened contributing to the dorsal/ventral pattern of the neural tube.
0	2	0	lymphatic endothelial cell differentiation	The process in which a venous blood vessel endothelial cell acquires specialized features of a lymphatic vessel endothelial cell, a thin flattened cell that lines the inside surfaces of lymph vessels.
0	1	0	blood vessel endothelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a blood vessel endothelial cell, a thin flattened cell that lines the inside surfaces of blood vessels.
0	1	0	lymphatic endothelial cell fate commitment	The commitment of a venous blood vessel endothelial cell to a lymphatic endothelial cell fate and its capacity to differentiate into a lymphatic endothelial cell.
1	1	1	artery development	The progression of the artery over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure. An artery is a blood vessel that carries blood away from the heart to a capillary bed.
0	1	1	venous blood vessel development	The progression of the venous blood vessel over time from its initial formation to the mature structure. Venous blood vessels carry blood back to the heart after the capillary bed.
0	0	1	establishment of blood-brain barrier	Establishment of the barrier between the blood and the brain. The cells in the brain are packed tightly together preventing the passage of most molecules from the blood into the brain. Only lipid soluble molecules or those that are actively transported can pass through the blood-brain barrier.
1	0	0	semicircular canal development	The progression of the semicircular canal from its initial formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	anterior semicircular canal development	The progession of the anterior semicircular canal from its initial formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	lateral semicircular canal development	The progession of the lateral semicircular canal from its initial formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	limb epidermis development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the epidermis of the limb over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The limb epidermis is the outer epithelial layer of the limb, it is a complex stratified squamous epithelium.
0	0	1	regulation of protein folding in endoplasmic reticulum	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the protein folding process that takes place in the endoplasmic reticulum (ER). Secreted, plasma membrane and organelle proteins are folded in the ER, assisted by chaperones and foldases (protein disulphide isomerases), and additional factors required for optimal folding (ATP, Ca2+ and an oxidizing environment to allow disulfide bond formation).
1	2	1	positive regulation of macrophage cytokine production	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of macrophage cytokine production. Macrophage cytokine production is the appearance of a chemokine due to biosynthesis or secretion following a cellular stimulus, resulting in an increase in its intracellular or extracellular levels.
0	0	1	heart formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of the heart from unspecified parts. This process begins with the specific processes that contribute to the appearance of the heart field and the arrival of cardiac neural crest to the heart region. The process ends when the structural rudiment is recognizable.
0	1	0	cardiac muscle cell fate commitment	The commitment of cells to specific cardiac muscle cell fates and their capacity to differentiate into cardiac muscle cells. Cardiac muscle cells are striated muscle cells that are responsible for heart contraction.
1	0	0	atrioventricular node cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an atrioventricular (AV) node cell over time, from its formation to the mature state.
0	1	0	sinoatrial node cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a sinoatrial (SA) node cell over time, from its formation to the mature state. SA node cells are pacemaker cells that are found in the sinoatrial node.
1	0	0	epicardium-derived cardiac fibroblast cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an epicardial-derived cardiac fibroblast over time, from its formation to the mature state. A epicardial-derived cardiac fibroblast is a connective tissue cell of the heart that arises from the epicardium and secretes an extracellular matrix rich in collagen and other macromolecules.
1	0	1	epithelial to mesenchymal transition involved in cardiac fibroblast development	A transition where an epicardial cell loses apical/basolateral polarity, severs intercellular adhesive junctions, degrades basement membrane components and becomes a migratory mesenchymal cell that will mature into a cardiac fibroblast.
0	0	1	cardiac vascular smooth muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a cardiac vascular smooth muscle cell. A cardiac vascular smooth muscle cell covers the heart vasculature and lacks transverse striations in its constituent fibers.
2	16	16	regulation of gene silencing by miRNA	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the downregulation of gene expression through the action of microRNAs (miRNAs), endogenous 21-24 nucleotide small RNAs processed from stem-loop RNA precursors (pre-miRNAs). Once incorporated into a RNA-induced silencing complex (RISC), miRNAs can downregulate gene expression by either of two posttranscriptional mechanisms: RNA (often mRNA) cleavage or mRNA translational repression.
1	0	1	negative regulation of gene silencing by miRNA	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of gene silencing by miRNA.
0	1	1	regulation of gene silencing	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of gene silencing, the transcriptional or post-transcriptional process carried out at the cellular level that results in long-term gene inactivation.
3	0	2	coronary vasculature development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the blood vessels of the heart over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	coronary vasculature morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of blood vessels of the heart are generated and organized. The blood vessel is the vasculature carrying blood.
1	1	0	vasculogenesis involved in coronary vascular morphogenesis	The differentiation of endothelial cells from progenitor cells that contributes to blood vessel development in the heart, and the de novo formation of blood vessels and tubes.
0	1	1	coronary artery morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of coronary arteries are generated and organized. Coronary arteries are blood vessels that transport blood to the heart muscle.
0	0	1	lipid tube	A macromolecular complex that contains a tube of lipid surrounded by a protein coat.
1	0	1	lipid tube assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of macromolecules to form a macromolecular complex that contains a tube of lipid surrounded by a protein coat involved in membrane shaping of vesicle membranes as they fuse or undergo fission.
2	0	1	response to fungicide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fungicide stimulus. Fungicides are chemicals used to kill fungi.
2	0	1	kidney morphogenesis	Morphogenesis of a kidney. A kidney is an organ that filters the blood and excretes the end products of body metabolism in the form of urine.
0	3	6	dendritic spine development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the dendritic spine over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A dendritic spine is a protrusion from a dendrite and a specialized subcellular compartment involved in synaptic transmission.
1	5	3	dendritic spine morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a dendritic spine are generated and organized. A dendritic spine is a protrusion from a dendrite and a specialized subcellular compartment involved in synaptic transmission.
3	1	4	regulation of dendritic spine development	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of dendritic spine development, the process whose specific outcome is the progression of the dendritic spine over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	6	5	positive regulation of dendritic spine development	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of dendritic spine development, the process whose specific outcome is the progression of the dendritic spine over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
2	2	1	negative regulation of dendritic spine development	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of dendritic spine development, the process whose specific outcome is the progression of the dendritic spine over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
2	2	11	regulation of dendritic spine morphogenesis	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of dendritic spine morphogenesis, the process in which the anatomical structures of a dendritic spine are generated and organized. A dendritic spine is a protrusion from a dendrite and a specialized subcellular compartment involved in synaptic transmission.
2	0	1	negative regulation of dendritic spine morphogenesis	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of dendritic spine morphogenesis, the process in which the anatomical structures of a dendritic spine are generated and organized. A dendritic spine is a protrusion from a dendrite and a specialized subcellular compartment involved in synaptic transmission.
2	3	4	positive regulation of dendritic spine morphogenesis	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of dendritic spine morphogenesis, the process in which the anatomical structures of a dendritic spine are generated and organized. A dendritic spine is a protrusion from a dendrite and a specialized subcellular compartment involved in synaptic transmission.
1	0	0	cell differentiation involved in kidney development	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the cells of the kidney as it progresses from its formation to the mature state.
1	0	0	common bile duct development	The progression of the common bile duct over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The common bile duct is formed from the joining of the common hepatic duct running from the liver, and the cystic duct running from the gall bladder. The common bile duct transports bile from the liver and gall bladder to the intestine.
0	0	1	gall bladder development	The progression of the gall bladder over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure. The gall bladder is a cavitated organ that stores bile.
0	2	5	positive regulation of mRNA catabolic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of a mRNA catabolic process, the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of RNA, ribonucleic acid, one of the two main type of nucleic acid, consisting of a long, unbranched macromolecule formed from ribonucleotides joined in 3',5'-phosphodiester linkage.
1	1	0	snRNA import into nucleus	The directed movement of snRNA, small nuclear ribonucleic acid into the nucleus.
13	20	42	membrane organization	A process which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a membrane. A membrane is a double layer of lipid molecules that encloses all cells, and, in eukaryotes, many organelles; may be a single or double lipid bilayer; also includes associated proteins.
4	4	10	membrane fusion	The membrane organization process that joins two lipid bilayers to form a single membrane.
0	1	1	cardiac muscle tissue regeneration	The regrowth of cardiac muscle tissue to repair injured or damaged muscle fibers in the postnatal stage.
3	3	6	establishment of endothelial barrier	The establishment of a barrier between endothelial cell layers, such as those in the brain, lung or intestine, to exert specific and selective control over the passage of water and solutes, thus allowing formation and maintenance of compartments that differ in fluid and solute composition.
1	1	3	eyelid development in camera-type eye	The progression of the eyelid in a camera-type eye from its formation to the mature state. The eyelid is a membranous cover that helps protect and lubricate the eye.
1	0	0	olfactory bulb mitral cell layer development	The progression of the olfactory bulb mitral cell layer over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The mitral cell layer is composed of pyramidal neurons whose cell bodies are located between the granule cell layer and the plexiform layer.
0	0	1	regulation of cartilage development	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of cartilage development, the process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cartilage over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cartilage is a connective tissue dominated by extracellular matrix containing collagen type II and large amounts of proteoglycan, particularly chondroitin sulfate.
4	2	0	positive regulation of cartilage development	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of cartilage development, the process whose specific outcome is the progression of the cartilage over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cartilage is a connective tissue dominated by extracellular matrix containing collagen type II and large amounts of proteoglycan, particularly chondroitin sulfate.
2	0	1	uterus morphogenesis	The process in which anatomical structures of the uterus are generated and organized.
1	1	2	regulation of wound healing	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the series of events that restore integrity to a damaged tissue, following an injury.
2	0	0	vascular wound healing	Blood vessel formation when new vessels emerge from the proliferation of pre-existing blood vessels and contribute to the series of events that restore integrity to damaged vasculature.
0	1	0	regulation of vascular wound healing	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of blood vessel formation when new vessels emerge from the proliferation of pre-existing blood vessels and contribute to the series of events that restore integrity to damaged vasculature.
0	0	1	negative regulation of vascular wound healing	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of blood vessel formation when new vessels emerge from the proliferation of pre-existing blood vessels and contribute to the series of events that restore integrity to damaged vasculature.
1	1	3	negative regulation of wound healing	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the series of events that restore integrity to a damaged tissue, following an injury.
1	0	0	regulation of branching involved in lung morphogenesis	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the process in which a highly ordered sequence of patterning events generates the branched structures of the lung, consisting of reiterated combinations of bud outgrowth, elongation, and dichotomous subdivision of terminal units.
1	0	4	cell growth involved in cardiac muscle cell development	The growth of a cardiac muscle cell, where growth contributes to the progression of the cell over time from its initial formation to its mature state.
1	4	0	positive regulation of cell growth involved in cardiac muscle cell development	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the growth of a cardiac muscle cell, where growth contributes to the progression of the cell over time from its initial formation to its mature state.
2	0	3	negative regulation of cell growth involved in cardiac muscle cell development	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the growth of a cardiac muscle cell, where growth contributes to the progression of the cell over time from its initial formation to its mature state.
0	2	1	somite development	The progression of a somite from its initial formation to the mature structure. Somites are mesodermal clusters that are arranged segmentally along the anterior posterior axis of an embryo.
1	2	4	muscle structure development	The progression of a muscle structure over time, from its formation to its mature state. Muscle structures are contractile cells, tissues or organs that are found in multicellular organisms.
0	2	0	iris morphogenesis	The process in which the iris is generated and organized. The iris is an anatomical structure in the eye whose opening forms the pupil. The iris is responsible for controlling the diameter and size of the pupil and the amount of light reaching the retina.
1	1	0	ciliary body morphogenesis	The process in which the ciliary body generated and organized. The ciliary body is the circumferential tissue inside the eye composed of the ciliary muscle and ciliary processes.
5	6	6	chaperone-mediated protein folding	The process of inhibiting aggregation and assisting in the covalent and noncovalent assembly of single chain polypeptides or multisubunit complexes into the correct tertiary structure that is dependent on interaction with a chaperone.
0	2	1	negative regulation of protein refolding	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of protein refolding. Protein refolding is the process carried out by a cell that restores the biological activity of an unfolded or misfolded protein, using helper proteins such as chaperones.
2	0	1	negative regulation of histone H3-K27 methylation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of histone H3-K27 methylation. Histone H3-K27 methylation is the modification of histone H3 by addition of a methyl group to lysine at position 27 of the histone.
1	0	0	positive regulation of histone H3-K27 methylation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of histone H3-K27 methylation. Histone H3-K27 methylation is the modification of histone H3 by addition of a methyl group to lysine at position 27 of the histone.
0	0	1	regulation of sequestering of zinc ion	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of sequestering of zinc ion. Sequestering of zinc ion is the process of binding or confining zinc ions such that they are separated from other components of a biological system.
0	0	3	positive regulation of phospholipid translocation	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the translocation, or flipping, of phospholipid molecules from one monolayer of a membrane bilayer to the opposite monolayer.
1	0	1	regulation of protein tyrosine kinase activity	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of protein tyrosine kinase activity.
4	3	4	positive regulation of protein tyrosine kinase activity	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of protein tyrosine kinase activity.
2	3	4	negative regulation of protein tyrosine kinase activity	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of protein tyrosine kinase activity.
0	1	0	neuroendocrine cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized structural and/or functional features of a neuroendocrine cell. A neuroendocrine cell is a cell that receives input form a neuron which controls the secretion of an endocrine substance.
1	0	0	negative regulation of stomach neuroendocrine cell differentiation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of the differentiation of a neuroendocrine cell in the stomach.
1	0	0	seminal vesicle epithelium development	The progression of the seminal vesicle epithelium over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	branching involved in pancreas morphogenesis	The process in which the branches of the pancreas are generated and organized.
2	3	0	endopeptidase activator activity	Increases the activity of an endopeptidase, any enzyme that hydrolyzes nonterminal peptide bonds in polypeptides.
1	0	0	endopeptidase regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a peptidase, any enzyme that hydrolyzes nonterminal peptide bonds in polypeptides.
3	4	3	regulation of proteasomal protein catabolic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds that is mediated by the proteasome.
2	0	0	morphogenesis of a branching epithelium	The process in which the anatomical structures of a branched epithelium are generated and organized.
0	0	1	lung ciliated cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a lung ciliated cell. A lung ciliated cell is a specialized lung epithelial cell that contains cilia for moving substances released from lung secretory cells.
1	0	0	alveolar secondary septum development	The progression of a secondary alveolar septum over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A secondary alveolar septum is a specialized epithelium that subdivides the initial saccule.
1	0	1	lung smooth muscle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of smooth muscle in the lung over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	3	3	endothelial tube morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a tube are generated and organized from an endothelium. Endothelium refers to the layer of cells lining blood vessels, lymphatics, the heart, and serous cavities, and is derived from bone marrow or mesoderm. Corneal endothelium is a special case, derived from neural crest cells.
0	0	1	pulmonary artery morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the pulmonary artery are generated and organized. The pulmonary artery is the artery that carries blood from the heart to the lungs.
4	3	4	mRNA destabilization	Any process that decreases the stability of an mRNA molecule, making it more vulnerable to degradative processes. Messenger RNA is the intermediate molecule between DNA and protein. It includes UTR and coding sequences. It does not contain introns.
0	6	4	3'-UTR-mediated mRNA destabilization	An mRNA destabilization process in which one or more RNA-binding proteins associate with the 3'-untranslated region (UTR) of an mRNA.
0	0	2	establishment of monopolar cell polarity	The specification and formation of monopolar intracellular organization or cell growth patterns. Monopolar cell organization is directional organization along an axis.
0	1	0	endoplasmic reticulum polarization	The endoplasmic reticulum organization process that results in the structure of the endoplasmic reticulum being oriented in the cell.
1	3	3	regulation of insulin secretion involved in cellular response to glucose stimulus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of insulin that contributes to the response of a cell to glucose.
1	0	0	negative regulation of insulin secretion involved in cellular response to glucose stimulus	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of insulin that contributes to the response of a cell to glucose.
2	0	0	mammary gland epithelium development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the mammary gland epithelium over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The mammary gland is a large compound sebaceous gland that in female mammals is modified to secrete milk.
0	1	0	regulation of chondrocyte development	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the process whose specific outcome is the progression of a chondrocyte over time, from its commitment to its mature state. Chondrocyte development does not include the steps involved in committing a chondroblast to a chondrocyte fate.
0	1	1	negative regulation of ribosomal DNA heterochromatin assembly	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the repression of assembly of rDNA heterochromatin.
0	0	1	fungiform papilla development	The progression of the fungiform papilla over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The fungiform papilla is a mushroom-shaped papilla of the tongue.
0	0	2	fungiform papilla formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of a spongiform papilla from unspecified parts. The fungiform papilla is a mushroom-shaped papilla of the tongue.
0	0	5	clathrin-sculpted gamma-aminobutyric acid transport vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a clathrin-sculpted gamma-aminobutyric acid transport vesicle.
1	0	0	canonical Wnt signaling pathway involved in metanephric kidney development	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes that contribute to the progression of the metanephric kidney over time. In this pathway, the activated receptor signals via downstream effectors that result in the inhibition of beta-catenin phosphorylation, thereby preventing degradation of beta-catenin. Stabilized beta-catenin can then accumulate and travel to the nucleus to trigger changes in transcription of target genes.
0	1	0	retina vasculature development in camera-type eye	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the vasculature of the retina over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	retina vasculature morphogenesis in camera-type eye	The process in which the vasculature of the retina is generated and organized.
0	0	1	smooth muscle cell-matrix adhesion	The binding of a smooth muscle cell to the extracellular matrix via adhesion molecules.
1	1	0	cornea development in camera-type eye	The progression of the cornea over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The cornea is the transparent structure that covers the anterior of the eye.
0	1	0	retinal blood vessel morphogenesis	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a blood vessel of the retina over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	2	cardiac neural crest cell development involved in heart development	The process aimed at the progression of a cardiac neural crest cell over time, from initial commitment of the cell to its specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell that contributes to the development of the heart.
1	0	0	cardiac neural crest cell development involved in outflow tract morphogenesis	The process aimed at the progression of a cardiac neural crest cell over time, from initial commitment of the cell to its specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell that contributes to the shaping of the outflow tract.
0	1	0	Notch signaling involved in heart development	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of an extracellular ligand to a Notch receptor on the surface of the target cell and contributing to the progression of the heart over time.
0	0	1	canonical Wnt signaling pathway involved in positive regulation of cardiac outflow tract cell proliferation	The canonical Wnt signaling pathway that contributes to the modulation of the expansion of a population of cardiac outflow tract cells.
0	0	1	renal tubule development	The progression of the renal tubule over time from its formation to the mature form. A renal tubule is a tube that filters, re-absorbs and secretes substances to rid an organism of waste and to play a role in fluid homeostasis.
0	4	0	renal tubule morphogenesis	The process in which the renal tubule is generated by specification of cell fate, through the maintenance of cell polarity, regulated cell proliferation and morphogenetic cell rearrangements, shape changes and growth. A renal tubule is a tube that filters, re-absorbs and secretes substances to rid an organism of waste and to play a role in fluid homeostasis.
2	1	2	cardiac conduction	Transfer of an organized electrical impulse across the heart to coordinate the contraction of cardiac muscles. The process begins with generation of an action potential (in the sinoatrial node (SA) in humans) and ends with a change in the rate, frequency, or extent of the contraction of the heart muscles.
0	1	0	establishment or maintenance of monopolar cell polarity	Any cellular process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of monopolar intracellular organization or cell growth patterns. Monopolar cell organization is directional organization along an axis.
2	1	1	neural precursor cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of neural precursor cells, resulting in the expansion of a cell population. A neural precursor cell is either a nervous system stem cell or a nervous system progenitor cell.
1	0	0	testosterone biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of testosterone, an androgen having 17beta-hydroxy and 3-oxo groups, together with unsaturation at C-4 C-5.
1	0	0	inferior colliculus development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the inferior colliculus over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The inferior colliculus (IC) (Latin, lower hill) is the principal midbrain nucleus of the auditory pathway and receives input from several more peripheral brainstem nuclei in the auditory pathway, as well as inputs from the auditory cortex. The inferior colliculus has three subdivisions: the central nucleus (CIC), a dorsal cortex (DCIC) by which it is surrounded, and an external cortex (ICX) which is located laterally.
2	1	0	heart trabecula morphogenesis	The process of shaping a trabecula in the heart. A trabecula is a small, often microscopic, tissue element in the form of a small beam, strut or rod, which generally has a mechanical function. Trabecula are usually but not necessarily, composed of dense collagenous tissue.
0	0	1	closure of optic fissure	The closure of the temporary ventral gap in the optic cup that contributes to its shaping.
0	0	1	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to heat stress	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a heat stimulus, a temperature stimulus above the optimal temperature for that organism.
9	10	16	regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to hypoxia	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a hypoxia stimulus.
1	1	0	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to hypoxia	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a hypoxia stimulus.
0	0	1	negative regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to hypoxia	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a hypoxia stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to caloric restriction	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a of caloric restriction, insufficient food energy intake.
4	4	4	establishment of skin barrier	Establishment of the epithelial barrier, the functional barrier in the skin that limits its permeability.
0	1	0	renal artery morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structure of a renal artery is generated and organized. Renal arteries supply the kidneys with blood.
0	1	0	trophoblast cell migration	Trophoblast cell migration that is accomplished by extension and retraction of a pseudopodium. Trophoblast cells line the outside of the blastocyst.
0	0	2	reproductive system development	The progression of the reproductive system over time from its formation to the mature structure. The reproductive system consists of the organs that function in reproduction.
0	0	1	L-arginine transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the stereospecific transfer of L-arginine, 2-amino-5-guanidinopentanoic acid, across a biological membrane.
1	2	2	protein localization to lysosome	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a lysosome.
1	0	0	O-acetyl-ADP-ribose deacetylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction O-acetyl-ADP-ribose + H2O = ADP-ribose + acetate.
0	1	0	regulation of type B pancreatic cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of type B pancreatic cell proliferation.
2	2	0	T follicular helper cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized T cell acquires specialized features of a mature T follicular helper cell.
0	1	0	phagolysosome membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a phagolysosome.
0	0	1	response to TNF agonist	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a TNF agonist stimulus.
2	3	2	hematopoietic stem cell homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of the steady-state number of hematopoietic stem cells within a population of cells.
0	1	0	memory T cell proliferation	The expansion of a memory T cell population by cell division.
0	1	0	early endosome to recycling endosome transport	The directed movement of substances, in membrane-bounded vesicles, from the early sorting endosomes to the recycling endosomes.
0	0	1	centriole elongation	The centrosome organization process by which a centriole increases in length as part of the process of replication.
4	2	0	protein localization to cilium	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a cilium.
1	1	0	myeloid cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a myeloid cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	2	microglial cell proliferation	The expansion of a microglial cell population by cell division.
0	0	1	macrophage homeostasis	The process of regulating the proliferation and elimination of macrophage cells such that the total number of myeloid cells within a whole or part of an organism is stable over time in the absence of an outside stimulus.
0	1	0	glycogen synthase activity, transferring glucose-1-phosphate	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-glucose + (1,4)-alpha-D-glucosyl(n) = UMP + (1,4)-alpha-D-glucosyl(n)-glucose-1-phosphate.
1	0	1	sympathetic ganglion development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a sympathetic ganglion over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	6	axon development	The progression of an axon over time. Covers axonogenesis (de novo generation of an axon) and axon regeneration (regrowth), as well as processes pertaining to the progression of the axon over time (fasciculation and defasciculation).
0	1	0	actin filament bundle retrograde transport	A process of actin filament bundle distribution that results in the arrangement of actin filament bundles from the periphery toward the interior of the cell.
0	1	1	ASAP complex	A protein complex involved in regulation of mRNA processing and apoptosis. It binds to RNA in a sequence-independent manner and is recruited to the EJC prior to or during the splicing process. In humans the core proteins are RNPS1, SAP18 and ACIN1.
0	2	0	cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a cyclin-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase.
1	4	1	Lys63-specific deubiquitinase activity	Hydrolysis of Lys63-Linked ubiquitin unit(s) from a ubiquitinated protein.
0	1	0	intestinal epithelial cell migration	The orderly movement of an intestinal epithelial cell from one site to another, often during the development of a multicellular organism.
0	0	1	calcium activated phospholipid scrambling	The movement of a population of phospholipid molecules from one leaflet of the plasma membrane bilayer to the opposite leaflet as a result of a calcium stimulus.
0	0	1	molybdopterin adenylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction ATP + molybdopterin = diphosphate + adenylyl-molybdopterin.
0	0	1	molybdopterin molybdotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction adenylyl-molybdopterin + molybdate = molybdenum cofactor + AMP.
0	1	0	molybdopterin-synthase sulfurtransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: [Molybdopterin-synthase sulfur-carrier protein]-Gly-Gly-AMP + [cysteine desulfurase]-S-sulfanyl-L-cysteine <=> AMP [molybdopterin-synthase sulfur-carrier protein]-Gly-NH-CH(2)-C(O)SH + cysteine desulfurase.
0	1	0	molybdopterin-synthase adenylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP [molybdopterin-synthase sulfur-carrier protein]-Gly-Gly = diphosphate [molybdopterin-synthase sulfur-carrier protein]-Gly-Gly-AMP.
2	6	0	nuclear import signal receptor activity	Combining with a nuclear import signal (NIS) on a cargo to be transported, to mediate transport of the cargo through the nuclear pore, from the cytoplasm to the nuclear lumen. The cargo can be either a RNA or a protein.
0	0	1	fructose-1-phosphate aldolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: D-fructose-1-phosphate = dihydroxyacetone phosphate + D-glyceraldehyde.
0	0	1	pri-miRNA transcription by RNA polymerase II	The cellular synthesis of primary microRNA (pri-miRNA) transcripts from a DNA template by RNA polymerase II, originating at an RNA polymerase II promoter. pri-miRNA transcripts are subsequently processed to produce the ~22nt miRNAs that function in gene regulation.
0	1	0	glycolytic process through fructose-6-phosphate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a monosaccharide into pyruvate, occurring through a fructose-6-phosphate intermediate, with the concomitant production of ATP and NADH.
0	0	2	MICOS complex	Mitochondrial inner membrane complex involved in maintenance of crista junctions, inner membrane architecture, and formation of contact sites to the outer membrane. In Saccharomyces cerevisiae the complex has six subunits: MIC10, MIC12, MIC19, MIC26, MIC27, and MIC60.
1	3	15	canonical glycolysis	The glycolytic process that begins with the conversion of glucose to glucose-6-phosphate by glucokinase activity. Glycolytic processes are the  chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a carbohydrate into pyruvate, with the concomitant production of a small amount of ATP.
0	0	3	fructose catabolic process to hydroxyacetone phosphate and glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of fructose that results in the formation of dihydroxyacetone phosphate and glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate.
1	1	0	pharyngeal arch artery morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a pharyngeal arch artery is generated and organized. The pharyngeal arch arteries are a series of six paired embryological vascular structures, the development of which give rise to several major arteries, such as the stapedial artery, the middle meningeal artery, the internal carotid artery and the pulmonary artery.
0	0	2	RNA polymerase II-specific DNA-binding transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a sequence-specific DNA binding RNA polymerase II transcription factor, any of the factors that interact selectively and non-covalently with a specific DNA sequence in order to modulate transcription.
30	31	16	ubiquitin protein ligase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of ubiquitin to a substrate protein via the reaction X-ubiquitin + S -> X + S-ubiquitin, where X is either an E2 or E3 enzyme, the X-ubiquitin linkage is a thioester bond, and the S-ubiquitin linkage is an amide bond: an isopeptide bond between the C-terminal glycine of ubiquitin and the epsilon-amino group of lysine residues in the substrate or, in the linear extension of ubiquitin chains, a peptide bond the between the C-terminal glycine and N-terminal methionine of ubiquitin residues.
4	3	3	ubiquitin conjugating enzyme activity	Isoenergetic transfer of ubiquitin from one protein to another via the reaction X-ubiquitin + Y -> Y-ubiquitin + X, where both the X-ubiquitin and Y-ubiquitin linkages are thioester bonds between the C-terminal glycine of ubiquitin and a sulfhydryl side group of a cysteine residue.
1	1	2	regulation of protein complex stability	Any process that affects the structure and integrity of a protein complex by altering the likelihood of its assembly or disassembly.
1	4	5	cytoskeleton-dependent cytokinesis	A cytokinesis that involves the function of a set of proteins that are part of the microfilament or microtubule cytoskeleton.
1	0	0	chemoattraction of axon	The process in which a neuron growth cone is directed to a specific target site in response to an attractive chemical signal.
0	0	1	positive regulation of glutamate neurotransmitter secretion in response to membrane depolarization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glutamate secretion in response to membrane depolarization, where glutamate acts as a neurotransmitter.
0	1	2	ubiquitin modification-dependent histone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone protein in which a residue has been modified by ubiquitination. Histones are any of a group of water-soluble proteins found in association with the DNA of eukaroytic chromosomes.
0	1	0	NEDD8 ligase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of NEDD8 to a substrate protein via the reaction X-NEDD8 + S --> X + S-NEDD8, where X is either an E2 or E3 enzyme, the X-NEDD8 linkage is a thioester bond, and the S-NEDD8 linkage is an isopeptide bond between the C-terminal amino acid of NEDD8 and the epsilon-amino group of lysine residues in the substrate.
1	2	0	SUMO ligase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of SUMO to a substrate protein via the reaction X-SUMO + S --> X + S-SUMO, where X is either an E2 or E3 enzyme, the X-SUMO linkage is a thioester bond, and the S-SUMO linkage is an isopeptide bond between the C-terminal amino acid of SUMO and the epsilon-amino group of lysine residues in the substrate.
0	1	0	UFM1 ligase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of UFM1 to a substrate protein via the reaction X-UFM1 + S --> X + S-UFM1, where X is either an E2 or E3 enzyme, the X-UFM1 linkage is a thioester bond, and the S-UFM1 linkage is an isopeptide bond between the C-terminal amino acid of UFM1 and the epsilon-amino group of lysine residues in the substrate.
0	0	3	spontaneous neurotransmitter secretion	Neurotransmitter secretion that occurs in the absence of the action of a secretagogue or a presynaptic action potential.
0	0	1	evoked neurotransmitter secretion	Neurotransmitter secretion that occurs in the presence of the action of a secretagogue or a presynaptic action potential.
1	2	1	mitotic spindle astral microtubule	Any of the mitotic spindle microtubules that radiate in all directions from the spindle poles and are thought to contribute to the forces that separate the poles and position them in relation to the rest of the cell.
1	2	2	importin-alpha family protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any member of the importin-alpha family.
0	0	5	chaperone-mediated autophagy	The autophagy process which begins when chaperones and co-chaperones recognize a target motif and unfold the substrate protein. The proteins are then transported to the lysosome where they are degraded.
0	1	0	diphthine methylesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: diphthine methyl ester + H2O <=> diphthine + H+ + methanol.
1	1	1	tricellular tight junction	An specialized occluding junction where three epithelial cells meet. It is composed of a branching network of sealing strands that run perpendicularly to the bicellular tight junction at the point of contact between three epithelial cells in an epithelial sheet.
0	3	0	GATOR2 complex	A multiprotein subcomplex of GATOR that regulates mTOR signaling by interacting with the Rag GTPases. In humans this complex consists of Mios, WDR24, WDR59, Seh1L, Sec13.
4	2	2	reticulophagy	The selective autohagy process in which parts of the endoplasmic reticulum are loaded into autophagosomes, delivered to the vacuole, and degraded in response to changing cellular conditions.
2	0	0	anterior neural tube closure	The step in the formation of the neural tube, where the paired anterior neural folds are brought together and fuse at the dorsal midline.
0	0	2	glycophagy	The selective autophagy process in which cellular glycogen is delivered to the vacuole and degraded in response to changing cellular conditions.
0	0	1	lipophagy	The selective autophagy process in which lipid droplets are delivered to the vacuole and degraded in response to changing cellular conditions.
0	1	0	methylglyoxal catabolic process to lactate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of methylglyoxal, CH3-CO-CHO, into lactate.
0	0	1	mitochondrial acetyl-CoA biosynthetic process from pyruvate	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of acetyl-CoA from pyruvate in the mitochondrion. The process begins with the transport of pyruvate from the cytosol to the mitochondrion where it is subsequently decarboxylated to form acetyl-CoA.
2	0	1	peptide-lysine-N-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + lysine in peptide = CoA + N-acetyl-lysine-peptide.
0	1	1	parkin-mediated stimulation of mitophagy in response to mitochondrial depolarization	A positive regulation of the macromitophagy pathway that is triggered by mitochondrial depolarization and requires the function of a parkin-family molecule.
0	1	2	late endosomal microautophagy	The autophagy process by which cytosolic proteins targeted for degradation are tagged with a chaperone and are directly transferred into and degraded in a late endosomal compartment.
0	1	0	protein lipidation involved in autophagosome assembly	The protein lipidation process by which phosphatidylethanolamine is conjugated to a protein of the ATG8 family, leading to membrane insertion of the protein as a step in autophagosome assembly.
0	0	2	protein targeting to lysosome involved in chaperone-mediated autophagy	The targeting of a protein to the lysosome process in which an input protein binds to a chaperone and subsequently to a lysosomal receptor.
0	0	2	chaperone-mediated protein transport involved in chaperone-mediated autophagy	The chaperone-mediated protein transport process in which a protein that is bound to a chaperone and a lysosomal receptor is unfolded and transported into the lysosome as part of chaperone-mediated autophagy.
0	0	2	motor learning	Any process in which an organism acquires a novel neuromuscular action or movement as the result of experience.
2	1	1	motor behavior	The specific neuromuscular movement of a single organism in response to external or internal stimuli.
0	1	0	forked DNA-dependent helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, to drive the unwinding of a DNA helix containing forked DNA.
0	0	1	neutral sphingomyelin phosphodiesterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H(2)O + sphingomyelin = ceramide + choline phosphate + H(+) in a neutral environment.
0	0	2	telomeric repeat-containing RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with long non-coding RNA molecules transcribed from subtelomeric regions in most eukaryotes. Telomeric repeat-containing RNA (TERRA) molecules consist of subtelomeric-derived sequences and G-rich telomeric repeats.
0	2	0	CAMKK-AMPK signaling cascade	A series of molecular signals in which calmodulin-dependent protein kinase activity enabled by a CAMKK directly activates an AMPK. The cascade begins with calmodulin binding calcium which in turn binds CAMKK enabling its calmodulin-dependent protein kinase activity. The cascade ends with AMP-activated protein kinase activity.
0	0	1	multivesicular body-lysosome fusion	The organelle membrane fusion process in which the membrane of a multivesicular body fuses with a lysosome to create a hybrid organelle.
0	0	1	translation elongation factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a translation elongation factor, any polypeptide factor involved in the peptide elongation in ribosome-mediated translation.
2	0	0	response to caloric restriction	A change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a caloric restriction, insufficient food energy intake.
2	0	1	dense core granule priming	A process that converts unprimed dense core granules (DCVs) to a pool of primed vesicles that are capable of fusing with the plasma membrane (fusion-competent) and thereby releasing their contents. Priming typically occurs after docking.
0	1	0	NAD+ nucleotidase, cyclic ADP-ribose generating	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD+ + H2O = nicotinamide + ADP-ribose that proceeds in a stepwise fashion by ADP-ribosyl cyclase activity followed by cyclic ADP-ribose hydrolase activity.
0	1	2	endoplasmic reticulum-plasma membrane tethering	The attachment of an endoplasmic reticulum membrane to the plasma membrane via molecular tethers.
0	0	1	telomeric DNA-containing double minutes formation	A telomere maintenance process that results in the formation of small fragments of circular extrachromosomal DNA elements which contain telomeric DNA. It is speculated that telomeric DNA-containing double minutes are formed through a recombination event between the telomere and chromosome-internal TTAGGG-like sequences. Telomeric DNA-containing double minutes appear as two closely positioned dots in metaphase.
0	3	1	telomeric D-loop disassembly	A telomere loop disassembly process that results in the disassembly of telomeric D-loops. A telomeric D-loop is a three-stranded DNA displacement loop that forms at the site where the telomeric 3' single-stranded DNA overhang (formed of the repeat sequence TTAGGG in mammals) is tucked back inside the double-stranded component of telomeric DNA molecule, thus forming a t-loop or telomeric-loop and protecting the chromosome terminus.
0	2	0	telomeric D-loop binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a telomeric D-loop. A telomeric D-loop is a three-stranded DNA displacement loop that forms at the site where the telomeric 3' single-stranded DNA overhang (formed of the repeat sequence TTAGGG in mammals) is tucked back inside the double-stranded component of telomeric DNA molecule, thus forming a t-loop or telomeric-loop and protecting the chromosome terminus.
0	1	0	podosome core	The F-actin-rich core of an adhesion structure characterized by formation upon cell substrate contact and localization at the substrate-attached part of the cell.
0	0	1	sperm head	The part of the late spermatid or spermatozoon that contains the nucleus and acrosome.
0	0	1	apical tubulobulbar complex	Actin-based structures involved in establishing close contact between mature spermatids and Sertoli cells at the luminal end of the Sertoli cell.
0	0	1	basal tubulobulbar complex	Actin-based structures involved in establishing the blood-testis barrier of the Sertoli cell.
0	0	1	apical ectoplasmic specialization	Testis-specific junction between mature spermatids and Sertoli cells at the luminal end of the Sertoli cell.
1	0	1	protein localization to tricellular tight junction	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a tricellular tight junction.
0	1	0	neuropeptide processing	Any protein maturation process achieved by the cleavage of a peptide bond or bonds within a neuropeptide precursor. Processing leads to the attainment of the full functional capacity of the neuropeptide.
0	1	0	microtubule organizing center localization	Any process in which the microtubule organizing center is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location within the cell.
10	9	9	antimicrobial humoral immune response mediated by antimicrobial peptide	An immune response against microbes mediated by anti-microbial peptides in body fluid.
0	0	1	response to cholecystokinin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cholecystokinin stimulus.
0	1	0	telomeric G-quadruplex DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with telomeric G-quadruplex DNA structures, in which groups of four guanines adopt a flat, cyclic Hoogsteen hydrogen-bonding arrangement known as a guanine tetrad. The stacking of guanine tetrads results in G-quadruplex DNA structures in telomeres.
1	0	0	leading edge of lamellipodium	That part of the lamellipodium which represents the distal part of the structure.
0	0	2	endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced pre-emptive quality control	The response to endoplasimic reticulum stress in which nascent proteins are degraded by attenuation of their translocation into the ER followed by rerouting to the cytosol without cleavage of the signal peptide, and subsequent degradation by the proteasome.
0	1	1	DNA clamp unloader activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, to drive the opening of the ring structure of the PCNA complex, or any of the related sliding clamp complexes, and their removal from the DNA duplex.
0	1	0	microtubule plus end polymerase	Catalysis of the transfer of tubulin dimers to the plus end of a microtubule. The reaction is reversable depending on the availability of dimers.
0	0	1	positive regulation of hepatic stellate cell migration	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of hepatic stellate cell migration.
0	1	0	regulation of astrocyte activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of astrocyte activation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of astrocyte activation	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of astrocyte activation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of 1-phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase activity	Any process that starts or increases the frequency or rate of 1-phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase activity.
2	0	0	autophagosome-lysosome fusion	The process in which autophagosomes, double-membraned vesicles containing cytoplasmic material, fuse with a vacuole (yeast) or lysosome (e.g. mammals and insects). In the case of yeast, inner membrane-bounded structures (autophagic bodies) appear in the vacuole. Fusion provides an acidic environment and digestive function to the interior of the autophagosome.
0	0	1	selective autophagy	The macroautophagy process in which specific structures are targeted by the autophagy process.
0	0	1	protein propionyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: propionyl-CoA + lysine in peptide = CoA + N-propionyl-lysine-peptide.
0	0	1	peptidyl-lysine propionylation	The propionylation of peptidyl-lysine.
0	0	1	negative regulation of protein K48-linked ubiquitination	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of K48-linked ubiquitination, a protein ubiquitination process in which a polymer of ubiquitin, formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 48 of the ubiquitin monomers, is added to a protein. K48-linked ubiquitination targets the substrate protein for degradation.
1	0	2	establishment of protein localization to plasma membrane	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in a plasma membrane.
4	5	2	midbody abscission	The process by which the midbody, the cytoplasmic bridge that connects the two prospective daughter cells, is severed at the end of mitotic cytokinesis, resulting in two separate daughter cells.
1	0	0	establishment of left/right asymmetry	The initial formation of the type asymmetry in an organism's body plan or part of an organism with respect to the left and right halves.
0	1	0	3-hydroxykynureninase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-3-hydroxykynurenine + H2O = 3-hydroxyanthranilate + L-alanine.
2	1	0	secondary palate development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of the secondary palate from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of the structure and ends with the mature structure. The secondary palate is the part of the palate formed from the fusion of the two palatine shelves, extensions of the maxillary prominences.
58	59	38	collagen-containing extracellular matrix	An extracellular matrix consisting mainly of proteins (especially collagen) and glycosaminoglycans (mostly as proteoglycans) that provides not only essential physical scaffolding for the cellular constituents but can also initiate crucial biochemical and biomechanical cues required for tissue morphogenesis, differentiation and homeostasis. The components are secreted by cells in the vicinity and form a sheet underlying or overlying cells such as endothelial and epithelial cells.
1	0	0	negative regulation of SCF-dependent proteasomal ubiquitin-dependent catabolic process	Any process that stops or decreases the rate, frequency or extent of SCF-dependent proteasomal ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process, the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide by hydrolysis of its peptide bonds, initiated by the covalent attachment of ubiquitin, with ubiquitin-protein ligation catalyzed by an SCF (Skp1/Cul1/F-box protein) complex, and mediated by the proteasome.
1	1	0	regulation of stress granule assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of stress granule assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and RNA molecules to form a stress granule.
0	0	2	positive regulation of stress granule assembly	Any process that starts or increases the rate, frequency or extent of stress-granule assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and RNA molecules to form a stress granule.
0	1	0	D-loop DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DNA D-loop. A D-loop is a three-stranded DNA structure formed by the invasion of a single DNA strand that base pairs with one strand of duplex DNA, while the rest of the double-stranded DNA does not unwind.
0	0	1	TAP complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a TAP complex.
0	0	1	box C/D snoRNP complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a box C/D snoRNP complex.
0	0	1	box H/ACA snoRNP complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a box H/ACA snoRNP complex.
0	0	1	GARP complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a GARP complex.
0	0	1	H3K9me3 modified histone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone H3 in which the lysine residue at position 9 has been modified by trimethylation.
0	2	0	negative regulation of programmed necrotic cell death	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of programmed necrotic cell death.
0	1	0	positive regulation of programmed necrotic cell death	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of programmed necrotic cell death.
0	0	1	peptidyl-aspartic acid 3-dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein L-aspartate + 2-oxoglutarate + O2 = protein 3-hydroxy-L-aspartate + succinate + CO2.
0	1	0	RNA 2'-O-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + RNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + RNA containing 2'-O-methylribonucleotide.
0	0	1	mRNA (cytidine-5-)-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a cytidine in mRNA + S-adenosyl-L-methionine = a 5-methylcytidine in mRNA + H(+) + S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine.
0	2	1	C5-methylcytidine-containing RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA molecule modified by C5-methylcytidine.
0	0	1	brexanolone metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways by which living organisms transform brexanolone.
0	2	1	R-loop disassembly	A DNA metabolic process that results in the disassembly of R-loops. R-loops are three-stranded nucleic acid structures consisitng of an RNA:DNA heteroduplex and a looped-out non-template strand. Aberrant formation and persistence of R-loops block transcription elongation and cause DNA damage. Mechanisms that resolve R-loops are essential for genome stability.
0	1	0	testosterone 16-beta-hydroxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: O2 + reduced [NADPH--hemoprotein reductase] + testosterone = 16beta,17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one + H(+) + H2O + oxidized [NADPH--hemoprotein reductase].
0	1	0	anandamide 8,9 epoxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-(5Z,8Z,11Z,14Z-eicosatetraenoyl)-ethanolamine + O2 + reduced [NADPH--hemoprotein reductase] = H(+) + H2O + N-(8,9-epoxy-5Z,11Z,14Z-eicosatrienoyl)-ethanolamine + oxidized [NADPH--hemoprotein reductase].
0	1	0	anandamide 11,12 epoxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-(5Z,8Z,11Z,14Z-eicosatetraenoyl)-ethanolamine + O2 + reduced [NADPH--hemoprotein reductase] = H(+) + H2O + N-(11,12-epoxy-5Z,8Z,14Z-eicosatrienoyl)-ethanolamine + oxidized [NADPH--hemoprotein reductase].
0	1	0	anandamide 14,15 epoxidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: N-(5Z,8Z,11Z,14Z-eicosatetraenoyl)-ethanolamine + O2 + reduced [NADPH--hemoprotein reductase] = H(+) + H2O + N-(14,15-epoxy-5Z,8Z,11Z-eicosatrienoyl)-ethanolamine + oxidized [NADPH--hemoprotein reductase].
0	0	1	positive regulation of pattern recognition receptor signaling pathway	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of a pattern recognition receptor signaling pathway.
0	1	0	specification of axis polarity	The pattern specification process in which the polarity of a body or organ axis is established and maintained.
0	2	0	intracellular protein transmembrane transport	The directed movement of proteins in a cell, from one side of a membrane to another by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
15	28	22	protein-containing complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of macromolecules to form a protein-containing complex.
1	1	0	protein-DNA complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and DNA molecules to form a protein-DNA complex.
1	0	0	extracellular membrane-bounded organelle	Organized structure of distinctive morphology and function, bounded by a lipid bilayer membrane and occurring outside the cell.
0	0	1	aspartic-type peptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which a water molecule bound by the side chains of aspartic residues at the active center acts as a nucleophile.
0	2	0	cysteine-type exopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of C- or N-terminal peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile.
9	3	0	metalloaminopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of N-terminal amino acid residues from a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which water acts as a nucleophile, one or two metal ions hold the water molecule in place, and charged amino acid side chains are ligands for the metal ions.
0	1	0	oligopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of a peptide bond in an oligopeptide, i.e. a molecule containing a small number (2 to 20) of amino acid residues connected by peptide bonds.
3	1	2	armadillo repeat domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the armadillo repeat domain of a protein, an approximately 40 amino acid long tandemly repeated sequence motif first identified in the Drosophila segment polarity protein armadillo. Arm-repeat proteins are involved in various processes, including intracellular signalling and cytoskeletal regulation.
1	0	0	carbon monoxide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with carbon monoxide (CO).
1	1	0	nitric oxide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with nitric oxide (NO).
0	0	2	synaptobrevin 2-SNAP-25-syntaxin-1a-complexin I complex	A SNARE complex that contains synaptobrevin 2 (VAMP2), SNAP-25, syntaxin 1a, and complexin I (or orthologs thereof).
1	0	2	synaptobrevin 2-SNAP-25-syntaxin-1a-complexin II complex	A SNARE complex that contains synaptobrevin 2 (VAMP2), SNAP-25, syntaxin 1a, and complexin II (or orthologs thereof).
0	3	5	telomerase RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the telomerase RNA template.
1	0	2	synaptobrevin 2-SNAP-25-syntaxin-1a complex	A SNARE complex that contains synaptobrevin 2 (VAMP2), SNAP-25, and syntaxin 1a (or orthologs thereof).
0	3	5	neuron cellular homeostasis	The cellular homeostatic process that preserves a neuron in a stable, differentiated functional and structural state.
1	2	0	fibrinogen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with fibrinogen, a highly soluble hexameric glycoprotein complex that is found in blood plasma and is converted to fibrin by thrombin in the coagulation cascade.
0	2	0	collagen V binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type V collagen trimer.
0	1	0	thrombospondin receptor activity	Combining with thrombospondin and transmitting the signal to initiate a change in cell activity.
8	3	4	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to endoplasmic reticulum stress	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway is induced in response to a stimulus indicating endoplasmic reticulum (ER) stress, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered. ER stress usually results from the accumulation of unfolded or misfolded proteins in the ER lumen.
0	1	0	'de novo' actin filament nucleation	The actin nucleation process in which actin monomers combine in the absence of any existing actin filaments; elongation of the actin oligomer formed by nucleation leads to the formation of an unbranched filament.
1	1	2	fructose binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the D- or L-enantiomer of fructose, the ketohexose arabino-hex-2-ulose.
327	375	453	extracellular exosome	A vesicle that is released into the extracellular region by fusion of the limiting endosomal membrane of a multivesicular body with the plasma membrane. Extracellular exosomes, also simply called exosomes, have a diameter of about 40-100 nm.
3	7	5	RNA polymerase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA polymerase molecule or complex.
3	2	8	proline-rich region binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a proline-rich region, i.e. a region that contains a high proportion of proline residues, in a protein.
1	0	0	proton-transporting V-type ATPase complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a proton-transporting V-type ATPase complex, proton-transporting two-sector ATPase complex that couples ATP hydrolysis to the transport of protons across a concentration gradient.
1	0	1	vacuolar proton-transporting V-type ATPase complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a vacuolar proton-transporting V-type ATPase complex, proton-transporting two-sector ATPase complex that couples ATP hydrolysis to the transport of protons across the vacuolar membrane.
0	0	1	titin Z domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the titin Z domain, which recognizes and binds to the C-terminal calmodulin-like domain of alpha-actinin-2 (Act-EF34), adopts a helical structure, and binds in a groove formed by the two planes between the helix pairs of Act-EF34.
0	0	2	clathrin-sculpted monoamine transport vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a clathrin-sculpted monoamine transport vesicle.
1	0	0	protein initiator methionine removal	The protein modification process in which the translation-initiating methionine or formylmethionine residue is removed from a protein.
0	1	1	glycosylation	The covalent attachment and further modification of carbohydrate residues to a substrate molecule.
0	1	5	chromo shadow domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a chromo shadow domain, a protein domain that is distantly related, and found in association with, the chromo domain.
0	1	0	glucagon secretion	The regulated release of glucagon from secretory granules in the A (alpha) cells of the pancreas (islets of Langerhans).
0	1	1	regulation of glucagon secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of glucagon.
0	0	1	negative regulation of glucagon secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of glucagon.
1	0	1	positive regulation of glucagon secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of glucagon.
1	1	1	fructose-6-phosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with fructose 6-phosphate.
2	0	1	delta-catenin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the delta subunit of the catenin complex.
2	4	0	chemokine-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a chemokine to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	2	0	negative regulation of chemokine-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of a chemokine binding to a cell surface receptor.
4	5	3	interleukin-6-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-6 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	2	0	negative regulation of interleukin-6-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of interleukin-6 binding to a cell surface receptor.
0	1	0	positive regulation of interleukin-6-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the series of molecular events generated as a consequence of interleukin-6 binding to a cell surface receptor.
3	2	2	interleukin-27-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-27 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	1	0	ciliary neurotrophic factor receptor complex	A protein complex that acts as a receptor for the cytokine ciliary neurotrophic factor (CNTF). In humans the receptor complex is a hexamer composed of two molecules each of CNTF and CNTFR and one molecule each of gp130 and LIFR.
0	1	0	ciliary neurotrophic factor-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of a ciliary neurotrophic factor (CNTF) to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
5	1	0	isopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of an isopeptide bond. An isopeptide bond is an amide linkage between a carboxyl group of one amino acid and an amino group of another amino acid in which at least one of these groups is not on the a-carbon of one of the amino acids (for example, the link between an epsilon-amino group of a lysine molecule to a carboxyl group on a second amino acid is an isopeptide bond).
1	0	0	transforming growth factor beta receptor activity, type III	Combining with transforming growth factor beta to initiate a change in cell activity; facilitates ligand binding to type I and type II TGF-beta receptors.
5	2	2	mitochondrial translational elongation	The successive addition of amino acid residues to a nascent polypeptide chain during protein biosynthesis in a mitochondrion.
5	2	1	mitochondrial translational termination	The process resulting in the release of a polypeptide chain from the ribosome in a mitochondrion, usually in response to a termination codon (note that mitochondria use variants of the universal genetic code that differ between different taxa).
0	1	1	regulation of mitochondrial translation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of proteins by the translation of mRNA in a mitochondrion.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mitochondrial translation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of proteins by the translation of mRNA in a mitochondrion.
1	2	0	SUMO-specific endopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of peptide bonds between an alpha-carboxyl group and an alpha-amino group within the small conjugating protein SUMO.
0	2	0	SUMO-specific isopeptidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of an isopeptide bond between the small conjugating protein SUMO and a protein to which SUMO has been conjugated.
0	0	2	response to UV-A	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a UV-A radiation stimulus. UV-A radiation (UV-A light) spans the wavelengths 315 to 400 nm.
0	1	0	synaptic vesicle budding	Evagination of a membrane to form a synaptic vesicle.
1	0	0	mitochondrial asparaginyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling asparagine to asparaginyl-tRNA in a mitochondrion, catalyzed by asparaginyl-tRNA synthetase. In tRNA aminoacylation, the amino acid is first activated by linkage to AMP and then transferred to either the 2'- or the 3'-hydroxyl group of the 3'-adenosine residue of the tRNA.
0	1	0	mitochondrial glycyl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling glycine to glycyl-tRNA in a mitochondrion, catalyzed by glycyl-tRNA synthetase. In tRNA aminoacylation, the amino acid is first activated by linkage to AMP and then transferred to either the 2'- or the 3'-hydroxyl group of the 3'-adenosine residue of the tRNA.
1	0	0	mitochondrial seryl-tRNA aminoacylation	The process of coupling serine to seryl-tRNA in a mitochondrion, catalyzed by seryl-tRNA synthetase. In tRNA aminoacylation, the amino acid is first activated by linkage to AMP and then transferred to either the 2'- or the 3'-hydroxyl group of the 3'-adenosine residue of the tRNA.
1	3	5	tight junction	A cell-cell junction that seals cells together in an epithelium in a way that prevents even small molecules from leaking from one side of the sheet to the other.
1	0	2	negative regulation of adiponectin secretion	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of adiponectin from a cell.
2	0	2	enamel mineralization	The process in which calcium salts, mainly carbonated hydroxyapatite, are deposited in tooth enamel.
1	1	1	negative regulation of biomineral tissue development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of biomineral tissue development, the formation of hard tissues that consist mainly of inorganic compounds.
0	2	0	negative regulation of tooth mineralization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of tooth mineralization, the deposition of calcium salts in tooth structures.
1	0	0	positive regulation of tooth mineralization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of tooth mineralization, the deposition of calcium salts in tooth structures.
1	0	0	regulation of enamel mineralization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of enamel mineralization, the deposition of calcium salts in tooth enamel.
1	0	0	positive regulation of enamel mineralization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of enamel mineralization, the deposition of calcium salts in tooth enamel.
0	1	0	DRM complex	A transcriptional repressor complex that contains the lin-9, lin-35, lin-37, lin-52, lin-53, lin-5is involved in 4-, dpl-1 and efl-1 proteins, and is involved in cell fate specification.
1	0	3	large ribosomal subunit rRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the large ribosomal subunit RNA (LSU rRNA), a constituent of the large ribosomal subunit. In S. cerevisiae, this is the 25S rRNA.
1	2	2	small ribosomal subunit rRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the small ribosomal subunit RNA (SSU rRNA), a constituent of the small ribosomal subunit. In S. cerevisiae, this is the 18S rRNA.
2	4	6	DNA polymerase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DNA polymerase.
0	1	2	shelterin complex	A nuclear telomere cap complex that is formed by the association of telomeric ssDNA- and dsDNA-binding proteins with telomeric DNA, and is involved in telomere protection and recruitment of telomerase. The complex is known to contain TERF1, TERF2, POT1, RAP1, TINF2 and ACD in mammalian cells, and Pot1, Tpz1, Rap1, Rif1, Rif2 and Taz1 in Saccharomyces. Taz1 and Rap1 (or their mammalian equivalents) form a dsDNA-binding subcomplex, Pot1 and Tpz1 form an ssDNA-binding subcomplex, and the two subcomplexes are bridged by Poz1, which acts as an effector molecule along with Ccq1.
1	0	0	kynurenine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving kynurenine, the amino acid 3-(2-aminobenzoyl)-alanine.
1	0	1	chromosome organization involved in meiotic cell cycle	A process of chromosome organization that is involved in a meiotic cell cycle.
1	0	1	synaptonemal complex disassembly	The controlled breakdown of a synaptonemal complex.
3	1	3	protein localization to chromosome, telomeric region	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, the telomeric region of a chromosome.
1	1	0	establishment of protein localization to telomere	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in the telomeric region of a chromosome.
1	2	1	regulation of establishment of protein localization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of a protein to a specific location.
2	0	1	protein homotrimerization	The formation of a protein homotrimer, a macromolecular structure consisting of three noncovalently associated identical subunits.
0	0	1	protein heterotrimerization	The formation of a protein heterotrimer, a macromolecular structure consisting of three noncovalently associated subunits, of which not all are identical.
1	0	0	ASTRA complex	A protein complex that is part of the chromatin remodeling machinery; the acronym stands for ASsembly of Tel, Rvb and Atm-like kinase. In Saccharomyces cerevisiae this complex includes Rvb1p, Rvb2p, Tra1p, Tel2p, Asa1p, Ttilp and Tti2p.
4	1	0	protein poly-ADP-ribosylation	The transfer of multiple ADP-ribose residues from NAD to a protein amino acid, forming a poly(ADP-ribose) chain.
3	1	0	protein auto-ADP-ribosylation	The ADP-ribosylation by a protein of one or more of its own amino acid residues, or residues on an identical protein.
2	0	0	sulfide oxidation, using sulfide:quinone oxidoreductase	A sulfide oxidation process that proceeds via the reaction catalyzed by sulfide:quinone oxidoreductase.
1	0	0	sulfide:quinone oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: hydrogen sulfide + a quinone = S0 + a hydroquinone.
0	2	0	T cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a T cell, a type of lymphocyte whose defining characteristic is the expression of a T cell receptor complex.
1	1	0	regulation of T cell apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the occurrence or rate of T cell death by apoptotic process.
1	2	1	negative regulation of T cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T cell death by apoptotic process.
0	1	0	regulation of activation-induced cell death of T cells	Any process that modulates the occurrence or rate of activation-induced cell death of T cells.
1	1	0	negative regulation of activation-induced cell death of T cells	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of activation-induced cell death of T cells.
2	1	0	thymocyte apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a thymocyte, an immature T cell located in the thymus.
1	0	0	negative regulation of thymocyte apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of thymocyte death by apoptotic process.
3	1	0	positive regulation of thymocyte apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of thymocyte death by apoptotic process.
0	1	0	actin-mediated cell contraction	The actin filament-based process in which cytoplasmic actin filaments slide past one another resulting in contraction of all or part of the cell body.
0	0	1	somatostatin secretion	The regulated release of somatostatin from secretory granules in the D cells of the pancreas.
1	1	0	mucus secretion	The regulated release of mucus by the mucosa. Mucus is a viscous slimy secretion consisting of mucins and various inorganic salts dissolved in water, with suspended epithelial cells and leukocytes. The mucosa, or mucous membrane, is the membrane covered with epithelium that lines the tubular organs of the body. Mucins are carbohydrate-rich glycoproteins that have a lubricating and protective function.
0	0	2	positive regulation of mucus secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the regulated release of mucus from a cell or a tissue.
2	0	2	peptidyl-serine dephosphorylation	The removal of phosphoric residues from peptidyl-O-phospho-L-serine to form peptidyl-serine.
4	4	2	necroptotic process	A programmed necrotic cell death process which begins when a cell receives a signal (e.g. a ligand binding to a death receptor or to a Toll-like receptor), and proceeds through a series of biochemical events (signaling pathways), characterized by activation of receptor-interacting serine/threonine-protein kinase 1 and/or 3 (RIPK1/3, also called RIP1/3) and by critical dependence on mixed lineage kinase domain-like (MLKL), and which typically lead to common morphological features of necrotic cell death. The process ends when the cell has died. The process is divided into a signaling phase, and an execution phase, which is triggered by the former.
21	14	20	cornification	A type of programmed cell death that occurs in the epidermis, morphologically and biochemically distinct from apoptosis. It leads to the formation of corneocytes, i.e. dead keratinocytes containing an amalgam of specific proteins (e.g., keratin, loricrin, SPR and involucrin) and lipids (e.g., fatty acids and ceramides), which are necessary for the function of the cornified skin layer (mechanical resistance, elasticity, water repellence and structural stability).
2	2	2	pyroptosis	A caspase-1-dependent cell death subroutine that is associated with the generation of pyrogenic mediators such as IL-1beta and IL-18.
4	2	10	phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol-4-phosphate, a derivative of phosphatidylinositol in which the inositol ring is phosphorylated at the 4' position.
0	0	1	RES complex	A protein complex that is required for efficient splicing, and prevents leakage of unspliced pre-mRNAs from the nucleus (named for pre-mRNA REtention and Splicing). In Saccharomyces, the complex consists of Ist3p, Bud13p, and Pml1p.
1	0	0	extracellular matrix constituent secretion	The controlled release of molecules that form the extracellular matrix, including carbohydrates and glycoproteins by a cell.
3	0	0	axonemal dynein complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an axonemal dynein complex, a dynein complex found in eukaryotic cilia and flagella, in which the motor domain heads interact with adjacent microtubules to generate a sliding force which is converted to a bending motion.
1	0	0	ferritin receptor activity	Combining with ferritin, and delivering ferritin into the cell via endocytosis.
1	0	1	N-acylphosphatidylethanolamine-specific phospholipase D activity	Catalysis of the release of N-acylethanolamine from N-acyl-phosphatidylethanolamine (NAPE) to generate N-acylethanolamine (NAE).
2	1	2	renal absorption	A renal system process in which water, ions, glucose and proteins are taken up from the collecting ducts, glomerulus and proximal and distal loops of the nephron. In non-mammalian species, absorption may occur in related structures (e.g. protein absorption is observed in nephrocytes in Drosophila, see PMID:23264686).
1	1	1	renal sodium ion absorption	A renal system process in which sodium ions are taken up from the collecting ducts and proximal and distal loops of the nephron. In non-mammalian species, absorption may occur in related structures.
0	0	3	sarcoplasmic reticulum calcium ion transport	The directed movement of calcium ions (Ca2+) into, out of or within the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
1	4	6	phosphatidic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidic acid, any of a class of glycerol phosphate in which both the remaining hydroxyl groups of the glycerol moiety are esterified with fatty acids.
11	20	10	cellular response to hydrogen peroxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydrogen peroxide (H2O2) stimulus.
0	0	1	positive regulation of stress-activated protein kinase signaling cascade	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signaling via the stress-activated protein kinase signaling cascade.
4	1	0	lens fiber cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a lens fiber cell, any of the elongated, tightly packed cells that make up the bulk of the mature lens in the camera-type eye. The cytoplasm of a lens fiber cell is devoid of most intracellular organelles including the cell nucleus, and contains primarily crystallins, a group of water-soluble proteins expressed in vary large quantities.
0	0	1	lens fiber cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a lens fiber cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Cell development does not include the steps involved in committing a cell to a lens fiber cell fate. A lens fiber cell is any of the elongated, tightly packed cells that make up the bulk of the mature lens in a camera-type eye.
0	2	1	lens fiber cell morphogenesis	The process in which the structures of a lens fiber cell are generated and organized. This process occurs while the initially relatively unspecialized cell is acquiring the specialized features of a lens fiber cell. A lens fiber cell is any of the elongated, tightly packed cells that make up the bulk of the mature lens in a camera-type eye.
0	0	3	G1 to G0 transition	A cell cycle arrest process that results in arrest during G1 phase, whereupon the cell enters a specialized resting state known as G0 or quiescence.
7	12	3	negative regulation of G0 to G1 transition	A cell cycle process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate or extent of the transition from the G0 quiescent state to the G1 phase.
0	0	1	positive regulation of G0 to G1 transition	A cell cycle process that activates or increases the rate or extent of the transition from the G0 quiescent state to the G1 phase.
0	1	0	Golgi to plasma membrane transport vesicle	A transport vesicle that mediates transport from the Golgi to the plasma membrane, and fuses with the plasma membrane to release various cargo molecules, such as proteins or hormones, by exocytosis.
0	0	1	inward rectifier potassium channel inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents, or reduces the activity of an inwardly rectifying potassium channel.
1	1	1	thyroid hormone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with thyroxine (T4) or triiodothyronine (T3), tyrosine-based hormones produced by the thyroid gland.
1	0	0	lipoprotein particle receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a lipoprotein particle receptor.
1	1	0	very-low-density lipoprotein particle receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a very-low-density lipoprotein receptor.
1	2	1	thyroid hormone transport	The directed movement of thyroid hormone into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
2	3	0	triglyceride homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of triglyceride within an organism or cell.
2	0	0	aromatase activity	Catalysis of the reduction of an aliphatic ring to yield an aromatic ring.
0	0	1	aspartate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with aspartate, the alpha-amino-acid anion of 2-aminobutanedioic acid that has formula C4H5NO4.
0	1	0	flap-structured DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a flap structure in DNA. A DNA flap structure is one in which a single-stranded length of DNA or RNA protrudes from a double-stranded DNA molecule.
1	1	0	negative regulation of fat cell proliferation	Any process that stops or decreases the rate or extent of fat cell proliferation.
0	4	1	actin polymerization-dependent cell motility	A process involved in the controlled movement of a bacterial cell powered by the continuous polymerization of actin at one pole of the cell.
4	3	3	hepatocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a hepatocyte. A hepatocyte is specialized epithelial cell that is organized into interconnected plates called lobules, and is the main structural component of the liver.
1	0	1	beta-catenin-TCF7L2 complex	A protein complex that contains beta-catenin and TCF7L2 (TCF4), binds to the TCF DNA motif within a promoter element, and is involved in the regulation of WNT target gene transcription.
0	1	2	cellular heat acclimation	Any process that increases heat tolerance of a cell in response to high temperatures.
5	4	6	ERK1 and ERK2 cascade	An intracellular protein kinase cascade containing at least ERK1 or ERK2 (MAPKs), a MEK (a MAPKK) and a MAP3K. The cascade may involve 4 different kinases, as it can also contain an additional tier: the upstream MAP4K. The kinases in each tier phosphorylate and activate the kinase in the downstream tier to transmit a signal within a cell.
9	6	5	regulation of ERK1 and ERK2 cascade	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the ERK1 and ERK2 cascade.
10	18	10	negative regulation of ERK1 and ERK2 cascade	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the ERK1 and ERK2 cascade.
23	18	18	positive regulation of ERK1 and ERK2 cascade	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction mediated by the ERK1 and ERK2 cascade.
0	1	0	ERK5 cascade	An intracellular protein kinase cascade containing at least ERK5 (also called BMK1; a MAPK), a MEK (a MAPKK) and a MAP3K. The cascade can also contain an additional tier: the upstream MAP4K. The kinases in each tier phosphorylate and activate the kinases in the downstream tier to transmit a signal within a cell.
0	0	1	endosome to plasma membrane transport vesicle	A transport vesicle that mediates transport from the endosome to the plasma membrane, and fuses with the plasma membrane to deliver lipids and membrane proteins to the plasma membrane  and to release various cargo molecules, such as proteins or hormones, by exocytosis.
3	3	6	exocytic vesicle	A transport vesicle that mediates transport from an intracellular compartment to the plasma membrane, and fuses with the plasma membrane to release various cargo molecules, such as proteins or hormones, by exocytosis.
1	0	0	Harderian gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the Harderian gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The Harderian gland is an anterior orbital structure usually associated with the nictitating membrane, and produces and secretes a variety of substances to the eye, depending upon the species.
0	1	0	transcription export complex 2	A protein complex that couples SAGA-dependent gene expression to mRNA export at the inner side of the nuclear pore complex (NPC). The TREX-2 complex is tethered to the inner side of the NPC via the nucleoporins Nup1 and Nup60; in S. cerevisiae it contains Sac3p, Thp1p, Sem1, Sus1p and Cdc31p.
1	1	2	NADPH binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the reduced form, NADPH, of nicotinamide-adenine dinucleotide phosphate, a coenzyme involved in many redox and biosynthetic reactions.
3	3	2	NAD+ binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the oxidized form, NAD, of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide, a coenzyme involved in many redox and biosynthetic reactions.
0	0	1	NADH binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the reduced form, NADH, of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide, a coenzyme involved in many redox and biosynthetic reactions.
0	0	1	carbamoyl phosphate biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of carbamoyl phosphate, an intermediate in the urea cycle and other nitrogen compound metabolic pathways.
3	0	0	co-SMAD binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a common mediator SMAD signaling protein.
4	1	2	I-SMAD binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an inhibitory SMAD signaling protein.
1	3	3	R-SMAD binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a receptor-regulated SMAD signaling protein.
0	0	1	trehalose metabolism in response to stress	The chemical reactions and pathways involving trehalose that occur as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress.
1	1	1	cellular response to cold	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cold stimulus, a temperature stimulus below the optimal temperature for that organism.
0	0	1	DNA-dependent protein kinase complex	A protein complex that is involved in the repair of DNA double-strand breaks and, in mammals, V(D)J recombination events. It consists of the DNA-dependent protein kinase catalytic subunit (DNA-PKcs) and the DNA end-binding heterodimer Ku.
3	1	2	nonhomologous end joining complex	A protein complex that plays a role in DNA double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining. Such complexes typically contain a specialized DNA ligase (e.g. Lig4 in eukaryotes) and one or more proteins that bind to DNA ends.
0	0	1	DNA ligase III-XRCC1 complex	A protein complex that contains DNA ligase III and XRCC1, and is involved in base excision repair.
1	5	6	nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to a nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing (NOD) protein.
1	1	0	regulation of nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of a nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing (NOD) pathway.
0	1	0	nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 1 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 1 (NOD1).
0	1	0	negative regulation of nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 1 signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of the nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 1 (NOD1) pathway.
1	1	0	nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 2 signaling pathway	Any series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of binding to nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 2 (NOD2).
1	1	1	negative regulation of nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 2 signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of the nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 2 (NOD2) pathway.
0	0	2	positive regulation of nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 2 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of the nucleotide-binding oligomerization domain containing 2 (NOD2) pathway.
0	1	1	Shc-EGFR complex	A protein complex that contains the epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and the adaptor protein Shc, and is involved in linking EGFR activation to the p21-Ras pathway.
0	1	0	Grb2-EGFR complex	A protein complex that contains the epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and Grb2, and is involved in linking EGFR activation to the p21-Ras pathway.
1	0	0	regulation of oligodendrocyte progenitor proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of oligodendrocyte progenitor proliferation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of oligodendrocyte progenitor proliferation	Any process that stops or decreases the rate or extent of oligodendrocyte progenitor proliferation.
0	0	2	positive regulation of oligodendrocyte progenitor proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of oligodendrocyte progenitor proliferation.
1	0	0	elongin complex	A transcription elongation factor complex that suppresses RNA polymerase II pausing, and may act by promoting proper alignment of the 3'-end of nascent transcripts with the polymerase catalytic site. Consists of a transcriptionally active Elongin A subunit (about 100 kDa) and two smaller Elongin B (about 18 kDa) and Elongin C (about 15 kDa) subunits.
0	0	1	prolactin secretion	The regulated release of prolactin, a peptide hormone that stimulates lactation, from secretory granules in the anterior pituitary.
0	1	0	SAGA-type complex	A histone acetyltransferase complex that acetylates nucleosomal H3 and H2B and is required for the expression of a subset of Pol II-transcribed genes. The budding yeast complex includes the acetyltransferase Gcn5p, several proteins of the Spt and Ada families, and several TBP-associate proteins (TAFs); analogous complexes in other species have analogous compositions, and usually contain homologs of the yeast proteins.
0	1	0	tubulin-dependent ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate. This reaction requires the presence of a tubulin dimer to accelerate release of ADP and phosphate.
1	1	0	respirasome	The protein complexes that form the electron transport system (the respiratory chain), associated with a cell membrane, usually the plasma membrane (in prokaryotes) or the inner mitochondrial membrane (on eukaryotes). The respiratory chain complexes transfer electrons from an electron donor to an electron acceptor and are associated with a proton pump to create a transmembrane electrochemical gradient.
1	2	1	rRNA base methylation	The addition of a methyl group to an atom in the nucleoside base portion of a nucleotide residue in an rRNA molecule.
2	0	0	rRNA (guanine-N7)-methylation	The addition of a methyl group to the N7 atom in the base portion of a guanine nucleotide residue in an rRNA molecule.
0	0	1	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, 3'-5' exonucleolytic nonsense-mediated decay	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the nuclear-transcribed mRNA transcript body of an mRNA in which an amino-acid codon has changed to a nonsense codon; occurs when the 3' end is not protected by a 3'-poly(A) tail; degradation proceeds in the 3' to 5' direction.
1	0	0	detection of hypoxia	The series of events in which a stimulus indicating lowered oxygen tension is received by a cell and converted into a molecular signal. Hypoxia, defined as a decline in O2 levels below normoxic levels of 20.8 - 20.95%, results in metabolic adaptation at both the cellular and organismal level.
1	0	1	monocyte aggregation	The adhesion of one monocyte to one or more other monocytes via adhesion molecules.
0	2	0	neutrophil aggregation	The adhesion of one neutrophil to one or more other neutrophils via adhesion molecules.
1	0	1	T cell aggregation	The adhesion of one T cell to one or more other T cells via adhesion molecules.
4	12	7	repressing transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a transcription repressor, any protein whose activity is required to prevent or downregulate transcription.
3	1	0	oligosaccharide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any oligosaccharide, a molecule with between two and (about) 20 monosaccharide residues connected by glycosidic linkages.
1	1	0	thrombin-activated receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a thrombin-activated receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
0	1	1	negative regulation of thrombin-activated receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of thrombin-activated receptor protein signaling pathway activity. A thrombin receptor signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a thrombin-activated receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
11	16	20	interleukin-1-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-1 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	0	0	poly-gamma-glutamate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving poly-gamma-glutamate, a polymer of D- and/or L-glutamic acid residues linked by gamma-peptidyl bonds.
3	10	9	regulation of microtubule cytoskeleton organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the formation, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising microtubules and their associated proteins.
1	1	0	cholesterol import	The directed movement of cholesterol into a cell or organelle.
2	4	3	calcium ion import	The directed movement of calcium ions into a cell or organelle.
0	1	0	positive regulation of histone H4-K20 methylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the covalent addition of a methyl group to the lysine at position 20 of histone H4.
0	1	1	death domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a death domain of a protein. The death domain (DD) is a homotypic protein interaction module composed of a bundle of six alpha-helices. DD bind each other forming oligomers. Some DD-containing proteins are involved in the regulation of apoptosis and inflammation through their activation of caspases and NF-kappaB.
0	0	1	CAK-ERCC2 complex	A protein complex formed by the association of the cyclin-dependent protein kinase activating kinase (CAK) holoenzyme complex with ERCC2.
0	0	1	ERCC4-ERCC1 complex	A heterodimeric nucleotide-excision repair complex that has endonuclease activity specific for bubble structures characteristic of certain DNA lesions. The subunits are known as XPF/ERCC4 and ERCC1 in mammals, and Rad1p and Rad10p in S. cerevisiae.
0	1	0	tRNA threonylcarbamoyladenosine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving tRNA threonylcarbamoyladenosine, a modified nucleoside found in some tRNA molecules.
6	2	19	platelet aggregation	The adhesion of one platelet to one or more other platelets via adhesion molecules.
3	3	0	protein kinase C signaling	A series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase C, which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
3	3	7	K63-linked polyubiquitin modification-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon poly-ubiquitination formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 63 in the target protein.
1	2	1	BRCA1-A complex	A protein complex that contains the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimer, RAP80/UIMC1, BRCC3/BRCC36, BRE/BRCC45, FAM175A/CCDC98/Abraxas and MERIT40/NBA1, and specifically recognizes and binds K63-linked polyubiquitin chains present on histone H2A and H2AX at DNA damage sites.
4	3	5	protein K63-linked ubiquitination	A protein ubiquitination process in which a polymer of ubiquitin, formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 63 of the ubiquitin monomers, is added to a protein. K63-linked ubiquitination does not target the substrate protein for degradation, but is involved in several pathways, notably as a signal to promote error-free DNA postreplication repair.
2	7	4	protein K63-linked deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a K63-linked ubiquitin chain, i.e. a polymer of ubiquitin formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 63 of the ubiquitin monomers, is removed from a protein.
0	0	2	histone H2A K63-linked deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a K63-linked ubiquitin chain, i.e. a polymer of ubiquitin formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 63 of the ubiquitin monomers, is removed from a lysine residue in histone H2A or the variant H2AX.
1	0	0	oleic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with oleic acid, the 18-carbon monounsaturated fatty acid (9Z)-octadec-9-enoic acid.
0	1	1	response to platinum ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a platinum stimulus.
4	3	1	response to fatty acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fatty acid stimulus.
1	0	0	response to linoleic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a linoleic acid stimulus.
1	3	0	histone H3-K36 demethylation	The modification of histone H3 by the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 36 of the histone.
1	2	0	PeBoW complex	A protein complex that is involved in coordinating ribosome biogenesis with cell cycle progression. In human, it is composed of Pes1, Bop1, and WDR12; in Saccharomyces the proteins are known as Nop7p, Erb1 and Ytm1 respectively.
0	1	0	endoribonuclease activity, cleaving siRNA-paired mRNA	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of the mRNA in a double-stranded RNA molecule formed by the base pairing of an mRNA with an siRNA, yielding 5'-phosphomonoesters.
0	1	0	BRISC complex	A protein complex that contains the FAM175B/ABRO1, BRCC3/BRCC36, BRE/BRCC45 and MERIT40/NBA1 proteins, and specifically cleaves K63-linked polyubiquitin chains.
1	0	0	synaptobrevin 2-SNAP-25-syntaxin-3-complexin complex	A SNARE complex that contains synaptobrevin 2 (VAMP2), SNAP-25, syntaxin 3, and a complexin (or orthologs thereof).
3	4	3	response to interleukin-1	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-1 stimulus.
1	0	1	PCNA-p21 complex	A protein complex that contains the cyclin-dependent protein kinase inhibitor p21WAF1/CIP1 bound to PCNA; formation of the complex inhibits DNA replication.
1	0	1	protein secretion by platelet	The regulated release of proteins by a platelet or group of platelets.
0	1	2	regulation of vitamin D receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of vitamin D receptor signaling pathway activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of vitamin D receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the vitamin D receptor signaling pathway activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of vitamin D receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vitamin D receptor signaling pathway activity.
1	0	0	uridylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of an uridylyl group to an acceptor.
0	1	0	negative regulation of neuron projection regeneration	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neuron projection regeneration, the regrowth of neuronal processes such as axons or dendrites following their loss or damage.
1	1	0	cadmium ion transmembrane transport	A process in which a cadmium ion is transported from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
4	4	7	lysine-acetylated histone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone in which a lysine residue has been modified by acetylation.
2	2	1	RISC-loading complex	A trimeric protein complex required for the formation of a mature RNA-induced silencing complex (RISC). In humans the complex is composed of the endonuclease Dicer (DICER1), TRBP (TARBP2) and the Argonaute protein Ago2 (EIF2C2/AGO2). Within the complex, Dicer and TRBP are required to process precursor miRNAs (pre-miRNAs) to mature miRNAs and then load them onto Ago2. Ago2 bound to the mature miRNA constitutes the minimal RISC and may subsequently dissociate from Dicer and TRBP. This complex has endoribonuclease activity.
0	1	0	methylcytosine dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: methylcytosine + 2-oxoglutarate + O2 = 5-hydroxymethylcytosine + succinate + CO2.
1	2	7	mitochondrion morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a mitochondrion are generated and organized.
0	2	2	protein localization to mitochondrion	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the mitochondrion.
0	1	0	cell-cell adhesion involved in gastrulation	The attachment of one cell to another cell affecting gastrulation.
5	4	6	calcium ion transmembrane transport	A process in which a calcium ion is transported from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	2	2	dendrite self-avoidance	The process in which dendrites recognize and avoid contact with sister dendrites from the same cell.
0	1	1	regulation of centromeric sister chromatid cohesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of sister chromatid cohesion in the centromeric region of a chromosome.
1	0	2	regulation of protein processing	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein processing, any protein maturation process achieved by the cleavage of a peptide bond or bonds within a protein.
6	11	6	nucleosome-dependent ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate. This reaction requires the presence of one or more nucleosomes.
0	0	1	Grb2-Sos complex	A protein complex that contains Grb2 and the guanine nucleotide exchange factor Sos (or an ortholog thereof, such as mSos1), and is involved in linking EGFR activation to the p21-Ras pathway.
1	0	0	zymogen granule exocytosis	The release of intracellular molecules contained within the zymogen granule by fusion of the granule with the plasma membrane of the oocyte, requiring calcium ions.
3	2	5	proteasome binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a proteasome, a large multisubunit protein complex that catalyzes protein degradation.
2	3	1	transepithelial transport	The directed movement of a substance from one side of an epithelium to the other.
0	0	1	transepithelial ammonium transport	The directed movement of ammonium ions from one side of an epithelium to the other.
0	1	0	vitamin D response element binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the vitamin D response element (VDRE), a short sequence with dyad symmetry found in the promoters of some of the cellular immediate-early genes, regulated by serum.
0	1	0	protein modification by small protein removal	A protein modification process in which one or more covalently attached groups of a small protein, such as ubiquitin or a ubiquitin-like protein, are removed from a target protein.
0	1	1	formin-nucleated actin cable assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a formin-nucleated actin cable. A formin-nucleated actin cable is an actin filament bundle that consists of short filaments organized into bundles of uniform polarity, and is nucleated by formins.
2	1	0	HAUS complex	A protein complex that localizes to interphase centrosomes and to mitotic spindle tubules and regulates mitotic spindle assembly and centrosome integrity; in human, the complex consists of eight subunits, some of which are homologous to subunits of the Drosophila Augmin complex.
1	1	1	high-density lipoprotein particle receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a high-density lipoprotein receptor.
1	0	0	mast cell proliferation	The expansion of a mast cell population by cell division.
0	1	0	negative regulation of leukocyte proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of leukocyte proliferation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mast cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the rate or extent of mast cell proliferation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mast cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of mast cell proliferation.
1	0	0	response to interleukin-2	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-2 stimulus.
2	0	0	response to interleukin-4	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-4 stimulus.
1	1	0	response to interleukin-12	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-12 stimulus.
1	0	1	response to interleukin-15	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-15 stimulus.
1	1	0	response to interleukin-18	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-18 stimulus.
2	0	0	intralumenal vesicle formation	The invagination of the endosome membrane and resulting formation of a vesicle within the lumen of the endosome.
1	1	3	inositol 1,4,5 trisphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with inositol 1,4,5 trisphosphate.
0	0	1	deoxyribonucleoside 5'-monophosphate N-glycosidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a deoxyribonucleoside 5'-monophosphate + H2O = deoxyribose 5-monophosphate + a purine or pyrimidine base.
1	2	0	FHF complex	A protein complex that is composed of AKTIP/FTS, FAM160A2/p107FHIP, and one or more members of the Hook family of proteins, HOOK1, HOOK2, and HOOK3. The complex is thought to promote vesicle trafficking and/or fusion, and associates with the homotypic vesicular sorting complex (the HOPS complex).
1	0	1	type II activin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a type II activin receptor.
1	1	0	BMP receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a BMP receptor.
0	0	1	mucus layer	An extracellular region part that consists of a protective layer of mucus secreted by epithelial cells lining tubular organs of the body such as the colon or secreted into fluids such as saliva. Mucus is a viscous slimy secretion consisting of mucins (i.e. highly glycosylated mucin proteins) and various inorganic salts dissolved in water, with suspended epithelial cells and leukocytes.
2	0	0	response to cholesterol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cholesterol stimulus.
2	3	0	leucine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with 2-amino-4-methylpentanoic acid.
0	1	0	cAMP transport	The directed movement of cyclic AMP (cAMP), into, out of or within a cell.
0	0	1	histone H3-K27 methylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of one or more methyl groups to lysine at position 27 of the histone.
6	1	3	C2H2 zinc finger domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a C2H2-type zinc finger domain of a protein. The C2H2 zinc finger is the classical zinc finger domain, in which two conserved cysteines and histidines co-ordinate a zinc ion.
4	1	2	interleukin-35-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-35 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
1	2	2	pre-snoRNP complex	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains a precursor small nucleolar RNA (pre-snoRNA) and associated proteins, and forms during small nucleolar ribonucleoprotein complex (snoRNP) assembly. Pre-snoRNP complexes may contain proteins not found in the corresponding mature snoRNP complexes.
0	1	0	nuclear pore transmembrane ring	A subcomplex of the nuclear pore complex (NPC) that spans the nuclear membrane and anchors the NPC to the nuclear envelope. In S. cerevisiae, the transmembrane ring is composed of Pom152p, Pom34p, and Ndc1p. In vertebrates, it is composed of Gp210, Ndc1, and Pom121. Components are arranged in 8-fold symmetrical 'spokes' around the central transport channel. A single 'spoke', can be isolated and is sometime referred to as the Ndc1 complex.
2	1	0	gamma-secretase complex	A protein complex that has aspartic-type endopeptidase activity, and contains a catalytic subunit, presenilin (PS), that is a prototypical member of the GxGD-type aspartyl peptidases. The complex also contains additional subunits, including nicastrin, APH-1, PEN-2, and a regulatory subunit, CD147. Gamma-secretase cleaves several transmembrane proteins including the cell surface receptor Notch and the amyloid-beta precursor protein.
1	5	0	MOZ/MORF histone acetyltransferase complex	A histone acetyltransferase complex that has histone H3 acetyltransferase and coactivator activities. Subunits of the human complex include MYST3/MOZ, MYST4/MORF, ING5, EAF6 and one of BRPF1, BRD1/BRPF2 and BRPF3.
1	0	0	D-aspartate transport	The directed movement of D-aspartate, the D-enantiomer of the anion of (2R)-2-aminobutanedioic acid, into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	1	L-aspartate transmembrane transport	The directed movement of L-aspartate across a membrane.
2	0	1	D-aspartate import across plasma membrane	The directed import of D-aspartate from the extracellular region across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	0	1	dihydrosphingosine-1-phosphate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: dihydrosphingosine 1-phosphate + H2O = dihydrosphingosine + phosphate.
1	0	0	response to biotin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a biotin stimulus.
1	0	0	phosphatidylserine exposure on apoptotic cell surface	A phospholipid scrambling process that results in the appearance of phosphatidylserine on the outer leaflet of the plasma membrane of an apoptotic cell, which acts as an 'eat-me' signal for engulfing cells. Phosphatidylserine is exposed on the apoptotic cell surface by a phospholipid scramblase activity.
2	0	0	hydrogen sulfide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving hydrogen sulfide, H2S.
2	0	0	hydrogen sulfide biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of hydrogen sulfide, H2S.
0	0	3	phosphorylation of RNA polymerase II C-terminal domain	The process of introducing a phosphate group on to an amino acid residue in the C-terminal domain of RNA polymerase II. Typically, this occurs during the transcription cycle and results in production of an RNA polymerase II enzyme where the carboxy-terminal domain (CTD) of the largest subunit is extensively phosphorylated, often referred to as hyperphosphorylated or the II(0) form. Specific types of phosphorylation within the CTD are usually associated with specific regions of genes, though there are exceptions. The phosphorylation state regulates the association of specific complexes such as the capping enzyme or 3'-RNA processing machinery to the elongating RNA polymerase complex.
1	1	1	tertiary granule	A secretory granule that contains cathepsin and gelatinase and is readily exocytosed upon cell activation; found primarily in mature neutrophil cells.
16	10	5	tertiary granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a tertiary granule.
0	3	1	Sin3-type complex	Any of a number of evolutionarily conserved histone deacetylase complexes (HDACs) containing a core consisting of a paired amphipathic helix motif protein (e.g. Sin3p in S. cerevisiae, Pst1 in S. pombe or Sin3A in mammals) at least one class I histone deacetylase (e.g. Rpd3p in S. cerevisiae, Clr6 in S. pombe, or HDAC1 and HDAC2 in mammals), and at least one WD40 repeat protein (e.g. Ume1p in S. cerevisiae, Prw1 in S. pombe, or RbAp46 and RbAp48 in mammals). These complexes also contain a variable number of other proteins that direct histone binding, DNA binding, or add other functionality to the complex.
1	1	0	chromatin maintenance	The chromatin organization process that preserves chromatin in a stable functional or structural state.
1	1	1	heterochromatin organization	Any process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of the physical structure of eukaryotic heterochromatin, a compact and highly condensed form of chromatin.
0	1	1	heterochromatin maintenance	The chromatin organization process that preserves heterochromatin in a stable functional or structural state.
8	12	8	bicellular tight junction assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a tight junction, an occluding cell-cell junction that is composed of a branching network of sealing strands that completely encircles the apical end of each cell in an epithelial sheet.
3	1	0	basement membrane assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a basement membrane, a part of the extracellular region that consists of a thin layer of dense material found in various animal tissues interposed between the cells and the adjacent connective tissue.
1	0	1	caveola assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a caveola. A caveola is a plasma membrane raft that forms a small pit, depression, or invagination that communicates with the outside of a cell and extends inward, indenting the cytoplasm and the cell membrane.
0	5	5	dynein complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a dynein complex, a protein complex that contains two or three dynein heavy chains and several light chains, and has microtubule motor activity.
0	1	2	aggresome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an aggresome; requires the microtubule cytoskeleton and dynein.
0	1	0	polyubiquitinated misfolded protein transport	The directed movement of misfolded polyubiquitinated proteins in a cell, including the movement of proteins between specific compartments or structures within a cell.
0	1	0	Hsp90 deacetylation	The modification of an Hsp90 protein by removal of acetyl groups.
2	1	0	core mediator complex	A protein complex that interacts with the carboxy-terminal domain of the largest subunit of RNA polymerase II and plays an active role in transducing the signal from a transcription factor to the transcriptional machinery. The core mediator complex has a stimulatory effect on basal transcription, and contains most of the same subdomains as the larger form of mediator complex -- a head domain comprising proteins known in Saccharomyces as Srb2, -4, and -5, Med6, -8, and -11, and Rox3 proteins; a middle domain comprising Med1, -4, and -7, Nut1 and -2, Cse2, Rgr1, Soh1, and Srb7 proteins; and a tail consisting of Gal11p, Med2p, Pgd1p, and Sin4p -- but lacks the regulatory subcomplex comprising Ssn2, -3, and -8, and Srb8 proteins. Metazoan core mediator complexes have similar modular structures and include homologs of yeast Srb and Med proteins.
1	4	2	response to growth factor	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a growth factor stimulus.
0	0	3	response to epidermal growth factor	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an epidermal growth factor stimulus.
0	3	1	growth factor receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a growth factor receptor.
0	0	1	cell body fiber	A neuron projection that is found in unipolar neurons and corresponds to the region between the cell body and the point at which the single projection branches.
1	0	0	myosin VI binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a class VI myosin. The myosin VI heavy chain has a single IQ motif in the neck and a tail region with a coiled coil domain followed by a unique globular domain, a unique insertion that enables myosin VI to move towards the pointed or minus end of actin filaments.
1	0	0	myosin VI light chain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a light chain of a myosin VI complex.
1	2	0	regulation of bile acid biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of bile acids.
0	1	0	negative regulation of bile acid biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of bile acids.
0	1	0	regulation of protein exit from endoplasmic reticulum	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of proteins from the endoplasmic reticulum.
2	1	2	positive regulation of protein exit from endoplasmic reticulum	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of directed movement of proteins from the endoplasmic reticulum.
1	0	0	heterochromatin organization involved in chromatin silencing	Any process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of the physical structure of eukaryotic heterochromatin and contributes to chromatin silencing.
0	1	0	regulation of glycogen metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving glycogen.
0	0	1	SOSS complex	A protein complex that functions downstream of the MRN complex to promote DNA repair and the G2/M checkpoint. The SOSS complex associates with single-stranded DNA at DNA lesions and is composed of SOSS-B (SOSS-B1/OBFC2B or SOSS-B2/OBFC2A), SOSS-A/INTS3 and SOSS-C/C9orf80.
0	2	0	microprocessor complex	A protein complex that binds to heme and to pri-miRNAs, and is required for the formation of a pre-microRNA (pre-miRNA), the initial step of microRNA (miRNA) biogenesis. The complex is composed of the double-stranded-RNA-specific RNase Drosha (also called RNASEN) and the RNA-binding protein DGCR8 (heme-free or heme-bound forms). Within the complex, DGCR8 function as a molecular anchor necessary for the recognition of pri-miRNA at dsRNA-ssRNA junction and directs RNASEN/Drosha to cleave the 3' and 5' strands of a stem-loop to release hairpin-shaped pre-miRNAs.
2	2	3	primary miRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a primary microRNA (pri-miRNA) transcript, an RNA molecule that is processed into a short hairpin-shaped structure called a pre-miRNA and finally into a functional miRNA. Both double-stranded and single-stranded regions of a pri-miRNA are required for binding.
2	0	1	pre-miRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a precursor microRNA (pre-miRNA) transcript, a stem-loop-containing precursor of microRNA.
1	0	0	regulation of calcineurin-NFAT signaling cascade	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the calcineurin-NFAT signaling cascade.
2	5	3	negative regulation of calcineurin-NFAT signaling cascade	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the calcineurin-NFAT signaling cascade.
3	2	2	positive regulation of calcineurin-NFAT signaling cascade	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signaling via the calcineurin-NFAT signaling cascade.
9	5	2	E-box binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an E-box, a DNA motif with the consensus sequence CANNTG that is found in the promoters of a wide array of genes expressed in neurons, muscle and other tissues.
2	0	0	lipoteichoic acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with lipoteichoic acid.
1	0	1	transcription preinitiation complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins on promoter DNA to form the transcriptional preinitiation complex (PIC), required for transcription.
1	0	0	mitochondrial tRNA modification	The covalent alteration of one or more nucleotides within a mitochondrial tRNA molecule to produce a mitochondrial tRNA molecule with a sequence that differs from that coded genetically.
1	0	1	mitochondrial tRNA methylation	The posttranscriptional addition of methyl groups to specific residues in a mitochondrial tRNA molecule.
0	1	0	serine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with 2-amino-3-hydroxypropanoic acid.
2	3	7	global genome nucleotide-excision repair	The nucleotide-excision repair process in which DNA lesions are removed from nontranscribed strands and from transcriptionally silent regions over the entire genome.
2	3	1	UV-damage excision repair	A DNA repair process that is initiated by an endonuclease that introduces a single-strand incision immediately 5' of a UV-induced damage site. UV-damage excision repair acts on both cyclobutane pyrimidine dimers (CPDs) and pyrimidine-pyrimidone 6-4 photoproducts (6-4PPs).
0	1	0	small RNA loading onto RISC	The process in which a single-stranded small RNA associates with the RNA-initiated silencing complex (RISC); occurs as part of a process of gene silencing by small RNA.
2	1	2	organelle assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an organelle. An organelle is an organized structure of distinctive morphology and function. Includes the nucleus, mitochondria, plastids, vacuoles, vesicles, ribosomes and the cytoskeleton. Excludes the plasma membrane.
0	1	0	regulation of ATP:ADP antiporter activity	Any process that modulates the activity of an ATP:ADP antiporter.
2	3	5	histone H3 deacetylation	The modification of histone H3 by the removal of one or more acetyl groups.
3	2	4	histone H4 deacetylation	The modification of histone H4 by the removal of one or more acetyl groups.
0	2	3	CRD-mediated mRNA stabilization	An mRNA stabilization process in which one or more RNA-binding proteins associate with a sequence in the open reading frame called the coding region instability determinant (CRD).
1	5	4	3'-UTR-mediated mRNA stabilization	An mRNA stabilization process in which one or more RNA-binding proteins associate with the 3'-untranslated region (UTR) of an mRNA.
8	6	1	protein K48-linked ubiquitination	A protein ubiquitination process in which a polymer of ubiquitin, formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 48 of the ubiquitin monomers, is added to a protein. K48-linked ubiquitination targets the substrate protein for degradation.
1	2	3	CRD-mediated mRNA stability complex	A protein complex that binds to, and promotes stabilization of, mRNA molecules containing the coding region instability determinant (CRD). In human, it may consist of IGF2BP1, HNRNPU, SYNCRIP/HNRNPQ, YBX1, and DHX9.
2	1	0	contractile ring	A cytoskeletal structure composed of filamentous protein that forms beneath the membrane of many cells or organelles, in the plane of cell or organelle division. Ring contraction is associated with centripetal growth of the membrane that divides the cytoplasm of the two daughter cells or organelles.
0	1	0	Dsl1/NZR complex	A multisubunit tethering complex, i.e. a protein complex involved in mediating the initial interaction between vesicles and the membranes with which they fuse, that is involved in trafficking from the Golgi apparatus to the ER. In Saccharomyces cerevisiae the Dsl1p complex contains Dsl1p, Tip20p, and Sec39p.
0	2	0	dephosphorylation of RNA polymerase II C-terminal domain	The process of removing a phosphate group from an amino acid residue in the C-terminal domain of RNA polymerase II. Some dephosphorylation occurs during transcription while some may occur after the enzyme is released from the template in order to prepare it for the beginning of the transcription cycle again. RNA polymerase II with little or no phosphorylation is referred to as the hypophosphorylated or II(A) form.
1	0	0	neutrophil-mediated killing of bacterium	The directed killing of a bacterium by a neutrophil.
0	2	1	neutrophil-mediated killing of gram-negative bacterium	The directed killing of a gram-negative bacterium by a neutrophil.
1	0	0	neutrophil-mediated killing of gram-positive bacterium	The directed killing of a gram-positive bacterium by a neutrophil.
0	1	0	neutrophil-mediated killing of fungus	The directed killing of a fungal cell by a neutrophil.
1	0	0	positive regulation of neutrophil mediated killing of fungus	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed killing of a fungal cell by a neutrophil.
2	0	0	nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, no-go decay	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of the transcript body of a nuclear-transcribed mRNA with stalls in translation elongation.
3	6	5	endoplasmic reticulum exit site	An endoplasmic reticulum part at which COPII-coated vesicles are produced.
1	1	1	protein localization to endoplasmic reticulum	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the endoplasmic reticulum.
1	1	4	protein localization to endoplasmic reticulum exit site	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location at an endoplasmic reticulum exit site.
0	0	1	FHA domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a FHA domain of a protein. The FHA domain is a phosphopeptide recognition domain found in many regulatory proteins, and consists of approximately 80-100 amino acid residues folded into an 11-stranded beta sandwich.
5	2	1	protein K11-linked ubiquitination	A protein ubiquitination process in which ubiquitin monomers are attached to a protein, and then ubiquitin polymers are formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 11 of the ubiquitin monomers. K11-linked polyubiquitination targets the substrate protein for degradation. The anaphase-promoting complex promotes the degradation of mitotic regulators by assembling K11-linked polyubiquitin chains.
0	0	1	transcription factor TFIIK complex	A transcription factor complex that forms part of the holo TFIIH complex. In Saccharomyces/human, TFIIK contains Ccl1p/Cyclin H, Tfb3p/MAT1 and Kin28p/CDK7.
0	1	0	left/right axis specification	The establishment, maintenance and elaboration of the left/right axis. The left/right axis is defined by a line that runs orthogonal to both the anterior/posterior and dorsal/ventral axes. Each side is defined from the viewpoint of the organism rather of the observer (as per anatomical axes).
1	1	9	error-free translesion synthesis	The conversion of DNA-damage induced single-stranded gaps into large molecular weight DNA after replication by using a specialized DNA polymerase or replication complex to insert a defined nucleotide across the lesion. This process does not remove the replication-blocking lesions but does not causes an increase in the endogenous mutation level. For S. cerevisiae, RAD30 encodes DNA polymerase eta, which incorporates two adenines. When incorporated across a thymine-thymine dimer, it does not increase the endogenous mutation level.
1	0	0	demethylation	The process of removing one or more methyl groups from a molecule.
1	1	0	oxidative demethylation	The process of removing one or more methyl groups from a molecule, involving the oxidation (i.e. electron loss) of one or more atoms in the substrate.
0	1	0	snRNP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any part of a small nuclear ribonucleoprotein particle.
1	1	0	medium-chain-acyl-CoA dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acyl-CoA + acceptor = 2,3-dehydroacyl-CoA + reduced acceptor, where the acyl group is a medium-chain fatty acid residue. A medium chain fatty acid is any fatty acid with a chain length of between C6 and C12.
1	1	0	detection of oxidative stress	The series of events in which a stimulus indicating oxidative stress is received and converted into a molecular signal.
0	2	1	NADPH oxidation	A metabolic process that results in the oxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide, NADPH, to the oxidized form, NADP.
0	1	2	neuron death	The process of cell death in a neuron.
0	1	0	response to magnetism	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a magnetic stimulus.
1	0	0	U4/U6 snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains base-paired U4 and U6 small nuclear RNAs.
1	3	5	U2-type prespliceosome	A spliceosomal complex that is formed by association of the 5' splice site with the U1 snRNP, while the branch point sequence is recognized by the U2 snRNP. The prespliceosome includes many proteins in addition to those found in the U1 and U2 snRNPs. Commitment to a given pair of 5' and 3' splice sites occurs at the time of prespliceosome formation.
4	10	9	U2-type precatalytic spliceosome	A spliceosomal complex that is formed by the recruitment of the preassembled U4/U6.U5 tri-snRNP to the prespliceosome. Although all 5 snRNPs are present, the precatalytic spliceosome is catalytically inactive. The precatalytic spliceosome includes many proteins in addition to those found in the U1, U2 and U4/U6.U5 snRNPs.
1	7	1	U2-type catalytic step 1 spliceosome	A spliceosomal complex that is formed by the displacement of the U1 and U4 snRNPs from the precatalytic spliceosome; the U2, U5 and U6 snRNPs remain associated with the mRNA. This complex, sometimes called the activated spliceosome, is the catalytically active form of the spliceosome, and includes many proteins in addition to those found in the U2, and U5 and U6 snRNPs.
7	3	3	U2-type catalytic step 2 spliceosome	A spliceosomal complex that contains the U2, U5 and U6 snRNPs bound to a splicing intermediate in which the first catalytic cleavage of the 5' splice site has occurred. The precise subunit composition differs significantly from that of the catalytic step 1, or activated, spliceosome, and includes many proteins in addition to those found in the U2, U5 and U6 snRNPs.
0	1	1	U2-type post-mRNA release spliceosomal complex	A spliceosomal complex that is formed following the release of the spliced product from the post-spliceosomal complex and contains the excised intron and the U2, U5 and U6 snRNPs.
1	4	2	precatalytic spliceosome	A spliceosomal complex that is formed by the recruitment of a preassembled U5-containing tri-snRNP to the prespliceosome. Although all 5 snRNPs are present, the precatalytic spliceosome is catalytically inactive. The precatalytic spliceosome includes many proteins in addition to those found in the associated snRNPs.
10	17	25	catalytic step 2 spliceosome	A spliceosomal complex that contains three snRNPs, including U5, bound to a splicing intermediate in which the first catalytic cleavage of the 5' splice site has occurred. The precise subunit composition differs significantly from that of the catalytic step 1, or activated, spliceosome, and includes many proteins in addition to those found in the associated snRNPs.
0	1	2	post-mRNA release spliceosomal complex	A spliceosomal complex that is formed following the release of the spliced product from the post-spliceosomal complex and contains the excised intron and three snRNPs, including U5.
2	2	0	nuclear mRNA surveillance	The set of processes involved in identifying and degrading defective or aberrant mRNAs within the nucleus.
1	0	0	CUT catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of cryptic unstable transcripts (CUTs).
0	2	0	nuclear polyadenylation-dependent rRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways occurring in the nucleus and resulting in the breakdown of a ribosomal RNA (rRNA) molecule, including RNA fragments released as part of processing the primary transcript into multiple mature rRNA species, initiated by the enzymatic addition of a sequence of adenylyl residues (polyadenylation) at the 3' end the target rRNA.
0	2	0	nuclear polyadenylation-dependent tRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways occurring in the nucleus and resulting in the breakdown of an aberrant or incorrectly modified transfer RNA (tRNA) molecule, initiated by the enzymatic addition of a sequence of adenylyl residues (polyadenylation) at the 3' end the target tRNA.
0	2	0	nuclear polyadenylation-dependent mRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways occurring in the nucleus and resulting in the breakdown of a messenger RNA (mRNA) molecule, initiated by the enzymatic addition of a sequence of adenylyl residues (polyadenylation) at the 3' end the target mRNA.
1	0	2	histone mRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of histone messenger RNA (mRNA).
0	0	1	nuclear histone mRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of histone messenger RNA (mRNA) within the nucleus.
2	0	1	polyadenylation-dependent snoRNA 3'-end processing	Any process involved in forming the mature 3' end of a snoRNA molecule linked to prior polyadenylation of the 3'-end of the precursor snoRNA.
1	0	2	alphav-beta3 integrin-vitronectin complex	A protein complex that consists of an alphav-beta3 integrin complex bound to vitronectin.
2	0	0	negative regulation of phospholipid biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phospholipids.
1	0	0	positive regulation of phospholipid biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of phospholipids.
0	1	1	eukaryotic initiation factor eIF2 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with eukaryotic initiation factor eIF2, a protein complex involved in the initiation of ribosome-mediated translation.
1	0	1	RNA 3' uridylation	The enzymatic addition of a sequence of uridylyl residues at the 3' end of an RNA molecule.
0	1	0	DNA conformation change	A cellular process that results in a change in the spatial configuration of a DNA molecule. A conformation change can bend DNA, or alter the, twist, writhe, or linking number of a DNA molecule.
1	0	0	response to interleukin-9	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-9 stimulus.
1	0	0	response to parathyroid hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a parathyroid hormone stimulus.
4	6	6	protein K48-linked deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a K48-linked ubiquitin chain, i.e. a polymer of ubiquitin formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 48 of the ubiquitin monomers, is removed from a protein.
0	0	1	superior temporal gyrus development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the superior temporal gyrus over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The superior temporal gyrus is a portion of the cerebral cortex that extends from the lateral sulcus to the superior temporal sulcus.
1	0	0	alpha9-beta1 integrin-ADAM8 complex	A protein complex that consists of an alpha9-beta1 integrin complex bound to the transmembrane metallopeptidase ADAM8.
3	0	1	SMAD protein complex	A protein complex that consists of only SMAD proteins; may be homomeric or heteromeric. Heteromeric complexes act as transcription factors while homomeric complexes exist but are transcriptionally inactive. Hetero- versus homotrimerization is largely enthalpy driven.
3	0	0	heteromeric SMAD protein complex	A protein complex composed of SMAD family proteins, a transcription factor complex which binds to the promoters of target genes and recruits co-activators and histone acetyltransferases, facilitating transcription. Phosphorylation of the non-SMAD4 subunit(s) enables binding of SMAD4 to form heteromeric complexes that enter the nucleus to initiate gene transcription. DNA-binding specificity is conferred by other transcription factors binding to SMAD complexes. Interactions with coactivators or corepressors modulate their transcriptional activity. Can be heterotrimeric or heterodimeric.
0	4	1	regulation of cell cycle arrest	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of cell cycle arrest, the process in which the cell cycle is halted during one of the normal phases.
4	4	2	negative regulation of cell cycle arrest	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of cell cycle arrest, the process in which the cell cycle is halted during one of the normal phases.
3	7	4	positive regulation of cell cycle arrest	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of cell cycle arrest, the process in which the cell cycle is halted during one of the normal phases.
0	0	1	NF-kappaB complex	A protein complex that consists of a homo- or heterodimer of members of a family of structurally related proteins that contain a conserved N-terminal region called the Rel homology domain (RHD). In the nucleus, NF-kappaB complexes act as transcription factors. In unstimulated cells, NF-kappaB dimers are sequestered in the cytoplasm by IkappaB monomers; signals that induce NF-kappaB activity cause degradation of IkappaB, allowing NF-kappaB dimers to translocate to the nucleus and induce gene expression.
1	2	2	CMG complex	A protein complex that contains the GINS complex, Cdc45p, and the heterohexameric MCM complex, and that is involved in unwinding DNA during replication.
1	1	0	DNA replication preinitiation complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the DNA replication preinitiation complex, a protein-DNA complex that is assembled at DNA replication origins immediately prior to the initiation of DNA replication. The complex consists of proteins that initiate the DNA binding, melt the helix and enable helicase activity.
0	1	0	RNA trimethylguanosine synthase activity	Catalysis of two successive methyl transfer reactions from AdoMet to the N-2 atom of guanosine, thereby converting 7-methylguanosine in an RNA cap to 2,2,7 trimethylguanosine.
0	1	0	ribonucleoprotein complex localization	Any process in which a ribonucleoprotein complex is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location within a cell.
2	3	3	protein localization to chromatin	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, a part of a chromosome that is organized into chromatin.
0	1	4	establishment of protein localization to chromatin	The directed movement of a protein to a part of a chromosome that is organized into chromatin.
1	2	3	WASH complex	A protein complex that localizes at the surface of endosomes, where it recruits and activates the Arp2/3 complex to induce actin polymerization. In human, the WASH complex is composed of F-actin-capping protein subunits alpha and beta, WASH1, FAM21, KIAA1033, KIAA0196 and CCDC53.
0	2	1	histone pre-mRNA 3'end processing complex	A ribonucleoprotein that binds to specific sites in, and is required for cleavage of, the 3'-end of histone pre-mRNAs. The complex contains the U7 snRNP and additional proteins, including the stem-loop binding protein (SLBP) and the exonuclease 3'hExo/Eri-1.
0	0	2	protein localization to juxtaparanode region of axon	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, the juxtaparanode region of an axon.
0	1	0	histone pre-mRNA stem-loop binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a conserved stem-loop structure found in histone pre-mRNAs.
0	1	1	histone pre-mRNA DCP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the downstream cleavage product (DCP) generated by histone pre-mRNA 3'-end processing.
0	0	1	U7 snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the U7 small nuclear RNA (U7 snRNA).
0	1	1	cellular response to misfolded protein	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a misfolded protein stimulus.
1	0	1	cellular response to molecule of bacterial origin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus by molecules of bacterial origin such as peptides derived from bacterial flagellin.
26	18	11	cellular response to lipopolysaccharide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lipopolysaccharide stimulus; lipopolysaccharide is a major component of the cell wall of gram-negative bacteria.
1	2	0	cellular response to lipoteichoic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lipoteichoic acid stimulus; lipoteichoic acid is a major component of the cell wall of gram-positive bacteria and typically consists of a chain of glycerol-phosphate repeating units linked to a glycolipid anchor.
0	1	0	cellular response to peptidoglycan	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a peptidoglycan stimulus. Peptidoglycan is a bacterial cell wall macromolecule.
1	1	2	cellular response to muramyl dipeptide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a muramyl dipeptide stimulus. Muramyl dipeptide is derived from peptidoglycan.
1	1	0	cellular response to molecule of fungal origin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus by molecules of fungal origin such as chito-octamer oligosaccharide.
4	9	6	cellular response to amino acid stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an amino acid stimulus. An amino acid is a carboxylic acids containing one or more amino groups.
3	3	1	cellular response to leucine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a leucine stimulus.
0	2	3	cellular response to antibiotic	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an antibiotic stimulus. An antibiotic is a chemical substance produced by a microorganism which has the capacity to inhibit the growth of or to kill other microorganisms.
1	0	0	cellular response to inorganic substance	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an inorganic substance stimulus.
1	0	1	cellular response to ammonium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an ammonium stimulus.
2	4	0	cellular response to arsenic-containing substance	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an arsenic stimulus from compounds containing arsenic, including arsenates, arsenites, and arsenides.
0	1	0	cellular response to chromate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a chromate stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to metal ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a metal ion stimulus.
0	2	1	connexin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a connexin, any of a group of related proteins that assemble to form gap junctions.
2	1	2	cellular response to electrical stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an electrical stimulus.
8	13	19	cellular response to mechanical stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a mechanical stimulus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of translational initiation in response to starvation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of translation initiation, as a result of deprivation of nourishment.
1	0	0	L-methionine salvage	Any process that generates L-methionine from derivatives of it, without de novo synthesis.
4	4	8	cellular response to cadmium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cadmium (Cd) ion stimulus.
10	12	14	cellular response to calcium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a calcium ion stimulus.
1	1	2	cellular response to cobalt ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cobalt ion stimulus.
3	1	2	cellular response to copper ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a copper ion stimulus.
1	1	2	cellular response to iron ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an iron ion stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to iron(III) ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an iron(III) ion stimulus.
0	1	1	cellular response to lead ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lead ion stimulus.
3	1	2	cellular response to lithium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lithium (Li+) ion stimulus.
1	1	2	cellular response to magnesium ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a magnesium ion stimulus.
0	1	2	cellular response to manganese ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a manganese ion stimulus.
3	1	0	cellular response to mercury ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a mercury ion stimulus.
0	1	1	cellular response to zinc ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a zinc ion stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to vitamin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin stimulus.
9	4	9	cellular response to retinoic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a retinoic acid stimulus.
0	1	2	cellular response to vitamin D	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin D stimulus.
1	0	1	cellular response to vitamin E	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin E stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to vitamin K	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vitamin K stimulus.
3	0	1	cellular response to organic substance	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an organic substance stimulus.
1	1	0	cellular response to alkaloid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an alkaloid stimulus. Alkaloids are a large group of nitrogenous substances found in naturally in plants, many of which have extracts that are pharmacologically active.
2	0	1	cellular response to caffeine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a caffeine stimulus. Caffeine is an alkaloid found in numerous plant species, where it acts as a natural pesticide that paralyzes and kills certain insects feeding upon them.
2	0	1	cellular response to cocaine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cocaine stimulus. Cocaine is a crystalline alkaloid obtained from the leaves of the coca plant.
0	0	1	cellular response to morphine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a morphine stimulus. Morphine is an opioid alkaloid, isolated from opium, with a complex ring structure.
0	2	2	cellular response to nicotine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nicotine stimulus.
2	1	1	cellular response to ATP	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an ATP (adenosine 5'-triphosphate) stimulus.
8	8	8	cellular response to cAMP	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cAMP (cyclic AMP, adenosine 3',5'-cyclophosphate) stimulus.
0	1	1	cellular response to cGMP	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cGMP (cyclic GMP, guanosine 3',5'-cyclophosphate) stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to carbohydrate stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a carbohydrate stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to fructose stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fructose stimulus.
10	4	9	cellular response to glucose stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glucose stimulus.
3	11	6	MLL1 complex	A protein complex that can methylate lysine-4 of histone H3. MLL1/MLL is the catalytic methyltransferase subunit, and the complex also contains the core components ASH2L, HCFC1/HCF1 WDR5 and RBBP5.
0	2	0	skeletal muscle acetylcholine-gated channel clustering	The accumulation of acetylcholine-gated cation channels in a narrow, central region of muscle fibers, in apposition to nerve terminals.
1	0	1	diphosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving diphosphate, the anion or salt of diphosphoric acid.
6	10	4	cellular response to cytokine stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cytokine stimulus.
5	8	13	cellular response to interferon-gamma	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interferon-gamma stimulus. Interferon gamma is the only member of the type II interferon found so far.
9	3	7	cellular response to interleukin-1	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-1 stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to interleukin-12	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-12 stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to interleukin-2	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-2 stimulus.
2	2	8	cellular response to interleukin-4	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-4 stimulus.
3	1	1	cellular response to interleukin-6	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-6 stimulus.
12	16	12	cellular response to tumor necrosis factor	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a tumor necrosis factor stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to dsRNA	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a double-stranded RNA stimulus.
2	2	2	cellular response to exogenous dsRNA	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an exogenous double-stranded RNA stimulus.
0	3	1	cellular response to ethanol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an ethanol stimulus.
7	10	5	cellular response to growth factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a growth factor stimulus.
8	10	11	cellular response to epidermal growth factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an epidermal growth factor stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to gonadotropin stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a gonadotropin stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to follicle-stimulating hormone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a follicle-stimulating hormone stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to luteinizing hormone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a luteinizing hormone stimulus.
0	1	4	cellular response to parathyroid hormone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a parathyroid hormone stimulus.
1	3	2	cellular response to peptide hormone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a peptide hormone stimulus. A peptide hormone is any of a class of peptides that are secreted into the blood stream and have endocrine functions in living animals.
2	4	6	cellular response to glucagon stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glucagon stimulus.
1	1	0	cellular response to prostaglandin stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a prostagladin stimulus.
3	4	4	cellular response to prostaglandin E stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a prostagladin E stimulus.
1	2	4	cellular response to steroid hormone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a steroid hormone stimulus.
1	0	0	cellular response to corticosteroid stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a corticosteroid hormone stimulus. A corticosteroid is a steroid hormone that is produced in the adrenal cortex. Corticosteroids are involved in a wide range of physiologic systems such as stress response, immune response and regulation of inflammation, carbohydrate metabolism, protein catabolism, blood electrolyte levels, and behavior. They include glucocorticoids and mineralocorticoids.
2	5	2	cellular response to glucocorticoid stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glucocorticoid stimulus. Glucocorticoids are hormonal C21 corticosteroids synthesized from cholesterol with the ability to bind with the cortisol receptor and trigger similar effects. Glucocorticoids act primarily on carbohydrate and protein metabolism, and have anti-inflammatory effects.
0	0	1	cellular response to corticosterone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a corticosterone stimulus. Corticosterone is a 21 carbon steroid hormone of the corticosteroid type, produced in the cortex of the adrenal glands. In many species, corticosterone is the principal glucocorticoid, involved in regulation of fuel metabolism, immune reactions, and stress responses.
4	2	1	cellular response to estrogen stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of stimulus by an estrogen, C18 steroid hormones that can stimulate the development of female sexual characteristics.
7	2	5	cellular response to estradiol stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of stimulus by estradiol, a C18 steroid hormone hydroxylated at C3 and C17 that acts as a potent estrogen.
1	2	0	cellular response to progesterone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a progesterone stimulus.
0	0	3	cellular response to testosterone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a testosterone stimulus.
4	0	0	cellular response to jasmonic acid stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a jasmonic acid stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to lipid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a lipid stimulus.
2	4	0	cellular response to cholesterol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cholesterol stimulus.
2	2	2	cellular response to fatty acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fatty acid stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to oleic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an oleic acid stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to high density lipoprotein particle stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a high density lipoprotein particle stimulus.
2	8	0	cellular response to low-density lipoprotein particle stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a low-density lipoprotein particle stimulus.
8	0	7	cellular response to organic cyclic compound	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an organic cyclic compound stimulus.
0	1	1	cellular response to organonitrogen compound	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an organonitrogen stimulus. An organonitrogen compound is formally a compound containing at least one carbon-nitrogen bond.
1	1	0	cellular response to histamine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a histamine stimulus. Histamine, the biogenic amine 2-(1H-imidazol-4-yl)ethanamine, is involved in local immune responses as well as regulating physiological function in the gut and acting as a neurotransmitter.
1	0	0	manganese ion transmembrane transport	A process in which a manganese ion is transported from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	succinate transmembrane transport	The process in which succinate is transported across a membrane.
1	0	0	malate transmembrane transport	A process in which a malate ion is transported across a membrane.
1	3	1	hematopoietic stem cell proliferation	The expansion of a hematopoietic stem cell population by cell division. A hematopoietic stem cell is a stem cell from which all cells of the lymphoid and myeloid lineages develop.
0	0	2	clathrin complex	A protein complex that consists of three clathrin heavy chains and three clathrin light chains, organized into a symmetrical three-legged structure called a triskelion. In clathrin-coated vesicles clathrin is the main component of the coat and forms a polymeric mechanical scaffold on the vesicle surface.
0	0	1	regulation of histone H3-K14 acetylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of an acetyl group to histone H3 at position 14 of the histone.
0	1	0	negative regulation of histone H3-K14 acetylation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the addition of an acetyl group to histone H3 at position 14 of the histone.
1	0	3	cellular response to hydroperoxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydroperoxide stimulus. Hydroperoxides are monosubstitution products of hydrogen peroxide, HOOH.
1	0	0	cellular response to superoxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a superoxide stimulus. Superoxide is the anion, oxygen-, formed by addition of one electron to dioxygen (O2) or any compound containing the superoxide anion.
1	0	0	cellular response to oxygen levels	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus reflecting the presence, absence, or concentration of oxygen.
0	1	0	cellular response to anoxia	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating a decline in oxygen levels to trace amounts, <0.1%.
2	1	1	cellular response to hyperoxia	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating increased oxygen tension.
16	17	18	cellular response to hypoxia	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating lowered oxygen tension. Hypoxia, defined as a decline in O2 levels below normoxic levels of 20.8 - 20.95%, results in metabolic adaptation at both the cellular and organismal level.
1	1	0	integral component of cytoplasmic side of endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The component of the endoplasmic reticulum membrane consisting of the gene products that penetrate only the cytoplasmic side of the membrane.
1	3	0	protein localization to chromosome, centromeric region	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, the centromeric region of a chromosome.
0	1	0	cellular response to cell-matrix adhesion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of cell-matrix adhesion.
1	1	1	cellular response to redox state	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating redox state. Redox state refers to the balance of oxidized versus reduced forms of electron donors and acceptors in an organelle, cell or organ; plastoquinone, glutathione (GSH/GSSG), and nicotinamide nucleotides (NAD+/NADH and NADP+/NADPH) are among the most important.
0	1	1	cellular response to hydrostatic pressure	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydrostatic pressure stimulus. Hydrostatic pressure is the force acting on an object in a system where the fluid is at rest (as opposed to moving). The weight of the fluid above the object creates pressure on it.
1	1	1	cellular response to xenobiotic stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a xenobiotic compound stimulus. Xenobiotic compounds are compounds foreign to living organisms.
0	1	2	cellular response to acidic pH	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a pH stimulus with pH < 7. pH is a measure of the acidity or basicity of an aqueous solution.
0	4	1	cellular response to osmotic stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating an increase or decrease in the concentration of solutes outside the organism or cell.
1	1	0	cellular response to salt stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating an increase or decrease in the concentration of salt (particularly but not exclusively sodium and chloride ions) in the environment.
1	2	3	cellular hyperosmotic response	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of detection of, or exposure to, a hyperosmotic environment, i.e. an environment with a higher concentration of solutes than the organism or cell.
1	1	1	cellular hyperosmotic salinity response	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of detection of, or exposure to, an increase in the concentration of salt (particularly but not exclusively sodium and chloride ions) in the environment.
0	1	3	cellular hypotonic response	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of detection of, or exposure to, a hypotonic environment, i.e. an environment with a lower concentration of solutes than the organism or cell.
0	1	0	cellular hypotonic salinity response	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of detection of, or exposure to, a decrease in the concentration of salt (particularly but not exclusively sodium and chloride ions) in the environment.
0	1	0	cellular response to radiation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an electromagnetic radiation stimulus. Electromagnetic radiation is a propagating wave in space with electric and magnetic components. These components oscillate at right angles to each other and to the direction of propagation.
2	10	3	cellular response to ionizing radiation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a ionizing radiation stimulus. Ionizing radiation is radiation with sufficient energy to remove electrons from atoms and may arise from spontaneous decay of unstable isotopes, resulting in alpha and beta particles and gamma rays. Ionizing radiation also includes X-rays.
6	6	7	cellular response to gamma radiation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a gamma radiation stimulus. Gamma radiation is a form of electromagnetic radiation (EMR) or light emission of a specific frequency produced from sub-atomic particle interaction, such as electron-positron annihilation and radioactive decay. Gamma rays are generally characterized as EMR having the highest frequency and energy, and also the shortest wavelength, within the electromagnetic radiation spectrum.
1	0	5	cellular response to X-ray	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of X-ray radiation. An X-ray is a form of electromagnetic radiation with a wavelength in the range of 10 nanometers to 100 picometers (corresponding to frequencies in the range 30 PHz to 3 EHz).
0	1	0	cellular response to high light intensity	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a high light intensity stimulus.
1	1	0	cellular response to UV-A	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a UV-A radiation stimulus. UV-A radiation (UV-A light) spans the wavelengths 315 to 400 nm.
1	2	1	cellular response to UV-B	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a UV-B radiation stimulus. UV-B radiation (UV-B light) spans the wavelengths 280 to 315 nm.
0	1	0	cellular response to UV-C	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a UV-C radiation stimulus. UV-C radiation (UV-C light) spans the wavelengths 100 to 280 nm.
3	5	0	cellular response to fluid shear stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fluid shear stress stimulus. Fluid shear stress is the force acting on an object in a system where the fluid is moving across a solid surface.
2	0	0	cellular response to laminar fluid shear stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a laminar fluid shear stress stimulus. Laminar fluid flow is the force acting on an object in a system where the fluid is moving across a solid surface in parallel layers.
0	0	1	cellular response to nitrosative stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nitrosative stress stimulus. Nitrosative stress is a state often resulting from exposure to high levels of nitric oxide (NO) or the highly reactive oxidant peroxynitrite, which is produced following interaction of NO with superoxide anions.
1	0	0	cellular response to heparin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a heparin stimulus.
0	1	0	genetic imprinting	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving macromolecules by a mechanism that is mediated by DNA, is mitotically or meiotically heritable, or is stably self-propagated in the cytoplasm of a resting cell, and does not entail a change in DNA sequence.
1	0	0	maintenance of imprinting at mating-type locus	Any process involved in preserving the structure of a stable single-strand DNA lesion that triggers programmed gene conversion at the mating-type locus, thereby restricting mating-type interconversion to one of the two sister chromatids during DNA replication.
7	4	4	semaphorin-plexin signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of a semaphorin receptor (composed of a plexin and a neurophilin) binding to a semaphorin ligand.
1	0	0	cementum mineralization	The process in which calcium salts, mainly carbonated hydroxyapatite, are deposited into the initial acellular cementum.
0	0	1	ankyrin repeat binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an ankyrin repeat of a protein. Ankyrin repeats are tandemly repeated modules of about 33 amino acids; each repeat folds into a helix-loop-helix structure with a beta-hairpin/loop region projecting out from the helices at a 90-degree angle, and repeats stack to form an L-shaped structure.
1	0	0	RING-like zinc finger domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a RING-like zinc finger domain domain of a protein. The RING-like domain is a zinc finger domain that is related to the C3HC4 RING finger domain.
5	5	4	protein localization to centrosome	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, the centrosome.
0	2	0	eukaryotic translation initiation factor 3 complex, eIF3e	An eukaryotic translation initiation factor 3 complex that contains the PCI-domain protein eIF3e.
3	2	0	eukaryotic translation initiation factor 3 complex, eIF3m	An eukaryotic translation initiation factor 3 complex that contains the PCI-domain protein eIF3m.
2	0	0	dopaminergic neuron differentiation	The process in which a neuroblast acquires the specialized structural and functional features of a dopaminergic neuron, a neuron that secretes dopamine.
1	0	0	inositol phosphate catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of an inositol phosphate, 1,2,3,4,5,6-cyclohexanehexol, with one or more phosphate groups attached.
1	0	0	pi-body	A P granule that contains the PIWIL2-TDRD1 module, a set of proteins that act in the primary piRNA pathway. The pi-body corresponds to the cementing material between mitochondria found in gonocytes.
1	0	0	piP-body	A P granule that contains the PIWIL4-TDRD9 module, a set of proteins that act in the secondary piRNA pathway.
0	0	2	response to dexamethasone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a dexamethasone stimulus.
7	6	3	cellular response to dexamethasone stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a dexamethasone stimulus.
0	2	1	death-inducing signaling complex assembly	A process of protein complex assembly in which the arrangement and bonding together of the set of components that form the protein complex is mediated by a death domain (DD) interaction, as part of the extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
2	5	4	integral component of lumenal side of endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The component of the endoplasmic reticulum membrane consisting of the gene products that penetrate only the lumenal side of the membrane.
0	1	0	histone H3-K27 demethylation	The modification of histone H3 by the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 27 of the histone.
0	1	0	histone demethylase activity (H3-K27 specific)	Catalysis of the removal of a methyl group from lysine at position 27 of the histone H3 protein.
1	2	1	response to transforming growth factor beta	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a transforming growth factor beta stimulus.
7	12	4	cellular response to transforming growth factor beta stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a transforming growth factor beta stimulus.
0	1	0	nucleus-vacuole junction	An organelle membrane contact site formed between the vacuole membrane and the outer nuclear membrane. In S. cerevisiae these contacts are mediated through direct physical interaction between Vac8p and Nvj1p.
2	2	4	npBAF complex	A SWI/SNF-type complex that is found in neural stem or progenitor cells, and in human contains actin and proteins encoded by the ARID1A/BAF250A or ARID1B/BAF250B, SMARCD1/BAF60A, SMARCD3/BAF60C, SMARCA2/BRM/BAF190B, SMARCA4/BRG1/BAF190A, SMARCB1/BAF47, SMARCC1/BAF155, SMARCE1/BAF57, SMARCC2/BAF170, PHF10/BAF45A, ACTL6A/BAF53A genes. The npBAF complex is essential for the self-renewal/proliferative capacity of the multipotent neural stem cells.
3	2	5	nBAF complex	A SWI/SNF-type complex that is found in post-mitotic neurons, and in human contains actin and proteins encoded by the ARID1A/BAF250A or ARID1B/BAF250B, SMARCD1/BAF60A, SMARCD3/BAF60C, SMARCA2/BRM/BAF190B, SMARCA4/BRG1/BAF190A, SMARCB1/BAF47, SMARCC1/BAF155, SMARCE1/BAF57, SMARCC2/BAF170, DPF1/BAF45B, DPF3/BAF45C, ACTL6B/BAF53B genes. The nBAF complex along with CREST plays a role regulating the activity of genes essential for dendrite growth.
1	0	0	UFM1 activating enzyme activity	Catalysis of the activation of the small ubiquitin-related modifier UFM1, through the formation of an ATP-dependent high-energy thiolester bond.
0	1	0	UFM1 transferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of UFM1 from one protein to another via the reaction X-UFM1 + Y --> Y-UFM1 + X, where both X-UFM1 and Y-UFM1 are covalent linkages.
2	1	0	protein ufmylation	Covalent attachment of the ubiquitin-like protein UFM1 to another protein.
2	3	0	zinc ion transmembrane transport	A process in which a zinc II ion is transported from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	0	zinc ion import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of zinc(2+) ions from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	1	0	negative regulation of zinc ion transmembrane import	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of zinc ion import.
0	1	0	detoxification of cadmium ion	Any process that reduces or removes the toxicity of cadmium ion. These may include transport of cadmium away from sensitive areas and to compartments or complexes whose purpose is sequestration of cadmium ion.
0	0	2	lymphocyte aggregation	The adhesion of one lymphocyte to one or more other lymphocytes via adhesion molecules.
1	1	0	ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process via the N-end rule pathway	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide covalently tagged with ubiquitin, via the N-end rule pathway. In the N-end rule pathway, destabilizing N-terminal residues (N-degrons) in substrates are recognized by E3 ligases (N-recognins), whereupon the substrates are linked to ubiquitin and then delivered to the proteasome for degradation.
0	1	0	otic vesicle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the otic vesicle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The otic vesicle is a transient embryonic structure formed during development of the vertebrate inner ear.
0	0	1	endothelial cell-cell adhesion	The attachment of an endothelial cell to another endothelial cell via adhesion molecules.
0	1	0	transforming growth factor beta production	The appearance of any member of the transforming growth factor-beta family of cytokines due to biosynthesis or secretion following a cellular stimulus, resulting in an increase in its intracellular or extracellular levels. Transforming growth factor-beta family members include TGF-B1, TGF-B2, and TGF-B3.
1	0	0	lysophospholipid acyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of acyl groups from an acyl-CoA to a lysophospholipid.
0	0	1	granulocyte chemotaxis	The movement of a granulocyte in response to an external stimulus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of granulocyte chemotaxis	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of granulocyte chemotaxis. Granulocyte chemotaxis is the movement of a granulocyte in response to an external stimulus.
1	1	4	vocalization behavior	The behavior in which an organism produces sounds by a mechanism involving its respiratory system.
0	1	0	nuclear protein quality control by the ubiquitin-proteasome system	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of misfolded proteins via a mechanism in which the proteins are transported to the nucleus for ubiquitination, and then targeted to proteasomes for degradation.
1	1	1	negative regulation of transforming growth factor beta production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of transforming growth factor-beta.
1	0	0	positive regulation of transforming growth factor beta production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of transforming growth factor-beta.
0	1	1	negative regulation of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of monocyte chemotactic protein-1.
3	1	1	positive regulation of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of monocyte chemotactic protein-1.
0	0	1	negative regulation of macrophage inflammatory protein 1 alpha production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of macrophage inflammatory protein 1 alpha.
1	0	1	negative regulation of chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 5 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 5.
0	1	1	positive regulation of chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 5 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 5.
1	0	0	negative regulation of granulocyte colony-stimulating factor production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of granulocyte colony stimulating factor.
2	0	0	negative regulation of IP-10 production	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of production of IP-10.
0	0	1	positive regulation of IP-10 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of IP-10.
2	0	0	positive regulation of granzyme B production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of production of granzyme B.
1	0	0	catenin-TCF7L2 complex	A protein complex that contains a catenin and TCF7L2 (TCF4), binds to the TCF DNA motif within a promoter element, and is involved in the regulation of WNT target gene transcription.
0	0	1	gamma-catenin-TCF7L2 complex	A protein complex that contains gamma-catenin and TCF7L2 (TCF4), binds to the TCF DNA motif within a promoter element, and is involved in the regulation of WNT target gene transcription.
0	1	0	smooth muscle cell chemotaxis	The directed movement of a smooth muscle cell in response to an external stimulus.
1	1	0	negative regulation of smooth muscle cell chemotaxis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate, or extent of smooth muscle cell chemotaxis.
1	0	0	positive regulation of smooth muscle cell chemotaxis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate, or extent of smooth muscle cell chemotaxis.
1	1	0	mononuclear cell migration	The movement of a mononuclear cell within or between different tissues and organs of the body.
1	1	0	positive regulation of mononuclear cell migration	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of mononuclear cell migration. Mononuclear cell migration is the movement of a mononuclear cell within or between different tissues and organs of the body.
0	1	0	olfactory bulb axon guidance	The process in which the migration of an axon growth cone of a neuron in the olfactory bulb is directed to its target in the brain in response to a combination of attractive and repulsive cues.
1	0	2	commissural neuron axon guidance	The process in which the migration of an axon growth cone of a commissural neuron is directed to its target in the brain in response to a combination of attractive and repulsive cues.
1	1	3	cellular response to indole-3-methanol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an indole-3-methanol stimulus.
2	4	7	endocytic vesicle lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of an endocytic vesicle.
0	0	1	cardiac muscle thin filament assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins to form the actin-based thin filaments of myofibrils in cardiac muscle.
0	1	0	protein transport within extracellular region	The directed movement of proteins in the extracellular region, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	immunoglobulin heavy chain V-D-J recombination	The process in which immunoglobulin heavy chain V, D, and J gene segments are recombined within a single locus utilizing the conserved heptamer and nonomer recombination signal sequences (RSS).
0	0	2	membrane assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a membrane.
4	3	1	basement membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the basement membrane.
2	0	3	ER-associated misfolded protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of misfolded proteins transported from the endoplasmic reticulum and targeted to cytoplasmic proteasomes for degradation.
0	1	0	icosanoid transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of icosanoids from one side of a membrane to the other.
3	3	0	leukotriene transport	The directed movement of leukotrienes into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore. Leukotrienes are linear C20 endogenous metabolites of arachidonic acid (icosa-5,8,11,14-tetraenoic acid) containing a terminal carboxy function and four or more double bonds (three or more of which are conjugated) as well as other functional groups.
1	0	0	lipopeptide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a lipopeptide, any of a group of organic compounds comprising two or more amino acids linked by peptide bonds and containing a nonprotein group consisting of a lipid or lipids.
1	0	0	cellular response to diacyl bacterial lipopeptide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a diacylated bacterial lipopeptide stimulus.
1	0	0	cellular response to triacyl bacterial lipopeptide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a triacylated bacterial lipopeptide stimulus.
2	0	3	cellular response to nitric oxide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nitric oxide stimulus.
0	0	1	transcriptional activation by promoter-enhancer looping	The formation and maintenance of DNA loops that juxtapose the promoter and enhancer regions of RNA polymerase II-transcribed genes and activate transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter.
2	0	1	monomeric IgA immunoglobulin complex	A protein complex composed of two identical immunoglobulin heavy chains of an IgA isotype and two identical immunoglobulin light chains, held together by disulfide bonds, and present in the extracellular space, in mucosal areas or other tissues, or circulating in the blood or lymph.
1	0	0	dimeric IgA immunoglobulin complex	A protein complex composed of two monomeric IgA immunoglobulin complexes linked through both direct disulfide bonds and through a disulfide binded monomer of J chain acting as a bridge. Each IgA monomer consists of two identical immunoglobulin heavy chains of an IgA isotype and two identical immunoglobulin light chains, held together by disulfide bonds. Dimeric IgA is sometimes complexed additionally with secretory component, and present in the extracellular space, in mucosal areas or other tissues, or circulating in the blood or lymph.
2	1	1	secretory IgA immunoglobulin complex	A polymeric IgA immunoglobulin complex that is complexed with one chain of secretory component (SC). Polymeric IgA is present in mucosal areas, having been transported via a transcytosis mechanism in mucosal epithelial cells relying on the polymeric Ig receptor, a portion of which then remains bound to the polymeric IgA as secretory component.
2	0	1	secretory dimeric IgA immunoglobulin complex	A dimeric form of secretory IgA immunoglobulin complex.
1	0	1	pentameric IgM immunoglobulin complex	A circulating form of IgM consisting of a pentamer of IgM core units with a single J chain polypeptide.
0	0	1	hexameric IgM immunoglobulin complex	A circulating form of IgM consisting of a hexamer of IgM core units with a single J chain polypeptide.
0	0	2	nuclear membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the nuclear inner or outer membrane.
0	1	0	nuclear inner membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the nuclear inner membrane.
4	2	0	cellular response to BMP stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a bone morphogenetic protein (BMP) stimulus.
0	1	1	response to fibroblast growth factor	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fibroblast growth factor stimulus.
2	7	2	endoplasmic reticulum tubular network	A subcompartment of the endoplasmic reticulum consisting of tubules having membranes with high curvature in cross-section.
1	4	2	endoplasmic reticulum tubular network organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) tubular network. The ER tubular network is the ER part that that has membranes with high curvature in cross-section.
0	0	2	endoplasmic reticulum tubular network formation	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) tubular network. The ER tubular network is the ER part that comprises the membranes with high curvature in cross-section.
0	1	0	endoplasmic reticulum tubular network maintenance	The organization process that preserves the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) tubular network in a stable functional or structural state. The ER tubular network is the ER part that comprises the membranes with high curvature in cross-section.
0	1	0	chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 5 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with chemokine (C-C motif) ligand 5.
1	0	0	K11-linked polyubiquitin modification-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon poly-ubiquitination formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 11 in the target protein.
1	1	0	K6-linked polyubiquitin modification-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon poly-ubiquitination formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 6 in the target protein.
1	1	0	LUBAC complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex that catalyzes linear head-to-tail polyubiquitin conjugation on its targets. In human the complex consists of RBCK1, RNF31 and SHARPIN, and has an MW of approximately 600 kDa, suggesting a heteromultimeric assembly of its subunits. LUBAC stands for Linear Ubiquitin Chain Assembly Complex.
2	0	1	cellular response to prostaglandin D stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a prostagladin D stimulus.
1	1	2	podosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a podosome, an actin-rich adhesion structure characterized by formation upon cell substrate contact and localization at the substrate-attached part of the cell.
0	1	1	regulation of podosome assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of podosome assembly.
1	2	3	positive regulation of podosome assembly	Any process that activates or increases the rate or extent of podosome assembly.
6	2	8	potassium ion transmembrane transport	A process in which a potassium ion is transported from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	0	1	lipoprotein particle binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a lipoprotein particle. A lipoprotein particle, also known as a lipoprotein, is a clathrate complex consisting of a lipid enwrapped in a protein host without covalent binding in such a way that the complex has a hydrophilic outer surface consisting of all the protein and the polar ends of any phospholipids.
3	1	2	tail-anchored membrane protein insertion into ER membrane	A process of protein insertion into the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) membrane in which a tail-anchored (TA) transmembrane protein is incorporated into an endoplasmic reticulum (ER) membrane. TA transmembrane protein, also named type II transmembrane proteins, contain a single C- terminal transmembrane region.
0	0	1	MMXD complex	A protein complex that contains the proteins MMS19, MIP18 and XPD, localizes to mitotic spindle during mitosis, and is required for proper chromosome segregation.
1	0	1	BAT3 complex	A protein complex consisting of BAT3 (BAG6) and its cofactors. In mammals these cofactors are TRC35 (GET4) and UBL4A. It facilitates tail-anchored protein capture by ASNA1/TRC4 and also chaperones polypeptides from the endoplasmic reticulum retrotranslocation machinery to the proteasome, maintaining the solubility of substrates to improve ER-associated protein degradation (ERAD).
0	1	0	DUBm complex	A protein complex that forms part of SAGA-type complexes SAGA and SLIK, and mediates deubiquitination of histone H2B. In S. cerevisiae, the DUBm consists of the proteins Ubp8p, Sgf11p, Sus1p, and Sgf73p.
1	0	0	N-box binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an N-box, a DNA motif with the consensus sequence CACNAG that is found in the promoters of genes expressed preferentially at synapses.
1	0	0	triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle clearance	The process in which a triglyceride-rich lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
1	0	0	intermediate-density lipoprotein particle clearance	The process in which a intermediate-density lipoprotein particle is removed from the blood via receptor-mediated endocytosis and its constituent parts degraded.
1	2	1	HMG box domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an HMG box domain, a protein domain that consists of three helices in an irregular array. HMG-box domains are found in one or more copies in HMG-box proteins, which form a large, diverse family involved in the regulation of DNA-dependent processes such as transcription, replication, and strand repair, all of which require the bending and unwinding of chromatin.
2	0	0	actin filament debranching	An actin filament severing process that results in the removal of actin filament branches specifically at the branch points.
3	3	1	mitotic cell cycle arrest	The process in which the mitotic cell cycle is halted during one of the normal phases (G1, S, G2, M).
0	2	1	positive regulation of cell proliferation in bone marrow	A process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell proliferation in the bone marrow.
1	2	1	cellular response to catecholamine stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a catecholamine stimulus. A catecholamine is any of a group of biogenic amines that includes 4-(2-aminoethyl)pyrocatechol [4-(2-aminoethyl)benzene-1,2-diol] and derivatives formed by substitution.
2	0	7	cellular response to epinephrine stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an epinephrine stimulus. Epinephrine is a catecholamine that has the formula C9H13NO3; it is secreted by the adrenal medulla to act as a hormone, and released by certain neurons to act as a neurotransmitter active in the central nervous system.
1	1	2	adrenergic receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an adrenergic receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
0	0	1	positive regulation of adenylate cyclase-activating adrenergic receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the adenylate cyclase-activating adrenergic receptor protein signaling pathway. An adrenergic receptor signaling pathway is the series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an adrenergic receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
2	1	1	adenylate cyclase-activating adrenergic receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an adrenergic receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation of adenylyl cyclase and a subsequent increase in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
1	0	0	adenylate cyclase-inhibiting adrenergic receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an adrenergic receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with inhibition of adenylyl cyclase and a subsequent decrease in the concentration of cyclic AMP (cAMP).
1	0	0	phospholipase C-activating adrenergic receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an adrenergic receptor binding to its physiological ligand, where the pathway proceeds with activation of phospholipase C (PLC) and a subsequent release of inositol trisphosphate (IP3) and diacylglycerol (DAG).
1	0	0	leukocyte apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a leukocyte, an achromatic cell of the myeloid or lymphoid lineages capable of ameboid movement, found in blood or other tissue.
0	0	1	macrophage apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a macrophage, a mononuclear phagocyte present in a variety of tissues.
3	12	11	14-3-3 protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a 14-3-3 protein. A 14-3-3 protein is any of a large family of approximately 30kDa acidic proteins which exist primarily as homo- and heterodimers within all eukaryotic cells, and have been implicated in the modulation of distinct biological processes by binding to specific phosphorylated sites on diverse target proteins, thereby forcing conformational changes or influencing interactions between their targets and other molecules. Each 14-3-3 protein sequence can be roughly divided into three sections: a divergent amino terminus, the conserved core region and a divergent carboxy-terminus. The conserved middle core region of the 14-3-3s encodes an amphipathic groove that forms the main functional domain, a cradle for interacting with client proteins.
0	0	1	histone H2B conserved C-terminal lysine ubiquitination	A histone ubiquitination process in which a ubiquitin monomer is added to a conserved lysine residue in the C-terminus of histone H2B. The conserved lysine residue is K119 in fission yeast, K123 in budding yeast, or K120 in mammals.
0	1	3	protein localization to adherens junction	Any process in which a protein is transported to, and/or maintained at the adherens junction.
1	4	3	DNA biosynthetic process	The cellular DNA metabolic process resulting in the formation of DNA, deoxyribonucleic acid, one of the two main types of nucleic acid, consisting of a long unbranched macromolecule formed from one or two strands of linked deoxyribonucleotides, the 3'-phosphate group of each constituent deoxyribonucleotide being joined in 3',5'-phosphodiester linkage to the 5'-hydroxyl group of the deoxyribose moiety of the next one.
0	1	0	negative regulation of estrogen receptor binding	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of estrogen receptor binding, interacting selectively with an estrogen receptor.
1	1	0	regulation of protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of protein serine/threonine kinase activity.
3	2	2	negative regulation of protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of protein serine/threonine kinase activity.
3	3	13	positive regulation of protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of protein serine/threonine kinase activity.
1	0	0	determination of intestine left/right asymmetry	Determination of the asymmetric location of the intestine loops with respect to the left and right halves of the organism.
1	0	0	determination of stomach left/right asymmetry	Determination of the asymmetric location of the stomach with respect to the left and right halves of the organism.
1	1	0	determination of liver left/right asymmetry	Determination of the asymmetric location of the liver with respect to the left and right halves of the organism.
1	0	0	citrate secondary active transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of citrate from one side of a membrane to the other, up its concentration gradient. The transporter binds the solute and undergoes a series of conformational changes. Transport works equally well in either direction and is driven by a chemiosmotic source of energy. Secondary active transporters include symporters and antiporters.
1	0	1	prominosome	An extracellular membrane-bounded vesicle that contains prominin proteins (in mouse Prom1/CD33 or Prom2) and are found in body fluids including ventricular fluid, saliva, urine and seminal fluid. In the ventricular fluid of the developing mouse brain two major classes of these particles have been observed (P2 particles of 500-1000 nm and P4 particles of 50-80 nm) which likely originate from microvilli, primary cilia and/or the midbody of neuroepithelial cells. The physiological role is not known.
0	1	0	dipeptide transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a dipeptide from one side of a membrane to the other. A dipeptide is a combination of two amino acids linked together by a peptide (-CO-NH-) bond.
0	1	0	G-quadruplex DNA formation	A DNA metabolic process that results in the formation of G-quadruplex DNA structures, in which groups of four guanines adopt a flat, cyclic Hoogsteen hydrogen-bonding arrangement known as a guanine tetrad or G-quartet. The stacking of several layers of G-quartets forms G-quadruplexes, in which one or more DNA single strands are assembled in parallel and/or antiparallel, with interactions that can be either intra- or intermolecular in nature.
1	0	1	cleavage body	A nuclear body that contains proteins involved in pre-mRNA 3'-end cleavage and polyadenylation, such as DDX1, CSTF2 and CPSFs, as well as the transcription factors TFIIE and TFIIF. Cleavage bodies are localized adjacent to Cajal bodies and are involved in mRNA3'-end processing.
0	0	1	cohesin loading	The protein localization to chromatin by which a cohesin ring complex is topologically linked to DNA.
0	2	1	regulation of cohesin loading	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a process in which a cohesin complex is transported to, or maintained at, a part of a chromosome that is organized into chromatin.
1	0	0	endocannabinoid signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an endocannabinoid binding to a cell surface receptor. The pathway proceeds with the receptor transmitting the signal to a heterotrimeric G-protein complex and ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription. Endocannabinoids are small molecules derived from arachidonic acid, anandamide (arachidonoylethanolamide) and 2-arachidonoylglycerol.
0	1	0	alpha-tubulin acetylation	The addition of an acetyl group to the lysine 40 residue of alpha-tubulin.
1	1	0	negative regulation of transcription involved in G1/S transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any process that stop, prevents or decreases transcription as part of the G1/S transition of the mitotic cell cycle.
3	3	0	Arp2/3 complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an Arp2/3 complex, a protein complex that contains two actin-related proteins, Arp2 and Arp3, and five novel proteins (ARPC1-5).
0	0	2	XPC complex	A nucleotide-excision repair complex that is involved in damage sensing during global genome nucleotide excision repair (GG-NER). It is part of the pre-incision (or initial recognition) complex bound to sites of DNA damage. In human, it is composed of XPC, RAD23B and CETN2.
7	4	17	cell periphery	The part of a cell encompassing the cell cortex, the plasma membrane, and any external encapsulating structures.
1	1	1	protein deubiquitination involved in ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	The removal of one or more ubiquitin groups from a protein as part of a process of ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolism.
7	4	3	FAD binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the oxidized form, FAD, of flavin-adenine dinucleotide, the coenzyme or the prosthetic group of various flavoprotein oxidoreductase enzymes.
1	1	0	elastic fiber	An supramolecular fiber that consists of an insoluble core of polymerized tropoelastin monomers and a surrounding mantle of microfibrils. Elastic fibers provide elasticity and recoiling to tissues and organs, and maintain structural integrity against mechanical strain.
0	2	0	recycling endosome to Golgi transport	The directed movement of substances from recycling endosomes to the Golgi.
0	1	0	mitotic sister chromatid cohesion, centromeric	The cell cycle process in which centromeres of sister chromatids are joined during mitosis.
0	0	1	establishment or maintenance of cell polarity regulating cell shape	Any cellular process that results in the specification, formation or maintenance of a polarized intracellular organization or cell growth patterns that regulate the shape of a cell.
0	1	0	cell gliding	Cell motility that results in the smooth movement of a cell along a solid surface.
4	2	0	multivesicular body sorting pathway	A vesicle-mediated transport process in which transmembrane proteins are ubiquitylated to facilitate their entry into luminal vesicles of multivesicular bodies (MVBs); upon subsequent fusion of MVBs with lysosomes or vacuoles, the cargo proteins are degraded.
1	3	0	Ragulator complex	A eukaryotically conserved protein complex; in humans, it is comprised of LAMTOR1, LAMTOR2, LAMTOR3, LAMTOR4, and LAMTOR5. The complex is anchored to lipid rafts in late endosome membranes via LAMTOR1, constitutes a guanine nucleotide exchange factor (GEF) for the Rag GTPases.
1	3	0	WD40-repeat domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a WD40 repeat domain of a protein. The WD40 repeat is a short structural motif of approximately 40 amino acids, often terminating in a tryptophan-aspartic acid (W-D) dipeptide. Several of these repeats are combined to form a type of protein domain called the WD domain.
1	3	1	nephron development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the nephron over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A nephron is the functional unit of the kidney.
1	0	0	glomerular endothelium development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the glomerular endothelium over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The glomerular endothelium is an epithelial tissue that covers the internal surfaces of the glomerulus.
1	0	0	glomerulus vasculature development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of a glomerulus vasculature from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of the glomerulus vasculature and ends with the mature structure. The glomerulus vasculature is composed of the tubule structures that carry blood or lymph in the glomerulus.
0	1	0	proximal tubule development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the proximal tubule over time, from its formation to the mature structure. In mammals, the proximal tubule is a nephron tubule that connects Bowman's capsule to the descending thin limb of the loop of Henle. It has a brush border epithelial morphology.
2	2	2	glomerular visceral epithelial cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a glomerular visceral epithelial cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A glomerular visceral epithelial cell is a specialized epithelial cell that contains 'feet' that interdigitate with the 'feet' of other glomerular epithelial cells.
1	0	0	renal vesicle induction	Signaling at short range between cells of the ureteric bud terminus and the kidney mesenchyme that positively regulates the formation of the renal vesicle.
1	0	0	collecting duct development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a collecting duct over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The collecting duct responds to vasopressin and aldosterone to regulate water, electrolyte and acid-base balance. It is the final common path through which urine flows before entering the ureter and then emptying into the bladder.
1	0	0	comma-shaped body morphogenesis	The process in which the comma-shaped body is generated and organized. The comma-shaped body is the precursor structure to the S-shaped body that contributes to the morphogenesis of the nephron.
1	0	0	S-shaped body morphogenesis	The process in which the S-shaped body is generated and organized. The S-shaped body is the successor of the comma-shaped body that contributes to the morphogenesis of the nephron.
1	0	0	juxtaglomerular apparatus development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the juxtaglomerular apparatus over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The juxtaglomerular apparatus is an anatomical structure that lies adjacent to the glomerulus and regulates kidney function.
0	1	0	inner medullary collecting duct development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the inner medullary collecting duct over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The inner medullary collecting duct is the portion of the collecting duct that lies in the renal inner medulla.
1	0	1	kidney epithelium development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an epithelium in the kidney over time, from its formation to the mature structure. An epithelium is a tissue that covers the internal or external surfaces of an anatomical structure.
0	1	1	metanephric mesenchyme development	The biological process whose specific outcome is the progression of a metanephric mesenchyme from an initial condition to its mature state. This process begins with the formation of metanephric mesenchyme and ends with the mature structure. Metanephric mesenchyme is the tissue made up of loosely connected mesenchymal cells in the metanephros.
0	0	1	stem cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of stem cells, resulting in the expansion of a stem cell population. A stem cell is a cell that retains the ability to divide and proliferate throughout life to provide progenitor cells that can differentiate into specialized cells.
0	3	1	regulation of stem cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell proliferation. A stem cell is a cell that retains the ability to divide and proliferate throughout life to provide progenitor cells that can differentiate into specialized cells.
2	0	0	ureteric bud invasion	The process in which the ureteric bud grows along its axis and contributes to the formation of the metanephros.
0	2	0	glomerulus morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the glomerulus are generated and organized. The glomerulus is a capillary tuft surrounded by Bowman's capsule in nephrons of the vertebrate kidney.
0	1	0	glomerular capillary formation	The process that gives rise to a glomerular capillary. This process pertains to the initial formation of a structure from unspecified parts.
1	1	0	ureteric peristalsis	A wavelike sequence of involuntary muscular contraction and relaxation that passes along the ureter, impelling the contents onwards. The ureter is one of a pair of thick-walled tubes that transports urine from the kidney pelvis to the urinary bladder.
1	0	0	cell proliferation involved in kidney development	The multiplication or reproduction of cells, resulting in the expansion of the population in the kidney.
1	0	1	glomerular visceral epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a glomerular visceral epithelial cell. A glomerular visceral epithelial cell is a specialized epithelial cell that contains 'feet' that interdigitate with the 'feet' of other glomerular epithelial cells.
0	0	1	metanephric mesenchymal cell proliferation involved in metanephros development	The multiplication or reproduction of cells, resulting in the expansion of a metanephric mesenchymal cell population.
1	0	0	condensed mesenchymal cell proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of cells, resulting in the expansion of a condensed mesenchymal cell population. A condensed mesenchymal cell population is a population of adherent mesenchymal cells.
1	0	0	mesenchymal cell proliferation involved in ureteric bud development	The multiplication or reproduction of cells, resulting in the expansion of a mesenchymal cell population of the ureteric bud, that contributes to ureteric bud development.
1	0	0	glomerular parietal epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a glomerular parietal epithelial cell. Glomerular parietal epithelial cells are specialized epithelial cells that form tight junctions as a barrier to protein transport.
1	0	0	renal interstitial fibroblast development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a renal interstitial fibroblast over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	1	glomerular mesangial cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a glomerular mesangial cell in the kidney over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	distal tubule morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a distal tubule are generated and organized. The distal tubule is a nephron tubule that begins at the macula densa and extends to the connecting tubule.
0	2	0	nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the cells of the nephron tubule as it progresses from its formation to the mature state.
0	0	1	metanephric mesenchymal cell differentiation	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the mesenchymal cells of the metanephros as it progresses from its formation to the mature state.
0	1	0	mesonephric tubule development	The progression of a mesonephric tubule over time, from its initial formation to the mature structure. A mesonephric tubule is an epithelial tube that is part of the mesonephros.
1	0	0	epithelial tube formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of an epithelial tube.
0	1	0	mesonephric duct development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a mesonephric duct over time, from its initial formation to a mature structure. A mesonephric duct is a tube drains the mesonephros.
2	0	0	nephric duct morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the nephric duct are generated and organized. A nephric duct is a tube that drains a primitive kidney.
1	0	0	mesonephric duct morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the mesonephric duct are generated and organized. A mesonephric duct is a tube drains the mesonephros.
0	0	1	regulation of nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation.
1	0	1	ureter development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the ureter over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The ureter is a muscular tube that transports urine from the kidney to the urinary bladder or from the Malpighian tubule to the hindgut.
1	0	0	ureter urothelium development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the urothelium of the ureter over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The urothelium is an epithelium that makes up the epithelial tube of the ureter.
1	0	0	ureter smooth muscle cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a smooth muscle cell in the ureter.
1	1	0	ureter morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the ureter are generated and organized. The ureter is a muscular tube that transports urine from the kidney to the urinary bladder.
1	0	0	cell differentiation involved in metanephros development	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the cells of the metanephros as it progresses from its formation to the mature state.
1	0	0	cell proliferation involved in metanephros development	The multiplication or reproduction of cells, resulting in the expansion of the population in the metanephros.
1	2	0	metanephric collecting duct development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a collecting duct in the metanephros over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The collecting duct responds to vasopressin and aldosterone to regulate water, electrolyte and acid-base balance. The collecting duct is the final common path through which urine flows before entering the ureter and then emptying into the bladder.
0	1	0	metanephric smooth muscle tissue development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of smooth muscle in the metanephros over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	metanephric cortex development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephric cortex over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric cortex is the outer region of the metanephros.
2	1	0	metanephric ascending thin limb development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a metanephric ascending thin limb over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric ascending thin limb is a segment of a nephron tubule in the metanephros lying in the inner medulla that is permeable to ions but not to water and has a simple epithelium; active transepithelial solute transport is absent.
0	1	0	metanephric cortical collecting duct development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephric cortical collecting duct over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric cortical collecting duct is the portion of the metanephric collecting duct that resides in the renal cortex.
1	0	0	metanephric distal convoluted tubule development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephric distal convoluted tubule over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric distal convoluted tubule is the first segment of the metanephric nephron lying just downstream from the loop of Henle, immediately after the macula densa. Among other functions, in humans it is responsible for the reabsorption of about 5% of filtered sodium via the thiazide-sensitive Na-Cl symporter.
1	0	0	metanephric glomerulus development	The progression of the metanephric glomerulus over time from its initial formation until its mature state. The metanephric glomerulus is a capillary tuft which forms a close network with the visceral epithelium (podocytes) and the mesangium to form the filtration barrier and is surrounded by Bowman's capsule in nephrons of the mature vertebrate kidney, or metanephros.
1	0	0	metanephric macula densa development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephric macula densa over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric macula densa is an area of specialized cells in the distal tubule of the metanephros that makes contact with the vascular pole of the glomerulus.
2	0	0	metanephric thick ascending limb development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephric thick ascending limb over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric thick ascending limb is the last part of the metanephric loop of Henle. Its thick, mitochondria-rich epithelium characterizes the outer medulla, and is responsible for very avid active salt transport. At the macula densa, the thick ascending limb connects to the distal convoluted tubule.
0	1	0	metanephric distal tubule development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephric distal tubule over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric distal tubule is a metanephric nephron tubule that begins at the metanephric macula densa and extends to the metanephric connecting tubule.
1	0	0	metanephric loop of Henle development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephric loop of Henle over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric loop of Henle is a metanephric nephron tubule that connects the proximal convoluted tubule to the distal convoluted tubule in the metanephros.
1	0	0	metanephric DCT cell differentiation	The process in which relatively unspecialized cells acquire specialized structural and/or functional features that characterize the distal convoluted tubule cells of the metanephros as it progresses from its formation to the mature state.
0	1	0	metanephric glomerular visceral epithelial cell development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a metanephric glomerular visceral epithelial cell over time, from its formation to the mature structure. A metanephric glomerular visceral epithelial cell is a specialized epithelial cell that contains 'feet' that interdigitate with the 'feet' of other glomerular epithelial cells in the metanephros.
0	1	0	metanephric glomerular basement membrane development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the metanephric glomerular basement membrane over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The metanephric glomerular basement membrane is the basal laminal portion of the metanephric glomerulus which performs the actual filtration.
2	0	0	metanephric nephron tubule morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a metanephric nephron tubule are generated and organized. A metanephric nephron tubule is an epithelial tube that is part of the metanephric nephron, the functional part of the metanephros.
0	1	0	metanephric S-shaped body morphogenesis	The process in which the metanephric S-shaped body is generated and organized. The metanephric S-shaped body is the successor of the metanephric comma-shaped body that contributes to the morphogenesis of a nephron in the metanephros.
1	0	0	metanephric nephron tubule formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of a metanephric nephron tubule from unspecified parts. A metanephric nephron tubule is an epithelial tube that is part of a nephron in the metanephros.
0	0	2	regulation of metanephric nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of metanephric nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of metanephric nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of metanephric nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation.
0	0	1	clathrin coat disassembly	The disaggregation of a clathrin coat into its constituent components; results in stripping or removing the clathrin coat from clathrin-coated vesicles (CCV) before fusing with their targets. CVVs transport cargo from plasma membrane and trans-Golgi to the endosomal system.
0	1	0	vesicle uncoating	A protein depolymerization process that results in the disassembly of vesicle coat proteins.
0	1	1	volume-sensitive chloride channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a chloride ion by a volume-sensitive channel. A volume-sensitive channel is a channel that responds to changes in the volume of a cell.
2	0	2	chaperone-mediated protein transport	The directed movement of proteins into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, mediated by chaperone molecules that bind to the transported proteins.
0	1	0	signal transduction by p53 class mediator	An intracellular signaling process that is induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53 or an equivalent protein.
2	4	6	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway by p53 class mediator	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway is induced by the cell cycle regulator phosphoprotein p53, or an equivalent protein, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
1	1	1	modified amino acid binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a modified amino acid.
0	1	1	rescue of stalled ribosome	A process of translational elongation that takes place when a ribosome has stalled during translation, and results in freeing the ribosome from the stalled translation complex.
1	0	0	NAADP-sensitive calcium-release channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a calcium ion by a channel that opens when nicotinic acid adenine dinucleotide phosphate (NAADP) has been bound by the channel complex or one of its constituent parts.
1	0	0	response to anesthetic	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an anesthetic stimulus. An anesthetic is a substance that causes loss of feeling, awareness, or sensation.
0	1	0	tricarboxylic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving dicarboxylic acids, any organic acid containing three carboxyl (COOH) groups or anions (COO-).
0	1	0	histone kinase activity (H3-T3 specific)	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group to the threonine-3 residue of the N-terminal tail of histone H3.
0	1	0	chromosome passenger complex localization to kinetochore	A cellular protein complex localization that acts on a chromosome passenger complex; as a result, the complex is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location at the kinetochore. A chromosome passenger complex is a protein complex that contains the BIR-domain-containing protein Survivin, Aurora B kinase, INCENP and Borealin, and coordinates various events based on its location to different structures during the course of mitosis.
1	0	5	PTW/PP1 phosphatase complex	A protein serine/threonine phosphatase complex that contains a catalytic subunit (PPP1CA, PPP1CB or PPP1CC) and the regulatory subunits PPP1R10 (PNUTS), TOX4 and WDR82, and plays a role in the control of chromatin structure and cell cycle progression during the transition from mitosis into interphase.
1	2	0	circulatory system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the circulatory system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The circulatory system is the organ system that passes nutrients (such as amino acids and electrolytes), gases, hormones, blood cells, etc. to and from cells in the body to help fight diseases and help stabilize body temperature and pH to maintain homeostasis.
0	0	1	blood coagulation, common pathway	A protein activation cascade that contributes to blood coagulation and consists of events leading from the formation of activated factor X to the formation of active thrombin, the cleavage of fibrinogen by thrombin, and the formation of cleaved fibrin into a stable multimeric, cross-linked complex.
0	1	4	blood coagulation, fibrin clot formation	A protein activation cascade that contributes to blood coagulation and consists of the cascade of enzymatic reactions initiated by physical damage to the wall of a blood vessel, leading to the formation of a formation of a fibrin clot at the site of the injury. The process also includes numerous positive and negative regulatory events.
0	1	1	TRC complex	An ER membrane insertion complex that contains subunits that recognize two types of transmembrane domain signals. In budding yeast the complex contains Get4p, Get5p, Sgt2p, and at least two heat shock proteins (HSPs).
0	0	1	minus-end-directed vesicle transport along microtubule	The directed movement of a vesicle towards the minus end of a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins. This process begins with the attachment of a vesicle to a microtubule, and ends when the vesicle reaches its final destination.
2	1	1	plus-end-directed vesicle transport along microtubule	The directed movement of a vesicle towards the plus end of a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins. This process begins with the attachment of a vesicle to a microtubule, and ends when the vesicle reaches its final destination.
2	0	2	organelle transport along microtubule	The directed movement of an organelle along a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins. This process begins with the attachment of an organelle to a microtubule, and ends when the organelle reaches its final destination.
0	3	0	minus-end-directed organelle transport along microtubule	The directed movement of an organelle towards the minus end of a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins. This process begins with the attachment of an organelle to a microtubule, and ends when the organelle reaches its final destination.
0	0	1	plus-end-directed organelle transport along microtubule	The directed movement of an organelle towards the plus end of a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins. This process begins with the attachment of an organelle to a microtubule, and ends when the organelle reaches its final destination.
0	0	1	flavin adenine dinucleotide catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of flavin adenine dinucleotide, which acts as a coenzyme or prosthetic group of various flavoprotein oxidoreductase enzymes.
0	2	0	microtubule anchoring at microtubule organizing center	Any process in which a microtubule is maintained in a specific location in a cell by attachment to a microtubule organizing center.
0	1	0	detection of stimulus involved in cell cycle checkpoint	The series of events in which information about a biological process or quality is received and converted into a molecular signal, contributing to a cell cycle checkpoint.
0	1	0	detection of DNA damage stimulus involved in DNA damage checkpoint	The series of events in which information about damage to DNA is received and converted into a molecular signal, contributing to a DNA damage checkpoint.
0	3	0	signal transduction involved in DNA damage checkpoint	A signal transduction process that contributes to a DNA damage checkpoint.
0	1	0	response to DNA damage checkpoint signaling	A process that occurs in response to signals generated as a result of DNA damage checkpoint signaling.
1	4	1	signal transduction involved in G2 DNA damage checkpoint	A signal transduction process that contributes to a G2/M transition DNA damage checkpoint.
1	0	0	signal transduction involved in intra-S DNA damage checkpoint	A signal transduction process that contributes to an intra-S DNA damage checkpoint.
0	3	0	response to intra-S DNA damage checkpoint signaling	A process that occurs in response to signals generated as a result of intra-S DNA damage checkpoint signaling.
0	1	0	signal transduction involved in mitotic G1 DNA damage checkpoint	A signal transduction process that contributes to a mitotic cell cycle G1/S transition DNA damage checkpoint.
0	0	1	signal transduction involved in mitotic G2 DNA damage checkpoint	A signal transduction process that contributes to a mitotic G2/M transition DNA damage checkpoint.
1	1	0	MSL complex	A histone acetyltransferase complex that catalyzes the acetylation of a histone H4 lysine residue at position 16. In human, it contains the catalytic subunit MOF, and MSL1, MSL2 and MSL3.
0	0	1	mesenchymal stem cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a mesenchymal stem cell. A mesenchymal stem cell is a cell that retains the ability to divide and proliferate throughout life to provide progenitor cells that can differentiate into specialized mesenchymal cells.
0	1	0	divalent inorganic cation homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of divalent cations within an organism or cell.
0	1	1	Rho-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + a protein = ADP + a phosphoprotein. This reaction requires binding of the GTPase Rho.
1	3	2	seminiferous tubule development	The reproductive developmental process whose specific outcome is the progression of the seminiferous tubule over time, from its formation to the mature structure. Seminiferous tubules are ducts located in the testicles, and are the specific location of meiosis, and the subsequent creation of gametes, namely spermatozoa.
0	1	0	pyrimidine-containing compound transmembrane transport	The process in which a pyrimidine-containing compound is transported across a membrane. A pyrimidine-containing compound is any compound that contains pyrimidine or a formal derivative thereof.
0	0	1	perineuronal net	A dense extracellular matrix (ECM) that forms around many neuronal cell bodies and dendrites late in development and is responsible for synaptic stabilization in the adult brain.
0	1	0	fibroblast activation	A change in the morphology or behavior of a fibroblast resulting from exposure to an activating factor such as a cellular or soluble ligand.
2	0	0	T-helper 17 type immune response	An immune response which is associated with resistance to intracellular bacteria with a key role in inflammation and tissue injury. This immune response is associated with pathological autoimmune conditions such as multiple sclerosis, arthritis and psoriasis which is typically orchestrated by the production of particular cytokines by T-helper 17 cells, most notably interleukin-17, IL-21 and IL-22.
2	2	0	T-helper 17 cell lineage commitment	The process in which a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell becomes committed to becoming a T-helper 17 cell, a CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell with the phenotype RORgamma-t-positive that produces IL-17.
0	0	1		
0	0	4	protein phosphatase activator activity	Increases the activity of a protein phosphatase, an enzyme which catalyzes of the removal of a phosphate group from a protein substrate molecule.
1	0	0	L-DOPA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with L-DOPA, the modified amino acid (2S)-2-amino-3-(3,4-dihydroxyphenyl)propanoic acid.
1	0	0	tyrosine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with2-amino-3-(4-hydroxyphenyl)propanoic acid.
2	1	0	ER membrane protein complex	A transmembrane protein complex located in the ER that is involved in ER-mitochondrial membrane tethering, which is required to facilitate lipid transfer from the ER to the mitochondrial membrane. In S. cerevisiae, it has six members: EMC1, EMC2, AIM27, EMC4, KRE27, and EMC6.
0	1	0	terminal button organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a terminal button. A terminal button is the terminal inflated portion of the axon, containing the specialized apparatus necessary to release neurotransmitters.
1	0	0	IPAF inflammasome complex	A protein complex that consists of three components, IPAF, NAIP and caspase-1, and includes among its functions the sensing of flagellin derived from Legionella pneumophila, Salmonella typhimurium, Pseudomonas aeruginosa and Shigella flexneri.
1	0	0	NLRP1 inflammasome complex	A protein complex that consists of two components, NLRP1 (NALP1) and caspase-1 or caspase-5. The exact mechanisms of NLRP1 activation remain obscure, but potassium ion efflux appears to be essential.
2	1	1	NLRP3 inflammasome complex	A protein complex that consists of three components, NLRP3 (NALP3), PYCARD and caspase-1. It is activated upon exposure to whole pathogens, as well as a number of structurally diverse pathogen- and danger-associated molecular patterns (PAMPs and DAMPs) and environmental irritants. Whole pathogens demonstrated to activate the NLRP3 inflammasome complex include the fungi Candida albicans and Saccharomyces cerevisiae, bacteria that produce pore-forming toxins, including Listeria monocytogenes and Staphylococcus aureus, and viruses such as Sendai virus, adenovirus, and influenza virus.
19	27	55	blood microparticle	A phospholipid microvesicle that is derived from any of several cell types, such as platelets, blood cells, endothelial cells, or others, and contains membrane receptors as well as other proteins characteristic of the parental cell. Microparticles are heterogeneous in size, and are characterized as microvesicles free of nucleic acids.
1	0	0	endothelial microparticle	A blood microparticle that is derived from, and contains membrane receptors as well as other proteins characteristic of, an endothelial cell.
0	1	0	tolerance induction to lipopolysaccharide	Tolerance induction directed at lipopolysaccharide antigens.
0	3	1	hepatocyte proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of hepatocytes, resulting in the expansion of a cell population. Hepatocytes form the main structural component of the liver. They are specialized epithelial cells that are organized into interconnected plates called lobules.
0	1	0	liver morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of the liver are generated and organized.
1	3	0	endothelial cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in an endothelial cell. An endothelial cell comprises the outermost layer or lining of anatomical structures and can be squamous or cuboidal.
0	0	1	glycine receptor clustering	The receptor clustering process in which glycine receptors are localized to distinct domains in the cell membrane.
6	0	0	17-beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a 17-beta-hydroxysteroid + NADP+ = a 17-oxosteroid + NADPH + H+.
2	4	8	clathrin-dependent endocytosis	An endocytosis process that begins when material is taken up into clathrin-coated pits, which then pinch off to form clathrin-coated endocytic vesicles.
0	0	3	caveolin-mediated endocytosis	An endocytosis process that begins when material is taken up into plasma membrane caveolae, which then pinch off to form endocytic caveolar carriers.
0	0	1	DNA topoisomerase type II (double strand cut, ATP-hydrolyzing) activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of ATP-hydrolyzing DNA topoisomerase. DNA topoisomerase (ATP-hydrolyzing) regulator activity catalyzes a DNA topological transformation by transiently cleaving a pair of complementary DNA strands to form a gate through which a second double-stranded DNA segment is passed, after which the severed strands in the first DNA segment are rejoined; product release is coupled to ATP binding and hydrolysis; changes the linking number in multiples of 2.
0	0	1	box H/ACA scaRNP complex	A box H/ACA RNP complex that is located in the Cajal body of the nucleoplasm. In higher eukaryotes, box H/ACA RNP located in Cajal bodies mediate pseudouridylation of spliceosomal snRNAs.
3	1	3	reactive oxygen species metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving a reactive oxygen species, any molecules or ions formed by the incomplete one-electron reduction of oxygen. They contribute to the microbicidal activity of phagocytes, regulation of signal transduction and gene expression, and the oxidative damage to biopolymers.
0	2	0	establishment of protein localization to organelle	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location on or in an organelle. Encompasses establishment of localization in the membrane or lumen of a membrane-bounded organelle.
0	0	1	establishment of protein localization to endoplasmic reticulum	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in the endoplasmic reticulum.
0	0	2	establishment of protein localization to mitochondrion	The directed movement of a protein to the mitochondrion or a part of the mitochondrion.
0	0	2	maintenance of protein location in mitochondrion	Any process in which a protein is maintained in a specific location in a mitochondrion, and is prevented from moving elsewhere.
4	2	1	protein localization to membrane	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location in a membrane.
14	30	34	protein localization to plasma membrane	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a specific location in the plasma membrane.
0	0	2	maintenance of protein location in plasma membrane	Any process in which a protein is maintained in a specific location in the plasma membrane, and is prevented from moving elsewhere.
0	0	1	establishment of protein localization to peroxisome	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in a peroxisome.
1	0	0	protein localization to vacuole	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, a location in a vacuole.
0	1	0	establishment of protein localization to vacuole	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in a vacuole.
1	0	2	tRNA-splicing ligase complex	A protein complex that catalyzes the ligation of cleaved pre-tRNAs by directly joining spliced tRNA halves to mature-sized tRNAs by incorporating the precursor-derived splice junction phosphate into the mature tRNA as a canonical 3',5'-phosphodiester.
1	0	0	neutrophil extravasation	The migration of a neutrophil from the blood vessels into the surrounding tissue.
1	2	1	lamellipodium morphogenesis	A process that is carried out at the cellular level and in which the structure of a lamellipodium is organized.
0	1	1	osteoclast fusion	The plasma membrane fusion process that results in fusion of mononuclear osteoclasts to form a multinuclear osteoclast.
3	1	1	T cell migration	The movement of a T cell within or between different tissues and organs of the body.
1	0	0	T cell extravasation	The migration of a T cell from the blood vessels into the surrounding tissue.
0	1	0	mitochondrial tRNA 3'-trailer cleavage, endonucleolytic	Endonucleolytic cleavage of the 3'-end of the pre-tRNA as part of the process of generating the mature 3'-end of the tRNA in the mitochondrion.
25	17	25	mitotic spindle	A spindle that forms as part of mitosis. Mitotic and meiotic spindles contain distinctive complements of proteins associated with microtubules.
1	0	3	meiotic spindle	A spindle that forms as part of meiosis. Several proteins, such as budding yeast Spo21p, fission yeast Spo2 and Spo13, and C. elegans mei-1, localize specifically to the meiotic spindle and are absent from the mitotic spindle.
0	0	1	protein localization to cell cortex	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, the cell cortex.
1	0	1	response to sorbitol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a sorbitol stimulus.
0	2	1	cellular response to sorbitol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a sorbitol stimulus.
0	0	1	response to hydroxyurea	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydroxyurea stimulus.
2	4	1	cellular response to hydroxyurea	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydroxyurea stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to selenite ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a selenite ion stimulus.
0	0	1	response to actinomycin D	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an actinomycin D stimulus.
1	2	0	cellular response to actinomycin D	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an actinomycin D stimulus.
1	1	0	response to cisplatin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cisplatin stimulus.
1	1	0	cellular response to cisplatin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cisplatin stimulus.
0	0	1	response to dithiothreitol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a dithiothreitol stimulus.
1	1	0	cellular response to staurosporine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a staurosporine stimulus.
0	0	2	cellular response to diamide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a diamide (N,N,N',N'-tetramethyldiazene-1,2-dicarboxamide) stimulus.
0	0	1	response to anisomycin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an anisomycin stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to anisomycin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an anisomycin stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to cytochalasin B	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a cytochalasin B stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to rapamycin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a rapamycin stimulus.
0	2	0	cellular response to camptothecin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a camptothecin stimulus.
0	1	1	positive regulation by symbiont of host autophagy	Any process in which a symbiont organism increases the frequency, rate or extent of autophagy in the host cell. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
0	1	0	entry of viral genome into host nucleus through nuclear pore complex via importin	Viral penetration into the host nucleus where the viral genome passes through the nuclear pore complex (NPC) using the cellular importin transport machinery.
1	0	0	clathrin-dependent endocytosis of virus by host cell	Any clathrin-mediated endocytosis that is involved in the uptake of a virus into a host cell. Begins by invagination of a specific region of the host cell plasma membrane around the bound virus to form a clathrin-coated pit, which then pinches off to form a clathrin-coated endocytic vesicle containing the virus.
3	3	4	IRES-dependent viral translational initiation	Process by which viral mRNA translation is initiated, where a domain in the 5' untranslated region (UTR) of the viral mRNA called an internal ribosome entry site (IRES) binds the host 43S preinitiation complex, circumventing regular cap-dependent translation initiation.
1	2	1	viral translational termination-reinitiation	A process which occurs as part of viral mRNA translation which allows expression of a downstream open reading frame (ORF) in a dicistronic mRNA. In this process, ribosomes translate the upstream ORF but following termination, a proportion of 40S subunits remain tethered to the mRNA and go on to re-initiate translation at the start codon of the downstream ORF.
3	0	4	establishment of integrated proviral latency	A process by which the virus integrates into the host genome and establishes as a stable provirus or prophage.
0	1	1	viral penetration into host nucleus	The crossing by the virus of the host nuclear membrane, either as naked viral genome or for small viruses as an intact capsid.
1	17	16	intracellular transport of virus	The directed movement of a virus, or part of a virus, within the host cell.
6	7	2	Cul4-RING E3 ubiquitin ligase complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex in which a cullin from the Cul4 family and a RING domain protein form the catalytic core; substrate specificity is conferred by an adaptor protein.
3	1	6	mRNA methylation	The posttranscriptional addition of methyl groups to specific residues in an mRNA molecule.
5	3	3	phosphatidylinositol-3,5-bisphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol-3,5-bisphosphate, a derivative of phosphatidylinositol in which the inositol ring is phosphorylated at the 3' and 5' positions.
0	1	0	methyl indole-3-acetate esterase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: methyl indole-3-acetate + H2O = indole-3-acetate + methanol + H+.
1	0	0	protein deglutathionylation	The protein modification process in which a glutathione molecule is removed from a protein amino acid by breaking a disulfide linkage.
0	0	2	regulation of primary metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways within a cell or an organism involving those compounds formed as a part of the normal anabolic and catabolic processes. These processes take place in most, if not all, cells of the organism.
1	1	0	DNA demethylation	The removal of a methyl group from one or more nucleotides within an DNA molecule.
1	0	0	proteasome core complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a mature, active 20S proteasome core particle complex that does not contain any regulatory particles.
2	0	1	regulation of cellular response to stress	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a cellular response to stress. Cellular response to stress is a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress. The stress is usually, but not necessarily, exogenous (e.g. temperature, humidity, ionizing radiation).
0	1	1	regulation of fertilization	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of fertilization. Fertilization is the union of gametes of opposite sexes during the process of sexual reproduction to form a zygote. It involves the fusion of the gametic nuclei (karyogamy) and cytoplasm (plasmogamy).
2	4	4	histone H3-K4 trimethylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of three methyl groups to lysine at position 4 of the histone.
1	0	0	response to phenylpropanoid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as the result of a phenylpropanoid stimulus. The process begins with detection of the stimulus and ends with a change in state or activity or the cell or organism. A phenylpropanoid is any of secondary metabolites with structures based on a phenylpropane skeleton. The class includes phenylpropanoid esters, flavonoids, anthocyanins, coumarins and many small phenolic molecules. Phenylpropanoids are also precursors of lignin.
0	1	0	entry into host cell by a symbiont-containing vacuole	The invasion by a symbiont of a cell of a host organism, forming a vacuole in which the symbiont resides. The vacuole membrane is formed from lipids and proteins derived from both host and symbiont. Begins when the symbiont attaches on to the host cell membrane which invaginates and deepens as the symbiont enters, and ends when the host cell membrane closes behind the newly-formed vacuole.
1	0	0	maintenance of symbiont-containing vacuole by host	The process in which a host organism maintains the structure and function of a symbiont-containing vacuole. The symbiont-containing vacuole is a membrane-bounded vacuole within a host cell in which a symbiont organism resides, and can serve to reduce pathogenicity of invading symbionts by restricting them to the vacuolar compartment.
2	1	0	protein K6-linked ubiquitination	A protein ubiquitination process in which a polymer of ubiquitin, formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 6 of the ubiquitin monomers, is added to a protein. K6-linked ubiquitination is involved in DNA repair.
1	2	2	extracellular matrix assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of the extracellular matrix.
0	1	0	modulation by symbiont of host I-kappaB kinase/NF-kappaB cascade	Any process in which an organism modulates the frequency, rate or extent of host NF-kappaB-mediated signal transduction pathways during the host defense response. The host is defined as the larger of the organisms involved in a symbiotic interaction.
0	0	1	cardiac muscle cell action potential	An action potential that occurs in a cardiac muscle cell.
0	0	3	cardiac muscle cell action potential involved in contraction	An action potential that occurs in a cardiac muscle cell and is involved in its contraction.
0	0	4	cardiac muscle cell contraction	The actin filament-based process in which cytoplasmic actin filaments slide past one another resulting in contraction of a cardiac muscle cell.
0	0	5	regulation of cardiac muscle cell contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle cell contraction.
1	1	5	ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential	An action potential that occurs in a ventricular cardiac muscle cell.
1	0	0	voltage-gated potassium channel activity involved in cardiac muscle cell action potential repolarization	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a potassium ion by a voltage-gated channel through the plasma membrane of a cardiac muscle cell contributing to the repolarization phase of an action potential. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
1	0	2	membrane repolarization	The process in which ions are transported across a membrane such that the membrane potential changes in the repolarizing direction, toward the steady state potential. For example, the repolarization during an action potential is from a positive membrane potential towards a negative resting potential.
0	0	2	membrane depolarization during action potential	The process in which membrane potential changes in the depolarizing direction from the negative resting potential towards the positive membrane potential that will be the peak of the action potential.
1	0	0	membrane repolarization during action potential	The process in which ions are transported across a membrane such that the membrane potential changes in the direction from the positive membrane potential at the peak of the action potential towards the negative resting potential.
0	0	1	membrane depolarization during cardiac muscle cell action potential	The process in which cardiac muscle cell membrane potential changes in the depolarizing direction from the negative resting potential towards the positive membrane potential that will be the peak of the action potential.
2	0	2	membrane repolarization during cardiac muscle cell action potential	The process in which ions are transported across a membrane such that the cardiac muscle cell plasma membrane potential changes in the direction from the positive membrane potential at the peak of the action potential towards the negative resting potential.
1	1	2	atrial cardiac muscle cell action potential	An action potential that occurs in an atrial cardiac muscle cell.
0	0	1	SA node cell action potential	An action potential that occurs in a sinoatrial node cardiac muscle cell.
0	0	1	cell-cell signaling involved in cardiac conduction	Any process that mediates the transfer of information from one cell to another and contributes to the heart process that regulates cardiac muscle contraction; beginning with the generation of an action potential in the sinoatrial node and ending with regulation of contraction of the myocardium.
0	0	1	adenylate cyclase-activating adrenergic receptor signaling pathway involved in heart process	A series of molecular signals beginning with a G protein-coupled adrenergic cell surface receptor combining with epinephrine or norepinephrine, to activate adenylate cyclase, which contributes to a circulatory system process carried out by the heart.
0	0	1	adenylate cyclase-activating adrenergic receptor signaling pathway involved in positive regulation of heart rate	An adrenergic receptor signaling pathway that contributes to an increase in frequency or rate of heart contraction. Binding of adrenalin or noradrenalin to a beta-adrenergic receptor on the surface of the signal-receiving cell results in the activation of an intracellular Gs protein. Gs activates adenylate cyclase to increase intracellular cyclic-AMP (cAMP) levels. cAMP binds directly to F-channels to allow an inward flow of sodium (known as funny current, or If current). The funny current is responsible for membrane depolarization and an increase in heart rate.
0	0	1	Purkinje myocyte to ventricular cardiac muscle cell signaling	Any process that mediates the transfer of information from a Purkinje myocyte to a ventricular cardiac muscle cell.
0	0	1	adenylate cyclase-activating adrenergic receptor signaling pathway involved in cardiac muscle relaxation	An adrenergic receptor signaling pathway that contributes to a reduction in cardiac muscle contraction. Beta-adrenergic receptor-induced cardiac relaxation is achieved by a GPCR-activated adenylate cyclase generating cAMP; cAMP then activates the cAMP-dependent protein kinase A (PKA), which phosphorylates the sarcoplasmic reticulum (SR) membrane protein PLB. In its non-phosphorylated state, PLB acts as an inhibitor of the ATPase Ca(2+) pump of the cardiac SR (SERCA2a); inhibition of the pump is relieved upon phosphorylation. The pump removes Ca(2+) from the cytoplasm, thereby preventing cytosolic Ca(2+)-dependent activation of contractile proteins, leading to enhanced muscle relaxation.
0	0	4	regulation of cardiac muscle cell membrane potential	Any process that modulates the establishment or extent of a membrane potential in a cardiac muscle cell (a cardiomyocyte). A membrane potential is the electric potential existing across any membrane arising from charges in the membrane itself and from the charges present in the media on either side of the membrane.
0	0	1	calcium-transporting ATPase activity involved in regulation of cardiac muscle cell membrane potential	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a cardiac muscle cell plasma membrane to the other according to the reaction: ATP + H2O + Ca2+(cis) = ADP + phosphate + Ca2+(trans). The transfer contributes to the regulation of the plasma membrane potential.
0	0	1	sodium:proton antiporter activity involved in regulation of cardiac muscle cell membrane potential	Enables the transfer of a solute or solutes from one side of a cardiac muscle cell membrane to the other according to the reaction: Na+(out) + H+(in) = Na+(in) + H+(out). This transfer contributes to the regulation of the cardiac muscle cell plasma membrane potential.
0	0	1	membrane depolarization during SA node cell action potential	The process in which SA node cardiac muscle cell membrane potential changes in the depolarizing direction from the negative resting potential towards the positive membrane potential that will be the peak of the action potential.
1	0	7	cell communication by electrical coupling involved in cardiac conduction	The process that mediates signaling interactions between one cell and another cell by transfer of current between their adjacent cytoplasms via intercellular protein channels and contributes to the process of cardiac conduction.
0	0	1	atrial cardiac muscle cell to AV node cell communication	The process that mediates interactions between an atrial cardiomyocyte and its surroundings that contributes to the process of the atrial cardiomyocyte communicating with an AV node cell in cardiac conduction. Encompasses interactions such as signaling or attachment between one cell and another cell, between a cell and an extracellular matrix, or between a cell and any other aspect of its environment.
0	1	0	AV node cell to bundle of His cell communication	The process that mediates interactions between an AV node cell and its surroundings that contributes to the process of the AV node cell communicating with a bundle of His cell in cardiac conduction. Encompasses interactions such as signaling or attachment between one cell and another cell, between a cell and an extracellular matrix, or between a cell and any other aspect of its environment.
0	0	1	SA node cell to atrial cardiac muscle cell communication	The process that mediates interactions between an SA node cardiomyocyte and its surroundings that contributes to the process of the SA node cardiomyocyte communicating with an atrial cardiomyocyte in cardiac conduction. Encompasses interactions such as signaling or attachment between one cell and another cell, between a cell and an extracellular matrix, or between a cell and any other aspect of its environment.
0	1	0	AV node cell-bundle of His cell adhesion involved in cell communication	The attachment of an AV node cell to an bundle of His cell via adhesion molecules that results in the cells being juxtaposed so that they can communicate.
0	1	3	bundle of His cell-Purkinje myocyte adhesion involved in cell communication	The attachment of a bundle of His cell to a Purkinje myocyte via adhesion molecules that results in the cells being juxtaposed so that they can communicate.
0	0	1	gap junction channel activity involved in cardiac conduction electrical coupling	A wide pore channel activity that enables a direct cytoplasmic connection from one cardiomyocyte to an adjacent cardiomyocyte. The gap junction passes electrical signals between the cells contributing to cardiac conduction.
0	0	1	protein binding involved in heterotypic cell-cell adhesion	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex contributing to the adhesion of two different types of cells.
0	1	0	cell adhesive protein binding involved in AV node cell-bundle of His cell communication	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex that results in the connection of an AV node cell with a bundle of His cell and contributes to the communication between the two cells.
0	1	3	cell adhesive protein binding involved in bundle of His cell-Purkinje myocyte communication	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex that results in the connection of a bundle of His cell with a Purkinje myocyte and contributes to the communication between the two cells.
1	0	0	voltage-gated potassium channel activity involved in atrial cardiac muscle cell action potential repolarization	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a potassium ion by a voltage-gated channel through the plasma membrane of an atrial cardiomyocyte contributing to the repolarization phase of an action potential. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
2	1	8	regulation of heart rate by cardiac conduction	A cardiac conduction process that modulates the frequency or rate of heart contraction.
0	0	1	regulation of the force of heart contraction by cardiac conduction	A cardiac conduction process that modulates the extent of heart contraction, changing the force with which blood is propelled.
0	0	1	phospholipase C-activating angiotensin-activated signaling pathway	An angiotensin-mediated signaling pathway where the activated receptor transmits the signal via Gq-mediated activation of phospholipase C (PLC). PLC hydrolyses phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate (PIP2) into the second messengers inositol-1,4,5,-triphosphate (IP3) and diacylglycerol (DAG). DAG activates protein kinase C (PKC), whilst IP3 binds intracellular receptors to induce the release of Ca2+ from intracellular stores.
0	1	1	angiotensin-activated signaling pathway involved in heart process	An angiotensin receptor signaling pathway which contributes to a circulatory system process carried out by the heart.
1	4	0	endothelin receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by an endothelin receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands, and proceeding with the activated receptor promoting the exchange of GDP for GTP on the alpha-subunit of an associated heterotrimeric G-protein complex. Ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	0	3	protein kinase D signaling	A series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase D, which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
0	1	1	U2AF complex	A heterodimeric protein complex consisting of conserved large and small U2AF subunits that contributes to spliceosomal RNA splicing by binding to consensus sequences at the 3' splice site. U2AF is required to stabilize the association of the U2 snRNP with the branch point.
0	0	1	spanning component of membrane	The component of a membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that have some part that spans both leaflets of the membrane.
0	1	2	amino acid import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of an amino acid from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	2	0	caspase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a caspase family protein.
0	0	1	primitive streak formation	The developmental process pertaining to the initial formation of the primitive streak from unspecified parts. The primitive streak is a ridge of cells running along the midline of the embryo where the mesoderm ingresses. It defines the anterior-posterior axis.
1	2	4	positive regulation of neutrophil chemotaxis	Any process that increases the frequency, rate, or extent of neutrophil chemotaxis. Neutrophil chemotaxis is the directed movement of a neutrophil cell, the most numerous polymorphonuclear leukocyte found in the blood, in response to an external stimulus, usually an infection or wounding.
0	0	1	regulation of monocyte chemotaxis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of monocyte chemotaxis.
1	2	1	positive regulation of monocyte chemotaxis	Any process that increases the frequency, rate, or extent of monocyte chemotaxis.
0	1	0	negative regulation of monocyte chemotaxis	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate, or extent of monocyte chemotaxis.
0	0	1	positive regulation of chaperone-mediated protein complex assembly	Any process that increases the frequency, rate, or extent of chaperone-mediated protein complex assembly. Chaperone-mediated protein complex assembly is the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a protein complex, mediated by chaperone molecules that do not form part of the finished complex.
0	0	1	regulation of protein kinase C signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of a series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase C, which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
1	0	1	positive regulation of protein kinase C signaling	Any process that increases the frequency, rate, or extent of a series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase C, which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
1	1	1	negative regulation of protein kinase C signaling	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate, or extent of a series of reactions, mediated by the intracellular serine/threonine kinase protein kinase C, which occurs as a result of a single trigger reaction or compound.
0	1	2	tubulin deacetylation	The removal of an acetyl group from tubulin. An acetyl group is CH3CO-, derived from acetic [ethanoic] acid.
1	0	1	regulation of tubulin deacetylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of tubulin deacetylation. Tubulin deacetylation is the removal of an acetyl group from a protein amino acid.
0	1	0	positive regulation of tubulin deacetylation	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of tubulin deacetylation. Tubulin deacetylation is the removal of an acetyl group from a protein amino acid.
1	1	0	positive regulation of deacetylase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of deacetylase activity, the catalysis of the hydrolysis of an acetyl group or groups from a substrate molecule.
2	4	4	positive regulation of cell migration involved in sprouting angiogenesis	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell migration involved in sprouting angiogenesis. Cell migration involved in sprouting angiogenesis is the orderly movement of endothelial cells into the extracellular matrix in order to form new blood vessels contributing to the process of sprouting angiogenesis.
3	4	0	negative regulation of cell migration involved in sprouting angiogenesis	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of cell migration involved in sprouting angiogenesis. Cell migration involved in sprouting angiogenesis is the orderly movement of endothelial cells into the extracellular matrix in order to form new blood vessels contributing to the process of sprouting angiogenesis.
0	1	6	positive regulation of microtubule nucleation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of microtubule nucleation. Microtubule nucleation is the 'de novo' formation of a microtubule, in which tubulin heterodimers form metastable oligomeric aggregates, some of which go on to support formation of a complete microtubule. Microtubule nucleation usually occurs from a specific site within a cell.
1	0	0	regulation of production of siRNA involved in RNA interference	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the production of siRNA, the cleavage of double-stranded RNA to form small interfering RNA molecules (siRNAs) of 21-23 nucleotides, in the context of RNA interference.
1	0	0	positive regulation of cell cycle process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of a cellular process that is involved in the progression of biochemical and morphological phases and events that occur in a cell during successive cell replication or nuclear replication events.
0	1	0	negative regulation of protein homodimerization activity	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of protein homodimerization, interacting selectively with an identical protein to form a homodimer.
0	1	0	relaxation of skeletal muscle	A process in which the extent of skeletal muscle tissue contraction is reduced. Muscle relaxation involves the removal of calcium from the cytoplasm to the sarcoplasmic reticulum lumen through the action of Ca2+ ATPases.
1	0	0	regulation of inclusion body assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of inclusion body assembly. Inclusion body assembly is the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an inclusion body.
1	0	6	negative regulation of inclusion body assembly	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of inclusion body assembly. Inclusion body assembly is the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an inclusion body.
1	0	1	negative regulation of protein deubiquitination	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of protein deubiquitination. Protein deubiquitination is the removal of one or more ubiquitin groups from a protein.
29	27	23	negative regulation of canonical Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the Wnt signaling pathway through beta-catenin, the series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes.
0	2	3	positive regulation of extracellular matrix disassembly	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of extracellular matrix disassembly. Extracellular matrix disassembly is a process that results in the breakdown of the extracellular matrix.
0	1	0	positive regulation of metanephric cap mesenchymal cell proliferation	Any process that increases the frequency, rate, or extent of metanephric cap mesenchymal cell proliferation. Metanephric cap mesenchymal cell proliferation is the multiplication or reproduction of metanephric cap mesenchymal cells, resulting in the expansion of the cell population. A metanephric cap mesenchymal cell is a mesenchymal cell that has condensed with other mesenchymal cells surrounding the ureteric bud tip.
4	1	1	cochlea development	The progression of the cochlea over time from its formation to the mature structure. The cochlea is the snail-shaped portion of the inner ear that is responsible for the detection of sound.
2	0	0	cochlea morphogenesis	The process in which the cochlea is generated and organized.
1	5	1	COPII-coated vesicle cargo loading	The formation of a macromolecular complex between the COPII coat proteins and proteins and/or lipoproteins that are going to be transported by the COPII vesicle to the Golgi.
0	3	0	COPII-coated vesicle budding	The evagination of an endoplasmic reticulum membrane, resulting in formation of a COPII-coated vesicle.
1	1	0	receptor-mediated endocytosis involved in cholesterol transport	A receptor-mediated endocytosis process involved in intracellular cholesterol transport.
0	0	1	vesicle-mediated cholesterol transport	The directed movement of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol, or cholesterol-containing compounds, by membrane-bounded vesicles.
0	1	0	cholesterol ester hydrolysis involved in cholesterol transport	The cholesterol metabolic process in which cholesterol esters are hydrolyzed into free fatty acids and cholesterol in the lysosome that contributes to intracellular cholesterol transport.
1	0	1	regulation of synapse maturation	Any process that modulates the extent of synapse maturation, the process that organizes a synapse so that it attains its fully functional state.
1	1	1	positive regulation of synapse maturation	Any process that increases the extent of synapse maturation, the process that organizes a synapse so that it attains its fully functional state.
0	0	4	mesenchyme migration	The process in which the population of cells that make up a mesenchyme undergo directed movement.
1	0	0	epithelium migration	The process in which the population of cells that make up an epithelium undergo directed movement.
1	1	0	actin filament branching	The formation of daughter actin filament branches at an angle on the sides of preexisting mother filaments.
1	1	6	epithelial cell-cell adhesion	The attachment of an epithelial cell to another epithelial cell via adhesion molecules.
1	1	3	regulation of mitochondrial fission	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of mitochondrial fission. Mitochondrial fission is the division of a mitochondrion within a cell to form two or more separate mitochondrial compartments.
0	3	4	positive regulation of mitochondrial fission	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of mitochondrial fission. Mitochondrial fission is the division of a mitochondrion within a cell to form two or more separate mitochondrial compartments.
2	2	0	membrane fission	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the separation of a single continuous membrane into two membranes.
0	0	2	mitochondrial membrane fission	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the separation of a single continuous mitochondrial membrane into two membranes and contributes to mitochondrial fission.
1	3	1	establishment of protein localization to membrane	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in a membrane.
0	0	2	establishment of protein localization to mitochondrial membrane	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in the mitochondrial membrane.
0	0	1	establishment of protein localization to mitochondrial membrane involved in mitochondrial fission	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in the mitochondrial membrane that contributes to mitochondrial fission.
1	0	0	negative regulation of sphingolipid biosynthetic process	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of sphingolipid biosynthesis. Sphingolipid biosynthesis is the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of sphingolipids, any of a class of lipids containing the long-chain amine diol sphingosine or a closely related base (a sphingoid).
2	0	1	cellular sphingolipid homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of sphingolipids at the level of the cell.
1	1	0	endoplasmic reticulum membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of an endoplasmic reticulum membrane.
2	2	3	Golgi to lysosome transport	The directed movement of substances from the Golgi to lysosomes.
3	3	3	Golgi ribbon formation	The formation of a continuous ribbon of interconnected Golgi stacks of flat cisternae.
2	3	2	establishment of epithelial cell polarity	The specification and formation of anisotropic intracellular organization of an epithelial cell.
0	0	1	asymmetric Golgi ribbon formation	The asymmetric formation of a continuous ribbon of interconnected Golgi stacks of flat cisternae that contributes to the establishment of epithelial cell polarity.
1	0	2	Golgi disassembly	A cellular process that results in the breakdown of a Golgi apparatus that contributes to Golgi inheritance.
0	2	1	Golgi reassembly	The reformation of the Golgi following its breakdown and partitioning contributing to Golgi inheritance.
0	1	0	regulation of spindle assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of spindle assembly. Spindle assembly is the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the spindle, the array of microtubules and associated molecules that serves to move duplicated chromosomes apart.
0	0	4	regulation of Golgi inheritance	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of Golgi inheritance. Golgi inheritance is the partitioning of Golgi apparatus between daughter cells at cell division.
1	0	0	regulation of establishment of planar polarity	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of the establishment of planar polarity, the coordinated organization of groups of cells in a tissue, such that they all orient to similar coordinates.
0	0	2	microtubule cytoskeleton organization involved in establishment of planar polarity	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising microtubules and their associated proteins and contributes to the establishment of planar polarity.
1	0	0	planar cell polarity pathway involved in neural tube closure	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a receptor on the surface of the target cell where activated receptors signal via downstream effectors that modulates the establishment of planar polarity contributing to neural tube closure.
1	0	1	regulation of cholesterol metabolic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of cholesterol metabolism, the chemical reactions and pathways involving cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones.
1	0	0	positive regulation of kidney development	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of kidney development. Kidney development is the process whose specific outcome is the progression of the kidney over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The kidney is an organ that filters the blood and excretes the end products of body metabolism in the form of urine.
0	1	1	negative regulation of pancreatic juice secretion	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of pancreatic juice secretion, the regulated release of pancreatic juice by the exocrine pancreas into the upper part of the intestine.
2	2	0	positive regulation of branching involved in ureteric bud morphogenesis	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of branching involved in ureteric bud morphogenesis, the process in which the branching structure of the ureteric bud is generated and organized. The ureteric bud is an epithelial tube that grows out from the metanephric duct. The bud elongates and branches to give rise to the ureter and kidney collecting tubules.
1	0	0	negative regulation of branching involved in ureteric bud morphogenesis	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of branching involved in ureteric bud morphogenesis, the process in which the branching structure of the ureteric bud is generated and organized. The ureteric bud is an epithelial tube that grows out from the metanephric duct. The bud elongates and branches to give rise to the ureter and kidney collecting tubules.
6	3	3	positive regulation of release of cytochrome c from mitochondria	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of release of cytochrome c from mitochondria, the process in which cytochrome c is enabled to move from the mitochondrial intermembrane space into the cytosol, which is an early step in apoptosis and leads to caspase activation.
2	0	2	negative regulation of release of cytochrome c from mitochondria	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of release of cytochrome c from mitochondria, the process in which cytochrome c is enabled to move from the mitochondrial intermembrane space into the cytosol, which is an early step in apoptosis and leads to caspase activation.
0	1	1	protein localization to nuclear pore	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a nuclear pore.
0	2	0	positive regulation of cholesterol metabolic process	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of cholesterol metabolism, the chemical reactions and pathways involving cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3 beta-ol, the principal sterol of vertebrates and the precursor of many steroids, including bile acids and steroid hormones.
1	0	1	regulation of triglyceride metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving triglyceride, any triester of glycerol.
1	0	0	negative regulation of triglyceride metabolic process	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways involving triglyceride, any triester of glycerol.
0	1	1	positive regulation of lipid kinase activity	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of lipid kinase activity, the catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group, usually from ATP, to a simple or complex lipid.
1	1	0	centrosome-templated microtubule nucleation	The 'de novo' formation of a microtubule, in which tubulin heterodimers form metastable oligomeric aggregates from the centrosome.
0	2	0	regulation of centromere complex assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of centromere complex assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and centromeric DNA molecules to form a centromeric protein-DNA complex.
0	1	1	regulation of kinetochore assembly	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of kinetochore assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the kinetochore, a multisubunit complex that is located at the centromeric region of DNA and provides an attachment point for the spindle microtubules.
1	1	2	regulation of metaphase plate congression	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of metaphase plate congression, the alignment of chromosomes at the metaphase plate, a plane halfway between the poles of the spindle.
0	1	0	regulation of arachidonic acid secretion	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of arachidonic acid secretion, the controlled release of arachidonic acid from a cell or a tissue.
1	0	0	positive regulation of arachidonic acid secretion	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of arachidonic acid secretion, the controlled release of arachidonic acid from a cell or a tissue.
0	1	0	regulation of histone H4 acetylation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of histone H4 acetylation, the modification of histone H4 by the addition of an acetyl group.
2	1	1	positive regulation of histone H4 acetylation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of histone H4 acetylation, the modification of histone H4 by the addition of an acetyl group.
0	1	0	negative regulation of histone H4 acetylation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of histone H4 acetylation, the modification of histone H4 by the addition of an acetyl group.
0	1	0	Wnt signaling pathway involved in somitogenesis	The series of molecular signals initiated by binding of Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell and ending with a change in cell state that contributes to somitogenesis.
0	1	0	axis elongation involved in somitogenesis	The developmental growth that results in the elongation of the rostral-caudal axis that contributes to somitogenesis.
0	1	0	regulation of cell motility involved in somitogenic axis elongation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate, or extent of the controlled self-propelled movement of a cell that contributes to somitogenic axis elongation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mitochondrial fission	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of mitochondrial fission. Mitochondrial fission is the division of a mitochondrion within a cell to form two or more separate mitochondrial compartments.
0	0	1	positive regulation of inclusion body assembly	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of inclusion body assembly. Inclusion body assembly is the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an inclusion body.
19	20	26	positive regulation of canonical Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the Wnt signaling pathway through beta-catenin, the series of molecular signals initiated by binding of a Wnt protein to a frizzled family receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by propagation of the signal via beta-catenin, and ending with a change in transcription of target genes.
0	1	0	regulation of mitotic cell cycle spindle assembly checkpoint	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the mitotic cell cycle spindle assembly checkpoint, a cell cycle checkpoint that delays the metaphase/anaphase transition of a mitotic nuclear division until the spindle is correctly assembled and chromosomes are attached to the spindle.
0	0	2	positive regulation of mitotic cell cycle spindle assembly checkpoint	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the mitotic cell cycle spindle assembly checkpoint, a cell cycle checkpoint that delays the metaphase/anaphase transition of a mitotic nuclear division until the spindle is correctly assembled and chromosomes are attached to the spindle.
1	0	1	positive regulation of fibroblast growth factor production	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the appearance of a fibroblast growth factor due to biosynthesis or secretion following a cellular stimulus, resulting in an increase in its intracellular or extracellular levels.
0	1	0	negative regulation of fibroblast growth factor production	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of the appearance of a fibroblast growth factor due to biosynthesis or secretion following a cellular stimulus, resulting in an increase in its intracellular or extracellular levels.
1	0	0	negative regulation of somatostatin secretion	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, extent of the regulated release of somatostatin from secretory granules in the D cells of the pancreas.
1	0	3	positive regulation of peptide hormone secretion	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the regulated release of a peptide hormone from secretory granules.
1	2	1	regulation of calcium ion import	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the directed movement of calcium ions into a cell or organelle.
2	2	1	positive regulation of calcium ion import	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the directed movement of calcium ions into a cell or organelle.
1	1	0	negative regulation of calcium ion import	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the directed movement of calcium ions into a cell or organelle.
0	1	0	positive regulation of protein glycosylation in Golgi	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the addition of a carbohydrate or carbohydrate derivative unit to a protein amino acid in any compartment of the Golgi apparatus.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cellular response to growth factor stimulus	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a growth factor stimulus.
0	2	0	negative regulation of osteoclast proliferation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the multiplication or reproduction of osteoclasts, resulting in the expansion of an osteoclast cell population.
0	1	1	nuclear matrix anchoring at nuclear membrane	The process in which the nuclear matrix, the dense fibrillar network lying on the inner side of the nuclear membrane, is directly or indirectly linked to the nuclear membrane.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mitochondrial DNA replication	Any process that increases the rate, frequency or extent of the process in which new strands of DNA are synthesized in the mitochondrion.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mitochondrial DNA replication	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of the process in which new strands of DNA are synthesized in the mitochondrion.
5	4	8	positive regulation of wound healing	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the series of events that restore integrity to a damaged tissue, following an injury.
3	0	1	nucleic acid phosphodiester bond hydrolysis	The nucleic acid metabolic process in which the phosphodiester bonds between nucleotides are cleaved by hydrolysis.
2	0	0	spindle assembly involved in meiosis	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the spindle that contributes to the process of meiosis.
9	11	10	mitotic spindle assembly	Mitotic bipolar spindle assembly begins with spindle microtubule nucleation from the separated spindle pole body, includes spindle elongation during prometaphase, and is complete when all kinetochores are stably attached the spindle, and the spindle assembly checkpoint is satisfied.
1	1	7	positive regulation of DNA methylation-dependent heterochromatin assembly	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of the repression of transcription by methylation of DNA, leading to the formation of heterochromatin.
0	2	1	regulation of protein deacetylation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of protein deacetylation, the removal of an acetyl group from a protein amino acid. An acetyl group is CH3CO-, derived from acetic [ethanoic] acid.
0	0	1	positive regulation of protein deacetylation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of protein deacetylation, the removal of an acetyl group from a protein amino acid. An acetyl group is CH3CO-, derived from acetic [ethanoic] acid.
1	0	0	regulation of protein targeting to membrane	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the process of directing proteins towards a membrane, usually using signals contained within the protein.
2	12	4	positive regulation of protein targeting to membrane	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the process of directing proteins towards a membrane, usually using signals contained within the protein.
1	1	1	negative regulation of protein targeting to membrane	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of the process of directing proteins towards a membrane, usually using signals contained within the protein.
3	5	6	positive regulation of intracellular protein transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of proteins within cells.
1	0	0	negative regulation of intracellular protein transport	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of proteins within cells.
0	1	0	regulation of superoxide metabolic process	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of superoxide metabolism, the chemical reactions and pathways involving superoxide, the superoxide anion O2- (superoxide free radical), or any compound containing this species.
1	1	0	negative regulation of oxidative phosphorylation	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of the chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the phosphorylation of ADP to ATP that accompanies the oxidation of a metabolite through the operation of the respiratory chain. Oxidation of compounds establishes a proton gradient across the membrane, providing the energy for ATP synthesis.
0	1	0	regulation of DNA-dependent DNA replication	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of DNA-dependent DNA replication, the process in which new strands of DNA are synthesized, using parental DNA as a template for the DNA-dependent DNA polymerases that synthesize the new strands.
0	1	3	regulation of platelet aggregation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of platelet aggregation. Platelet aggregation is the adhesion of one platelet to one or more other platelets via adhesion molecules.
3	1	2	negative regulation of platelet aggregation	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency or extent of platelet aggregation. Platelet aggregation is the adhesion of one platelet to one or more other platelets via adhesion molecules.
0	2	0	regulation of brown fat cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of brown fat cell differentiation. Brown fat cell differentiation is the process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a brown adipocyte, an animal connective tissue cell involved in adaptive thermogenesis. Brown adipocytes contain multiple small droplets of triglycerides and a high number of mitochondria.
1	3	2	positive regulation of brown fat cell differentiation	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of brown fat cell differentiation. Brown fat cell differentiation is the process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of a brown adipocyte, an animal connective tissue cell involved in adaptive thermogenesis. Brown adipocytes contain multiple small droplets of triglycerides and a high number of mitochondria.
0	1	1	positive regulation of cell aging	Any process that increases the rate, frequency, or extent of cell aging. Cell aging is the progression of the cell from its inception to the end of its lifespan.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cell aging	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of cell aging. Cell aging is the progression of the cell from its inception to the end of its lifespan.
0	0	1	regulation of platelet-derived growth factor production	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency, or extent of the appearance of any platelet-derived growth factor due to biosynthesis or secretion following a cellular stimulus, resulting in an increase in its intracellular or extracellular levels.
0	1	0	negative regulation of mRNA modification	Any process that decreases the rate, frequency, or extent of the covalent alteration of one or more nucleotides within an mRNA molecule to produce an mRNA molecule with a sequence that differs from that coded genetically.
3	0	0	negative regulation of cholesterol efflux	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of cholesterol efflux. Cholesterol efflux is the directed movement of cholesterol, cholest-5-en-3-beta-ol, out of a cell or organelle.
1	3	2	phagosome maturation	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the arrangement of constituent parts of a phagosome within a cell. Phagosome maturation begins with endocytosis and formation of the early phagosome and ends with the formation of the hybrid organelle, the phagolysosome.
4	0	1	phagosome acidification	Any process that reduces the pH of the phagosome, measured by the concentration of the hydrogen ion.
1	0	0	phagosome-lysosome docking	The initial attachment of a phagosome membrane to a lysosome membrane. Docking requires only that the proteins come close enough to interact and adhere.
1	1	3	phagosome-lysosome fusion	The creation of a phagolysosome from a phagosome and a lysosome.
0	1	0	phagolysosome assembly involved in apoptotic cell clearance	The process in which a phagosome, a vesicle formed by phagocytosis, fuses with a lysosome as a part of apoptotic cell clearance.
0	1	0	phagosome-lysosome fusion involved in apoptotic cell clearance	The creation of a phagolysosome from a phagosome and a lysosome as a part of apoptotic cell clearance.
1	1	2	negative regulation of excitatory postsynaptic potential	Any process that prevents the establishment or decreases the extent of the excitatory postsynaptic potential (EPSP) which is a temporary increase in postsynaptic potential due to the flow of positively charged ions into the postsynaptic cell. The flow of ions that causes an EPSP is an excitatory postsynaptic current (EPSC) and makes it easier for the neuron to fire an action potential.
3	4	6	cellular senescence	A cell aging process stimulated in response to cellular stress, whereby normal cells lose the ability to divide through irreversible cell cycle arrest.
3	3	1	replicative senescence	A cell aging process associated with the dismantling of a cell as a response to telomere shortening and/or cellular aging.
1	3	0	stress-induced premature senescence	A cellular senescence process associated with the dismantling of a cell as a response to environmental factors such as hydrogen peroxide or X-rays.
0	0	2	oncogene-induced cell senescence	A cellular senescence process associated with the dismantling of a cell as a response to oncogenic stress, such as the activation of the Ras oncogenic family.
1	1	0	oxidative stress-induced premature senescence	A cellular senescence process associated with the dismantling of a cell as a response to oxidative stress, e.g. high levels of reactive oxygen species, such as superoxide anions, hydrogen peroxide, and hydroxyl radicals.
0	1	0	acinar cell differentiation	The epithelial cell differentiation process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires specialized features of an acinar cell, a secretory cell that is grouped together with other cells of the same type to form grape-shaped clusters known as acini.
1	0	0	oleoyl-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + oleic acid + CoA = AMP + diphosphate + oleoyl-CoA.
1	2	0	protein localization to nuclear envelope	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, a location within a nuclear envelope.
0	0	2	FAR/SIN/STRIPAK complex	A conserved protein phosphatase type 2A complex which contains a protein phosphatase type 2A, a protein phosphatase regulatory subunit, a striatin, an FHA domain protein and other subunits (at least six proteins). In fission yeast this complex negatively regulate the septation initiation network at the spindle pole body.
3	0	0	glutamate homeostasis	Any process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of glutamate within an organism or cell.
0	1	0	vitamin transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of a vitamin from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	1	extrinsic component of Golgi membrane	The component of a Golgi membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
2	1	0	RNA phosphodiester bond hydrolysis	The RNA metabolic process in which the phosphodiester bonds between ribonucleotides are cleaved by hydrolysis.
3	3	1	RNA phosphodiester bond hydrolysis, endonucleolytic	The chemical reactions and pathways involving the hydrolysis of internal 3',5'-phosphodiester bonds in one or two strands of ribonucleotides.
0	4	1	RNA phosphodiester bond hydrolysis, exonucleolytic	The chemical reactions and pathways involving the hydrolysis of terminal 3',5'-phosphodiester bonds in one or two strands of ribonucleotides.
0	0	1	sphingolipid mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals mediated by a sphingolipid.
0	1	3	glomerular visceral epithelial cell migration	The orderly movement of a podocyte from one site to another, often during the development of a multicellular organism or multicellular structure. A podocyte is a specialized kidney epithelial cell.
0	0	1	vesicle tethering involved in exocytosis	The initial, indirect interaction between a secretory vesicle membrane and a site of exocytosis in the plasma membrane. This interaction is mediated by tethering factors (or complexes), which interact with both membranes. Interaction can occur via direct binding  to membrane phospholipids or membrane proteins, or via binding to vesicle coat proteins. This process is distinct from and prior to docking and fusion.
1	1	2	actin filament reorganization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in dynamic structural changes to the arrangement of actin filaments.
0	0	1	cation-transporting ATPase complex	Protein complex that carries out the reaction: ATP + H2O + cation(out) = ADP + phosphate + cation(in).
0	0	1	calcium ion-transporting ATPase complex	Protein complex that carries out the reaction: ATP + H2O + Ca2+(out) = ADP + phosphate + Ca2+(in).
0	1	0	CERF complex	An ISWI complex that contains an ATPase subunit of the ISWI family (specifically SNF2L in mammals, which contain two ISWI homologs) and a CECR2 homolog. In mammals, CERF is involved in regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoters.
4	11	7	Flemming body	A cell part that is the central region of the midbody characterized by a gap in alpha-tubulin staining. It is a dense structure of antiparallel microtubules from the central spindle in the middle of the intercellular bridge.
0	1	1	phosphatidylethanolamine flippase activity	Catalysis of the movement of phosphatidylethanolamine from the exoplasmic to the cytosolic leaftlet of a membrane, using energy from the hydrolysis of ATP.
2	2	5	establishment of endothelial intestinal barrier	The establishment of a barrier between endothelial cell layers of the intestine to exert specific and selective control over the passage of water and solutes, thus allowing formation and maintenance of compartments that differ in fluid and solute composition.
0	4	1	regulation of membrane permeability	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the passage or uptake of molecules by a membrane.
0	1	0	RNA polymerase II transcription repressor complex	A protein complex, located in the nucleus, that possesses activity that prevents or downregulates transcription from a RNA polymerase II promoter.
6	9	5	RNA polymerase II transcription regulator complex	A transcription factor complex that acts at a regulatory region of a gene transcribed by RNA polymerase II.
0	1	0	alpha-glucosidase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of terminal, non-reducing alpha-linked alpha-D-glucose residue with release of alpha-D-glucose.
2	2	1	ubiquitin-independent protein catabolic process via the multivesicular body sorting pathway	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide, via the multivesicular body (MVB) sorting pathway; proteins are sorted into MVBs, and delivered to a lysosome/vacuole for degradation.  This process is independent of ubiquitination.
0	1	1	DNA clamp unloading	The process of removing the PCNA complex from DNA when Okazaki fragments are completed or the replication fork terminates.
1	0	0	meiotic spindle pole	Either of the ends of a meiotic spindle, a spindle that forms as part of meiosis, where spindle microtubules are organized; usually contains a microtubule organizing center and accessory molecules, spindle microtubules and astral microtubules.
0	1	0	endoribonuclease activity, cleaving miRNA-paired mRNA	Catalysis of the endonucleolytic cleavage of the mRNA in a double-stranded RNA molecule formed by the base pairing of an mRNA with an miRNA.
0	1	0	mRNA cleavage involved in gene silencing by siRNA	The process in which small interfering RNAs (siRNAs) direct the cleavage of target mRNAs. Once incorporated into a RNA-induced silencing complex (RISC), a siRNA will typically direct cleavage by base pairing with perfect or near-perfect complementarity to the target mRNA.
13	33	18	activation of GTPase activity	Any process that initiates the activity of an inactive GTPase through the replacement of GDP by GTP.
0	0	1	outer dense plaque of desmosome	The desmosomal part containing plakoglobins, plakophilins, the N-termini of desmoplakins,  as well as the cytoplasmic tails of the desmosomal cadherins, which together attach the plaque to the plasma membrane.
0	0	1	inner dense plaque of desmosome	The desmosomal part containing the C-termini of desmoplakins which interact with the keratin intermediate filaments, serving to tether the intermediate filaments to the plasma membrane.
0	1	0	mitochondrial tRNA processing	The process in which a pre-tRNA molecule is converted to a mature tRNA, ready for addition of an aminoacyl group,  in the mitochondrion.
0	2	3	modulation of age-related behavioral decline	Any process that modulates the processes that arise as an organism progresses toward the end of its lifespan that results in a decline in behavioral activities such as locomotory behavior, and learning or memory.
0	0	1	response to oxygen-glucose deprivation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of the deprivation of oxygen and glucose.
0	2	1	cellular response to oxygen-glucose deprivation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of the deprivation of oxygen and glucose.
1	0	0	apical cytoplasm	The region of the cytoplasm located at the apical side of the cell. Used in reference to animal polarized epithelial cells.
1	4	0	t-circle formation	A telomere maintenance process that results in the formation of a telomeric circle, or t-circle. A t-circle is an extrachromosomal duplex or single-stranded circular DNA molecule composed of t-arrays. T-circles are involved in the control of telomere length via alternative-lengthening of telomeres (ALT) pathway and telomere rapid deletion (TRD).
0	1	0	telomeric loop disassembly	The telomere maintenance process in which telomeric loops are disassembled to permit efficient telomere replication.
1	0	0	cone matrix sheath	A biochemically and structurally distinct domain of the retinal interphotoreceptor matrix that is specifically associated with cone photoreceptor cell inner and outer segments.
0	1	0	walking behavior	The behavior of an organism relating to the progression of that organism along the ground by the process of lifting and setting down each leg.
1	1	2	cerebrospinal fluid circulation	The neurological system process driven by motile cilia on ependymal cells of the brain by which cerebrospinal fluid circulates from the sites of secretion to the sites of absorption. In ventricular cavities, the flow is unidirectional and rostrocaudal, in subarachnoid spaces, the flow is multi-directional.
0	0	1	box H/ACA telomerase RNP complex	A box H/ACA ribonucleoprotein complex that contains the RNA component of vertebrate telomerase, the enzyme essential for the replication of chromosome termini in most eukaryotes. This ribonucleoprotein complex is a structural box H/ACA RNP, which does not have the catalytic pseudouridylation function shared by the majority of H/ACA RNPs present in the cell.
0	3	2	scaRNA localization to Cajal body	A process in which a small Cajal body-specific RNA is transported to, or maintained in, a Cajal body.
0	1	0	endothelial cell chemotaxis to vascular endothelial growth factor	The directed movement of an endothelial cell in response to the presence of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF).
0	1	2	telomerase RNA stabilization	Prevention of degradation of telomerase RNA (TERC) molecules.
0	1	0	telomerase RNA localization to Cajal body	A process in which telomerase RNA (TERC) is transported to, or maintained in, a Cajal body.
0	0	1	Scc2-Scc4 cohesin loading complex	A eukaryotically conserved heterodimeric protein complex (comprising adherin and the chromatid cohesion factor MAU2/Scc4/Ssl3) required for the loading of a cohesin, complex onto DNA.
0	1	0	primary adaptive immune response involving T cells and B cells	An adaptive immune response mediated by naive T or B cells against an antigen not previously encountered by immune system.
1	0	0	receptor-receptor interaction	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of two or more different receptor complexes that individually undergo combination with a hormone, neurotransmitter, drug or intracellular messenger to form a higher level receptor complex. The formation of the higher level complex initiates a change in cell function.
1	1	1	central region of growth cone	The center of the migrating motile tip of a growing nerve cell axon or dendrite.
0	1	0	peripheral region of growth cone	The non-central region or periphery of the migrating motile tip of a growing nerve cell axon or dendrite.
0	1	0	Las1 complex	A four subunit complex, that comprises all the necessary RNA processing enzymes (endonuclease, polynucleotide kinase, and exonuclease) to mediate 'cistronic rRNA transcript ITS2 (internal transcribed spacer) cleavage' (GO:0000448).
9	3	3	site of DNA damage	A region of a chromosome at which DNA damage has occurred. DNA damage signaling and repair proteins accumulate at the lesion to respond to the damage and repair the DNA to form a continuous DNA helix.
0	1	0	telomere maintenance via telomere trimming	A process that contributes to the maintenance of proper telomeric length and structure via the activation of telomere shortening pathways that compensate telomerase-dependent excessive telomere elongation. Telomere attrition is mediated by a mechanism which involves the generation of single-stranded C-rich telomeric DNA, and the formation and removal of double-stranded telomeric circular DNA (T-circles). Telomere trimming is an independent pathway to recombination-mediated telomere elongation and the well-documented gradual telomere attrition that accompanies cellular replication.
0	2	1	acetylcholine receptor signaling pathway	The series of molecular signals generated as a consequence of an acetylcholine receptor binding to one of its physiological ligands.
0	0	3	ceramide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any ceramide, a class of lipids that is composed of sphingosine linked to a fatty acid. Ceramides are a major component of cell membranes.
7	5	4	energy homeostasis	Any process involved in the balance between food intake (energy input) and energy expenditure.
0	1	1	eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4F complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4F complex.
0	3	2	cellular response to granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a granulocyte macrophage colony-stimulating factor stimulus.
0	3	0	phagocytic vesicle lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of a phagocytic vesicle.
0	0	1	L27 domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a L27 domain of a protein. L27 is composed of conserved negatively charged amino acids and a conserved aromatic amino acid. L27 domains can assemble proteins involved in signaling and establishment and maintenance of cell polarity into complexes by interacting in a heterodimeric manner.
0	0	1	renal protein absorption	A renal system process in which proteins are taken up from the collecting ducts, glomerulus and proximal and distal loops of the nephron. In non-mammalian species, absorption may occur in related structures (e.g. protein absorption is observed in nephrocytes in Drosophila, see PMID:23264686).
0	0	1	lymphocyte migration into lymph node	The movement of a lymphocyte within the lymphatic system into a lymph node, and its subsequent positioning within defined functional compartments such as sites of cell activation by antigen.
0	0	1	MPP7-DLG1-LIN7 complex	A heterotrimeric protein complex formed by the association of MMP7, DLG1 and either LIN7A or LIN7C; regulates the stability and localization of DLG1 to cell junctions.
2	1	0	ubiquitin-protein transferase activator activity	Increases the activity of a ubiquitin-protein transferase, an enzyme that catalyzes the covalent attachment of ubiquitin to lysine in a substrate protein.
3	0	1	dendritic cell differentiation	The process in which a precursor cell type acquires the specialized features of a dendritic cell. A dendritic cell is a leukocyte of dendritic lineage specialized in the uptake, processing, and transport of antigens to lymph nodes for the purpose of stimulating an immune response via T cell activation.
1	0	0	heme export	The directed movement of heme out of a cell or organelle.
1	4	3	perinuclear endoplasmic reticulum	The portion of endoplasmic reticulum, the intracellular network of tubules and cisternae, that occurs near the nucleus. The lumen of the perinuclear endoplasmic reticulum is contiguous with the nuclear envelope lumen (also called perinuclear space), the region between the inner and outer nuclear membranes.
1	1	0	protein linear polyubiquitination	A protein ubiquitination process in which a linear polymer of ubiquitin, formed by the amino-terminal methionine (M1) of one ubiquitin molecule and by the carboxy-terminal glycine (G76) of the next, is added to a protein.
1	2	0	motor neuron apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a motor neuron, an efferent neuron that passes from the central nervous system or a ganglion toward or to a muscle and conducts an impulse that causes movement.
0	0	1	type B pancreatic cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a type B pancreatic cell, a cell located towards center of the islets of Langerhans that secretes insulin.
0	1	2	establishment of protein localization to endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The directed movement of a protein to a specific location in the endoplasmic reticulum membrane.
1	0	0	L-kynurenine metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving L-kynurenine, the L-enantiomer of the amino acid kynurenine (3-(2-aminobenzoyl)-alanine).
0	1	0	L-kynurenine catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of L-kynurenine, the L-enantiomer of the amino acid kynurenine (3-(2-aminobenzoyl)-alanine).
1	0	0	selenocysteinyl-tRNA(Sec) biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of selenocysteinyl-tRNA(Sec). This process occurs through the following steps: a unique serine-tRNA with a UGA recognizing anticodon is first aminoacylated with serine; this is then phosphorylated by phosphoseryl-tRNA[Ser]Sec kinase; lastly, selenium is swapped for the phosphate on the serine.
0	1	0	TRAF2-GSTP1 complex	A protein complex comprising tumor necrosis factor (TNF) receptor-associated factor 2 (TRAF2) and glutathione S-transferase pi 1 (GSTP1). This complex is thought to disrupt the TNF signaling cascade, thus down-regulating inflammatory responses.
4	3	8	synaptic membrane	A specialized area of membrane on either the presynaptic or the postsynaptic side of a synapse, the junction between a nerve fiber of one neuron and another neuron or muscle fiber or glial cell.
0	1	0	dendritic spine organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a dendritic spine. A dendritic spine is a specialized protrusion from a neuronal dendrite and is involved in synaptic transmission.
3	3	1	dendritic spine maintenance	The organization process that preserves a dendritic spine in a stable functional or structural state. A dendritic spine is a specialized protrusion from a neuronal dendrite and is involved in synaptic transmission.
1	2	0	anterior head development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the anterior part of the head over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	1	0	response to thyroid hormone	A change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a thyroid hormone stimulus.
3	2	3	cellular response to thyroid hormone stimulus	A change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a thyroid hormone stimulus.
2	0	0	vascular associated smooth muscle cell development	The process aimed at the progression of a vascular smooth muscle cell over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell. A vascular smooth muscle cell is a non-striated, elongated, spindle-shaped cell found lining the blood vessels.
2	0	0	methyl-branched fatty acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving methyl-branched fatty acids, aliphatic monocarboxylic acids with methyl branches on the main chain.
0	0	5	synaptic vesicle clustering	The process that results in grouping synaptic vesicles in presynaptic structures.
3	0	0	craniofacial suture morphogenesis	The process in which any suture between cranial and/or facial bones is generated and organized.
0	1	3	supercoiled DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with supercoiled DNA. For example, during replication and transcription, template DNA is negatively supercoiled in the receding downstream DNA and positively supercoiled in the approaching downstream DNA.
0	0	1	postsynaptic membrane assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a postsynaptic membrane, a specialized area of membrane facing the presynaptic membrane on the tip of the nerve ending and separated from it by a minute cleft (the synaptic cleft).
0	0	1	presynaptic membrane assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a presynaptic membrane, including any proteins associated with the membrane, but excluding other cellular components. A presynaptic membrane is a  specialized area of membrane of the axon terminal that faces the plasma membrane of the neuron or muscle fiber with which the axon terminal establishes a synaptic junction.
0	1	1	postsynaptic density assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a postsynaptic density, a region that lies adjacent to the cytoplasmic face of the postsynaptic membrane at excitatory synapse.
0	0	1	neuroligin family protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a member of the neuroligin protein family, neuronal cell surface proteins that mediate synapse formation.
3	10	22	scaffold protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a scaffold protein. Scaffold proteins are crucial regulators of many key signaling pathways. Although not strictly defined in function, they are known to interact and/or bind with multiple members of a signaling pathway, tethering them into complexes.
0	1	1	endoplasmic reticulum-Golgi intermediate compartment organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the endoplasmic reticulum (ER)-Golgi intermediate compartment.
0	0	1	gamma-aminobutyric acid receptor clustering	The receptor clustering process in which gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA) receptors are localized to distinct domains in the cell membrane.
1	0	2	AMPA glutamate receptor clustering	The glutamate receptor clustering process in which alpha-amino-3-hydroxy-5-methyl-4-isoxazole propionate (AMPA) receptors are localized to distinct domains in the cell membrane.
1	0	1	NMDA glutamate receptor clustering	The receptor clustering process in which N-methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA) receptors are localized to distinct domains in the cell membrane.
0	0	1	guanylate kinase-associated protein clustering	The clustering process in which guanylate kinase-associated proteins (GKAPs) are localized to distinct domains in the cell membrane. GKAP facilitates assembly of the post synaptic density of neurons.
2	0	4	receptor localization to synapse	Any process in which a receptor is transported to, and/or maintained at the synapse, the junction between a nerve fiber of one neuron and another neuron or muscle fiber or glial cell.
0	0	1	cyclin A1-CDK2 complex	A protein complex consisting of cyclin A1 and cyclin-dependent kinase 2 (CDK2). Cyclins are characterized by periodicity in protein abundance throughout the cell cycle. Cyclin-dependent kinases represent a family of serine/threonine protein kinases that become active upon binding to a cyclin regulatory partner.
0	0	1	cyclin A2-CDK2 complex	A protein complex consisting of cyclin A2 and cyclin-dependent kinase 2 (CDK2). Cyclins are characterized by periodicity in protein abundance throughout the cell cycle. Cyclin-dependent kinases represent a family of serine/threonine protein kinases that become active upon binding to a cyclin regulatory partner.
0	0	1	cyclin B1-CDK1 complex	A protein complex consisting of cyclin B1 and cyclin-dependent kinase 1 (CDK1). Cyclins are characterized by periodicity in protein abundance throughout the cell cycle. Cyclin-dependent kinases represent a family of serine/threonine protein kinases that become active upon binding to a cyclin regulatory partner.
1	0	1	cyclin E1-CDK2 complex	A protein complex consisting of cyclin E1 and cyclin-dependent kinase 2 (CDK2). Cyclins are characterized by periodicity in protein abundance throughout the cell cycle. Cyclin-dependent kinases represent a family of serine/threonine protein kinases that become active upon binding to a cyclin regulatory partner.
0	0	1	cyclin E2-CDK2 complex	A protein complex consisting of cyclin E2 and cyclin-dependent kinase 2 (CDK2). Cyclins are characterized by periodicity in protein abundance throughout the cell cycle. Cyclin-dependent kinases represent a family of serine/threonine protein kinases that become active upon binding to a cyclin regulatory partner.
1	0	0	Bcl-2 family protein complex	A protein complex that consists of members of the Bcl-2 family of anti- and proapoptotic regulators. Bcl-2 proteins respond to cues from various forms of intracellular stress, such as DNA damage or cytokine deprivation, and interact with opposing family members to determine whether or not the caspase proteolytic cascade should be unleashed.
1	0	0	BAK complex	An oligomeric protein complex consisting of BAK, a member of the Bcl-2 family of anti- and proapoptotic regulators.
0	3	0	centralspindlin complex	A heterotetrameric protein complex playing a key role in the formation of the central spindle in mitosis. Made up of two molecules each of a mitotic kinesin (ZEN-4 in Caenorhabditis elegans or MKLP1 in mammals) and of two molecules each of a GTPase activating protein (GAP) factor (CYK-4 in Caenorhabditis elegans or MgcRacGAP in mammals).
2	2	3	neuronal stem cell population maintenance	Any process in by an organism or tissue maintains a population of neuronal stem cells.
2	0	2	positive regulation of inhibitory postsynaptic potential	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of inhibitory postsynaptic potential (IPSP). IPSP is a temporary decrease in postsynaptic membrane potential due to the flow of negatively charged ions into the postsynaptic cell. The flow of ions that causes an IPSP is an inhibitory postsynaptic current (IPSC) and makes it more difficult for the neuron to fire an action potential.
0	1	0	mesenchymal cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a mesenchymal cell. A mesenchymal cell is a loosely associated cell that is part of the connective tissue in an organism. Mesenchymal cells give rise to more mature connective tissue cell types.
3	2	0	cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic process	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal, alpha-peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile, and contributing to the apoptotic process.
1	0	0	GABAergic neuron differentiation	The process in which a neuroblast acquires the specialized structural and functional features of a GABAergic neuron.
2	0	0	fasciculation of sensory neuron axon	The collection of sensory neuron axons into a bundle of rods, known as a fascicle.
2	0	0	fasciculation of motor neuron axon	The collection of motor neuron axons into a bundle of rods, known as a fascicle.
3	3	3	pre-mRNA intronic binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an intronic sequence of a pre-messenger RNA (pre-mRNA).
1	1	0	pre-mRNA intronic pyrimidine-rich binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a pyrimidine-rich (CU-rich) intronic sequence of a pre-messenger RNA (pre-mRNA).
0	0	1	organic cyclic compound binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an organic cyclic compound, any molecular entity that contains carbon arranged in a cyclic molecular structure.
1	0	0	DH domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DH (Dbl homology) domain of a protein. The DH domain contains three structurally conserved regions separated by more variable regions. It is composed of 11 alpha helices that are folded into a flattened, elongated alpha-helix bundle in which two of the three conserved regions, conserved region 1 (CR1) and conserved region 3 (CR3), are exposed near the centre of one surface. CR1 and CR3, together with a part of alpha-6 and the DH/PH (pleckstrin homology) junction site, constitute the Rho GTPase interacting pocket.
0	1	2	nuclear stress granule	A dense aggregation in the nucleus composed of proteins and RNAs that appear when the cell is under stress.
0	1	1	circadian regulation of translation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA translation with a regularity of approximately 24 hours.
2	0	0	AIM2 inflammasome complex	A protein complex that consists of AIM2, ASC, and caspase-1. AIM2 is a member of the HN-200 protein family that appears to be the sensor of cytosolic double-stranded DNA.
0	1	0	epoxide metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving epoxides, compounds in which an oxygen atom is directly attached to two adjacent or non-adjacent carbon atoms of a carbon chain or ring system; thus cyclic ethers.
0	0	1	mitochondrial ribosome binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any part of a mitochondrial ribosome, a ribosome found in the mitochondrion of a eukaryotic cell.
4	2	4	ruffle assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a ruffle, a projection at the leading edge of a crawling cell; the protrusions are supported by a microfilament meshwork. The formation of ruffles (also called membrane ruffling) is thought to be controlled by a group of enzymes known as Rho GTPases, specifically RhoA, Rac1 and cdc42.
0	1	0	serine protease inhibitor complex	A heterodimeric protein complex that contains a serine protease inhibitor and a protease; formation of the complex inhibits serine protease activity.
1	1	0	amelogenesis	The process whose specific outcome is the formation of tooth enamel, occurring in two stages: secretory stage and maturation stage.
0	0	1	dentinogenesis	The process whose specific outcome is the formation of dentin, the mineralized tissue that constitutes the major bulk of teeth. Dentin may be one of three types: primary dentin, secondary dentin, and tertiary dentin.
10	12	6	apoptotic signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals which triggers the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway starts with reception of a signal, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
4	5	7	extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals in which a signal is conveyed from the cell surface to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway starts with either a ligand binding to a cell surface receptor, or a ligand being withdrawn from a cell surface receptor (e.g. in the case of signaling by dependence receptors), and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
5	7	3	extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in absence of ligand	A series of molecular signals in which a signal is conveyed from the cell surface to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway starts with withdrawal of a ligand from a cell surface receptor, and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
3	6	5	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway starts with reception of an intracellular signal (e.g. DNA damage, endoplasmic reticulum stress, oxidative stress etc.), and ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered. The intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway is crucially regulated by permeabilization of the mitochondrial outer membrane (MOMP).
4	4	3	execution phase of apoptosis	A stage of the apoptotic process that starts with the controlled breakdown of the cell through the action of effector caspases or other effector molecules (e.g. cathepsins, calpains etc.). Key steps of the execution phase are rounding-up of the cell, retraction of pseudopodes, reduction of cellular volume (pyknosis), chromatin condensation, nuclear fragmentation (karyorrhexis), plasma membrane blebbing and fragmentation of the cell into apoptotic bodies. When the execution phase is completed, the cell has died.
1	0	0	pilomotor reflex	The reflex process in which the arrectores pilorum (hair follicle) muscles contract and cause the hair to stand erect.
1	2	1	tetraspanin-enriched microdomain	A pre-organized unit composed either of adhesion molecules (mainly integrins and members of the Ig superfamily), signaling receptors and/or enzyme-enriched plasma membrane domains that compartmentalizes cellular processes. Tetraspanin-enriched microdomains might be specially suited for the regulation of avidity of adhesion receptors and the compartmentalization of enzymatic activities.
0	2	0	histone H3-K36 trimethylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of three methyl groups to lysine at position 36 of the histone.
3	1	0	cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal, alpha-peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile, and contributing to the apoptotic signaling pathway.
2	2	0	cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in execution phase of apoptosis	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of internal, alpha-peptide bonds in a polypeptide chain by a mechanism in which the sulfhydryl group of a cysteine residue at the active center acts as a nucleophile, and contributing to the execution phase of apoptosis.
0	0	2	negative regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to stress	Any process that decreases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of a stimulus indicating the organism is under stress. The stress is usually, but not necessarily, exogenous (e.g. temperature, humidity, ionizing radiation).
3	3	2	activation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity	Any process that initiates the activity of the inactive enzyme cysteine-type endopeptidase.
0	1	0	renal filtration	A renal system process in which fluid circulating through the body is filtered through a barrier system.
2	1	0	alveolar lamellar body	A specialized secretory organelle found in type II pneumocytes and involved in the synthesis, secretion, and reutilization of pulmonary surfactant.
1	1	0	cellular response to gonadotropin-releasing hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a gonadotropin-releasing hormone stimulus. Gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) is a peptide hormone responsible for the release of follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH) and luteinizing hormone (LH) from the anterior pituitary. GnRH is synthesized and released by the hypothalamus.
0	1	0	lysosomal membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a lysosomal membrane. A lysosomal membrane is the lipid bilayer surrounding the lysosome and separating its contents from the cell cytoplasm.
3	0	1	sperm connecting piece	The segment of the sperm flagellum that attaches to the implantation fossa of the nucleus in the sperm head; from the remnant of the centriole at this point, the axoneme extends throughout the length of the flagellum.
5	1	4	sperm midpiece	The highly organized segment of the sperm flagellum which begins at the connecting piece and is characterized by the presence of 9 outer dense fibers (ODFs) that lie outside each of the 9 outer axonemal microtubule doublets and by a sheath of mitochondria that encloses the ODFs and the axoneme; the midpiece terminates about one-fourth of the way down the sperm flagellum at the annulus, which marks the beginning of the principal piece.
0	1	3	sperm annulus	The ring-like, filamentous structure located at the distal end of the midpiece of the sperm flagellum; the annulus is thought to form a diffusion barrier between the midpiece and the principal piece and serve as a stabilizing structure for tail rigidity.
4	0	2	sperm principal piece	The segment of the sperm flagellum where the mitochondrial sheath ends, and the outer dense fibers (ODFs) associated with outer axonemal doublets 3 and 8 are replaced by the 2 longitudinal columns of the fibrous sheath (FS) which run the length of the principal piece and are stabilized by circumferential ribs. The principal piece makes up ~2/3 of the length of the sperm flagellum and is defined by the presence of the FS and of only 7 (rather than 9) ODFs which taper and then terminate near the distal end of the principal piece.
3	0	0	sperm end piece	The short tip of the sperm flagellum, adjacent to the sperm principal piece and furthest from the sperm head, which contains only the axoneme surrounded by the plasma membrane.
0	0	1	cellular response to toxic substance	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a toxic stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular response to methylglyoxal	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a methylglyoxal stimulus. Methylglyoxal is a 2-oxoaldehyde derived from propanal.
5	4	2	amyloid-beta clearance	The process in which amyloid-beta is removed from extracellular brain regions by mechanisms involving cell surface receptors.
1	1	0	oligodendrocyte apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in an oligodendrocyte. Oligodendrocytes belong to a class of large neuroglial (macroglial) cells in the central nervous system, where they form the insulating myelin sheath of axons.
0	1	1	R2TP complex	A highly conserved protein complex comprised of two ATP-dependent DNA helicases (Rvb1p and Rvb2p in yeast, Pontin52 and Reptin52 in humans), Pih1p in yeast or PIH1D1 in humans, and Tah1 in yeast or RPAP3 in humans. The complex associates with Hsp90 and is thought to have a role in assembly of large protein or protein/nucleic acid complexes. In this role it is involved in multiple processes such as box C/D snoRNP biogenesis, phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase-related protein kinase (PIKK) signaling, RNA polymerase II assembly, and others.
0	1	0	leukotriene B4 12-hydroxy dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: leukotriene B4 + NADP(+) = 12-oxo-leukotriene B4 + NADPH + H(+).
1	0	0	omega-hydroxylase P450 pathway	The chemical reactions and pathways by which arachidonic acid is converted to other compounds initially by omega-hydroxylation.
0	1	1	cytoophidium	A subcellular filamentary structure where CTP synthase is compartmentalized in a range of organisms including bacteria, yeast, fruit fly, rat and human.
1	0	0	ammonium homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of ammonium.
1	0	0	creatinine homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of creatinine.
1	0	0	urea homeostasis	Any biological process involved in the maintenance of an internal steady state of urea.
0	1	1	complement-dependent cytotoxicity	Cell killing caused by the membrane attack complex formed following complement activation.
0	1	0	immune complex formation	The process that gives rise to an immune complex. Immune complexes are clusters of antibodies bound to antigen, to which complement may also be fixed, and which may precipitate or remain in solution. Examples are the clumping of cells such as bacteria or red blood cells in the presence of an antibody, precipitation of a toxin after an antibody binds to it, and clumping of viral particles as a result of antibody binding to the virus.
2	3	4	hepatocyte apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a hepatocyte, the main structural component of the liver.
0	0	1	renal phosphate ion absorption	A renal system process in which phosphate ions are taken up from the collecting ducts and proximal and distal loops of the nephron. In non-mammalian species, absorption may occur in related structures.
1	0	0	activation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that initiates the activity of an inactive cysteine-type endopeptidase involved in the apoptotic signaling pathway.
0	0	1	regulation of nucleus size	Any process that modulates the size of the nucleus.
0	3	0	programmed necrotic cell death	A necrotic cell death process that results from the activation of endogenous cellular processes, such as signaling involving death domain receptors or Toll-like receptors.
0	0	1	cap1 mRNA methylation	Methylation of the ribose of the first nucleotide of a 5'-capped mRNA.
2	1	5	plasma membrane tubulation	A membrane tubulation process occurring in a plasma membrane.
0	1	4	7SK snRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a 7SK small nuclear RNA (7SK snRNA).
2	0	0	melanocyte migration	The orderly movement of melanocytes from one site to another, often during the development of a multicellular organism. A melanocyte is a pigment cell derived from the neural crest. It contains melanin-filled pigment granules, which give a brown to black appearance.
1	0	0	melanocyte adhesion	The attachment of a melanocyte to another cell via adhesion molecules.
1	3	0	response to antineoplastic agent	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an antineoplastic agent stimulus. An antineoplastic agent is a substance that inhibits or prevents the proliferation of neoplasms.
1	0	0	response to antipsychotic drug	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an antipsychotic drug stimulus. Antipsychotic drugs are agents that control agitated psychotic behaviour, alleviate acute psychotic states, reduce psychotic symptoms, and exert a quieting effect.
0	0	2	response to clozapine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a clozapine stimulus.
0	1	0	inhibition of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity	Any process that prevents the activation of an inactive cysteine-type endopeptidase.
1	2	0	ripoptosome	A protein complex whose core components are the receptor-interacting serine/threonine-protein kinases RIPK1 and RIPK3 (also called RIP1 and RIP3). Formation of the ripoptosome can induce an extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway or a necroptotic signaling pathway. The composition of this protein complex may depend on several factors including nature of the signal, cell type and more.
0	1	0	ripoptosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a ripoptosome, a protein complex whose formation can induce an extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway or a necroptotic signaling pathway. The composition of this protein complex may depend on several factors including nature of the signal, cell type and more.
2	0	3	mitochondrial outer membrane permeabilization	The process by which the mitochondrial outer membrane becomes permeable to the passing of proteins and other molecules from the intermembrane space to the cytosol as part of the apoptotic signaling pathway.
2	0	2	neutrophil clearance	The selective elimination of senescent neutrophils from the body by autoregulatory mechanisms.
6	4	1	autophagosome maturation	Removal of PI3P and Atg8/LC3 after the closure of the phagophore and before the fusion with the endosome/lysosome (e.g. mammals and insects) or vacuole (yeast), and that very likely destabilizes other Atg proteins and thus enables their efficient dissociation and recycling.
0	0	2	protein localization to heterochromatin	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, a part of a chromosome that is organized into heterochromatin.
1	0	1	perinucleolar compartment	The perinucleolar compartment (PNC) is a subnuclear structure associated with, but structurally distinct from, the nucleolus. The PNC contains large amounts of the heterogeneous nuclear ribonucleoprotein complex (hnRNP) called hnRNP 1 (PTB). Many RNA binding proteins as well as RNA polymerase III transcripts are highly enriched in this compartment. PTB and pol III transcripts are required for the integrity of the PNC.
0	1	1	carbohydrate derivative binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a carbohydrate derivative.
2	1	1	establishment of Sertoli cell barrier	Establishment of a structure near the basement membrane in adjacent Sertoli cells of the seminiferous epithelium for maintaining spermatogenesis. The structure consists of tight junctions, basal ectoplasmic specializations, and desmosome-like junctions.
1	4	0	MDM2/MDM4 family protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any isoform of the MDM2/MDM4 protein family, comprising negative regulators of p53.
0	1	1	photoreceptor disc membrane	Stack of disc membranes located inside a photoreceptor outer segment, and containing densely packed molecules of photoreceptor proteins that traverse the lipid bilayer. Disc membranes arise as evaginations of the ciliary membrane during the development of the outer segment and may or may not remain contiguous with the ciliary membrane.
1	2	2	glial cell projection	A prolongation or process extending from a glial cell.
0	1	0	cellular response to raffinose	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a raffinose stimulus.
0	0	1	Lewy body	Cytoplasmic, spherical inclusion commonly found in damaged neurons, and composed of abnormally phosphorylated, neurofilament proteins aggregated with ubiquitin and alpha-synuclein.
0	0	5	neurofibrillary tangle	Intracellular mass of paired, helically wound protein filaments (also called PHF) lying in the cytoplasm of neuronal cell bodies and neuritic cell processes. Neurofibrillary tangles contain an abnormally phosphorylated form of a microtubule-associated protein, tau. The shape of these inclusions may resemble a flame or a star.
6	5	4	liver regeneration	The regrowth of lost or destroyed liver.
1	0	1	tubular endosome	A network of fine tubules in the vicinity of the Golgi complex and around the centriole.
0	2	2	microtubule bundle	An arrangement of closely apposed microtubules running parallel to each other.
9	6	6	mitotic spindle pole	Either of the ends of a mitotic spindle, a spindle that forms as part of mitosis, where spindle microtubules are organized; usually contains a microtubule organizing center and accessory molecules, spindle microtubules and astral microtubules.
0	0	3	dense body	An electron dense body which may contain granules.
1	0	3	supramolecular fiber organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a supramolecular fiber, a polymer consisting of an indefinite number of protein or protein complex subunits that have polymerised to form a fiber-shaped structure.
1	1	6	apical dendrite	A dendrite that emerges near the apical pole of a neuron. In bipolar neurons, apical dendrites are located on the opposite side of the soma from the axon.
1	0	3	basal dendrite	A dendrite that emerges near the basal pole of a neuron. In bipolar neurons, basal dendrites are either on the same side of the soma as the axon, or project toward the axon.
0	0	1	CA3 pyramidal cell dendrite	A dendrite of a hippocampal CA3 pyramidal cell.
0	1	1	sorting endosome	A multivesicular body surrounded by and connected with multiple tubular compartments with associated vesicles.
0	0	1	spine apparatus	A specialization of the endomembrane system found in some classes of dendritic spines consisting of two or more closely apposed lamellae with interspersed electron dense material.  The endomembrane component is continuous with the smooth endoplasmic reticulum.
1	0	0	dendritic tree	The entire complement of dendrites for a neuron, consisting of each primary dendrite and all its branches.
1	0	2	astrocyte projection	A prolongation or process extending from the soma of an astrocyte and wrapping around neurons.
0	0	2	astrocyte end-foot	Terminal process of astrocyte abutting non-neuronal surfaces in the brain.
0	1	0	glial limiting end-foot	Terminal process of astrocyte that extends to the surface of the central nervous system. Together, glial limiting end-feet form the glial limiting membrane or glia limitans.
0	1	2	GAIT complex	A protein complex which mediates interferon-gamma-induced transcript-selective translation inhibition in inflammation processes. The complex binds to stem loop-containing GAIT elements in the 3'-UTR of diverse inflammatory mRNAs and suppresses their translation by blocking the recruitment of the 43S ribosomal complex to m7G cap-bound eIF4G. In humans it includes RPL13A, EPRS, SYNCRIP and GAPDH; mouse complexes lack SYNCRIP.
0	0	1	mesaxon	Portion of the ensheathing process (either myelin or non-myelin) where the enveloping lips of the ensheathing cell come together so that their apposed plasma membranes run parallel to each other, separated by a cleft 12 nm wide.
0	1	1	Schwann cell microvillus	Small finger-like extension of a Schwann cell that contacts the nodal membrane.
0	0	1	hippocampal mossy fiber	Axon of dentate gyrus granule cell projecting to hippocampal area CA3, characterized by expansions (mossy fiber expansions) giving the fibers a mossy appearance. These unmyelinated axons were first described by Ramon y Cajal.
0	0	1	ribbon synapse	Type of synapse characterized by an electron-dense ribbon, lamella (bar) or spherical body in the presynaptic process cytoplasm.
0	0	2	cyclin-dependent protein kinase activity	Catalysis of the phosphorylation of an amino acid residue in a protein, usually according to the reaction: a protein + ATP = a phosphoprotein + ADP. This reaction requires the binding of a regulatory cyclin subunit and full activity requires stimulatory phosphorylation by a CDK-activating kinase (CAK).
0	1	0	retinal rod cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a retinal rod cell, one of the two photoreceptor cell types of the vertebrate retina.
1	2	1	dendrite extension	Long distance growth of a single dendrite involved in cellular development.
1	0	1	neuron projection guidance	The process in which the migration of a neuron projection is directed to a specific target site in response to a combination of attractive and repulsive cues.
2	0	0	multivesicular body lumen	The volume enclosed by the outermost membrane of a multivesicular body.
0	0	1	multivesicular body, internal vesicle	A membrane-bounded vesicle wholly contained within a multivesicular body.
0	0	1	multivesicular body, internal vesicle lumen	The volume enclosed by the membrane of the multivesicular body internal vesicle.
1	0	0	sympathetic neuron projection extension	Long distance growth of a single sympathetic neuron projection involved in cellular development. A neuron projection is a prolongation or process extending from a nerve cell, e.g. an axon or dendrite.
1	0	0	sympathetic neuron projection guidance	The process in which the migration of a sympathetic neuron projection is directed to a specific target site in response to a combination of attractive and repulsive cues.
0	0	2	structural molecule activity conferring elasticity	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a complex or assembly within or outside a cell, providing elasticity and recoiling.
2	1	1	regulation of vesicle size	Any process that modulates the size of a vesicle.
1	0	0	endothelial tube lumen extension	Any endothelial tube morphogenesis process by which the tube is increased in length.
0	0	1	stress response to metal ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a disturbance in organismal or cellular homeostasis caused by a metal ion stimulus.
1	0	0	mannosylation	The covalent attachment of a mannose residue to a substrate molecule.
0	1	0	sialylation	The covalent attachment of sialic acid to a substrate molecule.
1	3	2	Gemini of coiled bodies	Nuclear bodies frequently found near or associated with Cajal bodies (also called coiled bodies or CBs). Gemini of coiled bodies, or 'gems', are similar in size and shape to CBs, and often indistinguishable under the microscope. Unlike CBs, gems do not contain small nuclear ribonucleoproteins (snRNPs); they contain a protein called survivor of motor neurons (SMN) whose function relates to snRNP biogenesis. Gems are believed to assist CBs in snRNP biogenesis, and to play a role in the etiology of spinal muscular atrophy (SMA).
0	1	0	Rad6-Rad18 complex	A ubiquitin ligase complex found to be involved in post-replicative bypass of UV-damaged DNA and UV mutagenesis. In S. cerevisiae, the complex contains the ubiquitin conjugating enzyme Rad6 and Rad18, a protein containing a RING finger motif and a nucleotide binding motif. The yeast Rad6-Rad18 heterodimer has ubiquitin conjugating activity, binds single-stranded DNA, and possesses single-stranded DNA-dependent ATPase activity.
0	1	0	base-excision repair, AP site formation via deaminated base removal	A base-excision repair, AP site formation process occurring via excision of a deaminated base.
0	0	3	cardiac myofibril	A cardiac myofibril is a myofibril specific to cardiac muscle cells.
0	0	3	myosin II filament	A bipolar filament composed of myosin II molecules.
0	1	1	spliceosomal tri-snRNP complex	A spliceosomal snRNP complex containing U4 and U6 (or U4atac and U6atac) snRNAs and U5 snRNAs and associated proteins.
0	4	0	necroptotic signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals which triggers the necroptotic death of a cell. The pathway starts with reception of a signal, is characterized by activation of receptor-interacting serine/threonine-protein kinase 1 and/or 3 (RIPK1/3, also called RIP1/3), and ends when the execution phase of necroptosis is triggered.
0	1	0	execution phase of necroptosis	A stage of the necroptotic process that starts after a necroptotic signal has been relayed to the execution machinery. Key steps of the execution phase are swelling of organelles, minor ultrastructural modifications of the nucleus (specifically, dilatation of the nuclear membrane and condensation of chromatin into small, irregular, circumscribed patches) and increased cell volume (oncosis), culminating in the disruption of the plasma membrane and subsequent loss of intracellular contents. The execution phase ends when the cell has died.
1	0	0	mast cell migration	The movement of a mast cell within or between different tissues and organs of the body.
0	1	0	lymphoid lineage cell migration into thymus	The movement of a lymphoid lineage cell (also called a lymphoid lineage restricted progenitor cell) into the thymus. Lymphoid lineage cells enter and exit the thymus several times as part of this process.
1	2	0	ciliary transition fiber	A nine-bladed, propeller-like protein complex that links the distal end of the basal body and the cilium to the plasma membrane. Functions in protein sorting and gating (i.e. active and passive transport of proteins in and out of the cilium).
9	3	3	ciliary tip	Part of the cilium where the axoneme ends. The ciliary tip has been implicated in ciliary assembly and disassembly, as well as signal transduction.
1	0	0	ciliary inversin compartment	Proximal part of the ciliary shaft to which the inversin protein (also called Inv) specifically localizes. The inversin compartment appears to have a different protein composition than the rest of the cilium, although there is no structure that separates it form the distal part of the cilium.
7	2	5	ciliary base	Area of the cilium (also called flagellum) where the basal body and the axoneme are anchored to the plasma membrane. The ciliary base encompasses the distal part of the basal body, transition fibers and transition zone and is structurally and functionally very distinct from the rest of the cilium. In this area proteins are sorted and filtered before entering the cilium, and many ciliary proteins localize specifically to this area.
1	0	1	transcription preinitiation complex	A protein-DNA complex composed of proteins binding promoter DNA to form the transcriptional preinitiation complex (PIC), the formation of which is a prerequisite for transcription.
0	1	0	mitochondrial double-strand break repair via homologous recombination	The repair of a double-strand break in mitochondrial DNA in which the broken DNA molecule is repaired using homologous sequences.
0	0	2	calcium ion transmembrane import into cytosol	A process in which a calcium ion is transported from one side of a membrane to the other into the cytosol by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	0	0	glutathione oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein-S-S-glutathione + glutathione-SH = protein-SH + glutathione-S-S-glutathione.
0	0	1	lateral cell cortex	The region directly beneath the plasma membrane of the lateral portion of the cell.
0	1	2	lamellipodium organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a lamellipodium. A lamellipodium is a thin sheetlike process extended by the leading edge of a crawling fibroblast; contains a dense meshwork of actin filaments.
2	2	0	cullin family protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any member of the cullin family, hydrophobic proteins that act as scaffolds for ubiquitin ligases (E3).
1	0	0	potassium ion export across plasma membrane	The directed movement of potassium ions from inside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the extracellular region.
0	1	0	extrinsic component of omegasome membrane	The component of the omegasome membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	1	0	extrinsic component of phagophore assembly site membrane	The component of the phagophore assembly site membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	1	1	extrinsic component of autophagosome membrane	The component of the autophagosome membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	0	1	L-arginine import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of L-arginine from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
1	1	0	histone H3-K36 dimethylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of two methyl groups to lysine at position 36 of the histone.
0	2	5	STAT family protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any member of the signal transducers and activators of transcription (STAT) protein family. STATs are, as the name indicates, both signal transducers and transcription factors. STATs are activated by cytokines and some growth factors and thus control important biological processes including cell growth, cell differentiation, apoptosis and immune responses.
2	0	2	double-strand break repair via classical nonhomologous end joining	An instance of double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining that requires a number of factors important for V(D)J recombination, including the KU70/80 heterodimer (KU), XRCC4, ligase IV, and DNA-PKcs in mammals. It does not produce translocations (as opposed to the alternative nonhomologous end joining).
0	1	1	double-strand break repair via alternative nonhomologous end joining	An instance of double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining that is independent of factors important for V(D)J recombination (as opposed to classical nonhomologous end joining). It often results in a deletion with microhomology (i.e. 5-25bp homology) at the repair junction. Among different subclasses of nonhomologous end joining (NHEJ), alternative NHEJ appears to play a significant role in the etiology of mutations that arise during cancer development and treatment.
2	1	4	histone H3-K4 monomethylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of one methyl group to lysine at position 4 of the histone.
1	0	1	establishment of RNA localization to telomere	The directed movement of RNA to a specific location in the telomeric region of a chromosome.
1	0	1	establishment of protein-containing complex localization to telomere	The directed movement of a protein-containing macromolecular complex to a specific location in the telomeric region of a chromosome.
1	0	0	telomere maintenance via base-excision repair	A telomere maintenance process that occurs by base-excision repair of telomeric DNA in response to DNA damage. Telomeric sequences are particularly susceptible to oxidative DNA damage, due to their G-rich nature.
0	1	1	intracellular vesicle	Any vesicle that is part of the intracellular region.
1	0	0	connective tissue replacement	The series of events leading to growth of connective tissue when loss of tissues that are incapable of regeneration occurs, or when fibrinous exudate cannot be adequately cleared.
15	17	21	ciliary basal body-plasma membrane docking	The docking of a cytosolic centriole/basal body to the plasma membrane via the ciliary transition fibers. In some species this may happen via an intermediate step, by first docking to the ciliary vesicle via the ciliary transition fibers. The basal body-ciliary vesicle then relocates to the plasma membrane, followed by the ciliary vesicle fusing with the plasma membrane, effectively attaching the basal body to the plasma membrane.
1	5	16	disordered domain specific binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a disordered domain of a protein.
1	0	0	LEM domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a LEM domain. The LEM domain (for lamina-associated polypeptide, emerin, MAN1 domain) is present in a group of nuclear proteins that bind chromatin through interaction of the LEM motif with the conserved DNA crosslinking protein, barrier-to-autointegration factor (BAF).
1	1	0	9+2 motile cilium	A motile cilium where the axoneme has a ring of nine outer microtubule doublets plus two central microtubules (and is therefore called a 9+2 axoneme).
0	2	3	non-motile cilium	A cilium which may have a variable array of axonemal microtubules but does not contain molecular motors.
2	0	1	9+0 non-motile cilium	A non-motile cilium where the axoneme has a ring of nine outer microtubule doublets but no central microtubules (and is therefore called a 9+0 axoneme).
0	0	1	photoreceptor cell cilium	A specialised 9+0 non-motile cilium found in photoreceptor cells. A ciliary transition zone called 'photoreceptor connecting cilium' links the photoreceptor outer segment to the inner segment.
1	0	0	urate salt excretion	The elimination by an organism of urate salt or uric acid.
0	0	1	mitochondrial tRNA 5'-end processing	The process in which the 5' end of a pre-tRNA molecule is converted to that of a mature tRNA in the mitochondrion.
1	3	1	regulation of blood vessel diameter	Any process that modulates the diameter of blood vessels.
1	1	0	endosome membrane tubulation	A membrane tubulation process occurring in an endosome membrane.
1	1	0	regulation of DNA stability	Any process that modulates the stability of DNA.
0	0	1	membrane bending	A membrane organization process resulting in the bending of a membrane.
0	0	1	non-replicative transposition, DNA-mediated	Process by which a transposable element is excised from the donor site and integrated at the target site without replication of the element. Also referred to as cut-and-paste transposition.
1	1	4	G-rich strand telomeric DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with G-rich, single-stranded, telomere-associated DNA.
1	1	0	endothelial to hematopoietic transition	The generation of hematopoietic stem cells from hemogenic endothelial cells by a process that includes tight-junction dissolution and loss of cell polarity followed by delamination from the endothelium.
1	1	1	histone H3-K27 trimethylation	The modification of histone H3 by addition of three methyl groups to lysine at position 27 of the histone.
0	1	1	centriole assembly	A cellular process that results in the assembly of one or more centrioles.
0	1	0	de novo centriole assembly involved in multi-ciliated epithelial cell differentiation	Centriole assembly in which a centriole arises de novo by a process involving an electron-dense structure known as a deuterosome, rather than by duplication of an existing centriole, and occurring as part of multi-ciliated epithelial cell differentiation.
0	1	0	deuterosome	A spherical, electron dense, cytoplasmic structure that is involved in de novo assembly of centrioles.
1	0	0	defense response to other organism	Reactions triggered in response to the presence of another organism that act to protect the cell or organism from damage caused by that organism.
0	1	0	lumenal side of Golgi membrane	The side of the Golgi membrane that faces the lumen.
0	2	1	cytoplasmic side of endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The side (leaflet) of the plasma membrane that faces the cytoplasm.
1	1	0	cytoplasmic side of rough endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The side (leaflet) of the rough endoplasmic reticulum membrane that faces the cytoplasm.
2	0	0	cytoplasmic side of early endosome membrane	The side (leaflet) of the early endosome membrane that faces the cytoplasm.
0	1	0	cytoplasmic side of membrane	The side of a membrane that faces the cytoplasm.
0	0	3	cytoplasmic side of lysosomal membrane	The side (leaflet) of the lysosomal membrane that faces the cytoplasm.
0	0	1	lumenal side of lysosomal membrane	The side (leaflet) of the lysosomal membrane that faces the lumen.
1	0	0	lumenal side of membrane	Any side (leaflet) of a membrane that faces the lumen of an organelle.
0	0	1	inactive sex chromosome	A sex chromosome that has been inactivated.
5	6	4	cellular response to virus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus from a virus.
0	2	1	external side of apical plasma membrane	The leaflet the apical region of the plasma membrane that faces away from the cytoplasm and any proteins embedded or anchored in it or attached to its surface.
0	1	1	cytoplasmic side of apical plasma membrane	The side (leaflet) of the apical region of the plasma membrane that faces the cytoplasm.
0	1	0	mucin granule	A secretory granule that contains mucin.
20	16	24	cell-cell adhesion	The attachment of one cell to another cell via adhesion molecules.
2	3	3	cell-cell adhesion mediator activity	The binding by a cell-adhesion protein on the cell surface to an extracellular matrix component, to mediate adhesion of the cell to another cell.
1	0	0	collagen fibril binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a collagen fibril.
1	1	0	collagen binding involved in cell-matrix adhesion	Any collagen binding that occurs as part of cell-matrix adhesion.
2	1	13	cadherin binding involved in cell-cell adhesion	Any cadherin binding that occurs as part of the process of cell-cell adhesion.
1	1	1	cation transmembrane transport	The process in which a cation is transported across a membrane.
0	0	1	anion transmembrane transport	The process in which an anion is transported across a membrane.
0	1	0	import into cell	The directed movement of some substance from outside of a cell into a cell. This may occur via transport across the plasma membrane or via endocytosis.
0	0	1	inorganic anion import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of inorganic anions from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	0	1	inorganic cation import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of inorganic cations from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	1	0	inorganic cation transmembrane transport	A process in which an inorganic cation is transported from one side of a membrane to the other by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	0	2	extrinsic component of neuronal dense core vesicle membrane	The component of the neuronal dense core vesicle membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
2	0	1	photoreceptor ribbon synapse	A ribbon synapse between a retinal photoreceptor cell (rod or cone) and a retinal bipolar cell.  These contain a plate-like synaptic ribbon.
11	8	19	Schaffer collateral - CA1 synapse	A synapse between the Schaffer collateral axon of a CA3 pyramidal cell and a CA1 pyramidal cell.
4	3	5	hippocampal mossy fiber to CA3 synapse	One of the giant synapses that form between the mossy fiber axons of dentate gyrus granule cells and the large complex spines of CA3 pyramidal cells. It consists of a giant bouton known as the mossy fiber expansion, synapsed to the complex, multiheaded spine (thorny excresence) of a CA3 pyramidal cell.
3	0	0	parallel fiber to Purkinje cell synapse	An excitatory synapse formed by the parallel fibers of granule cells synapsing onto the dendrites of Purkinje cells.
0	0	1	glycinergic synapse	A synapse that uses glycine as a neurotransmitter.
2	1	0	dopaminergic synapse	A synapse that uses dopamine as a neurotransmitter.
1	1	3	regulation of synaptic vesicle cycle	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the synaptic vesicle cycle.
1	0	0	inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate receptor activity involved in regulation of postsynaptic cytosolic calcium levels	Any inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate receptor activity that is involved in regulation of postsynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentration.
2	2	1	regulation of neurotransmitter receptor localization to postsynaptic specialization membrane	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neurotransmitter receptor localization to postsynaptic specialization membrane.
2	0	1	neurotransmitter loading into synaptic vesicle	The active transport of neurotransmitters into a synaptic vesicle.  This import is fuelled by an electrochemical gradient across the vesicle membrane, established by the action of proton pumps.
1	0	3	calcium ion import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of calcium ions from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	1	0	glucose import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of glucose from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
3	1	1	L-glutamate import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of L-glutamate from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	2	1	leucine import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of leucine from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
3	0	2	sodium ion import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of sodium ions from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	0	3	positive regulation of the force of heart contraction	Any process that increases the force of heart muscle contraction.
0	0	1	negative regulation of the force of heart contraction	Any process that decreases the force of heart muscle contraction.
1	0	1	import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of some substance from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
4	2	2	cell-cell adhesion via plasma-membrane adhesion molecules	The attachment of one cell to another cell via adhesion molecules that are at least partially embedded in the plasma membrane.
0	1	1	cerebellar neuron development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a cerebellar neuron over time, from initial commitment of the cell to a specific fate, to the fully functional differentiated cell.
1	0	0	integral component of the cytoplasmic side of the plasma membrane	The component of the plasma membrane consisting of the gene products that penetrate only the cytoplasmic side of the membrane.
1	4	4	cellular response to interleukin-7	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an interleukin-7 stimulus.
1	0	0	FBXO family protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any member of the FBXO protein family. Members of this family have an F-box protein motif of approximately 50 amino acids that functions as a site of protein-protein interaction.
0	0	1	skin epidermis development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of the skin epidermis over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mitophagy in response to mitochondrial depolarization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitophagy in response to mitochondrial depolarization.
0	1	1	response to mitochondrial depolarisation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) in response to the depolarization of one or more mitochondria.
3	2	3	pre-mRNA cleavage required for polyadenylation	The targeted, endonucleolytic cleavage of a pre-mRNA,  required for polyadenylation of the 3' end.  This cleavage is directed by binding sites near the 3' end of the mRNA and leaves a 3' hydoxyl end which then becomes a target for adenylation.
0	1	0	xenophagy	The selective autophagy process in which a region of cytoplasm containing an intracellular pathogen or some part of an intracellular pathogen (e.g. viral capsid) is enclosed in a double membrane bound autophagosome, which then fuses with the lysosome leading to degradation of the contents.
11	12	26	presynapse	The part of a synapse that is part of the presynaptic cell.
8	3	25	postsynapse	The part of a synapse that is part of the post-synaptic cell.
0	0	1	membrane protein complex	Any protein complex that is part of a membrane.
2	1	1	plasma membrane protein complex	Any protein complex that is part of the plasma membrane.
1	1	0	mRNA cap binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a 7-methylguanosine (m7G) group or derivative located at the 5' end of an mRNA molecule.
0	1	2	modulation of excitatory postsynaptic potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of excitatory postsynaptic potential (EPSP). EPSP is a process that leads to a temporary increase in postsynaptic potential due to the flow of positively charged ions into the postsynaptic cell. The flow of ions that causes an EPSP is an excitatory postsynaptic current (EPSC) and makes it easier for the neuron to fire an action potential.
1	1	0	BMP receptor activity	Combining with a member of the bone morphogenetic protein (BMP) family, and transmitting a signal across the plasma membrane to initiate a change in cell activity.
1	2	1	endoplasmic reticulum tubular network membrane	The membrane of the endoplasmic reticulum tubular network.
0	0	1	presynaptic endosome	An endosome present in the presynapse that fuses with endocytic vesicles arising in the presynaptic endocytic zone.  This organelle is believed to be involved in regeneration of synaptic vesicles.
3	0	3	presynaptic active zone cytoplasmic component	A specialized region below the presynaptic membrane, characterized by electron-dense material, a specialized cytoskeletal matrix and accumulated (associated) synaptic vesicles.
1	0	0	presynaptic endocytic zone	A specialized region of the plasma membrane and underlying cytoplasm which surround the the active zone, into which synaptic vesicle membranes are recycled following exocytosis.  It is especially enriched in endocytic proteins following intense activity.
0	0	2	presynaptic endocytic zone membrane	The region of the presynaptic membrane that is part of the presynaptic endocytic zone - where synaptic vesicles are endocytosed and recycled following release.
0	1	2	postsynaptic recycling endosome	A recycling endosome of the postsynapse. In postsynaptic terminals with dendritic spines, it is typically located at the base of a dendritic spine. It is involved in recycling of neurotransmitter receptors to the postsynaptic membrane.  In some cases at least, this recycling is activated by postsynaptic signalling and so can play a role in long term potentiation.
2	0	10	postsynaptic density membrane	The membrane component of the postsynaptic density. This is the region of the postsynaptic membrane in which the population of neurotransmitter receptors involved in synaptic transmission are concentrated.
0	0	3	protein transport along microtubule	The directed movement of a protein along a microtubule, mediated by motor proteins.
1	0	0	postsynaptic early endosome	An early endosome of the postsynapse. It acts as the major sorting station on the endocytic pathway, targeting neurotransmitter receptors for degregation or recycling.
0	0	2	postsynaptic endocytic zone membrane	The region of the postsynaptic membrane that is part of the postsynaptic endocytic zone.  This region of membrane is associated with stable clathrin puncta.
1	0	0	postsynaptic endosome	An endosomal compartment that is part of the post-synapse. Only early and recycling endosomes are typically present in the postsynapse.
0	0	2	sequence-specific single stranded DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with single-stranded DNA of a specific nucleotide composition.
1	0	0	cellular detoxification of cadmium ion	Any process that reduces or removes the toxicity of cadmium cations in a cell. These include transport of cadmium cations away from sensitive areas and to compartments or complexes whose purpose is sequestration.
1	0	1	extrinsic component of synaptic vesicle membrane	The component of the synaptic vesicle membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
1	0	0	intestinal lipid absorption	Any process in which lipids are taken up from the contents of the intestine.
0	0	1	membrane microdomain	A membrane region with a lipid composition that is distinct from that of the membrane regions that surround it.
1	0	1	bone growth	The increase in size or mass of a bone that contributes to the shaping of that bone.
1	3	4	cellular oxidant detoxification	Any process carried out at the cellular level that reduces or removes the toxicity superoxide radicals or hydrogen peroxide.
1	0	3	postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton	The actin cytoskeleton that is part of a postsynapse.
0	0	1	epididymosome	A microvesicle of the epididymal fluid, from which spermatozoa aquire membrane proteins.
1	0	0	neurotransmitter receptor transport to plasma membrane	The directed movement of neurotransmitter receptor to the plasma membrane in transport vesicles.
0	0	1	maintenance of postsynaptic specialization structure	A process which maintains the organization and the arrangement of proteins in the presynaptic specialization.
1	1	3	structural constituent of presynaptic active zone	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a presynaptic active zone.
2	1	0	synapse pruning	A cellular process that results in the controlled breakdown of synapse. After it starts the process is continuous until the synapse has disappeared.
0	0	3	postsynaptic neurotransmitter receptor internalization	A receptor-mediated endocytosis process that results in the internalization of a neurotransmitter receptor from the postsynaptic membrane endocytic zone into an endocytic vesicle.
0	0	1	modification of postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton	Any process that modifies the structure of a postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton.
0	0	1	modification of dendritic spine	Any process that modifies the structure of a dendritic spine.
0	2	2	neurotransmitter receptor transport, endosome to postsynaptic membrane	The directed movement of neurotransmitter receptor from the postsynaptic endosome to the postsynaptic membrane in transport vesicles.
1	0	1	extrinsic component of presynaptic membrane	The component of the presynaptic membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
1	1	0	extrinsic component of postsynaptic membrane	The component of the postsynaptic membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
1	0	0	extrinsic component of presynaptic active zone membrane	The component of the presynaptic active zone membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	1	0	extrinsic component of postsynaptic specialization membrane	The component of the postsynaptic specialization membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	0	2	extrinsic component of presynaptic endocytic zone membrane	The component of the presynaptic endocytic zone membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
1	1	1	regulation of action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination. This typically occurs via modulation of the activity or expression of voltage-gated ion channels.
1	0	3	regulation of cardiac muscle cell action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination in a cardiac muscle cell. This typically occurs via modulation of the activity or expression of voltage-gated ion channels.
0	1	0	regulation of membrane depolarization during action potential	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of membrane depolarization during an action potential. Membrane depolarization is the process in which membrane potential changes in the depolarizing direction from the resting potential.
0	0	1	regulation of membrane repolarization during action potential	Any process that modulates the rate, frequency or extent of membrane repolarization during an action potential. Membrane repolarization is the process in which membrane potential changes in the repolarizing direction, towards the resting potential.
0	1	1	regulation of AV node cell action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination in an atrioventricular node myocyte. This typically occurs via modulation of the activity or expression of voltage-gated ion channels.
0	0	2	regulation of SA node cell action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination in an SA node cardiac myocyte. This typically occurs via modulation of the activity or expression of voltage-gated ion channels.
0	0	1	regulation of neuronal action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination in a neuron. This typically occurs via modulation of the activity or expression of voltage-gated ion channels.
1	0	3	regulation of cardiac muscle cell action potential involved in regulation of contraction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination in a cardiac muscle cell contributing to the regulation of its contraction.
0	0	2	regulation of atrial cardiac muscle cell action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination in an atrial cardiac muscle cell contributing to the regulation of its contraction. This typically occurs via modulation of the activity or expression of voltage-gated ion channels.
0	1	6	regulation of ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of action potential creation, propagation or termination in a ventricular cardiac muscle cell contributing to the regulation of its contraction.  This typically occurs via modulation of the activity or expression of voltage-gated ion channels.
1	0	0	membrane repolarization during atrial cardiac muscle cell action potential	The process in which ions are transported across a membrane such that the atrial cardiomyocyte membrane potential changes in the direction from the positive membrane potential at the peak of the action potential towards the negative resting potential.
1	0	0	membrane repolarization during ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential	The process in which ions are transported across a membrane such that the ventricular cardiomyocyte membrane potential changes in the direction from the positive membrane potential at the peak of the action potential towards the negative resting potential.
1	0	0	structural constituent of synapse	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a synapse.
0	0	1	structural constituent of postsynaptic density	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a postsynaptic density.
1	0	0	retrograde trans-synaptic signaling by endocannabinoid	Cell-cell signaling from postsynapse to presynapse, across the synaptic cleft, mediated by an  endocannabinoid ligand.
0	0	1	retrograde trans-synaptic signaling by nitric oxide, modulating synaptic transmission	Modulation of synaptic transmission by cell-cell signaling from postsynapse to presynapse, across the synaptic cleft, mediated by nitric oxide.
0	0	1	axonal transport	The directed movement of organelles or molecules along microtubules in axons.
1	0	0	retrograde trans-synaptic signaling by trans-synaptic protein complex	Cell-cell signaling from postsynapse to presynapse, across the synaptic cleft, mediated by trans-synaptic protein complex.
0	0	2	neurotransmitter receptor transport, postsynaptic endosome to lysosome	The directed movement of neurotransmitter receptor from the postsynaptic endosome in tranpsort vesicles to the lysosome for degradation.
2	1	2	regulation of postsynaptic neurotransmitter receptor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neurotransmitter receptor activity involved in synaptic transmission. Modulation may be via an effect on ligand affinity, or effector funtion such as ion selectivity or pore opening/closing in ionotropic receptors.
0	0	3	dendritic transport of messenger ribonucleoprotein complex	The directed movement of a messenger ribonucleoprotein complex along microtubules in nerve cell dendrites.
0	0	1	perisynaptic extracellular matrix	The portion of the extracellular matrix that lies within the perisynaptic space.
0	0	1	exocytic insertion of neurotransmitter receptor to postsynaptic membrane	The exocytic fusion of neurotransmitter receptor containing vesicles with the postsynaptic membrane resulting in the integration of NT receptors, enabling them to participate in neurotransmitter reception.  This process includes tethering and docking steps that prepare vesicles for fusion.
0	0	1	neurotransmitter receptor transport postsynaptic membrane to endosome	Vesicle-mediated transport of a neurotransmitter receptor complex from the postsynaptic membrane to the postsynaptic early endosome.
0	1	0	neurotransmitter receptor transport to postsynaptic membrane	The directed movement of neurotransmitter receptor to the postsynaptic membrane in transport vesicles.
0	0	3	postsynaptic neurotransmitter receptor diffusion trapping	The process by which diffusing neurotransmitter receptor becomes trapped at the postsynaptic specialization membrane. This is typically due to interaction with components of the post-synaptic specialization.
0	1	1	anterograde dendritic transport of neurotransmitter receptor complex	The directed movement of a neurotransmitter receptor complex along microtubules in nerve cell dendrites towards the postsynapse.
0	0	4	structural constituent of postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton.
1	2	4	postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of cytoskeletal structures comprising actin filaments and their associated proteins in the postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton.
0	1	2	excitatory chemical synaptic transmission	Synaptic transmission that results in an excitatory postsynaptic potential.
36	35	73	glutamatergic synapse	A synapse that uses glutamate as a neurotransmitter.
1	0	2	cholinergic synapse	A synapse that uses acetylcholine as a neurotransmitter.
6	2	14	GABA-ergic synapse	A synapse that uses GABA as a neurotransmitter.  These synapses are typically inhibitory.
0	0	1	symmetric, GABA-ergic, inhibitory synapse	A neuron to neuron synapse that lacks an electron dense postsynaptic specialization, uses GABA as a neurotransmitter and whose activity results in inhibitory postsynaptic potentials.
0	0	1	neuron to neuron synapse	A synapse in which pre and post-synaptic cells are neurons.
0	0	1	asymmetric, glutamatergic, excitatory synapse	A neuron to neuron synapse with a postsynaptic density, that uses glutamate as a neurotransmitter and whose activity results in excitatory postsynaptic potentials.
0	1	0	NMDA selective glutamate receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by glutamate binding to an NMDA-selective glutamate receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by the movement of ions through a channel in the receptor complex. Ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	0	1	AMPA selective glutamate receptor signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by glutamate binding to an AMPA-selective glutamate receptor on the surface of the target cell, followed by the movement of ions through a channel in the receptor complex. Ends with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	0	5	neuronal dense core vesicle	A dense core vesicle (granule) that is part of a neuron.  These vesicles typically contain neuropeptides.  They can be found in all parts of neurons, including the soma, dendrites, axonal swellings (varicosities) and synaptic terminals.
1	1	3	anchored component of synaptic vesicle membrane	The component of the synaptic vesicle membrane consisting of the gene products that are tethered to the membrane only by a covalently attached anchor, such as a lipid group that is embedded in the membrane. Gene products with peptide sequences that are embedded in the membrane are excluded from this grouping.
0	0	1	extrinsic component of postsynaptic early endosome membrane	The component of the postsynaptic early endosome membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	0	1	extrinsic component of postsynaptic endosome membrane	The component of the postsynaptic endosome membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
0	2	0	vesicle-mediated transport in synapse	Any vesicle-mediated transport that occurs in a synapse.
0	1	0	modification of postsynaptic structure	Any process that modifies the structure of a postsynapse.
1	0	1	neuronal dense core vesicle exocytosis	The secretion of molecules (e.g. neuropeptides, insulin-related peptides or neuromodulators such as serotonin and dopamine) contained within a neuronal dense core vesicle by fusion of the granule with the plasma membrane of a neuron in response to increased cytosolic calcium levels.
1	0	0	neuronal dense core vesicle membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a neuronal dense core vesicle.
1	0	0	neuronal dense core vesicle lumen	The volume enclosed by a neuronal dense core vesicle membrane.
0	0	1	perinuclear endoplasmic reticulum lumen	The volume enclosed by the membranes of the perinuclear endoplasmic reticulum.
0	0	1	vesicle tethering complex	Any protein complex that plays a role in vesicle tethering.
1	0	0	anchored component of postsynaptic membrane	The component of the postsynaptic membrane consisting of the gene products that are tethered to the membrane only by a covalently attached anchor, such as a lipid group that is embedded in the membrane. Gene products with peptide sequences that are embedded in the membrane are excluded from this grouping.
1	0	0	anchored component of presynaptic membrane	The component of the presynaptic membrane consisting of the gene products that are tethered to the membrane only by a covalently attached anchor, such as a lipid group that is embedded in the membrane. Gene products with peptide sequences that are embedded in the membrane are excluded from this grouping.
1	0	0	ceramide floppase activity	Catalysis of the movement of ceramide from the cytosolic to the exoplasmic leaftlet of a membrane, using energy from the hydrolysis of ATP.
0	1	0	sphingolipid translocation	The movement of a sphingolipid molecule from one leaflet of a membrane bilayer to the opposite leaflet.
1	0	0	ceramide translocation	The movement of a ceramide molecule from one leaflet of a membrane bilayer to the opposite leaflet.
0	4	1	vesicle tethering to Golgi	The initial, indirect interaction between a transport vesicle membrane and the membrane of the Golgi. This interaction is mediated by tethering factors (or complexes), which interact with both membranes.  Interaction can occur via direct binding  to membrane phospholipids or membrane proteins, or via binding to vesicle coat proteins. This process is distinct from and prior fusion.
1	0	0	vesicle tethering to endoplasmic reticulum	The initial, indirect interaction between a transport vesicle membrane and the membrane of the endoplasmic reticulum. This interaction is mediated by tethering factors (or complexes), which interact with both membranes.  Interaction can occur via direct binding  to membrane phospholipids or membrane proteins, or via binding to vesicle coat proteins. This process is distinct from and prior fusion.
2	0	0	activating signal cointegrator 1 complex	A protein complex that contains TRIP4 (ASC1) and acts a transcriptional coactivator by interacting with transcription factors such as NF-kappa B.  In humans this complex has 4 subunits: TRIP4 + ASCC1-3.
0	0	2	presynapse assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a presynapse.
3	0	1	integral component of postsynaptic membrane	The component of the postsynaptic membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
2	1	5	integral component of presynaptic membrane	The component of the presynaptic membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
1	0	5	integral component of presynaptic active zone membrane	The component of the presynaptic active zone membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
1	0	1	integral component of postsynaptic specialization membrane	The component of the postsynaptic specialization membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
5	1	5	integral component of postsynaptic density membrane	The component of the postsynaptic density membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
0	1	3	regulation of postsynaptic membrane neurotransmitter receptor levels	Any process that regulates the the local concentration of neurotransmitter receptor at the postsynaptic membrane.
0	0	1	mitochondrion-derived vesicle	A vesicle derived via budding from a mitochondrion.  These vesicles often contain inner membrane and, much more rarely, cristae.
0	0	1	mitochondrion to lysosome transport	Transport from the mitochondrion to the lysosome, mediated by mitochondrion-derived vesicles.
0	0	1	histone-dependent DNA binding	DNA-binding activity that is dependent on binding to a histone.
0	3	1	BORC complex	A protein complex that is invovled in positioning of the lysosome within the cytoplasm and which is composed of BLOC1S1, BLOC1S2, BORCS5, BORCS6, BORCS7, BORCS8, KXD1 and SNAPIN. The BORC complex recruits ARL8 at the cytosolic face of lysosomes and couples them to microtubule plus-end-directed kinesin motors.
0	0	1	anterograde axonal transport of messenger ribonucleoprotein complex	The directed movement of a messenger ribonucleoprotein complex along microtubules in axons, towards the presynapse.
1	1	1	postsynaptic specialization, intracellular component	A network of proteins adjacent to the postsynaptic membrane. Its major components include the proteins that spatially and functionally organize neurotransmitter receptors in the adjacent membrane, such as anchoring and scaffolding molecules, signaling enzymes and cytoskeletal components.
1	3	5	postsynaptic density, intracellular component	A network of proteins adjacent to the postsynaptic membrane forming an electron dense disc. Its major components include neurotransmitter receptors and the proteins that spatially and functionally organize neurotransmitter receptors in the adjacent membrane, such as anchoring and scaffolding molecules, signaling enzymes and cytoskeletal components.
0	0	1	calcium export from the mitochondrion	A process in which a calcium ion (Ca2+) is transported out of the mitochondrial matrix, and into the cytosol.
0	0	1	potassium channel activator activity	Direct interaction with a potassium channel (binding or modification), resulting in its opening.
1	0	1	ion channel regulator activity	Modulates the activity of a channel via direct interaction with it. A channel catalyzes energy-independent facilitated diffusion, mediated by passage of a solute through a transmembrane aqueous pore or channel.
0	0	2	microtubule-based transport	A microtubule-based process that results in the transport of organelles, other microtubules, or other cellular components.  Examples include motor-driven movement along microtubules and movement driven by polymerization or depolymerization of microtubules.
0	1	1	chromosome, subtelomeric region	A region of the chromosome, adjacent to the telomere (on the centromeric side) that contains repetitive DNA and sometimes genes. This region is usually heterochromatin.
0	0	4	RNA polymerase II C-terminal domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the C-terminal domain (CTD) of the largest subunit of RNA polymerase II. The CTD is comprised of repeats of a heptapeptide with the consensus sequence YSPTSPS. The number of repeats varies with the species and a minimum number of repeats is required for RNAP II function.
0	0	1	anchored component of synaptic membrane	The component of the synaptic membrane consisting of the gene products that are tethered to the membrane only by a covalently attached anchor, such as a lipid group that is embedded in the membrane. Gene products with peptide sequences that are embedded in the membrane are excluded from this grouping.
0	1	1	extrinsic component of postsynaptic density membrane	The component of the postsynaptic density membrane consisting of gene products and protein complexes that are loosely bound to one of its surfaces, but not integrated into the hydrophobic region.
2	2	0	regulation of postsynaptic neurotransmitter receptor internalization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of endocytosis of neurotransmitter receptor at the postsynapse.
0	0	1	regulation of postsynaptic specialization assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of postsynaptic specialization assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a postsynaptic specialization.
0	1	1	regulation of postsynaptic density assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of postsynaptic density assembly, the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a postsynaptic density.
1	0	1	regulation of neurotransmitter receptor transport, endosome to postsynaptic membrane	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the directed movement of neurotransmitter receptor from the postsynaptic endosome to the postsynaptic membrane in transport vesicles.
0	0	1	regulation of recycling endosome localization within postsynapse	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transport or maintenance of location of a postsynaptic recycling endosome within the postsynapse.
1	0	0	regulation of modification of postsynaptic structure	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of modification of postsynaptic structure.
0	0	2	postsynaptic intermediate filament cytoskeleton	The intermediate filament cytoskeleton that is part of a postsynapse.
0	0	2	postsynaptic modulation of chemical synaptic transmission	Any process, acting in the postsynapse that results in modulation of chemical synaptic transmission.
0	0	3	presynaptic modulation of chemical synaptic transmission	Any process, acting in the presynapse that results in modulation of chemical synaptic transmission.
0	1	0	presynapse organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a presynapse.
1	1	3	postsynapse organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a postsynapse.
3	2	3	regulation of postsynapse organization	Any process that modulates the physical form of a postsynapse.
1	0	1	regulation of retrograde trans-synaptic signaling by endocanabinoid	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of retrograde trans-synaptic signaling by an endocannabinoid.
2	1	0	regulation of synaptic membrane adhesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of adhesion between pre- and post-synaptic membranes.
0	0	1	zinc ion import into synaptic vesicle	The directed movement of Zn2+ ions from the cytoplasm into the lumen of a cytoplasmic vesicle.
0	0	1	structural constituent of presynapse	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a presynapse.
0	0	1	presynaptic intermediate filament cytoskeleton	The intermediate filament cytoskeleton that is part of a presynapse.
0	0	2	structural constituent of postsynaptic intermediate filament cytoskeleton	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a postsynaptic intermediate filament cytoskeleton.
0	0	2	structural constituent of postsynapse	The action of a molecule that contributes to the structural integrity of a postsynapse.
1	0	0	postsynaptic spectrin-associated cytoskeleton	The portion of the spectrin-associated cytoskeleton contained within the postsynapse.
0	0	1	caveola neck	A membrane microdomain that forms a necklace around the bulb (crater) of a caveola.  Intramembrane particles are concentrated in this region and cytoskeletal components, including actin, are highly enriched in the area underlying it.
0	0	1	calcium-dependent activation of synaptic vesicle fusion	The regulatory process by which increased cytosolic calcium levels lead to the the fusion of synaptic vesicles with the presynaptic active zone membrane by bringing primed synaptic vesicle membrane into contact with membrane presynaptic active zone membrane.
0	1	0	secretory vesicle	A cytoplasmic, membrane bound vesicle that is capable of fusing to the plasma membrane to release its contents into the extracellular space.
0	0	2	synaptic vesicle cycle	A biological process in which synaptic vesicles are loaded with neurotransmitters, move to the active zone, exocytose and are then recycled via endocytosis, ultimately leading to reloading with neurotransmitters.
0	0	3	dense core granule cytoskeletal transport	The directed movement of dense core granules along cytoskeletal fibers, such as microtubules or actin filaments.
0	0	1	ion antiporter activity involved in regulation of presynaptic membrane potential	Any ion antiporter activity, occurring in the presynaptic membrane, that is involved in regulation of presynaptic membrane potential.
1	0	6	presynaptic cytosol	The region of the cytosol consisting of all cytosol that is part of the presynapse.
1	5	5	postsynaptic cytosol	The region of the cytosol consisting of all cytosol that is part of the postsynapse.
2	0	2	presynaptic dense core vesicle exocytosis	The secretion of molecules (e.g. neuropeptides and neuromodulators such as serotonin and dopamine) contained within a membrane-bounced dense in response to increased presynaptic cytosolic calcium levels.
0	0	2	presynapse to nucleus signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals that conveys information from the presynapse to the nucleus via cytoskeletal transport of a protein from a presynapse to the component to the nucleus where it affects biochemical processes that occur in the nucleus (e.g DNA transcription, mRNA splicing, or DNA/histone modifications).
1	2	0	postsynapse to nucleus signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals that conveys information from the postsynapse to the nucleus via cytoskeletal transport of a protein from a postsynapse to the component to the nucleus where it affects biochemical processes that occur in the nucleus (e.g DNA transcription, mRNA splicing, or DNA/histone modifications).
0	0	1	G protein-coupled receptor activity involved in regulation of postsynaptic membrane potential	A G protein-coupled receptor activity occurring in the postsynaptic membrane that is part of a GPCR signaling pathway that positively regulates ion channel activity in the postsynaptic membrane.
1	1	0	synaptic signaling	Cell-cell signaling to, from or within a synapse.
1	0	0	perisynaptic space	The extracellular region immediately adjacent to to a synapse.
0	1	0	trans-synaptic signaling by trans-synaptic complex	Cell-cell signaling between presynapse and postsynapse mediated by a trans-synaptic protein complex.
0	1	0	regulation of translation at synapse, modulating synaptic transmission	Any process that modulates synaptic transmission by regulating translation occurring at the synapse.
1	0	1	trans-synaptic signaling by endocannabinoid, modulating synaptic transmission	Cell-cell signaling between presynapse and postsynapse, via the release and reception of endocannabinoid ligands, that modulates the synaptic transmission properties of the synapse.
0	0	2	maintenance of synapse structure	A process that preserves the structural organistation and orientation of a synaptic cellular component such as the synaptic cytoskeleton and molecular scaffolds.
2	1	1	synaptic membrane adhesion	The attachment of presynaptic membrane to postsynaptic membrane via adhesion molecules that are at least partially embedded in the plasma membrane.
1	0	0	maintenance of postsynaptic density structure	A process which maintains the organization and the arrangement of proteins in the presynaptic density.
2	1	0	modification of synaptic structure	Any process that modifies the structure/morphology of a synapse.
0	0	3	postsynaptic specialization	A network of proteins within and adjacent to the postsynaptic membrane. Its major components include neurotransmitter receptors and the proteins that spatially and functionally organize them such as anchoring and scaffolding molecules, signaling enzymes and cytoskeletal components.
2	0	1	regulation of protein catabolic process at postsynapse, modulating synaptic transmission	Any process that modulates synaptic transmission by regulating a catabolic process occurring at a postsynapse.
0	1	0	regulation of translation at presynapse, modulating synaptic transmission	Any process that modulates synaptic transmission by regulating translation occurring at the presynapse.
0	3	0	regulation of translation at postsynapse, modulating synaptic transmission	Any process that modulates synaptic transmission by regulating translation occurring at the postsynapse.
0	0	1	G protein-coupled neurotransmitter receptor activity involved in regulation of postsynaptic membrane potential	A G protein-coupled neurotransmitter receptor activity, occurring in the postsynaptic membrane, involved in regulation of postsynaptic membrane potential.
0	0	1	neurotransmitter receptor activity involved in regulation of postsynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentration	Any neurotransmitter receptor activity that is involved in regulating the concentration of calcium in the postsynaptic cytosol.
0	0	1	neurotransmitter receptor internalization	A receptor-mediated endocytosis process that results in the internalization of a neurotransmitter receptor.
0	0	1	regulation of action potential firing pattern	Any process that regulates the temporal pattern of a sequence of action potentials in a neuron.
0	0	2	microtubule lateral binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the side of a microtubule.
0	0	1	protein localization to axon	A process in which a protein is transported to or maintained in a location within an axon.
0	1	0	matrix side of mitochondrial inner membrane	The side (leaflet) of the mitochondrial inner membrane that faces the matrix.
1	0	0	voltage-gated calcium channel activity involved in regulation of presynaptic cytosolic calcium levels	Regulation of presynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentrations via the action of voltage-gated calcium ion channels.
0	0	2	postsynaptic specialization membrane	The membrane component of the postsynaptic specialization. This is the region of the postsynaptic membrane in which the population of neurotransmitter receptors involved in synaptic transmission are concentrated.
0	1	0	voltage-gated calcium channel activity involved in positive regulation of presynaptic cytosolic calcium levels	Positive regulation of presynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentrations via the directed movement of calcium ions across the plasma-membrane into the cytosol via the action of voltage-gated calcium ion channels.  This is the first step in synaptic transmission.
1	0	0	neurotransmitter receptor transport	The directed movement of neurotransmitter receptors.
0	0	1	endosome to plasma membrane protein transport	The directed movement of proteins from the endosome to the plasma membrane in transport vesicles.
0	0	1	neurotransmitter receptor transport, endosome to plasma membrane	The directed movement of neurotransmitter receptor from the endosome to the plasma membrane in transport vesicles.
0	1	5	anterograde axonal protein transport	The directed movement of proteins along microtubules from the cell body toward the cell periphery in nerve cell axons.
0	0	2	retrograde axonal protein transport	The directed movement of proteins along microtubules from the cell periphery toward the cell body in nerve cell axons.
0	0	2	neurotransmitter receptor localization to postsynaptic specialization membrane	A process in which a neurotransmitter is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the membrane adjacent to a postsynaptic specialization (e.g. postsynaptic density).
0	1	0	integral component of synaptic membrane	The component of the synaptic membrane consisting of the gene products and protein complexes having at least some part of their peptide sequence embedded in the hydrophobic region of the membrane.
0	1	7	cell cortex region	The complete extent of cell cortex that underlies some some region of the plasma membrane.
0	0	1	negative regulation of protein kinase activity by protein phosphorylation	Any protein phosphorylation process that negatively regulates protein kinase activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of DNA repair by transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter	Any transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter process that positively regulates DNA repair.
11	8	8	ficolin-1-rich granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding a ficolin-1-rich granule.
0	1	0	cytolytic granule membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding the cytolytic granule.
3	3	0	ubiquitinyl hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ubiquitin from proteins and other molecules.
0	1	0	protein histidine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein histidine phosphate + H2O = protein histidine + phosphate.
0	1	0	estrogen 2-hydroxylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: estrogen + donor-H2 + O2 = 2-hydroxyestrogen + H2O.
4	2	5	chaperone complex	A protein complex required for the non-covalent folding or unfolding, maturation, stabilization or assembly or disassembly of macromolecular structures. Usually active during or immediately after completion of translation. Many chaperone complexes contain heat shock proteins.
1	0	0	proline dipeptidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + a dipeptide with proline at the C-terminal <=> L-proline + a standard alpha amino acid.
0	0	1	L-dopa O-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-dopa + S-adenosyl-L-methionine  <=> 3-O-methyldopa + S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + H+.
0	1	1	5-diphosphoinositol pentakisphosphate 3-kinase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 5-diphospho-1D-myo-inositol pentakisphosphate + ATP = 3,5-bisdiphosphoinositol-1D-myo-inositol 2,3,4,6-tetrakisphosphate + ADP.
0	0	1	3-oxo-glutaryl-[acp] methyl ester reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP + a 3R-hydroxyglutaryl-[acp] methyl ester <=> NADPH + H+ + a 3-oxo-glutaryl-[acp] methyl ester.
0	0	1	3-oxo-pimeloyl-[acp] methyl ester reductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP + a 3R-hydroxypimeloyl-[acp] methyl ester <=> NADPH + H+ + a 3-oxo-pimeloyl-[acp] methyl ester.
0	0	1	very-long-chain 3-hydroxyacyl-CoA dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a very-long-chain (3R)-3-hydroxyacyl-CoA = H2O + a very-long-chain trans-2,3-dehydroacyl-CoA.
0	0	1	[protein]-3-O-(N-acetyl-D-glucosaminyl)-L-threonine O-N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + an N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminyl-L-threonine-[glycoprotein] <=> N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminide + a [protein]-L-threonine.
0	0	1	[protein]-3-O-(N-acetyl-D-glucosaminyl)-L-serine O-N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + an N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminyl-L-serine-[glycoprotein] <=> N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminide + a [protein]-L-serine.
2	0	0	linear malto-oligosaccharide phosphorylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: hydrogenphosphate + a linear malto-oligosaccharide = alpha-D-glucose 1-phosphate + a linear malto-oligosaccharide.
0	1	0	1,3-diacylglycerol acylhydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + a 1,3-diglyceride = a monoglyceride + a fatty acid.
0	1	0	1,2-diacylglycerol acylhydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + a 1,2-diacyl-sn-glycerol = a monoglyceride + a fatty acid.
1	0	0	3-oxo-arachidoyl-CoA synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: stearoyl-CoA(4-) + malonyl-CoA(5-) + H+ <=> 3-oxoicosanoyl-CoA. + carbon dioxide + coenzyme A.
1	0	0	3-oxo-cerotoyl-CoA synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: tetracosanoyl-CoA(4-) + malonyl-CoA(5-) + H+ <=> 3-oxohexacosanoyl-CoA + carbon dioxide + coenzyme A.
1	0	0	3-oxo-lignoceronyl-CoA synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: behenoyl-CoA(4-) + malonyl-CoA(5-) + H+ <=> 3-oxotetracosanoyl-CoA. + carbon dioxide + coenzyme A.
0	0	1	3-hydroxy-arachidoyl-CoA dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (R)-3-hydroxyicosanoyl-CoA <=> trans-2-icosenoyl-CoA + H2O.
0	0	1	3-hydroxy-behenoyl-CoA dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (R)-3-hydroxybehenoyl-CoA <=> trans-2-docosenoyl-CoA + H2O.
0	0	1	3-hydroxy-lignoceroyl-CoA dehydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (R)-3-hydroxylignoceroyl-CoA(4-) <=> trans-2-tetracosenoyl-CoA + H2O.
1	0	0	11-cis-retinol dehydrogenase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 11-cis-retinol + NADP = 11-cis-retinal + NADPH + H+.
1	2	0	decanoate-CoA ligase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: decanoate + ATP(4-) + coenzyme A(4-) <=> decanoyl-CoA(4-) + AMP(2-) + diphosphoric acid.
1	1	0	sn-1-glycerol-3-phosphate C16:0-DCA-CoA acyl transferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: hexadecanedioyl-CoA + sn-glycerol 3-phosphate = coenzyme A + 1-C16:0-alpha,omega-dicarboxyl-2-lysophosphatidate.
2	0	0	SHG alpha-glucan phosphorylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: hydrogenphosphate + a plant soluble heteroglycan = alpha-D-glucose 1-phosphate + a plant soluble heteroglycan.
1	0	0	beta-maltose 4-alpha-glucanotransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: beta-D-glucose + a plant soluble heteroglycan = a plant soluble heteroglycan + maltose.
1	0	0	tRNA 4-demethylwyosine alpha-amino-alpha-carboxypropyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine  + 4-demethylwyosine37 in tRNAPhe <=> 5'-S-methyl-5'-thioadenosine + H+ + 7-[(3S)-3-amino-3-carboxypropyl]-4-demethylwyosine37 in tRNAPhe.
0	2	1	phosphatidyl phospholipase B activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 H2O + a phosphatidylcholine = sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + 2 H+ + 2 a carboxylate.
1	0	0	1-18:1-2-16:0-monogalactosyldiacylglycerol lipase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-18:1-2-16:0-monogalactosyldiacylglycerol + H2O <=> sn-1-lyso-2-16:0-monogalactosyldiacylglycerol + oleate + H+.
0	2	2	phospholipase A2 activity (consuming 1,2-dipalmitoylphosphatidylcholine)	Catalysis of the reaction: 1,2-dihexadecanoyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + H2O = 1-hexadecanoyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + hexadecanoate + H+.
0	2	2	phospholipase A2 activity consuming 1,2-dioleoylphosphatidylethanolamine)	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-18:1-2-18:1-phosphatidylethanolamine + H2O = 1-oleoyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphoethanolamine  + oleate + H+.
0	0	1	[protein]-3-O-(N-acetyl-D-glucosaminyl)-L-serine/L-threonine O-N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: H2O + an N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminyl-[glycoprotein] <=> N-acetyl-alpha-D-glucosaminide + a [glycoprotein]-(L-serine/L-threonine).
0	1	0	malonate-semialdehyde dehydrogenase (acetylating, NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3-oxopropanoate + coenzyme A(4-) + NAD(1-) <=> acetyl-CoA(4-) + carbon dioxide + NADH(2-).
1	0	0	very-long-chain 3-ketoacyl-CoA synthase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: malonyl-CoA + a very-long-chain 2,3,4-saturated fatty acyl CoA = carbon dioxide + coenzyme A + a very-long-chain oxoacyl-CoA.
1	0	0	dihydroceramide glucosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-alpha-D-glucose + a dihydroceramide = UDP + H+ + a D-glucosyl-N-acylsphinganine.
1	0	0	geranial:oxygen oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: geranial + O2 + H2O = H+ + geranate + hydrogen peroxide.
1	0	0	heptaldehyde:oxygen oxidoreductase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: heptanal + O2 + H2O = H+ + heptanoate + hydrogen peroxide.
0	1	0	molybdenum cofactor sulfurtransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2 H+ + MoO2-molybdopterin cofactor(2-) + L-cysteine  <=> thio-molybdenum cofactor + L-alanine  + H2O.
0	0	1	orcinol O-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: orcinol + S-adenosyl-L-methionine  = H+ + 3-methoxy-5-hydroxytoluene + S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine.
0	0	1	hypoglycin A gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: glutathionate + hypoglycin A = L-cysteinylglycine + hypoglycin B.
0	0	1	myristoyl-CoA hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: myristoyl-CoA + H2O <=> H+ + tetradecanoate + coenzyme A.
0	2	0	alpha-amylase activity (releasing maltohexaose)	Catalysis of the reaction: n H2O + a 1,4-alpha-D-glucan = alpha-maltohexaose + a 1,4-alpha-D-glucan.
0	0	1	leukotriene C4 gamma-glutamyl transferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: leukotriene C4 + a standard alpha amino acid = leukotriene D4 + an (gamma-L-glutamyl)-L-amino acid.
0	1	0	RNA 5'-cap (guanine-N7)-methylation	The process whereby a guanine in 5-cap is methylated at the N7 position of guanine.
0	0	2	cytoskeletal protein-membrane anchor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that brings together a cytoskeletal protein or protein complex and a plasma membrane lipid or membrane-associated protein, in order to maintain the localization of the cytoskeleton at a specific cortical membrane location.
0	1	0	2-oxoglutaramate amidase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-oxoglutaramate + H(2)O = 2-oxoglutarate + NH(3).
1	0	1	negative regulation of inflammatory response to wounding	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the inflammatory response to wounding.
0	1	0	phosphatidylinositol-3,5-bisphosphate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 1-phosphatidyl-myo-inositol 3,5-bisphosphate + H2O = 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol phosphate + phosphate.
0	0	1	positive regulation of vesicle docking	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vesicle docking.
0	0	1	neuron projection organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a prolongation or process extending from a neuron, e.g. an axon, or a dendrite.
1	0	0	neuron projection fasciculation	The collection of neuronal projections into a bundle of rods, known as a fascicle.
0	1	0	guanine deglycation	The removal of a sugar or dicarbonyl from a glycated guanine.
0	1	0	guanine deglycation, methylglyoxal removal	The removal of methylglyoxal from a glycated guanine, to form lactate and a deglycated guanine.
0	1	0	guanine deglycation, glyoxal removal	The removal of glyoxal from a glycated guanine, to form glycolate and a deglycated guanine.
1	0	0	regulation of cellular response to osmotic stress	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the cellular response to osmotic stress.
0	0	1	regulation of calcineurin-mediated signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of calcineurin-mediated signaling.
0	0	2	positive regulation of adenylate cyclase-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of an adenylate cyclase-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway.
0	0	1	histone succinylation	The modification of a histone by the addition of an succinyl group.
0	1	0	positive regulation of cardiac muscle cell contraction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle cell contraction.
0	1	1	P-TEFb complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the P-TEFb complex.
1	0	0	phosphorylated histone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone in which a residue has been modified by phosphorylation. Histones are any of a group of water-soluble proteins found in association with the DNA of eukaroytic chromosomes.
1	0	0	mRNA N-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a cytidine in mRNA + acetyl-CoA + ATP + H2O = ADP + an N(4)-acetylcytidine in mRNA + CoA + H(+) + phosphate.
1	0	0	cyclic-GMP-AMP hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: cyclic GMP-AMP + 2 H2O = AMP + GMP.
0	0	1	peptide 2-hydroxyisobutyryltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 2-hydroxyisobutyryl-CoA + lysine in peptide = CoA + N-2-hydroxyisobutyryl-lysine-peptide.
0	1	0	protein depropionylation	The removal of a propionyl group from a residue in a peptide or protein.
0	1	0	protein-propionyllysine depropionylase activity	Catalysis of the reaction:H2O + N(6)-propanoyl-L-lysyl-[protein] + NAD(+) = 3''-O-propanoyl-ADP-D-ribose + L-lysyl-[protein] + nicotinamide.
1	0	0	ceramide-1-phosphate phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ceramide-1-phosphate + H2O = ceramide+ phosphate.
0	1	1	L-serine-phosphatidylethanolamine phosphatidyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: L-1-phosphatidylethanolamine + L-serine <=> L-1-phosphatidylserine + ethanolamine.
0	1	0	L-serine-phosphatidylcholine phosphatidyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: a 1,2-diacyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine + L-serine = 1,2-diacyl-sn-glycero-3-phospho-L-serine + choline.
1	0	0	protein localization to ERGIC	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the endoplasmic reticulum-Golgi intermediate compartment (ERGIC).
1	0	0	cytosol to ERGIC protein transport	The directed movement of proteins from the cystosol to the endoplasmic reticulum-Golgi intermediate compartment (ERGIC).
1	0	0	NAD+-protein-arginine ADP-ribosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD+ + L-arginine = nicotinamide + N2-(ADP-D-ribosyl)-L-arginine.
1	0	0	NADP+-protein-arginine ADP-ribosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADP+ + L-arginine = nicotinamide + N2-(ADP-D-ribosyl)-L-arginine.
2	0	0	biliberdin reductase NAD+ activity	Catalysis of the reaction: bilirubin + NAD+ = biliverdin + NADH+ H+.
2	0	0	biliverdin reductase (NADP+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: bilirubin + NADP+ = biliverdin + NADPH + H+.
0	0	1	chenodeoxycholate 7-alpha-dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: chenodeoxycholate + NAD(+) = 7-oxolithocholate + H(+) + NADH.
0	0	1	isoursodeoxycholate 7-beta-dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: 3beta,7beta-dihydroxy-5beta-cholan-24-oate + NAD(+) = 3beta-hydroxy-7-oxo-5beta-cholan-24-oate + H(+) + NADH.
0	0	1	ursodeoxycholate 7-beta-dehydrogenase (NAD+) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NAD(+) + ursodeoxycholate = 7-oxolithocholate + H(+) + NADH.
0	0	1	negative regulation of deadenylation-dependent decapping of nuclear-transcribed mRNA	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of deadenylation-dependent decapping of nuclear-transcribed mRNA.
2	0	0	NADH oxidase H202-forming activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADH + H+ + O2 = NAD + hydrogen peroxide (H2O2).
2	0	0	NADPH oxidase H202-forming activity	Catalysis of the reaction: NADPH + H+ + O2 = NADP + hydrogen peroxide (H2O2).
0	2	1	protein-DNA covalent cross-linking repair	The removal of covalent cross-link between DNA and a protein.
11	2	7	protein serine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein serine phosphate + H2O = protein serine + phosphate.
11	2	7	protein threonine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: protein threonine phosphate + H2O = protein threonine + phosphate.
48	87	91	protein serine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: ATP + protein serine = ADP + protein serine phosphate.
48	87	91	protein threonine kinase activity	Catalysis of the reactions: ATP + protein threonine = ADP + threonine phosphate.
1	0	0	S-(hydroxymethyl)glutathione dehydrogenase NADP activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-(hydroxymethyl)glutathione + NADP+ = S-formylglutathione + NADPH + H+.
1	0	0	S-(hydroxymethyl)glutathione dehydrogenase NAD activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-(hydroxymethyl)glutathione + NAD+ = S-formylglutathione + NADH + H+.
1	0	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	1		
0	0	1	ncRNA deadenylation	Shortening of the poly(A) tail of a nuclear-transcribed ncRNA.
0	1	0	positive regulation of cardiac muscle myoblast proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle myoblast proliferation.
0	1	1	DNA strand resection involved in replication fork processing	The 5' to 3' exonucleolytic resection of DNA at the site of a stalled replication fork that contributes to replication fork processing.
1	2	0	positive regulation of G2/MI transition of meiotic cell cycle	Any signalling pathway that activates or increases the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G2 phase to MI phase of the meiotic cell cycle.
0	0	1	regulation of actin filament organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of actin filament organization.
1	0	0	negative regulation of blood vessel endothelial cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of blood vessel endothelial cell differentiation.
0	1	1	regulation of angiotensin-activated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the angiotensin-activated signaling pathway.
0	1	0	positive regulation of hippocampal neuron apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell death by apoptotic process in hippocampal neurons.
1	2	0	cellular detoxification of aldehyde	Any process carried out at the cellular level that reduces or removes the toxicity of an aldehyde. These may include transport of aldehydes away from sensitive areas and to compartments or complexes whose purpose is sequestration of the toxic substance.
1	0	0	regulation of calcium import into the mitochondrion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of calcium import into the mitochondrion.
0	0	2	negative regulation of calcium import into the mitochondrion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion import into the mitochondrion.
1	0	3	mRNA alternative polyadenylation	The process of generating multiple mRNA molecules with variable 3'-end length formation from a given pre-mRNA by differential use of cleavage and polyadenylation signals (pA signals).
1	0	0	positive regulation of lipid transporter activity	Any process that increases the frequency, rate, or extent of lipid transporter activity.
1	0	0	apical plasma membrane urothelial plaque	A scallop-shaped plaque, also referred to as an asymmetric unit membrane (AUM), found in the apical plasma membrane of urothelial superficial (umbrella) cells which form a a barrier to the passage of water and soluble toxic compounds found in urine. The plaques are thickened regions of membrane composed of uroplakin transmembrane proteins which form a crystalline array.
0	1	2	intermembrane lipid transfer	The transport of lipids between membranes in which a lipid molecule is transported through an aqueous phase from the outer leaflet of a donor membrane to the outer leaflet of an acceptor membrane. This process does not require metabolic energy and can be either spontaneous or mediated by lipid transfer proteins (LTPs).
0	0	1	intermembrane sphingolipid transfer	The transport of sphingolipids between membranes in which a sphingolipid molecule is transported through an aqueous phase from the outer leaflet of a donor membrane to the outer leaflet of an acceptor membrane. This process does not require metabolic energy and can be either spontaneous or mediated by lipid transfer proteins (LTPs).
1	0	0	lipid transfer activity	Removes a lipid from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle. This results in intermembrane transfer of lipids.
1	0	0	phospholipid transfer activity	Removes a phospholipid from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle.
0	0	1	sterol transfer activity	Removes a sterol from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle.
0	0	1	ceramide transfer activity	Removes a ceramide from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle.
1	1	0	phosphatidylcholine transfer activity	Removes phosphatidylcholine from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle.
3	3	0	cholesterol transfer activity	Removes cholesterol from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle.
0	0	1	plasma membrane bounded cell projection	A prolongation or process extending from a cell and that is bounded by plasma membrane, e.g. a cilium, lamellipodium, or axon.
0	1	3	positive regulation of macrophage proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage proliferation.
0	1	0	stereocilium shaft	The shaft comprises the majority of the length of the stereocilium. This region is notable for the extreme stability of actin filaments, which are highly crosslinked into a parallel bundle.
3	0	0	stereocilium base	The tapered base of the stereocilium adjacent to where it joins the hair cell body. This region contains a rootlet comprised of bundled actin filaments which spans the joint and stabilizes the stereocilium.
1	0	0	stereocilium maintenance	The organization process that preserves a stereocilium in a stable functional or structural state.
1	0	0	U6 snRNA (adenine-(43)-N(6))-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + adenine(43) in U6 snRNA = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + N(6)-methyladenine(43) in U6 snRNA.
1	0	0	snRNA (adenine-N6)-methylation	The posttranscriptional N6-methylation of an adenine residue in an snRNA molecule.
1	0	0	ribitol beta-1,4-xylosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: UDP-D-xylose + D-ribitol 5-phosphate-R = UDP + beta1,4-xylosyl-D-ribitol 5-phosphate-R.
1	0	0	positive regulation of pyloric antrum smooth muscle contraction	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of any pyloric antrum smooth muscle contraction.
0	0	1	cell adhesion involved in sprouting angiogenesis	The attachment of a cell, either to another cell or to an underlying substrate such as the extracellular matrix, via cell adhesion molecules that contributes to the formation of a blood vessel network.
1	0	1	crotonyl-CoA hydratase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: Acetyl-CoA + [protein]-L-lysine = CoA + [protein]-N(6)-acetyl-L-lysine.
0	0	1	negative regulation of peptidyl-lysine crotonylation	Any process that stops or reduces the rate of crotonylation of a lysine residue in a protein.
1	0	0	vacuole-isolation membrane contact site	An organelle membrane contact site formed at the junction of the vacuolar membrane and the isolation membrane or phagophore in response to starvation or other stresses, leading to the formation of the autophagosome.
4	3	2	centriolar subdistal appendage	A protein complex which assembles on the mother centriole during cilium formation, adjacent and proximal to a centriolar distal appendage. In human, it contains ODF2, CNTRL, NIN, CCDC120c and CCDC68.
1	0	0	DNA-3'-diphospho-5'-guanosine diphosphatase	Catalysis of the reaction: (DNA)-3'-diphospho-5'-guanosine + H(2)O <=> (DNA)-3'-phosphate + GMP.
0	1	0	T cell meandering migration	The random-like motility observed for T cells in lymph nodes which enhances surveillance of antigens presented by major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules on antigen presenting cells (APCs).
3	1	0	sulfatide binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with sulfatide, also known as 3-O-sulfogalactosylceramide, SM4, or sulfated galactocerebroside. Sulfatide is a class of sulfoglycolipid, which are glycolipids that contain a sulfate group.
1	0	0	positive regulation of collagen catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of collagen catabolism. Collagen catabolism is the proteolytic chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of collagen in the extracellular matrix.
14	10	10	positive regulation of cold-induced thermogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cold-induced thermogenesis.
7	8	7	negative regulation of cold-induced thermogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the rate of cold-induced thermogenesis.
1	0	0	intraciliary transport particle B binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an intraciliary transport particle B (IFT B) complex.
1	1	3	positive regulation of focal adhesion disassembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of disaggregation of a focal adhesion into its constituent components.
1	2	0	regulation of bile acid secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the controlled release of bile acid from a cell or a tissue.
1	0	2	tight junction assembly	A cellular process that results in the aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a tight junction. A tight junction seals cells together in an epithelium in a way that prevents even small molecules from leaking from one side of the sheet to the other.
1	0	0	mucociliary clearance	The respiratory system process driven by motile cilia on epithelial cells of the respiratory tract by which mucus and associated inhaled particles and pathogens trapped within it are moved out of the airways.
0	0	1	rod photoreceptor outer segment	The outer segment of a vertebrate rod photoreceptor that contains sealed membrane discs that are not connected to the ciliary membrane and containing rhodopsin photoreceptor proteins.
0	0	1	sperm head-tail coupling apparatus	A centrosome-based structure consisting of two cylindrical microtubule-based centrioles and associated components which anchors the flagellum to the sperm head.
0	1	0	subapical part of cell	The region of a polarized cell that is just below the apical region. For example, in a polarized epithelial cell, the apical region has an exposed surface and lies opposite to the basal lamina that separates the epithelium from other tissue so the subapical region is further from the exposed surface and closer to the basal lamina.
1	0	0	larynx morphogenesis	The process in which the larynx is generated and organized. The larynx is a continuation of the pharynx that is involved in breathing, sound production, and protecting the trachea against food aspiration.
1	0	0	outer dynein arm docking complex	A complex which stabilizes the binding of and correctly positions the outer dynein arm complex along an A-tubule of the flagellar axoneme outer doublet microtubules.
1	0	0	protein localization to motile cilium	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a motile cilium.
0	0	2	7SK snRNP	A ribonucleoprotein complex that contains the 7SK snRNA. The 7SK snRNP plays a central role in RNA polymerase II elongation control by regulating the availability of active P-TEFb.
3	2	2		
0	0	1		
0	0	1		
0	0	1		
0	0	1		
0	0	1		
1	1	0	KICSTOR complex	A protein complex that regulates the TORC1 signaling pathway in response to nutrients. The KICSTOR complex is composed of KPTN, ITFG2, C12orf66 and SZT2.
2	1	0	L-aspartate import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of L-aspartate from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
1	0	0	D-aspartate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of D-aspartate from one side of a membrane to the other.
0	1	0	meiotic nuclear division	One of the two nuclear divisions that occur as part of the meiotic cell cycle.
0	0	2	mitotic nuclear division	A mitotic cell cycle process comprising the steps by which the nucleus of a eukaryotic cell divides; the process involves condensation of chromosomal DNA into a highly compacted form. Canonically, mitosis produces two daughter nuclei whose chromosome complement is identical to that of the mother cell.
0	0	4	mitochondrial ADP transmembrane transport	The process in which ADP is transported across a mitochondrial membrane, into or out of the mitochondrion.
1	1	0	modification-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon post-translation modification of the target protein.
1	0	2	phosphorylation-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon phosphorylation of the target protein.
0	0	2	ubiquitin-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon ubiquitination of the target protein.
0	0	2	sumo-dependent protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein upon sumoylation of the target protein.
0	1	0	cell-cell adhesion in response to extracellular stimulus	The attachment of one cell to another cell via adhesion molecules as a result of an extracellular stimulus.
0	1	0	cellular detoxification of methylglyoxal	Any process carried out at the cellular level that reduces or removes the toxicity of methylglyoxal.
0	1	1	lipid droplet formation	A process that results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts of a lipid droplet.
0	1	2	cellular response to oxidised low-density lipoprotein particle stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an oxidized lipoprotein particle stimulus.
0	0	2	organelle localization by membrane tethering	The process by which an organelle membrane interacts with another membrane via molecular tethers that physically bridge the two membranes and attach them to each other.
0	1	3	neuron projection arborization	The process in which the anatomical structures of a neuron projection are generated and organized into branches. A neuron projection is any process extending from a neural cell, such as axons or dendrites.
0	0	2	dendrite arborization	The process in which the anatomical structures of a dendritic tree are generated and organized into dendritic branches.
0	0	1	peptide butyryltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: butyryl-CoA + lysine in peptide = CoA + N-butyryl-lysine-peptide.
0	0	1	peptidyl-lysine crotonylation	The crotonylation of a lysine residue in a protein. Crotonyl is the univalent radical CH3-CH=CH-CO- derived from crotonic acid.
0	0	1	peptidyl-lysine butyrylation	The butyrylation of a lysine residue in a protein. Butyryl is the univalent radical C3H7COO- derived from butyric acid.
0	0	1	histone crotonyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: crotonyl-CoA + histone = CoA + crotonyl-histone.
0	0	1	histone butyryltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: butyryl-CoA + histone = CoA + butyryl-histone.
1	1	1	class I DNA-(apurinic or apyrimidinic site) endonuclease activity	Catalysis of the cleavage of an AP site 3' of the baseless site by a beta-lyase mechanism, leaving an unsaturated aldehyde, termed a 3'-(4-hydroxy-5-phospho-2-pentenal) residue, and a 5'-phosphate.
1	1	0	membrane curvature sensor activity	Preferential binding of proteins on curved membranes. The binding to curved membranes by insertion (aka wedging) to curved membranes is mediated by both the hydrophobic and hydrophilic faces of the helix of membrane curvature sensing (MCS) proteins.
2	0	0	interleukin-10-mediated signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals initiated by the binding of interleukin-10 to a receptor on the surface of a cell, and ending with regulation of a downstream cellular process, e.g. transcription.
0	0	1	extracellular vesicle biogenesis	The assembly and secretion a set of components to form an extracellular vesicule, a membrane-bounded vesicle that is released into the extracellular region. Extracellular vesicles include exosomes, microvesicles and apoptotic bodies, based on the mechanism by which they are released from cells and differentiated based on their size and content.
1	2	1	export across plasma membrane	The directed movement of some substance from inside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the extracellular region.
0	2	1	ammonium import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of an ammonium ion from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	0	3	negative regulation of adenylate cyclase-activating adrenergic receptor signaling pathway involved in heart process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of an adenylate cyclase-activating adrenergic receptor signaling pathway involved in some heart process.
1	1	0	dipeptide import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of a dipeptide from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	0	1	regulation of long-chain fatty acid import into cell	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of long-chain fatty acid import into a cell.
1	0	0	positive regulation of long-chain fatty acid import into cell	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of long-chain fatty acid import into a cell.
0	0	1	mitochondrial proton-transporting ATP synthase complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a mitochondrial proton-transporting ATP synthase complex.
0	1	0	BCOR complex	A protein-containing complex that monoubiquitinates histone H2A on K119, thus it facilitates the maintenance of the transcriptionally repressive state of some genes, such as BCL6. It consists of the corepressor BCOR or BCORL1, a Polycomb group (PcG) and a SCF ubiquitin ligase subcomplexes. In mammals, the core subunits of the complex include the PcG and PcG-associated proteins NSPC1, RING1, RNF2, and RYBP and the components of the SCF ubiquitin ligase, SKP1, and FBXL10.
0	0	2	mRNA cap binding complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a mRNA cap binding complex.
2	1	2	endoplasmic reticulum-plasma membrane contact site	A contact site between the endoplasmic reticulum membrane and the plasma membrane, structured by bridging complexes.
0	0	1	exogenous protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein or protein complex from a different species, for example a pathogen molecule binding to a host protein (a complex of two or more proteins that may include other nonprotein molecules).
0	2	2	MIB complex	A mitochondrial intermembrane space bridging complex consisting of components of the MICOS complex in the inner mitochondrial membrane, the SAM complex in the outer membrane, a conserved DNAJ protein (human DNAJC11) and Metaxin 1.
1	1	0	endoplasmic reticulum-endosome membrane contact site	A contact site between the endoplasmic reticulum membrane and the endosome membrane.
2	1	0	endosome fission	The process by which early and late endosomes undergo budding and fission reactions that separate regions destined for lysosomal degradation from carriers to be recycled to the plasma membrane.
4	1	0	protein mono-ADP-ribosylation	The transfer, from NAD, of a single (mono) ADP-ribose molecule to protein amino acids.
1	0	0	peptidyl-serine ADP-deribosylation	The removal of ADP-ribose from ADP-ribosylserine.
1	0	0	ADP-ribosylserine hydrolase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: (ADP-D-ribosyl)-L-seryl-[protein] + H2O = L-seryl-[protein] + ADP-ribose.
1	1	0	NAD DNA ADP-ribosyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of the ADP-ribose group of NAD+ to a residue in double-stranded DNA.
1	0	0	general transcription initiation factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a general transcription initiation factor, a protein that contributes to transcription start site selection and transcription initiation.
2	0	2	DNA-binding transcription factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a DNA-binding transcription factor, a protein that interacts with a specific DNA sequence (sometimes referred to as a motif) within the regulatory region of a gene to modulate transcription.
1	1	0	protein sequestering activity	The selective interaction of a protein with a specific protein, to prevent it from interacting with other partners or inhibiting its localization to other areas of the cell.
0	0	2	cargo adaptor activity	Binding directly to the structural scaffolding elements of a vesicle coat (such as clathrin or COPII), and bridging the membrane, cargo receptor, and membrane deformation machinery.
1	0	1	protein transporter activity	Directly binding to a specific protein and delivering it to a specific cellular location.
1	2	2	ATPase-coupled intramembrane lipid transporter activity	Catalysis of the movement of lipids from one membrane leaflet to the other, using energy from the hydrolysis of ATP. This includes flippases and floppases.
0	0	1	flippase activity	Catalysis of the movement of lipids from the exoplasmic to the cytosolic leaftlet of a membrane, using energy from the hydrolysis of ATP.
0	0	2	aminophospholipid translocation	The movement of an aminophospholipid molecule from one leaflet of a membrane bilayer to the opposite leaflet.
0	1	0	sphingomyelin transfer activity	Removes a sphingomyelin from the outer leaflet of a donor membrane, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to the outer leaflet of an acceptor membrane.
1	0	1	phosphatidylserine transfer activity	Removes phosphatidylserine from the outer leaflet of a donor membrane, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to the outer leaflet of an acceptor membrane.
1	0	0	triglyceride transfer activity	Directly binding to a triglyceride and delivering it either to an acceptor molecule or to a specific location.
1	0	0	phosphatidylcholine flippase activity	Catalysis of the movement of phosphatidylcholine from the exoplasmic to the cytosolic leaftlet of a membrane, using energy from the hydrolysis of ATP.
0	1	2	phosphatidylserine flippase activity	Catalysis of the movement of phosphatidylserine from the exoplasmic to the cytosolic leaftlet of a membrane, using energy from the hydrolysis of ATP.
1	1	0	ABC-type transmembrane transporter activity	Primary transporter characterized by two nucleotide-binding domains and two transmembrane domains. Catalyzes the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, to directly drive the active transport of a substance across a membrane.
3	0	1	antiviral innate immune response	A defense response against viruses mediated through an innate immune response. An innate immune response is mediated by germline encoded components that directly recognize components of potential pathogens.
1	1	3	DNA-binding transcription factor inhibitor activity	An activity that stops, prevents, or reduces the activity of a DNA binding transcription factor activity.
0	1	0	protein-cysteine S-stearoyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a stearoyl (systematic name, octadecanoyl) group to a sulfur atom on the cysteine of a protein molecule, in the reaction: octadecanoyl-CoA + L-cysteinyl-[protein] = CoA + S-octadecanoyl-L-cysteinyl-[protein].
0	1	2	cytoskeleton-nuclear membrane anchor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that brings together a cytoskeletal protein or protein complex and a nuclear membrane lipid or membrane-associated protein, in order to maintain the localization of the cytoskeleton at a specific location of the nuclear membrane.
0	1	0	GCN2-mediated signaling	A series of reactions in which a signal is passed on to downstream proteins within the cell via GCN2 (also known as EIF2AK4), an intracellular protein kinase that is activated by stress signals, such as amino acid starvation.
1	0	0	very long-chain fatty acid beta-oxidation	A fatty acid beta-oxidation pathway acting on fatty acid which has a chain length greater than C22 in which the initial step, which converts an acyl-CoA to a trans-2-enoyl-CoA, is catalyzed by acyl-CoA oxidase; the electrons removed by oxidation pass directly to oxygen and produce hydrogen peroxide, which is cleaved by peroxisomal catalases. Fatty acid beta-oxidation begins with the addition of coenzyme A to a fatty acid, and ends when only two or three carbons remain (as acetyl-CoA or propionyl-CoA respectively).
1	2	1	granzyme-mediated programmed cell death signaling pathway	A series of molecular signals induced by granzymes which triggers the cell death of a cell. The pathway starts with reception of a granzyme signal, and ends when the execution phase of cell death is triggered. Granzymes are serine proteases that are secreted by cytotoxic T cells and natural killer cells to induce cell death in target cells.
0	1	0	protein-RNA adaptor activity	The binding activity of a protein that brings together another protein and an RNA, permitting those molecules to function in a coordinated way.
1	0	0		
0	0	1		
0	0	1		
0	2	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	0		
0	1	0		
0	0	1		
0	0	2	primary dendrite	A dendrite emerging from the cell body (the soma) of a neuron.
1	0	1	distal dendrite	The dendrite of the dendritic tree that is farthest away from the neuronal cell body (the soma).
0	1	1	regulation of spontaneous synaptic transmission	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of spontaneous synaptic transmission.
0	0	2	clathrin-dependent synaptic vesicle endocytosis	Clathrin-dependent endocytosis of presynaptic membrane regions comprising synaptic vesicles' membrane constituents. This is a relatively slow process occurring in the range of tens of seconds.
0	1	2	regulation of neuron projection arborization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the process in which the anatomical structures of a neuron projection are generated and organized into branches.
1	0	1	positive regulation of neuron projection arborization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the process in which the anatomical structures of a neuron projection are generated and organized into branches.
0	0	1	apical distal dendrite	Any dendrite in a dendritic tree that emerges near the apical pole of a neuron, and which is farthest away from the neuronal cell body (the soma).
1	0	0	basal dendrite morphogenesis	The process in which the anatomical structures of a basal dendrite are generated and organized.
1	0	0	basal dendrite arborization	The process in which the anatomical structures of a dendritic tree are generated on the basal neuron side and organized into dendritic branches.
0	0	1	negative regulation of protein localization to lysosome	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to lysosome.
0	1	2	distal axon	That part of an axon close to and including the growth cone or the axon terminus.
0	0	1	postsynaptic Golgi apparatus	The network of the Golgi apparatus structures located within the postsynapse.
0	1	1	complement-mediated synapse pruning	Synaptic pruning mediated by complement system signalling.
0	1	1	vertebrate eye-specific patterning	Early postnatal vertebrate developmental process, during which axons of retinal ganglion cells (RGCs), transmitting overlapping inputs from both eyes, segregate into distinct eye-specific non-overlapping regions in the dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus (dLGN) of the thalamus.
0	1	0	regulation of neuroinflammatory response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neuroinflammatory response.
1	1	0	positive regulation of neuroinflammatory response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neuroinflammatory response.
2	3	2	amyloid-beta clearance by transcytosis	The process in which amyloid-beta is removed from extracellular brain regions by cell surface receptor-mediated endocytosis, followed by transcytosis across the blood-brain barrier.
2	1	0	amyloid-beta clearance by cellular catabolic process	The process in which amyloid-beta is removed from extracellular brain regions by cell surface receptor-mediated endocytosis, followed by intracellular degradation.
1	0	1	neuron-glial cell signaling	Cell-cell signaling that mediates the transfer of information from a neuron to a glial cell. This signalling has been shown to be mediated by various molecules released by different types of neurons, e.g. glutamate, gamma-amino butyric acid (GABA), noradrenaline, acetylcholine, dopamine and adenosine.
0	0	1	regulation of microtubule anchoring at centrosome	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule anchoring at centrosome.
2	0	0	negative regulation of monocyte activation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of monocyte activation.
0	1	0	reactive gliosis	A neuroinflammatory response, occurring over several days, during which glial cells undergo nonspecific reactive changes in response to damage to the central nervous system (CNS); typically involves the proliferation or hypertrophy of different types of glial cells.
10	8	17	transport across blood-brain barrier	The directed movement of substances (e.g. macromolecules, small molecules, ions) through the blood-brain barrier.
0	2	5	protein localization to cell-cell junction	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained, in a location within a cell-cell junction.
1	0	0	positive regulation of protein localization to cell-cell junction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to cell-cell junction.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cholesterol esterification	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cholesterol esterification.
0	1	2	regulation of transepithelial transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transepithelial transport.
0	1	0	cell-cell signaling by wnt	Any process that mediates the transfer of information from one cell to another, medaited by a wnt family protein ligand. This process includes wnt signal transduction in the receiving cell, release of wnt ligand from a secreting cell as well as any processes that actively facilitate wnt transport and presentation to receptor on the recieving cell.
1	0	0	negative regulation of serine-type endopeptidase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of serine-type endopeptidase activity.
1	0	0	positive regulation of serine-type endopeptidase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of serine-type endopeptidase activity.
2	2	2	positive regulation of dendrite development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dendrite development.
1	0	0	negative regulation of corticotropin-releasing hormone receptor activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of corticotropin-releasing hormone receptor activity.
1	1	1	regulation of cytokine production involved in inflammatory response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cytokine production involved in inflammatory response.
2	2	2	negative regulation of cytokine production involved in inflammatory response	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cytokine production involved in inflammatory response.
2	2	1	positive regulation of cytokine production involved in inflammatory response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cytokine production involved in inflammatory response.
0	0	1	positive regulation of protein kinase C activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein kinase C activity.
0	0	1	regulation of D-erythro-sphingosine kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of D-erythro-sphingosine kinase activity.
1	1	1	regulation of substrate adhesion-dependent cell spreading	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of substrate adhesion-dependent cell spreading.
3	5	3	negative regulation of substrate adhesion-dependent cell spreading	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of substrate adhesion-dependent cell spreading.
6	9	14	positive regulation of substrate adhesion-dependent cell spreading	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of substrate adhesion-dependent cell spreading.
3	1	2	regulation of ruffle assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ruffle assembly.
1	1	1	negative regulation of ruffle assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ruffle assembly.
2	4	2	positive regulation of ruffle assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ruffle assembly.
6	19	36	regulation of cellular response to heat	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to heat.
1	1	1	regulation of cellular response to hypoxia	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to hypoxia.
0	0	1	regulation of protein K63-linked ubiquitination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein K63-linked ubiquitination.
2	0	0	negative regulation of protein K63-linked ubiquitination	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein K63-linked ubiquitination.
0	3	5	positive regulation of histone exchange	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone exchange.
1	0	0	negative regulation of retinoic acid biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of retinoic acid biosynthetic process.
1	0	0	negative regulation of ceramide biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a ceramide biosynthetic process.
0	0	3	regulation of peroxisome organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of peroxisome organization.
0	0	1	regulation of cellular hyperosmotic salinity response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular hyperosmotic salinity response.
0	0	2	regulation of cellular response to insulin stimulus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to insulin stimulus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of cellular response to insulin stimulus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to insulin stimulus.
1	0	0	regulation of arginine biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of arginine biosynthetic process.
0	0	1	negative regulation of arginine catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of arginine catabolic process.
0	0	1	negative regulation of peptidyl-tyrosine autophosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-tyrosine autophosphorylation.
0	1	1	positive regulation of peptidyl-tyrosine autophosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-tyrosine autophosphorylation.
4	6	9	positive regulation of G1/S transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any signalling pathway that increases or activates a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G1 phase to S phase of the mitotic cell cycle.
1	0	0	negative regulation of plasma cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of plasma cell differentiation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of endoplasmic reticulum unfolded protein response	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of endoplasmic reticulum unfolded protein response.
1	1	0	positive regulation of endoplasmic reticulum unfolded protein response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endoplasmic reticulum unfolded protein response.
1	0	0	negative regulation of nodal signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of nodal signaling pathway.
1	0	0	negative regulation of histone H3-K9 dimethylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K9 dimethylation.
0	0	1	regulation of histone H3-K9 trimethylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K9 trimethylation.
1	1	0	negative regulation of histone H3-K9 trimethylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K9 trimethylation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of histone H3-K9 trimethylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K9 trimethylation.
0	1	0	extracellular negative regulation of signal transduction	Any negative regulation of signal transduction that takes place in extracellular region.
1	1	0	negative regulation of execution phase of apoptosis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of execution phase of apoptosis.
2	2	1	positive regulation of execution phase of apoptosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of execution phase of apoptosis.
2	0	2	negative regulation of receptor binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a protein or other molecule binding to a receptor.
0	1	2	positive regulation of receptor binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of a protein or other molecule binding to a receptor.
0	0	3	negative regulation of hyaluronan biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hyaluronan biosynthetic process.
1	0	1	positive regulation of hyaluronan biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hyaluronan biosynthetic process.
0	0	1	negative regulation of lipid binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of lipid binding.
1	0	0	negative regulation of renin secretion into blood stream	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of renin secretion into blood stream.
0	0	1	negative regulation of phospholipase A2 activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipase A2 activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of oligodendrocyte apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of oligodendrocyte apoptotic process.
1	0	0	negative regulation of Schwann cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Schwann cell migration.
1	0	0	positive regulation of Schwann cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Schwann cell migration.
0	7	1	positive regulation of nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, deadenylation-dependent decay	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, deadenylation-dependent decay.
0	1	0	negative regulation of bone trabecula formation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of bone trabecula formation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of bone mineralization involved in bone maturation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of bone mineralization involved in bone maturation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of bone mineralization involved in bone maturation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of bone mineralization involved in bone maturation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of phospholipid scramblase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipid scramblase activity.
0	2	0	regulation of protein localization to nucleus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to nucleus.
3	5	5	negative regulation of protein localization to nucleus	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to nucleus.
3	11	6	positive regulation of protein localization to nucleus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to nucleus.
1	0	0	negative regulation of clathrin-dependent endocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of clathrin-mediated endocytosis.
1	0	1	positive regulation of oocyte maturation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of oocyte maturation.
1	0	0	regulation of cardiolipin metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cardiolipin metabolic process.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cardiolipin metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cardiolipin metabolic process.
1	0	2	regulation of amyloid-beta clearance	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid-beta clearance.
0	1	1	negative regulation of amyloid-beta clearance	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid-beta clearance.
2	2	0	positive regulation of amyloid-beta clearance	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid-beta clearance.
0	1	0	regulation of NLRP3 inflammasome complex assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of NLRP3 inflammasome complex assembly.
0	0	1	negative regulation of NLRP3 inflammasome complex assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of NLRP3 inflammasome complex assembly.
0	2	0	positive regulation of NLRP3 inflammasome complex assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of NLRP3 inflammasome complex assembly.
0	1	0	negative regulation of single-species biofilm formation in or on host organism	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of single-species biofilm formation in or on host organism.
1	0	0	negative regulation of Kit signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Kit signaling pathway.
1	1	3	regulation of synaptic vesicle endocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle endocytosis.
0	1	2	positive regulation of synaptic vesicle endocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle endocytosis.
0	1	0	positive regulation of MDA-5 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of MDA-5 signaling pathway.
0	1	4	positive regulation of RIG-I signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of RIG-I signaling pathway.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cytoplasmic translational elongation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cytoplasmic translational elongation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of RNA-directed 5'-3' RNA polymerase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of RNA-directed 5'-3' RNA polymerase activity.
0	1	1	positive regulation of DNA-directed DNA polymerase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA-directed DNA polymerase activity.
2	0	2	regulation of long-term synaptic potentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of long-term synaptic potentiation.
2	1	1	negative regulation of long-term synaptic potentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of long-term synaptic potentiation.
0	4	4	positive regulation of long-term synaptic potentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of long-term synaptic potentiation.
0	2	0	negative regulation of phospholipase C activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipase C activity.
0	1	0	regulation of proteinase activated receptor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of proteinase activated receptor activity.
0	1	4	negative regulation of mRNA polyadenylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA polyadenylation.
1	0	1	positive regulation of mRNA polyadenylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA polyadenylation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of RNA interference	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of RNA interference.
0	0	1	regulation of synaptic plasticity by receptor localization to synapse	Any process that modulates synaptic plasticity, the ability of synapses to change as circumstances require, via receptor localization to the synapse, the junction between a nerve fiber of one neuron and another neuron or muscle fiber or glial cell. Processes may include receptor transport to, and/or maintenance at, the synapse.
0	1	0	regulation of cellular response to oxidative stress	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to oxidative stress.
0	0	2	negative regulation of cellular response to oxidative stress	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to oxidative stress.
1	0	0	regulation of defense response to bacterium	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of defense response to bacterium.
2	0	1	negative regulation of defense response to bacterium	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of defense response to bacterium.
2	0	0	positive regulation of defense response to bacterium	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of defense response to bacterium.
0	1	0	regulation of glutamate receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of glutamate receptor signaling pathway.
0	0	1	positive regulation of glutamate receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glutamate receptor signaling pathway.
0	0	2	regulation of long-term synaptic depression	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of long term synaptic depression.
1	0	2	positive regulation of long-term synaptic depression	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of long term synaptic depression.
0	0	1	positive regulation of monocyte aggregation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of monocyte aggregation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of phospholipase C-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipase C-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway.
0	1	1	positive regulation of phospholipase C-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipase C-activating G protein-coupled receptor signaling pathway.
5	6	7	positive regulation of protein insertion into mitochondrial membrane involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein insertion into mitochondrial membrane involved in apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	0	0	regulation of p38MAPK cascade	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of p38MAPK cascade.
2	5	3	positive regulation of p38MAPK cascade	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of p38MAPK cascade.
2	1	1	negative regulation of vascular endothelial growth factor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular endothelial growth factor signaling pathway.
0	2	1	positive regulation of vascular endothelial growth factor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular endothelial growth factor signaling pathway.
0	0	1	doxorubicin transport	The directed movement of a doxorubicin into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	regulation of membrane depolarization during cardiac muscle cell action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of membrane depolarization during a cardiac muscle cell action potential.
0	0	1	positive regulation of membrane depolarization during cardiac muscle cell action potential	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of membrane depolarization during a cardiac muscle cell action potential.
0	2	3	regulation of potassium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
0	0	4	negative regulation of potassium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
2	0	2	positive regulation of potassium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
0	0	1	regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
1	0	1	negative regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
0	1	0	regulation of mitochondrial outer membrane permeabilization involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mitochondrial outer membrane permeabilization involved in apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	1	3	negative regulation of mitochondrial outer membrane permeabilization involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mitochondrial outer membrane permeabilization involved in apoptotic signaling pathway.
3	0	3	positive regulation of mitochondrial outer membrane permeabilization involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitochondrial outer membrane permeabilization involved in apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	0	0	regulation of response to reactive oxygen species	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of response to reactive oxygen species.
0	1	0	negative regulation of relaxation of smooth muscle	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of relaxation of smooth muscle.
1	0	0	benzylpenicillin metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving benzylpenicillin.
1	1	0	regulation of autophagosome maturation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of autophagosome maturation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of autophagosome maturation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of autophagosome maturation.
2	0	1	positive regulation of autophagosome maturation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of autophagosome maturation.
1	0	0	insulin catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of insulin.
1	0	0	regulation of trophoblast cell migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of trophoblast cell migration.
1	1	2	negative regulation of trophoblast cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of trophoblast cell migration.
1	1	1	positive regulation of trophoblast cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of trophoblast cell migration.
1	0	1	neural crest cell migration involved in autonomic nervous system development	Any neural crest cell migration that is involved in autonomic nervous system development.
1	1	2	negative regulation of ERBB signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ERBB signaling pathway.
0	0	1	regulation of ephrin receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ephrin receptor signaling pathway.
0	1	0	regulation of extracellular matrix assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of extracellular matrix assembly.
1	0	0	negative regulation of extracellular matrix assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of extracellular matrix assembly.
1	1	0	positive regulation of extracellular matrix assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of extracellular matrix assembly.
1	0	0	negative regulation of heart looping	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of heart looping.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cardiac chamber formation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac chamber formation.
2	1	5	regulation of neuron death	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neuron death.
7	4	9	negative regulation of neuron death	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neuron death.
2	12	7	positive regulation of neuron death	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neuron death.
2	3	0	regulation of NIK/NF-kappaB signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of NIK/NF-kappaB signaling.
3	3	2	negative regulation of NIK/NF-kappaB signaling	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of NIK/NF-kappaB signaling.
11	5	9	positive regulation of NIK/NF-kappaB signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of NIK/NF-kappaB signaling.
1	0	0	negative regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter involved in heart development	Any negative regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter that is involved in heart development.
1	0	0	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter involved in heart development	Any positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter that is involved in heart development.
1	0	0	regulation of macrophage colony-stimulating factor production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage colony-stimulating factor production.
0	1	0	negative regulation of hydrogen peroxide-mediated programmed cell death	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hydrogen peroxide-mediated programmed cell death.
0	1	1	positive regulation of hydrogen peroxide-mediated programmed cell death	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hydrogen peroxide-mediated programmed cell death.
0	2	1	negative regulation of histone H2A K63-linked ubiquitination	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of histone H2A K63-linked ubiquitination.
0	0	1	positive regulation of store-operated calcium channel activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of store-operated calcium channel activity.
0	1	0	regulation of vasculature development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of vasculature development.
0	0	1	response to rapamycin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a rapamycin stimulus.
0	0	1	heterocyclic compound binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with heterocyclic compound.
0	1	0	regulation of potassium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion transmembrane transport.
0	0	4	negative regulation of potassium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion transmembrane transport.
3	1	4	positive regulation of potassium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion transmembrane transport.
1	0	0	regulation of chorionic trophoblast cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chorionic trophoblast cell proliferation.
0	1	2	regulation of voltage-gated calcium channel activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of voltage-gated calcium channel activity.
2	0	0	negative regulation of voltage-gated calcium channel activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of voltage-gated calcium channel activity.
0	1	1	positive regulation of voltage-gated calcium channel activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of voltage-gated calcium channel activity.
0	1	1	regulation of transforming growth factor beta activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transforming growth factor beta activation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of transforming growth factor beta activation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transforming growth factor beta activation.
0	1	1	regulation of phosphorylation of RNA polymerase II C-terminal domain	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of phosphorylation of RNA polymerase II C-terminal domain.
0	1	0	response to benzene	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a benzene stimulus.
1	0	0	pyruvate transmembrane transport	The directed movement of pyruvate across a membrane.
1	0	0	oleate transmembrane transporter activity	Enables the transfer of oleate from one side of a membrane to the other.
1	1	0	positive regulation of transcription factor catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription factor catabolic process.
0	1	0	negative regulation of lymphangiogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of lymphangiogenesis.
1	0	0	regulation of cysteine metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cysteine metabolic process.
1	0	0	regulation of endothelial tube morphogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial tube morphogenesis.
4	0	0	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter involved in cellular response to chemical stimulus	Any positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter that is involved in cellular response to chemical stimulus.
0	1	2	negative regulation of mitophagy	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mitophagy.
0	1	3	positive regulation of mitophagy	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitophagy.
0	1	0	regulation of hematopoietic progenitor cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of hematopoietic progenitor cell differentiation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of hematopoietic progenitor cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hematopoietic progenitor cell differentiation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of DNA demethylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA demethylation.
1	2	0	positive regulation of DNA demethylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA demethylation.
1	0	0	response to metformin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a metformin stimulus.
0	1	0	response to camptothecin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a camptothecin stimulus.
0	0	1	negative regulation of telomeric RNA transcription from RNA pol II promoter	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of telomeric RNA transcription from RNA pol II promoter.
0	0	1	positive regulation of telomeric RNA transcription from RNA pol II promoter	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of telomeric RNA transcription from RNA pol II promoter.
1	0	0	regulation of acid-sensing ion channel activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of acid-sensing ion channel activity.
0	0	1	dendritic microtubule	Any microtubule in a dendrite, a neuron projection.
0	0	1	positive regulation of vesicle transport along microtubule	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vesicle transport along microtubule.
0	0	1	phosphatidylglycerol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylglycerol.
0	2	2	cardiolipin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cardiolipin.
2	0	0	regulation of smoothened signaling pathway involved in dorsal/ventral neural tube patterning	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of smoothened signaling pathway involved in dorsal/ventral neural tube patterning.
1	0	2	negative regulation of smoothened signaling pathway involved in dorsal/ventral neural tube patterning	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of smoothened signaling pathway involved in dorsal/ventral neural tube patterning.
1	0	0		
1	0	0	positive regulation of presynaptic membrane organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of presynaptic membrane organization.
0	1	0	nucleoside transmembrane transport	The directed movement of nucleoside across a membrane.
1	0	0	response to peptide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a peptide stimulus.
2	2	3	cellular response to peptide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a peptide stimulus.
0	0	1	calcium ion export	The directed movement of calcium ion out of a cell or organelle.
0	1	0	quinone metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving quinone.
1	0	0	quinone catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of quinone.
0	1	0	positive regulation of NAD+ ADP-ribosyltransferase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of NAD+ ADP-ribosyltransferase activity.
0	1	0	regulation of superoxide dismutase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of superoxide dismutase activity.
1	1	0	positive regulation of superoxide dismutase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of superoxide dismutase activity.
5	4	7	regulation of mitotic spindle assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic spindle assembly.
0	0	1	negative regulation of histone H3-K27 acetylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K27 acetylation.
3	3	2	glutathione derivative biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of glutathione derivative.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cell proliferation involved in kidney development	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell proliferation involved in kidney development.
0	0	1	regulation of histone deacetylase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of histone deacetylase activity.
0	1	1	negative regulation of histone deacetylase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of histone deacetylase activity.
0	0	3	positive regulation of histone deacetylase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone deacetylase activity.
0	1	1	positive regulation of platelet aggregation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of platelet aggregation. Platelet aggregation is the adhesion of one platelet to one or more other platelets via adhesion molecules.
0	5	3	positive regulation of myoblast fusion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of myoblast fusion.
0	0	1	leukotriene D4 biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of leukotriene D4.
0	1	0	benzoyl-CoA metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving benzoyl-CoA.
28	48	22	regulation of signal transduction by p53 class mediator	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction by p53 class mediator.
3	1	0	negative regulation of signal transduction by p53 class mediator	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction by p53 class mediator.
1	1	0	positive regulation of signal transduction by p53 class mediator	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signal transduction by p53 class mediator.
1	0	4	negative regulation of proteasomal protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of proteasomal protein catabolic process.
2	1	0	positive regulation of proteasomal protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of proteasomal protein catabolic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of deadenylation-independent decapping of nuclear-transcribed mRNA	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of deadenylation-independent decapping of nuclear-transcribed mRNA.
1	0	1	negative regulation of transcription of nucleolar large rRNA by RNA polymerase I	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transcription of nuclear large rRNA transcript mediated by RNA polymerase I.
2	1	3	positive regulation of transcription of nucleolar large rRNA by RNA polymerase I	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription of nuclear large rRNA mediated by RNA polymerase I.
1	0	1	regulation of high voltage-gated calcium channel activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of high voltage-gated calcium channel activity.
1	0	2	negative regulation of high voltage-gated calcium channel activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of high voltage-gated calcium channel activity.
1	0	6	regulation of cell communication by electrical coupling involved in cardiac conduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell communication by electrical coupling involved in cardiac conduction.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cellular respiration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular respiration.
1	1	0	positive regulation of cellular respiration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cellular respiration.
1	0	0	negative regulation of muscle tissue development	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of muscle tissue development.
1	0	0	regulation of post-translational protein modification	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of post-translational protein modification.
0	1	0	negative regulation of post-translational protein modification	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of post-translational protein modification.
0	4	3	regulation of cell junction assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell junction assembly.
0	3	0	positive regulation of cell junction assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell junction assembly.
0	1	2	positive regulation of ATPase-coupled calcium transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of an ATPase-coupled calcium transmembrane transporter activity.
0	0	1	regulation of relaxation of cardiac muscle	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of relaxation of cardiac muscle.
0	0	2	negative regulation of relaxation of cardiac muscle	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of relaxation of cardiac muscle.
1	0	1	positive regulation of relaxation of cardiac muscle	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of relaxation of cardiac muscle.
0	0	1	positive regulation of exoribonuclease activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of exoribonuclease activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of anterograde dense core granule transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of anterograde dense core granule transport.
0	1	0	positive regulation of cell cycle checkpoint	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell cycle checkpoint.
0	1	0	regulation of inward rectifier potassium channel activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of inward rectifier potassium channel activity.
4	3	3	phosphatidylinositol phosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol phosphate.
0	2	1	negative regulation of protein acetylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein acetylation.
2	2	1	positive regulation of protein acetylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein acetylation.
0	1	0	response to ketamine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a ketamine stimulus.
0	1	0	regulation of cell cycle phase transition	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell cycle phase transition.
13	12	13	regulation of mitotic cell cycle phase transition	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic cell cycle phase transition.
0	3	0	negative regulation of mitotic cell cycle phase transition	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic cell cycle phase transition.
0	1	1	positive regulation of mitotic cell cycle phase transition	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic cell cycle phase transition.
5	7	8	toxin transport	The directed movement of a toxin into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
1	1	0	regulation of amyloid-beta formation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid-beta formation.
4	0	5	positive regulation of amyloid-beta formation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid-beta formation.
2	5	2	regulation of cilium assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cilium assembly.
1	2	1	negative regulation of cilium assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cilium assembly.
0	1	0	regulation of hematopoietic stem cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of hematopoietic stem cell proliferation.
0	1	1	positive regulation of hematopoietic stem cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hematopoietic stem cell proliferation.
11	16	13	regulation of hematopoietic stem cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of hematopoietic stem cell differentiation.
1	1	0	negative regulation of hematopoietic stem cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hematopoietic stem cell differentiation.
0	6	2	regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway via death domain receptors	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway via death domain receptors.
4	9	7	negative regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway via death domain receptors	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway via death domain receptors.
2	2	2	positive regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway via death domain receptors	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway via death domain receptors.
0	0	1	regulation of Fas signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Fas signaling pathway.
0	1	0	negative regulation of Fas signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Fas signaling pathway.
0	2	2	response to L-glutamate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an L-glutamate stimulus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of calcium ion import into sarcoplasmic reticulum	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion import into sarcoplasmic reticulum.
0	0	4	negative regulation of peptidyl-cysteine S-nitrosylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-cysteine S-nitrosylation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of flagellated sperm motility	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of flagellated sperm motility.
0	1	1	regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability involved in apoptotic process	Any regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability that is involved in apoptotic process.
0	0	2	negative regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability involved in apoptotic process	Any negative regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability that is involved in apoptotic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability involved in apoptotic process	Any positive regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability that is involved in apoptotic process.
0	0	3	regulation of organelle assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of organelle assembly.
1	0	0	positive regulation of organelle assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of organelle assembly.
0	1	0	calcidiol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with calcidiol.
0	0	1	regulation of response to DNA damage checkpoint signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of response to DNA damage checkpoint signaling.
1	0	0	positive regulation of DNA damage response, signal transduction by p53 class mediator resulting in transcription of p21 class mediator	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA damage response, signal transduction by p53 class mediator resulting in transcription of p21 class mediator.
0	0	1	regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage by p53 class mediator	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage by p53 class mediator.
3	2	2	negative regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage by p53 class mediator	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage by p53 class mediator.
1	0	0	positive regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage by p53 class mediator	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage by p53 class mediator.
0	1	0	cellular response to reactive nitrogen species	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a reactive nitrogen species stimulus.
0	2	0	regulation of keratinocyte apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of keratinocyte apoptotic process.
0	0	1	positive regulation of keratinocyte apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of keratinocyte apoptotic process.
0	1	0	regulation of oxidative stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of an oxidative stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
4	2	3	negative regulation of oxidative stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of an oxidative stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	1	1	positive regulation of oxidative stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of an oxidative stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
0	2	0	regulation of viral release from host cell	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of viral release from host cell.
2	1	2	negative regulation of viral release from host cell	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of viral release from host cell.
3	3	2	positive regulation of viral release from host cell	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of viral release from host cell.
0	2	0	regulation of hepatocyte growth factor receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of hepatocyte growth factor receptor signaling pathway.
0	1	0	negative regulation of interleukin-2-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of interleukin-2-mediated signaling pathway.
0	1	0	negative regulation of interleukin-4-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of interleukin-4-mediated signaling pathway.
1	0	0	positive regulation of interleukin-4-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of interleukin-4-mediated signaling pathway.
0	0	2	negative regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to osmotic stress	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to osmotic stress.
0	1	0	positive regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to osmotic stress	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to osmotic stress.
0	1	0	ketone body metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving ketone body.
0	1	0	negative regulation of macrophage colony-stimulating factor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage colony-stimulating factor signaling pathway.
2	2	2	negative regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage.
1	0	1	positive regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to DNA damage.
0	1	0	negative regulation of positive thymic T cell selection	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of positive thymic T cell selection.
0	0	1	regulation of endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of an endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	2	2	negative regulation of endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of an endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
2	3	1	positive regulation of endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of an endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	0	0	negative regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to osmotic stress by p53 class mediator	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to osmotic stress by p53 class mediator.
0	1	0	regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway by p53 class mediator	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway by p53 class mediator.
1	1	0	negative regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway by p53 class mediator	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway by p53 class mediator.
0	1	1	positive regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway by p53 class mediator	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway by p53 class mediator.
0	0	1	regulation of delayed rectifier potassium channel activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of delayed rectifier potassium channel activity.
1	0	1	negative regulation of delayed rectifier potassium channel activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of delayed rectifier potassium channel activity.
1	1	0	positive regulation of delayed rectifier potassium channel activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of delayed rectifier potassium channel activity.
1	0	0	apoptotic process involved in blood vessel morphogenesis	Any apoptotic process that is involved in blood vessel morphogenesis.
1	1	4	regulation of chromatin organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chromatin organization.
1	0	0	voltage-gated potassium channel activity involved in ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential repolarization	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a potassium ion by a voltage-gated channel through the plasma membrane of a ventricular cardiomyocyte contributing to the repolarization phase of an action potential. A voltage-gated channel is a channel whose open state is dependent on the voltage across the membrane in which it is embedded.
1	0	0	semaphorin-plexin signaling pathway involved in neuron projection guidance	Any semaphorin-plexin signaling pathway that is involved in neuron projection guidance.
4	1	0	semaphorin-plexin signaling pathway involved in axon guidance	Any semaphorin-plexin signaling pathway that is involved in axon guidance.
0	1	4	regulation of sodium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of sodium ion transmembrane transport.
0	0	2	negative regulation of sodium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of sodium ion transmembrane transport.
0	1	0	positive regulation of sodium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of sodium ion transmembrane transport.
0	0	1	negative regulation of peptidyl-serine dephosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-serine dephosphorylation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of chromosome condensation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chromosome condensation.
1	0	0	sulfate transmembrane transport	The directed movement of sulfate across a membrane.
0	0	1	positive regulation of protein localization to spindle pole body	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to spindle pole body.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mRNA catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA catabolic process.
0	0	1	positive regulation of endoribonuclease activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endoribonuclease activity.
0	1	2	ceramide 1-phosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ceramide 1-phosphate.
1	1	1	ceramide 1-phosphate transfer activity	Removes a ceramide 1-phosphate from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle.
0	1	3	protein localization to bicellular tight junction	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a bicellular tight junction.
0	1	0	mitotic cytokinetic process	Any cytokinetic process that is involved in mitotic cell cycle.
1	0	1	regulation of mitotic cytokinesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic cytokinesis.
1	1	1	protein localization to cell junction	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a cell junction.
2	1	1	positive regulation of mRNA binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA binding.
0	0	1	positive regulation of attachment of mitotic spindle microtubules to kinetochore	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of attachment of spindle microtubules to kinetochore involved in mitotic sister chromatid segregation.
1	0	0	deactivation of mitotic spindle assembly checkpoint	A positive regulation of the mitotic metaphase/anaphase transition that results from deactivation of the mitotic spindle assembly checkpoint.
1	3	5	negative regulation of amyloid-beta formation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid-beta formation.
0	0	2	positive regulation of male mating behavior	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of male mating behavior.
1	0	0	protein localization to mitotic spindle pole body	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a mitotic spindle pole body.
1	0	0	negative regulation of ripoptosome assembly involved in necroptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ripoptosome assembly involved in a necroptotic process.
1	0	0	regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability involved in programmed necrotic cell death	Any regulation of mitochondrial membrane permeability that is involved in programmed necrotic cell death.
1	1	2	positive regulation of stem cell population maintenance	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell population maintenance.
1	1	0	positive regulation of mesenchymal stem cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mesenchymal stem cell proliferation.
1	0	0	protein localization to cell leading edge	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a cell leading edge.
0	0	1	regulation of protein localization to synapse	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to synapse.
0	0	1	positive regulation of protein localization to synapse	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to synapse.
0	2	2	L-alpha-amino acid transmembrane transport	The directed movement of L-alpha-amino acid across a membrane.
2	4	4	chloride transmembrane transport	The process in which chloride is transported across a membrane.
0	1	0	cytotoxic T cell pyroptotic process	Any pyroptotic process in a cytotoxic T cell.
0	0	1	cholangiocyte apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a cholangiocyte.
0	1	3	catalytic complex	A protein complex which is capable of catalytic activity.
0	0	1	regulation of protein autoubiquitination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein autoubiquitination.
0	1	1	positive regulation of protein autoubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein autoubiquitination.
0	2	0	negative regulation of apoptotic DNA fragmentation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of apoptotic DNA fragmentation.
0	1	1	positive regulation of apoptotic DNA fragmentation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of apoptotic DNA fragmentation.
1	1	2	regulation of organelle transport along microtubule	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of organelle transport along microtubule.
1	0	2	regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transport via high voltage-gated calcium channel	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of generation of calcium ion transmembrane transport via high voltage-gated calcium channel.
2	1	0	positive regulation of protein K63-linked ubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein K63-linked ubiquitination.
1	1	0	positive regulation of protein K48-linked ubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein K48-linked ubiquitination.
1	0	1	positive regulation of protein monoubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein monoubiquitination.
0	2	1	regulation of intracellular signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of intracellular signal transduction.
0	0	1	negative regulation of intracellular signal transduction	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intracellular signal transduction.
0	0	1	positive regulation of intracellular signal transduction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of intracellular signal transduction.
0	0	1	positive regulation of DNA N-glycosylase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA N-glycosylase activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cellular response to vascular endothelial growth factor stimulus	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to vascular endothelial growth factor stimulus.
1	0	0	positive regulation of catalase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of catalase activity.
0	1	0	H4 histone acetyltransferase complex	A protein complex which is capable of H4 histone acetyltransferase activity.
0	1	0	regulation of neutrophil activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neutrophil activation.
0	0	1		
1	2	0	protein localization to nucleolus	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a nucleolus.
0	0	1	multi-organism intercellular transport	An intercellular transport which involves another organism.
2	0	0	regulation of DNA replication origin binding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of DNA replication origin binding.
6	0	9	proton transmembrane transport	The directed movement of a proton across a membrane.
0	1	0	heterotrimeric G-protein complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a heterotrimeric G-protein complex.
0	1	0	negative regulation of anti-Mullerian hormone signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of anti-Mullerian hormone signaling pathway.
1	0	0	response to fluoride	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fluoride stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to fluoride	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a fluoride stimulus.
1	0	2	regulation of neutrophil migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neutrophil migration.
0	0	1	positive regulation of neutrophil migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neutrophil migration.
0	2	0	assembly of large subunit precursor of preribosome	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form the large subunit precursor of the preribosome.
0	0	1	regulation of mRNA stability involved in cellular response to UV	Any regulation of mRNA stability that is involved in cellular response to UV.
0	2	0	negative regulation of membrane hyperpolarization	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of membrane hyperpolarization.
0	1	0		
1	0	0	kinociliary basal body	A ciliary basal body that is part of a kinocilium.
0	1	0	calcium ion import into cytosol	The directed movement of calcium ion into a cytosol.
1	0	1	positive regulation of glucose mediated signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glucose mediated signaling pathway.
1	2	1	regulation of axon guidance	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of axon guidance.
0	0	1	positive regulation of axon guidance	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of axon guidance.
1	1	0	positive regulation of RNA biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of RNA biosynthetic process.
0	0	2	positive regulation of receptor localization to synapse	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of receptor localization to synapse.
1	0	0	mitochondrial outer membrane permeabilization involved in programmed cell death	The process by which the mitochondrial outer membrane becomes permeable to the passing of proteins and other molecules from the intermembrane space to the cytosol as part of a programmed cell death process.
1	0	0	respiratory basal cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a respiratory basal cell.
0	0	1	regulation of neuroblast proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neuroblast proliferation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of prolactin secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of prolactin secretion.
1	0	0	positive regulation of growth factor dependent skeletal muscle satellite cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of satellite cell proliferation; dependent on specific growth factor activity such as fibroblast growth factors and transforming growth factor beta.
0	1	0	negative regulation of chondrocyte proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the multiplication or reproduction of chondrocytes by cell division, resulting in the expansion of their population. A chondrocyte is a polymorphic cell that forms cartilage.
1	2	0	positive regulation of chondrocyte proliferation	Any process that increases the frequency, rate or extent of the multiplication or reproduction of chondrocytes by cell division, resulting in the expansion of their population. A chondrocyte is a polymorphic cell that forms cartilage.
0	2	1	dendritic filopodium	A small, membranous protrusion found primarily on dendritic stretches of developing neurons. May receive synaptic input, and can develop into dendritic spines.
1	0	0	apoptotic process involved in development	Any apoptotic process that is involved in anatomical structure development.
0	1	1	positive regulation of lamellipodium organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of lamellipodium organization.
1	2	0	negative regulation of lens fiber cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of lens fiber cell differentiation.
1	2	0	regulation of cell cycle G2/M phase transition	Any signalling pathway that modulates the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G2 phase to M phase of the cell cycle.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cell cycle G2/M phase transition	Any signalling pathway that decreases or inhibits the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G2 phase to M phase of the cell cycle.
1	1	1	positive regulation of cell cycle G2/M phase transition	Any signalling pathway that activates or increases the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G2 phase to M phase of the cell cycle.
1	0	0	skeletal muscle satellite cell migration	The orderly movement of a skeletal muscle satellite cell from one site to another. Migration of these cells is a key step in the process of growth and repair of skeletal muscle cells.
1	0	0	GTPase activator complex	A protein complex which is capable of GTPase activator activity.
1	1	0	late endosome to lysosome transport	The directed movement of substances from late endosome to lysosome.
0	0	1	regulation of synaptic vesicle transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle transport.
1	1	1	regulation of cell cycle G1/S phase transition	Any signalling pathway that modulates the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G1 phase to S phase of the cell cycle.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cell cycle G1/S phase transition	Any signalling pathway that decreases or inhibits the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G1 phase to S phase of the cell cycle.
5	1	2	positive regulation of cell cycle G1/S phase transition	Any signalling pathway that activates or increases the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G1 phase to S phase of the cell cycle.
1	0	1	negative regulation of protein localization to microtubule	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to microtubule.
0	0	2	negative regulation of late endosome to lysosome transport	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of late endosome to lysosome transport.
0	2	0	positive regulation of late endosome to lysosome transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of late endosome to lysosome transport.
1	0	0	negative regulation of netrin-activated signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of netrin-activated signaling pathway.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mitotic spindle elongation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic spindle elongation.
0	0	1	regulation of neuronal signal transduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neuronal signal transduction.
0	2	0	microtubule cytoskeleton organization involved in mitosis	Any microtubule cytoskeleton organization that is involved in mitosis.
0	0	1	negative regulation of non-motile cilium assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of non-motile cilium assembly.
2	0	3	positive regulation of non-motile cilium assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of non-motile cilium assembly.
0	1	0	propionyl-CoA biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of propionyl-CoA.
0	0	1	regulation of response to oxidative stress	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of response to oxidative stress.
0	0	2	negative regulation of response to oxidative stress	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of response to oxidative stress.
1	0	1	positive regulation of response to oxidative stress	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of response to oxidative stress.
0	0	1	protein localization to spindle microtubule	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a spindle microtubule.
3	1	3	negative regulation of pri-miRNA transcription by RNA polymerase II	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of pri-miRNA transcription mediated by RNA polymerase II.
5	5	3	positive regulation of pri-miRNA transcription by RNA polymerase II	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of pri-miRNA transcription mediated by RNA polymerase II.
1	1	1	terminal web assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a terminal web.
0	0	1	regulation of postsynaptic density protein 95 clustering	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of postsynaptic density protein 95 clustering.
2	1	4	negative regulation of autophagosome assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of autophagosome assembly.
0	1	0	regulation of supramolecular fiber organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of supramolecular fiber organization.
0	0	1	negative regulation of supramolecular fiber organization	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of fibril organization.
1	0	0	positive regulation of supramolecular fiber organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of supramolecular fiber organization.
1	1	0	protein kinase complex	A protein complex which is capable of protein kinase activity.
0	0	1		
1	1	0	positive regulation of protein polyubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein polyubiquitination.
0	0	2	phosphatidylinositol bisphosphate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphatidylinositol bisphosphate.
0	0	1	regulation of intracellular calcium activated chloride channel activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of intracellular calcium activated chloride channel activity.
1	3	0	metalloendopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	Any metalloendopeptidase activity that is involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process.
1	1	0	regulation of tau-protein kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of tau-protein kinase activity.
0	1	0	negative regulation of tau-protein kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of tau-protein kinase activity.
0	1	3	positive regulation of tau-protein kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of tau-protein kinase activity.
0	0	1	regulation of dendritic spine maintenance	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic spine maintenance.
1	1	1	negative regulation of dendritic spine maintenance	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic spine maintenance.
1	0	1	positive regulation of dendritic spine maintenance	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic spine maintenance.
1	1	0	positive regulation of ER to Golgi vesicle-mediated transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ER to Golgi vesicle-mediated transport.
0	2	0	positive regulation of mitochondrial electron transport, NADH to ubiquinone	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitochondrial electron transport, NADH to ubiquinone.
0	0	1	regulation of aspartic-type endopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of aspartic-type endopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process.
1	0	1	negative regulation of aspartic-type endopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of aspartic-type endopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process.
1	0	3	positive regulation of aspartic-type endopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of aspartic-type endopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process.
0	0	1	negative regulation of metalloendopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of metalloendopeptidase activity involved in amyloid precursor protein catabolic process.
1	1	4	positive regulation of protein localization to early endosome	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to early endosome.
0	1	0	mitotic DNA replication	Any nuclear DNA replication that is involved in a mitotic cell cycle.
0	1	3	mitotic DNA replication initiation	Any DNA replication initiation involved in mitotic cell cycle DNA replication.
0	0	1	neurofibrillary tangle assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a neurofibrillary tangle.
0	1	1	mitotic telomere maintenance via semi-conservative replication	Any telomere maintenance via semi-conservative replication that is involved in mitotic cell cycle.
1	0	0	regulation of amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid precursor protein catabolic process.
0	1	0	negative regulation of amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid precursor protein catabolic process.
1	0	1	positive regulation of amyloid precursor protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid precursor protein catabolic process.
1	1	0	positive regulation of phospholipid efflux	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipid efflux.
1	0	1	positive regulation of neurofibrillary tangle assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neurofibrillary tangle assembly.
1	0	0		
1	0	0		
1	0	0	positive regulation of lipid transport across blood-brain barrier	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of lipid transport across blood-brain barrier.
0	2	0	positive regulation of protein deubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein deubiquitination.
1	0	1	positive regulation of protein K63-linked deubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein K63-linked deubiquitination.
0	0	1	positive regulation of Lys63-specific deubiquitinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Lys63-specific deubiquitinase activity.
1	0	0	organelle disassembly	The disaggregation of an organelle into its constituent components.
1	0	0	regulation of bone development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of bone development.
0	1	0	positive regulation of bone development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of bone development.
0	1	0	negative regulation of exo-alpha-sialidase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of exo-alpha-sialidase activity.
0	1	0	negative regulation of glycoprotein metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glycoprotein metabolic process.
0	2	0	positive regulation of glycoprotein metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glycoprotein metabolic process.
0	0	1	regulation of RNA polymerase II regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of RNA polymerase II regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding.
1	1	0	negative regulation of RNA polymerase II regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of RNA polymerase II regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding.
1	0	0	regulation of opsonization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of opsonization.
0	0	1	positive regulation of opsonization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of opsonization.
0	1	1	positive regulation of microtubule plus-end binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule plus-end binding.
0	1	0	positive regulation of response to wounding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of response to wounding.
0	1	2	negative regulation of leukocyte cell-cell adhesion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of leukocyte cell-cell adhesion.
0	1	0	positive regulation of leukocyte cell-cell adhesion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of leukocyte cell-cell adhesion.
0	1	1	protein localization to membrane raft	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a membrane raft.
1	0	0	negative regulation of proteolysis involved in cellular protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of proteolysis involved in cellular protein catabolic process.
1	0	1	positive regulation of proteolysis involved in cellular protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of proteolysis involved in cellular protein catabolic process.
0	1	0	regulation of extracellular matrix organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of extracellular matrix organization.
0	2	0	positive regulation of extracellular matrix organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of extracellular matrix organization.
1	0	0	regulation of melanosome organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of melanosome organization.
1	0	0	negative regulation of protein lipidation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein lipidation.
0	0	2	positive regulation of protein lipidation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein lipidation.
0	1	1	negative regulation of ER-associated ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ER-associated ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process.
1	0	2	positive regulation of ER-associated ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ER-associated ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process.
0	1	0	negative regulation of death-inducing signaling complex assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of death-inducing signaling complex assembly.
4	5	3	regulation of protein localization to plasma membrane	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to plasma membrane.
1	3	3	negative regulation of protein localization to plasma membrane	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to plasma membrane.
5	14	14	positive regulation of protein localization to plasma membrane	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to plasma membrane.
0	1	0	regulation of protein K48-linked deubiquitination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein K48-linked deubiquitination.
0	2	0	negative regulation of protein K48-linked deubiquitination	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein K48-linked deubiquitination.
1	0	0	protein localization to meiotic spindle midzone	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a meiotic spindle midzone.
0	1	0	1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3,5-bisphosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving 1-phosphatidyl-1D-myo-inositol 3,5-bisphosphate.
0	1	0	positive regulation of mitochondrial transcription	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription occuring in the mitochondrion.
0	0	1	protein localization to actin cytoskeleton	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, the location of an actin cytoskeleton.
0	1	0	negative regulation of TRAIL-activated apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of TRAIL-activated apoptotic signaling pathway.
0	0	1	negative regulation of thioredoxin peroxidase activity by peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation	A peptidyl-threonine phosphorylation that results in negative regulation of thioredoxin peroxidase activity.
0	1	0	cupric ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cupric ion, copper(2+).
1	2	1	cuprous ion binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with cuprous ion, copper(1+).
1	2	3	regulation of establishment of endothelial barrier	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of endothelial barrier.
0	1	1	positive regulation of establishment of endothelial barrier	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of endothelial barrier.
1	2	5	regulation of autophagy of mitochondrion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of mitochondrion degradation by an autophagic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of pyrroline-5-carboxylate reductase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of pyrroline-5-carboxylate reductase activity.
1	0	0	regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion transmembrane transport.
0	0	1	negative regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion transmembrane transport.
0	1	0	positive regulation of tyrosine 3-monooxygenase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of tyrosine 3-monooxygenase activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of dopamine biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dopamine biosynthetic process.
0	1	0	glyoxal metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving glyoxal.
0	1	0	positive regulation of L-dopa biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of L-dopa biosynthetic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of L-dopa decarboxylase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of L-dopa decarboxylase activity.
0	3	0	negative regulation of oxidative stress-induced cell death	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative stress-induced cell death.
1	0	0	regulation of oxidative stress-induced neuron death	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative stress-induced neuron death.
2	1	2	negative regulation of oxidative stress-induced neuron death	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative stress-induced neuron death.
0	0	1	regulation of hydrogen peroxide-induced cell death	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of hydrogen peroxide-induced cell death.
1	2	2	negative regulation of hydrogen peroxide-induced cell death	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hydrogen peroxide-induced cell death.
0	1	1	negative regulation of hydrogen peroxide-induced neuron death	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hydrogen peroxide-induced neuron death.
0	0	2	regulation of protein targeting to mitochondrion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein targeting to mitochondrion.
0	2	2	negative regulation of protein targeting to mitochondrion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein targeting to mitochondrion.
0	0	1	negative regulation of protein processing involved in protein targeting to mitochondrion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein processing involved in protein targeting to mitochondrion.
1	0	0	positive regulation of oxidative stress-induced neuron death	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative stress-induced neuron death.
0	0	1	positive regulation of endodermal cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endodermal cell differentiation.
0	1	0	mRNA binding involved in posttranscriptional gene silencing	Any mRNA binding that is involved in posttranscriptional gene silencing.
1	1	0	melanosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a melanosome, a tissue-specific, membrane-bounded cytoplasmic organelle within which melanin pigments are synthesized and stored.
0	0	2	regulation of calcium ion-dependent exocytosis of neurotransmitter	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion-dependent exocytosis of neurotransmitter.
0	2	0	positive regulation of leukocyte tethering or rolling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of leukocyte tethering or rolling.
0	2	0	U2-type prespliceosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an U2-type prespliceosome.
1	1	2	negative regulation of cardiac muscle hypertrophy in response to stress	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle hypertrophy in response to stress.
0	0	1	negative regulation of citrulline biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of citrulline biosynthetic process.
1	0	0	exon-exon junction complex disassembly	The disaggregation of an exon-exon junction complex into its constituent components.
2	1	2	positive regulation of tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of tumor necrosis factor-mediated signaling pathway.
1	0	1	positive regulation of sodium ion export across plasma membrane	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of sodium ion export across the plasma membrane.
0	0	1	negative regulation of calcium:sodium antiporter activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of calcium:sodium antiporter activity.
1	0	1	positive regulation of calcium:sodium antiporter activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of calcium:sodium antiporter activity.
0	0	1	regulation of potassium ion import	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion import.
1	2	1	positive regulation of potassium ion import across plasma membrane	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion import across the plasma membrane.
1	0	1	positive regulation of glutamate secretion, neurotransmission	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glutamate secretion, where glutamate acts as a neurotransmitter.
1	0	1	negative regulation of hypoxia-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hypoxia-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
0	0	1	positive regulation of hexokinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hexokinase activity.
0	0	1	regulation of regulated secretory pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of regulated secretory pathway.
0	2	1	positive regulation of regulated secretory pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of regulated secretory pathway.
0	2	1	negative regulation of bicellular tight junction assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of tight junction assembly.
0	2	0	positive regulation of bicellular tight junction assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of tight junction assembly.
0	1	6	cellular response to dopamine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a dopamine stimulus.
0	0	1	L-ornithine transmembrane transport	The directed movement of L-ornithine across a membrane.
2	1	4	regulation of Golgi organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Golgi organization.
0	2	1	protein localization to basolateral plasma membrane	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, basolateral regions of the plasma membrane.
1	0	0	regulation of cellular protein catabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular protein catabolic process.
1	1	0	negative regulation of cellular protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular protein catabolic process.
2	2	5	positive regulation of cellular protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cellular protein catabolic process.
1	1	2	positive regulation of endoplasmic reticulum tubular network organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endoplasmic reticulum tubular network organization.
0	1	0	regulation of oxidative stress-induced neuron intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative stress-induced neuron intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
0	1	1	negative regulation of oxidative stress-induced neuron intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative stress-induced neuron intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
0	1	0	negative regulation of hydrogen peroxide-induced neuron intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a hydrogen peroxide-induced neuron intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	0	0	regulation of homophilic cell adhesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of homophilic cell adhesion.
0	0	1	negative regulation of adherens junction organization	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of adherens junction organization.
0	0	1	positive regulation of adherens junction organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of adherens junction organization.
1	0	0	protein localization to kinetochore involved in kinetochore assembly	Any protein localization to kinetochore that is involved in kinetochore assembly.
1	0	0	positive regulation of sodium:potassium-exchanging ATPase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of sodium:potassium-exchanging ATPase activity.
1	0	1	reactive oxygen species biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of reactive oxygen species, any molecules or ions formed by the incomplete one-electron reduction of oxygen.
1	0	3	response to glycoside	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glycoside stimulus.
0	0	1	protein localization to endoplasmic reticulum tubular network	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within an endoplasmic reticulum tubular network.
0	1	0	regulation of synaptic vesicle recycling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle recycling.
0	1	1	negative regulation of synaptic vesicle recycling	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle recycling.
1	0	1	positive regulation of synaptic vesicle recycling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle recycling.
0	1	1	regulation of reactive oxygen species biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of reactive oxygen species biosynthetic process.
1	2	0	negative regulation of reactive oxygen species biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of reactive oxygen species biosynthetic process.
1	2	1	positive regulation of reactive oxygen species biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of reactive oxygen species biosynthetic process.
1	0	0	regulation of cell maturation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell maturation.
1	1	1	regulation of TORC1 signaling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of TORC1 signaling.
0	1	0	positive regulation of constitutive secretory pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of constitutive secretory pathway.
1	0	0	positive regulation of mitotic cytokinetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic cytokinetic process.
1	1	0	protein localization to ciliary membrane	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a ciliary membrane.
0	1	0	negative regulation of brown fat cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of brown fat cell differentiation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of G1 to G0 transition	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of G1 to G0 transition.
0	0	1	Okazaki fragment processing involved in mitotic DNA replication	Any DNA replication, Okazaki fragment processing that is involved in mitotic cell cycle DNA replication.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mitotic cell cycle DNA replication	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic cell cycle DNA replication.
0	1	0	regulation of lactation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of lactation.
1	0	0	response to acetylsalicylate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an aspirin (acetylsalicylate) stimulus. Aspirin is a non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drug with moA cyclooxygenase inhibitor activity.
0	0	2	regulation of nucleic acid-templated transcription	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of nucleic acid-templated transcription.
1	0	0	phytanic acid metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phytanic acid.
1	0	1	calcium ion transport from cytosol to endoplasmic reticulum	The directed movement of calcium ion from cytosol to endoplasmic reticulum.
0	1	1	positive regulation of single strand break repair	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of single strand break repair.
0	1	0	negative regulation of membrane tubulation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of membrane tubulation.
1	1	0	positive regulation of membrane tubulation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of membrane tubulation.
0	1	1	negative regulation of secretion by cell	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of secretion by cell.
0	1	0	regulation of protein targeting	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein targeting.
0	1	0	regulation of meiotic cell cycle process involved in oocyte maturation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of meiotic cell cycle process involved in oocyte maturation.
0	0	2	negative regulation of exosomal secretion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of exosomal secretion.
1	6	3	positive regulation of exosomal secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of exosomal secretion.
0	1	0	regulation of growth hormone activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of growth hormone activity.
1	2	0	regulation of extracellular exosome assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of extracellular vesicular exosome assembly.
0	3	0	positive regulation of extracellular exosome assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of extracellular vesicular exosome assembly.
1	0	0	negative regulation of tumor necrosis factor superfamily cytokine production	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of tumor necrosis factor superfamily cytokine production.
9	9	17	extracellular vesicle	Any vesicle that is part of the extracellular region.
1	0	0	negative regulation of protein localization to cilium	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to cilium.
0	1	1	positive regulation of protein localization to cilium	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to cilium.
0	0	1	negative regulation of response to endoplasmic reticulum stress	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a response to endoplasmic reticulum stress.
1	1	0	cornified envelope assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a cornified envelope.
0	0	2	regulation of ATP metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ATP metabolic process.
1	0	0	positive regulation of ATP metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ATP metabolic process.
1	2	0	negative regulation of blood vessel endothelial cell proliferation involved in sprouting angiogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of blood vessel endothelial cell proliferation involved in sprouting angiogenesis.
1	1	2	positive regulation of blood vessel endothelial cell proliferation involved in sprouting angiogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of blood vessel endothelial cell proliferation involved in sprouting angiogenesis.
0	2	1	positive regulation of histamine secretion by mast cell	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histamine secretion by mast cell.
0	0	1	regulation of gap junction assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gap junction assembly.
1	0	0	negative regulation of gap junction assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of gap junction assembly.
1	1	1	positive regulation of gap junction assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of gap junction assembly.
0	2	2	positive regulation of autophagy of mitochondrion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitochondrion degradation by autophagy.
0	3	3	protein localization to cytoplasmic stress granule	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a cytoplasmic stress granule.
0	0	1	negative regulation of inward rectifier potassium channel activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of inward rectifier potassium channel activity.
0	1	1	negative regulation of protein tyrosine phosphatase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein tyrosine phosphatase activity.
1	0	1	positive regulation of protein tyrosine phosphatase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein tyrosine phosphatase activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of DNA catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA catabolic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of protein insertion into mitochondrial outer membrane	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein insertion into mitochondrial outer membrane.
0	0	1	regulation of chaperone-mediated protein folding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chaperone-mediated protein folding.
1	1	0	negative regulation of chaperone-mediated protein folding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chaperone-mediated protein folding.
0	1	1	positive regulation of chaperone-mediated protein folding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of chaperone-mediated protein folding.
0	0	1	regulation of complement-dependent cytotoxicity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of complement-dependent cytotoxicity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of complement-dependent cytotoxicity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of complement-dependent cytotoxicity.
1	0	0	regulation of sprouting angiogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of sprouting angiogenesis.
1	2	1	negative regulation of sprouting angiogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of sprouting angiogenesis.
1	0	6	positive regulation of sprouting angiogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of sprouting angiogenesis.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cap-dependent translational initiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cap-dependent translational initiation.
1	1	1	positive regulation of cap-independent translational initiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cap-independent translational initiation.
0	1	2	negative regulation of wound healing, spreading of epidermal cells	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of wound healing, spreading of epidermal cells.
0	2	1	positive regulation of wound healing, spreading of epidermal cells	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of wound healing, spreading of epidermal cells.
0	0	1	negative regulation of microvillus assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of microvillus assembly.
1	0	0	tarsal gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a tarsal gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	regulation of hemopoiesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of hemopoiesis.
0	1	0	negative regulation of hemopoiesis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hemopoiesis.
1	0	0	uterine gland development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an uterine gland over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
2	2	3	regulation of aerobic respiration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of aerobic respiration.
0	0	1	negative regulation of I-kappaB phosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of I-kappaB phosphorylation.
1	0	1	positive regulation of I-kappaB phosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of I-kappaB phosphorylation.
0	2	0	negative regulation of centriole elongation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of centriole elongation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of centriole elongation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of centriole elongation.
0	1	0	regulation of phospholipid metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipid metabolic process.
0	1	0	regulation of phosphatidate phosphatase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of phosphatidate phosphatase activity.
0	0	2	positive regulation of anterograde synaptic vesicle transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of anterograde synaptic vesicle transport.
0	1	1	negative regulation of establishment of protein localization to mitochondrion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of protein localization to mitochondrion.
1	0	0	negative regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to hydrogen peroxide	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to hydrogen peroxide.
1	0	3	negative regulation of p38MAPK cascade	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of p38MAPK cascade.
0	0	1	cortical microtubule plus-end	The plus-end of a cortical microtubule.
0	0	1	regulation of voltage-gated potassium channel activity involved in ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential repolarization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of voltage-gated potassium channel activity involved in ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential repolarization.
1	0	0	positive regulation of voltage-gated potassium channel activity involved in ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential repolarization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of voltage-gated potassium channel activity involved in ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential repolarization.
0	0	1	gap junction channel activity involved in cell communication by electrical coupling	Any gap junction channel activity that is involved in cell communication by electrical coupling.
0	0	1	regulation of potassium ion export across plasma membrane	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of potassium ion export across the plasma membrane.
0	0	1	negative regulation of beta-galactosidase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of beta-galactosidase activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of beta-galactosidase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of beta-galactosidase activity.
0	2	0	positive regulation of viral budding via host ESCRT complex	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of viral budding via host ESCRT complex.
1	1	0	regulation of DNA double-strand break processing	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of DNA double-strand break processing.
8	2	17	regulation of cardiac conduction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac conduction.
1	0	0	regulation of glutathione biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of glutathione biosynthetic process.
1	0	0	positive regulation of glutathione biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glutathione biosynthetic process.
1	0	0	regulation of production of miRNAs involved in gene silencing by miRNA	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of production of miRNAs involved in gene silencing by miRNA.
0	1	2	negative regulation of production of miRNAs involved in gene silencing by miRNA	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of production of miRNAs involved in gene silencing by miRNA.
0	3	4	positive regulation of production of miRNAs involved in gene silencing by miRNA	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of production of miRNAs involved in gene silencing by miRNA.
0	2	1	L-leucine import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of L-leucine from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
1	0	0	L-glutamine import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of L-glutamine from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	1	0	L-serine import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of L-serine into a cell.
1	0	0	negative regulation of voltage-gated potassium channel activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of voltage-gated potassium channel activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of telomere single strand break repair	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of telomere single strand break repair.
3	2	4	regulation of cellular protein localization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular protein localization. Cellular protein localization is any process in which a protein is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location and encompasses movement within the cell, from within the cell to the cell surface, or from one location to another at the surface of a cell.
1	1	3	positive regulation of cellular protein localization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cellular protein localization. Cellular protein localization is any process in which a protein is transported to, and/or maintained in, a specific location and encompasses movement within the cell, from within the cell to the cell surface, or from one location to another at the surface of a cell.
0	0	1	cellular response to arsenite ion	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an arsenite ion stimulus.
0	1	1	negative regulation of dendrite extension	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dendrite extension.
2	1	8	positive regulation of dendrite extension	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dendrite extension.
0	0	1	positive regulation of oxidative phosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative phosphorylation.
0	0	1	regulation of ATF6-mediated unfolded protein response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the ATF6-mediated unfolded protein response.
0	1	0	negative regulation of ATF6-mediated unfolded protein response	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the ATF6-mediated unfolded protein response.
0	0	1	regulation of IRE1-mediated unfolded protein response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the IRE1-mediated unfolded protein response.
1	1	1	negative regulation of IRE1-mediated unfolded protein response	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the IRE1-mediated unfolded protein response.
3	1	0	positive regulation of IRE1-mediated unfolded protein response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the IRE1-mediated unfolded protein response.
0	0	1	regulation of PERK-mediated unfolded protein response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the PERK-mediated unfolded protein response.
1	2	1	negative regulation of PERK-mediated unfolded protein response	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the PERK-mediated unfolded protein response.
1	1	0	positive regulation of PERK-mediated unfolded protein response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the PERK-mediated unfolded protein response.
0	0	1	negative regulation of viral life cycle	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of viral life cycle.
1	2	1	positive regulation of viral life cycle	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of viral life cycle.
0	0	1	regulation of establishment of T cell polarity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of T cell polarity.
0	1	0	negative regulation of establishment of T cell polarity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of T cell polarity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of establishment of T cell polarity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of T cell polarity.
0	0	1	regulation of plasma membrane raft polarization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of plasma membrane raft polarization.
0	0	1	regulation of receptor clustering	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of receptor clustering.
0	1	0	positive regulation of receptor clustering	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of receptor clustering.
1	1	1	negative regulation of endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced eIF2 alpha phosphorylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of endoplasmic reticulum stress-induced eiF2alpha phosphorylation.
1	0	1	negative regulation of actin filament severing	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of actin filament severing.
1	0	0	positive regulation of actin filament severing	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of actin filament severing.
0	0	2	positive regulation of protein processing in phagocytic vesicle	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein processing in phagocytic vesicle.
1	0	0	cellular response to bisphenol A	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a bisphenol A stimulus.
0	0	1	response to sodium arsenite	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a sodium arsenite stimulus.
0	1	3	cellular response to sodium arsenite	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a sodium arsenite stimulus.
0	0	1	response to acrylamide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an acrylamide stimulus.
0	0	1	negative regulation of ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ventricular cardiac muscle cell action potential.
3	6	6	positive regulation of protein targeting to mitochondrion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein targeting to mitochondrion.
0	1	0	nitric-oxide synthase complex	A protein complex which is capable of nitric-oxide synthase activity.
0	1	0	monounsaturated fatty acid biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of monounsaturated fatty acid.
1	0	0	negative regulation of glial cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glial cell migration.
0	1	0	positive regulation of glial cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glial cell migration.
0	1	1	regulation of microglial cell activation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of microglial cell activation.
1	0	1	negative regulation of microglial cell activation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of microglial cell activation.
1	0	1	positive regulation of microglial cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of microglial cell activation.
0	0	1	enterobactin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with enterobactin.
1	0	0	positive regulation of TRAIL-activated apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of TRAIL-activated apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	0	0	negative regulation of non-membrane spanning protein tyrosine kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of non-membrane spanning protein tyrosine kinase activity.
1	2	0	positive regulation of non-membrane spanning protein tyrosine kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of non-membrane spanning protein tyrosine kinase activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of eating behavior	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of eating behavior.
0	1	0	cellular response to monosodium glutamate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a monosodium glutamate stimulus.
0	1	0	response to Aroclor 1254	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an Aroclor 1254 stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to serotonin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a serotonin stimulus.
0	1	0	response to Thyroglobulin triiodothyronine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a Thyroglobulin triiodothyronine stimulus.
0	2	0	cellular response to Thyroglobulin triiodothyronine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a Thyroglobulin triiodothyronine stimulus.
0	1	1	negative regulation of glucose catabolic process to lactate via pyruvate	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glucose catabolic process to lactate via pyruvate.
0	1	0	positive regulation of glucose catabolic process to lactate via pyruvate	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glucose catabolic process to lactate via pyruvate.
0	1	0	regulation of collagen fibril organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of collagen fibril organization.
0	1	0	positive regulation of collagen fibril organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of collagen fibril organization.
1	1	0	negative regulation of cyclin-dependent protein kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cyclin-dependent protein kinase activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cyclin-dependent protein kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cyclin-dependent protein kinase activity.
1	1	1	negative regulation of epithelial cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell apoptotic process.
2	0	0	positive regulation of epithelial cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell apoptotic process.
0	1	0	response to aldosterone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an aldosterone stimulus.
1	0	0	cellular response to aldosterone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an aldosterone stimulus.
0	1	0	negative regulation of vascular endothelial growth factor production	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular endothelial growth factor production.
3	2	1	S-adenosyl-L-methionine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with S-adenosyl-L-methionine.
0	0	1	negative regulation of spontaneous neurotransmitter secretion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of spontaneous neurotransmitter secretion.
0	0	1	positive regulation of spontaneous neurotransmitter secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of spontaneous neurotransmitter secretion.
1	0	0	regulation of cholangiocyte proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cholangiocyte proliferation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of cholangiocyte proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cholangiocyte proliferation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of sensory perception of pain	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of sensory perception of pain.
0	2	0	regulation of locomotor rhythm	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of locomotor rhythm.
0	1	1	regulation of cation transmembrane transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cation transmembrane transport.
1	0	0	positive regulation of cation transmembrane transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cation transmembrane transport.
0	0	2	presynaptic active zone assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a presynaptic active zone.  The presynaptic active zone is a specialized region of the plasma membrane and cell cortex of a presynaptic neuron; encompasses a region of the plasma membrane where synaptic vesicles dock and fuse, and a specialized cortical cytoskeletal matrix.
1	0	0	positive regulation of protein O-linked glycosylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein O-linked glycosylation.
0	1	0	protein localization to microvillus	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a microvillus.
1	0	0	positive regulation of cholesterol import	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cholesterol import.
4	7	16	axon cytoplasm	Any cytoplasm that is part of a axon.
1	1	0	cellular response to vasopressin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a vasopressin stimulus.
1	0	0	phosphatidylethanolamine transfer activity	Removes phosphatidylethanolamine from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle.
0	1	0	positive regulation of microglial cell mediated cytotoxicity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of microglial cell mediated cytotoxicity.
0	0	1	regulation of retrograde protein transport, ER to cytosol	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of retrograde protein transport, ER to cytosol.
0	0	1	negative regulation of retrograde protein transport, ER to cytosol	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of retrograde protein transport, ER to cytosol.
0	0	1	DN2 thymocyte differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a DN2 thymocyte. A DN2 thymocyte is a CD4-,CD8- thymocyte that is also CD44+,CD25-.
0	2	0	DNA synthesis involved in UV-damage excision repair	Any DNA synthesis that is involved in UV-damage excision repair.
0	0	1	positive regulation of bleb assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of bleb assembly.
0	1	0	positive regulation of adipose tissue development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of adipose tissue development.
0	1	0	negative regulation of transformation of host cell by virus	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transformation of host cell by virus.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cholangiocyte apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cholangiocyte apoptotic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of granulosa cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of granulosa cell proliferation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of skeletal muscle hypertrophy	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle hypertrophy.
0	1	0	positive regulation of skeletal muscle hypertrophy	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle hypertrophy.
1	0	0	membrane protein proteolysis involved in retrograde protein transport, ER to cytosol	Any membrane protein proteolysis that is involved in retrograde protein transport, ER to cytosol.
0	1	0	negative regulation of iodide transmembrane transport	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of iodide transmembrane transport.
1	0	1	positive regulation of CDP-diacylglycerol-serine O-phosphatidyltransferase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CDP-diacylglycerol-serine O-phosphatidyltransferase activity.
1	0	0	negative regulation of serine C-palmitoyltransferase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of serine C-palmitoyltransferase activity.
1	0	1	positive regulation of serine C-palmitoyltransferase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of serine C-palmitoyltransferase activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of glycogen synthase activity, transferring glucose-1-phosphate	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glycogen synthase activity, transferring glucose-1-phosphate.
0	1	0	positive regulation of aconitate hydratase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of aconitate hydratase activity.
0	2	1	positive regulation of substrate-dependent cell migration, cell attachment to substrate	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of substrate-dependent cell migration, cell attachment to substrate.
0	1	0	pericyte cell differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a pericyte cell.
0	1	0	negative regulation of polynucleotide adenylyltransferase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of polynucleotide adenylyltransferase activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of polynucleotide adenylyltransferase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of polynucleotide adenylyltransferase activity.
1	0	1	regulation of bile acid metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of bile acid metabolic process.
1	2	2	positive regulation of basement membrane assembly involved in embryonic body morphogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of basement membrane assembly involved in embryonic body morphogenesis.
2	2	2	negative regulation of TORC1 signaling	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of TORC1 signaling.
4	4	0	positive regulation of TORC1 signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of TORC1 signaling.
0	1	0	positive regulation of Schwann cell chemotaxis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Schwann cell chemotaxis.
0	2	1	L-alanine import across plasma membrane	The directed import of L-alanine from the extracellular region across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	0	1	tricellular tight junction assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a tricellular tight junction.
0	0	2	BAT3 complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a BAT3 complex.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mitotic DNA damage checkpoint	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic DNA damage checkpoint.
0	1	0	positive regulation of mitotic DNA damage checkpoint	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic DNA damage checkpoint.
1	0	0	regulation of ERAD pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ERAD pathway.
0	1	0	negative regulation of ERAD pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ERAD pathway.
0	0	1	positive regulation of ERAD pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ERAD pathway.
1	0	0	positive regulation of transcytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcytosis.
0	0	1	response to methamphetamine hydrochloride	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a methamphetamine hydrochloride stimulus.
1	0	0	transmitter-gated ion channel activity involved in regulation of postsynaptic membrane potential	Any transmitter-gated ion channel activity that is involved in regulation of postsynaptic membrane potential.
0	3	0	cellular response to forskolin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a forskolin stimulus.
0	0	1	positive regulation of inhibitory G protein-coupled receptor phosphorylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of inhibitory G protein-coupled receptor phosphorylation.
0	1	0	regulation of dopaminergic neuron differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of dopaminergic neuron differentiation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of dopaminergic neuron differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dopaminergic neuron differentiation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of colon smooth muscle contraction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of colon smooth muscle contraction.
1	0	0	positive regulation of small intestine smooth muscle contraction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of small intestine smooth muscle contraction.
0	1	0	positive regulation of protein catabolic process in the vacuole	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein catabolic process in the vacuole.
0	1	0	regulation of telomere capping	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of telomere capping.
1	1	2	negative regulation of telomere capping	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of telomere capping.
2	4	5	positive regulation of telomere capping	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of telomere capping.
0	2	2	negative regulation of telomere maintenance via telomere lengthening	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of telomere maintenance via telomere lengthening.
0	2	2	positive regulation of telomere maintenance via telomere lengthening	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of telomere maintenance via telomere lengthening.
0	0	1	positive regulation of protein localization to actin cortical patch	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to actin cortical patch.
0	0	1	response to kainic acid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a kainic acid stimulus.
1	0	0	regulation of protein localization to cell periphery	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to cell periphery.
0	0	1	maintenance of unfolded protein involved in ERAD pathway	Maintaining an endoplasmic reticulum (ER) protein in an unfolded, soluble state that contributes to its degradation by the cytoplasmic proteasome. Maintaining ER-resident proteins in an unfolded yet soluble state condition after their retro-translocation favors their turnover by the cytosolic proteasome.
0	0	1	protein localization to cytosolic proteasome complex involved in ERAD pathway	Any protein localization to cytosolic proteasome complex that is involved in ERAD pathway. Following their retrotranslocation out of the endoplasmic reticulum, protein substrates must be shuttled to the cytosolic proteasome for degradation.
1	0	4	endoplasmic reticulum mannose trimming	Any protein alpha-1,2-demannosylation that takes place in the endoplasmic reticulum quality control compartment (ERQC).
0	0	1	response to sodium phosphate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a sodium phosphate stimulus.
2	3	3	cellular response to angiotensin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an angiotensin stimulus. Angiotensin is any of three physiologically active peptides (angiotensin II, III, or IV) processed from angiotensinogen.
0	0	1	response to L-phenylalanine derivative	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a L-phenylalanine derivative stimulus.
0	1	0	regulation of skeletal muscle acetylcholine-gated channel clustering	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle acetylcholine-gated channel clustering.
0	0	1	positive regulation of neuromuscular junction development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neuromuscular junction development.
0	0	1	heparan sulfate binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with heparan sulfate.
1	0	0	melatonin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with melatonin.
0	0	1	positive regulation of secretory granule organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of secretory granule organization.
0	1	2	positive regulation of xenophagy	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of xenophagy.
1	0	1	regulation of GTP binding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of GTP binding.
0	0	1	positive regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion transmembrane transport.
1	1	2	negative regulation of tubulin deacetylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of tubulin deacetylation.
1	1	1	negative regulation of t-circle formation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of t-circle formation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of t-circle formation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of t-circle formation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of ferrous iron binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ferrous iron binding.
0	0	1	positive regulation of transferrin receptor binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transferrin receptor binding.
0	1	0	negative regulation of iron ion import across plasma membrane	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of iron ions import across plasma membrane.
0	0	1	folate import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of folic acid from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	0	1	positive regulation of aspartate secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of aspartate secretion.
0	0	1	regulation of matrix metallopeptidase secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of matrix metallopeptidase secretion.
1	0	0	negative regulation of matrix metallopeptidase secretion	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of matrix metallopeptidase secretion.
0	1	0	positive regulation of matrix metallopeptidase secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of matrix metallopeptidase secretion.
0	0	1	regulation of intestinal absorption	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of intestinal absorption.
1	1	0	response to 17alpha-ethynylestradiol	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a 17alpha-ethynylestradiol stimulus.
0	0	1	positive regulation of lipophagy	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of lipophagy.
0	1	0	negative regulation of telomere maintenance in response to DNA damage	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of telomere maintenance in response to DNA damage.
1	1	0	positive regulation of TORC2 signaling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of TORC2 signaling.
0	0	1	regulation of microtubule binding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule binding.
1	0	1	negative regulation of microtubule binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule binding.
0	1	1	positive regulation of microtubule binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule binding.
0	0	1	negative regulation of actin filament binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of actin filament binding.
0	1	0	positive regulation of actin filament binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of actin filament binding.
0	1	0	positive regulation of telomeric loop disassembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of telomeric loop disassembly.
0	0	1	negative regulation of glycolytic process through fructose-6-phosphate	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glycolytic process through fructose-6-phosphate.
0	1	0	L-tryptophan transmembrane transport	The directed movement of L-tryptophan across a membrane.
0	2	0	phosphatidylinositol 5-phosphate metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving phosphatidylinositol 5-phosphate.
0	1	0	cellular response to wortmannin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a wortmannin stimulus.
0	1	0	negative regulation of selenocysteine incorporation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of selenocysteine incorporation.
0	0	1		
0	1	0	negative regulation of selenocysteine insertion sequence binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of selenocysteine insertion sequence binding.
0	0	1	cellular response to thapsigargin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a thapsigargin stimulus.
0	2	0	positive regulation of intracellular mRNA localization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of intracellular mRNA localization.
0	0	1	cellular response to putrescine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a putrescine stimulus.
0	0	1	regulation of protein import	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein import.
0	1	0	positive regulation of protein import	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein import.
0	0	2	cellular response to phorbol 13-acetate 12-myristate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a phorbol 13-acetate 12-myristate stimulus.
0	1	2	response to amyloid-beta	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a amyloid-beta stimulus.
5	7	6	cellular response to amyloid-beta	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a amyloid-beta stimulus.
0	1	0	response to rotenone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a rotenone stimulus.
1	1	0	glucose transmembrane transport	The process in which glucose is transported across a membrane.
0	0	1	regulation of ubiquitin protein ligase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin protein ligase activity.
1	2	0	negative regulation of ubiquitin protein ligase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin protein ligase activity.
2	2	0	positive regulation of ubiquitin protein ligase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin protein ligase activity.
1	0	0	ATP export	The directed movement of ATP out of a cell or organelle.
1	1	0	regulation of somatic stem cell population maintenance	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of somatic stem cell population maintenance.
0	1	0	positive regulation of somatic stem cell population maintenance	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of somatic stem cell population maintenance.
1	0	0	negative regulation of metalloendopeptidase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of metalloendopeptidase activity.
1	0	1	positive regulation of metalloendopeptidase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of metalloendopeptidase activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of cytoplasmic translational initiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cytoplasmic translational initiation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of type B pancreatic cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of type B pancreatic cell proliferation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of type B pancreatic cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of type B pancreatic cell proliferation.
1	1	0	midbrain morphogenesis	The developmental process by which a midbrain is generated and organized.
0	2	0	negative regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle contraction	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular smooth muscle contraction.
1	0	0	positive regulation of acinar cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of acinar cell proliferation.
0	0	1	regulation of protein localization to adherens junction	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to adherens junction. An adherens junction is a cell-cell junction composed of the epithelial cadherin-catenin complex at which the cytoplasmic face of the plasma membrane is attached to actin filaments.
5	6	1	negative regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular smooth muscle cell proliferation.
4	5	5	positive regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular smooth muscle cell proliferation.
1	0	0	regulation of granulosa cell apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of granulosa cell apoptotic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of granulosa cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of granulosa cell apoptotic process.
0	0	1	beta-catenin destruction complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a beta-catenin destruction complex.
0	0	3	regulation of chaperone-mediated autophagy	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chaperone-mediated autophagy.
0	0	1	negative regulation of chaperone-mediated autophagy	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chaperone-mediated autophagy.
1	0	0	regulation of AMPA glutamate receptor clustering	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of AMPA glutamate receptor clustering.
0	1	0	positive regulation of AMPA glutamate receptor clustering	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of AMPA glutamate receptor clustering.
12	7	14	tertiary granule lumen	Any membrane-enclosed lumen that is part of a tertiary granule.
0	1	0	regulation of protein localization to nucleolus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to nucleolus.
0	1	0	negative regulation of protein localization to nucleolus	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to nucleolus.
0	1	1	positive regulation of protein localization to nucleolus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to nucleolus.
3	2	0	negative regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular associated smooth muscle cell migration.
2	4	3	positive regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular associated smooth muscle cell migration.
1	1	1	negative regulation of myofibroblast differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of myofibroblast differentiation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of myofibroblast differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of myofibroblast differentiation.
0	0	1	chaperone-mediated autophagy translocation complex disassembly	The disaggregation of a chaperone-mediated autophagy translocation complex into its constituent components.
0	1	2	response to tetrachloromethane	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a tetrachloromethane stimulus.
1	0	1	regulation of protein localization to cell cortex	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to cell cortex.
0	1	3	positive regulation of protein localization to cell cortex	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to cell cortex.
0	1	0	regulation of protein localization to centrosome	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to centrosome.
1	0	1	negative regulation of protein localization to centrosome	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to centrosome.
1	3	2	positive regulation of protein localization to centrosome	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to centrosome.
0	1	0	negative regulation of core promoter binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of core promoter binding.
0	1	0	negative regulation of neuron remodeling	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neuron remodeling.
1	0	0	regulation of translation involved in cellular response to UV	Any regulation of translation that is involved in cellular response to UV.
1	0	0	rRNA acetylation involved in maturation of SSU-rRNA	Any rRNA acetylation that is involved in maturation of SSU-rRNA.
19	23	42	ficolin-1-rich granule lumen	Any membrane-enclosed lumen that is part of a ficolin-1-rich granule.
0	0	1	negative regulation of protein localization to chromosome, telomeric region	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to chromosome, telomeric region.
0	0	1	positive regulation of protein localization to chromosome, telomeric region	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to chromosome, telomeric region.
0	1	0	purine nucleobase transmembrane transport	The process in which a purine nucleobase is transported across a membrane.
0	2	2	protein localization to microtubule plus-end	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location at a microtubule plus-end.
4	8	10	beta-catenin-TCF complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a beta-catenin-TCF complex.
0	0	1	TORC2 complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a TORC2 complex.
0	0	1	cellular response to nitroglycerin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nitroglycerin stimulus.
0	1	0	response to L-glutamine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a L-glutamine stimulus.
0	0	1	cellular response to L-glutamine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a L-glutamine stimulus.
1	5	4	positive regulation of establishment of protein localization to telomere	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of protein localization to telomere.
0	0	1	proteasome core complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a proteasome core complex.
0	1	0	proteasome regulatory particle binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a proteasome regulatory particle.
0	1	0	excitatory synapse assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form an excitatory synapse.
1	0	0	negative regulation of beta-catenin-TCF complex assembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of beta-catenin-TCF complex assembly.
0	1	0	protein localization to Cajal body	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a Cajal body.
1	4	6	positive regulation of protein localization to Cajal body	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to Cajal body.
0	0	2	regulation of telomerase RNA localization to Cajal body	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of telomerase RNA localization to Cajal body.
1	6	5	positive regulation of telomerase RNA localization to Cajal body	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of telomerase RNA localization to Cajal body.
0	0	1	negative regulation of DNA ligase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA ligase activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of DNA ligase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA ligase activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transport via high voltage-gated calcium channel	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion transmembrane transport via high voltage-gated calcium channel.
0	0	1	positive regulation of calcium ion transmembrane transport via high voltage-gated calcium channel	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion transmembrane transport via high voltage-gated calcium channel.
0	1	0	response to hydrogen sulfide	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a hydrogen sulfide stimulus.
1	0	1	positive regulation of telomerase catalytic core complex assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of telomerase catalytic core complex assembly.
2	1	1	beta-catenin destruction complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a beta-catenin destruction complex.
3	1	4	beta-catenin destruction complex disassembly	The disaggregation of a beta-catenin destruction complex into its constituent components.
0	0	1	Wnt signalosome assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a Wnt signalosome.
0	5	0	cranial skeletal system development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a cranial skeletal system over time, from its formation to the mature structure. The cranial skeletal system is the skeletal subdivision of the head, and includes the skull (cranium plus mandible), pharyngeal and/or hyoid apparatus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of receptor signaling pathway via STAT	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of receptor signaling pathway via STAT.
0	1	0	ESCRT complex disassembly	The disaggregation of an ESCRT complex into its constituent components.
2	3	2	ESCRT III complex disassembly	The disaggregation of an ESCRT III complex into its constituent components.
2	1	0	positive regulation of endothelial cell-matrix adhesion via fibronectin	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell-matrix adhesion via fibronectin.
0	0	1	negative regulation of maintenance of mitotic sister chromatid cohesion, telomeric	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of maintenance of mitotic sister chromatid cohesion, telomeric.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mitophagy in response to mitochondrial depolarization	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mitophagy in response to mitochondrial depolarization.
0	0	1	positive regulation of autophagy of mitochondrion in response to mitochondrial depolarization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of autophagy of the mitochondrion in response to mitochondrial depolarization.
1	0	0	coreceptor activity involved in Wnt signaling pathway, planar cell polarity pathway	Any coreceptor activity that is involved in Wnt signaling pathway, planar cell polarity pathway.
0	0	1	midbrain dopaminergic neuron differentiation	The process in which a relatively unspecialized cell acquires the specialized features of a midbrain dopaminergic neuron.
0	0	1	ATPase complex	A protein complex which is capable of ATPase activity.
1	0	0	positive regulation of establishment of protein localization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of protein localization.
0	0	1	canonical Wnt signaling pathway involved in midbrain dopaminergic neuron differentiation	Any canonical Wnt signaling pathway that is involved in midbrain dopaminergic neuron differentiation.
1	1	1	regulation of cytochrome-c oxidase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cytochrome-c oxidase activity.
1	1	0	brush border assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of adjacent microvilli through the formation of Ca(2+)-dependent adhesion links between them, forming a brush border.
0	1	0	positive regulation of viral translation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of viral translation.
1	0	0	cellular response to bleomycin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a bleomycin stimulus.
0	0	1	positive regulation of endosome organization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endosome organization.
1	0	0	positive regulation of adenylate cyclase-inhibiting dopamine receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of adenylate cyclase-inhibiting dopamine receptor signaling pathway.
2	3	0	positive regulation of leukocyte adhesion to vascular endothelial cell	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of leukocyte adhesion to vascular endothelial cell.
0	0	1	regulation of membrane repolarization during atrial cardiac muscle cell action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of membrane repolarization during atrial cardiac muscle cell action potential.
2	0	0	positive regulation of epithelial to mesenchymal transition involved in endocardial cushion formation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial to mesenchymal transition involved in endocardial cushion formation.
0	0	1	regulation of membrane repolarization during cardiac muscle cell action potential	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of membrane repolarization during cardiac muscle cell action potential.
1	0	0	autophagosome organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of an autophagosome.
0	1	1	carboxylic acid transmembrane transport	The process in which carboxylic acid is transported across a membrane.
0	0	1	regulation of epithelium regeneration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of epithelium regeneration.
1	0	0	negative regulation of Schwann cell proliferation involved in axon regeneration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Schwann cell proliferation involved in axon regeneration.
3	0	0	negative regulation of metallopeptidase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of metallopeptidase activity.
2	1	0	positive regulation of metallopeptidase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of metallopeptidase activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of base-excision repair	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of base-excision repair.
0	0	2	calcium-transporting ATPase activity involved in regulation of presynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentration	Any calcium-transporting ATPase activity that is involved in regulation of presynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentration.
0	0	1	calcium-transporting ATPase activity involved in regulation of postsynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentration	Any calcium-transporting ATPase activity that is involved in regulation of postsynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentration.
0	0	1	calcium:cation antiporter activity involved in regulation of postsynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentration	Any calcium:cation antiporter activity that is involved in regulation of postsynaptic cytosolic calcium ion concentration.
0	1	2	negative regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular smooth muscle cell differentiation.
2	0	0	positive regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular smooth muscle cell differentiation.
1	1	0	cardiac jelly development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of cardiac jelly over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
0	0	1	negative regulation of parkin-mediated stimulation of mitophagy in response to mitochondrial depolarization	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of parkin-mediated mitophagy in response to mitochondrial depolarization.
0	1	2	negative regulation of guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity.
0	1	1	cell surface receptor signaling pathway involved in cell-cell signaling	Any cell surface receptor signaling pathway that is involved in cell-cell signaling.
1	0	0	biotin import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of biotin from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	0	2	cellular response to acetylcholine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an acetylcholine stimulus.
3	0	0	lysosomal protein catabolic process	Any cellular protein catabolic process that takes place in a lysosome.
0	1	1	regulation of voltage-gated sodium channel activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of voltage-gated sodium channel activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of voltage-gated sodium channel activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of voltage-gated sodium channel activity.
1	0	0	regulation of phagosome maturation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of phagosome maturation.
1	0	0	regulation of lysosomal protein catabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of lysosomal protein catabolic process.
2	0	1	positive regulation of lysosomal protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of lysosomal protein catabolic process.
2	7	0	positive regulation of double-strand break repair via homologous recombination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of double-strand break repair via homologous recombination.
0	0	1	positive regulation of protein localization to phagocytic vesicle	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to phagocytic vesicle.
0	1	1	RISC complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a RISC complex.
1	1	0	negative regulation of cardiac muscle tissue regeneration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle tissue regeneration.
1	0	1	manchette assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a manchette.
0	1	0	methylcrotonoyl-CoA carboxylase complex	A protein complex which is capable of methylcrotonoyl-CoA carboxylase activity.
0	1	0	regulation of connective tissue replacement	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of connective tissue replacement.
0	1	1	positive regulation of connective tissue replacement	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of connective tissue replacement.
0	1	0	positive regulation of hydrogen peroxide-induced cell death	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell death in response to hydrogen peroxide.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cardiocyte differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cardiocyte differentiation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of platelet formation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of platelet formation.
2	1	0	atrioventricular canal morphogenesis	The developmental process by which an atrioventricular canal is generated and organized.
0	0	1	clathrin-coated pit assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a clathrin-coated pit.
0	2	0	cellular response to L-glutamate	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a L-glutamate(1-) stimulus.
0	1	0	response to 3,3',5-triiodo-L-thyronine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a 3,3',5-triiodo-L-thyronine stimulus.
2	1	1	regulation of modification of synaptic structure	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of modification of synaptic structure.
0	2	0	negative regulation of nitrosative stress-induced intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to nitrosative stress.
0	1	0	positive regulation of proton-transporting ATP synthase activity, rotational mechanism	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of proton-transporting ATP synthase activity, rotational mechanism.
1	2	1	regulation of modification of postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of modification of postsynaptic actin cytoskeleton.
1	0	0	positive regulation of epithelial tube formation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial tube formation.
0	1	1	regulation of retrograde transport, endosome to Golgi	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of retrograde transport, endosome to Golgi.
0	0	1	negative regulation of retrograde transport, endosome to Golgi	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of retrograde transport, endosome to Golgi.
0	1	0	positive regulation of retrograde transport, endosome to Golgi	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of retrograde transport, endosome to Golgi.
0	0	2	regulation of CAMKK-AMPK signaling cascade	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of CAMKK-AMPK signaling cascade.
0	0	1	negative regulation of macropinocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of macropinocytosis.
0	1	0	positive regulation of macropinocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of macropinocytosis.
0	1	0	semi-lunar valve development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a semi-lunar valve over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	inferior endocardial cushion morphogenesis	The developmental process by which an inferior endocardial cushion is generated and organized.
1	1	0	positive regulation of mesenchymal stem cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mesenchymal stem cell migration.
0	1	3	telomerase holoenzyme complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a telomerase holoenzyme complex.
0	0	1	positive regulation of morphogenesis of an epithelium	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of morphogenesis of an epithelium.
1	0	0	regulation of gastric motility	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of gastric motility.
1	0	2	positive regulation of aggrephagy	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of aggrephagy.
1	0	0	negative regulation of protein localization to kinetochore	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to kinetochore.
1	0	1	positive regulation of protein localization to kinetochore	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to kinetochore.
1	0	0	prostaglandin catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of prostaglandin.
0	0	1	spine apparatus assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a spine apparatus.
0	0	1	negative regulation of intralumenal vesicle formation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intralumenal vesicle formation.
1	0	0	serine-type endopeptidase complex	A protein complex which is capable of serine-type endopeptidase activity.
1	0	0	ceramide phosphoethanolamine biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of ceramide phosphoethanolamine.
0	1	0	negative regulation of snRNA transcription by RNA polymerase II	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of snRNA transcription mediated by RNA polymerase II.
0	0	2	positive regulation of snRNA transcription by RNA polymerase II	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of snRNA transcription mediated by RNA polymerase II.
2	0	4	retromer complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a retromer complex.
0	1	1	response to flavonoid	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a flavonoid stimulus.
0	1	0	negative regulation of activated CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of activated CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell apoptotic process.
1	0	0	positive regulation of activated CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of activated CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell apoptotic process.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mitotic cohesin loading	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic cohesin loading.
0	0	1	negative regulation of creatine transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of creatine transmembrane transporter activity.
0	0	1	regulation of dense core granule exocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of dense core granule exocytosis.
1	1	0	positive regulation of Wnt-mediated midbrain dopaminergic neuron differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Wnt signaling pathway involved in midbrain dopaminergic neuron differentiation.
0	1	0	cellular response to glycine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a glycine stimulus.
0	1	0	positive regulation of histone H3-K4 trimethylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K4 trimethylation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mitochondrial ATP synthesis coupled electron transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mitochondrial ATP synthesis coupled electron transport.
0	1	0	negative regulation of Fc-gamma receptor signaling pathway involved in phagocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Fc-gamma receptor signaling pathway involved in phagocytosis.
1	2	1	positive regulation of Fc-gamma receptor signaling pathway involved in phagocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Fc-gamma receptor signaling pathway involved in phagocytosis.
0	0	1	negative regulation of myeloid progenitor cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of myeloid progenitor cell differentiation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular associated smooth muscle cell apoptotic process.
1	2	1	positive regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular associated smooth muscle cell apoptotic process.
0	0	1	negative regulation of DNA duplex unwinding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA duplex unwinding.
1	0	0	regulation of protein localization to membrane	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to membrane.
1	1	0	positive regulation of protein localization to membrane	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to membrane.
0	0	1	negative regulation of short-term synaptic potentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of short-term synaptic potentiation.
6	2	4	non-motile cilium assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of a set of components to form a non-motile cilium.
0	1	0	regulation of macrophage migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage migration.
1	0	1	positive regulation of macrophage migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage migration.
1	0	0	regulation of Golgi lumen acidification	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Golgi lumen acidification.
1	0	0	positive regulation of Golgi lumen acidification	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Golgi lumen acidification.
0	0	1	positive regulation of eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4F complex assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4F complex assembly.
0	2	1	polysome binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a polysome.
0	1	0	positive regulation of subtelomeric heterochromatin assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of subtelomeric heterochromatin assembly.
1	0	1	positive regulation of protein localization to endoplasmic reticulum	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to endoplasmic reticulum.
0	2	0	positive regulation blood vessel branching	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of blood vessel branching.
1	1	0	negative regulation of vascular endothelial cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular endothelial cell proliferation.
3	3	2	positive regulation of vascular endothelial cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular endothelial cell proliferation.
0	1	0	ganglioside GM1 transport to membrane	The directed movement of ganglioside GM1 to membrane.
0	1	0	ganglioside GM1 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ganglioside GM1.
0	1	0	ganglioside GM2 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ganglioside GM2.
0	1	0	ganglioside GM3 binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ganglioside GM3.
0	1	1	ganglioside GT1b binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ganglioside GT1b.
0	1	0	ganglioside GP1c binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with ganglioside GP1c.
0	0	1	positive regulation of ERBB3 signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ERBB3 signaling pathway.
0	1	1	positive regulation of low-density lipoprotein particle clearance	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of low-density lipoprotein particle clearance.
1	0	0	resveratrol binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with resveratrol.
0	0	1	positive regulation of low-density lipoprotein particle receptor binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of low-density lipoprotein particle receptor binding.
3	1	0	negative regulation of low-density lipoprotein receptor activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of low-density lipoprotein receptor activity.
2	0	2	positive regulation of low-density lipoprotein receptor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of low-density lipoprotein receptor activity.
1	0	0	negative regulation of receptor-mediated endocytosis involved in cholesterol transport	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of receptor-mediated endocytosis involved in cholesterol transport.
0	1	1	positive regulation of receptor-mediated endocytosis involved in cholesterol transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of receptor-mediated endocytosis involved in cholesterol transport.
1	1	2	positive regulation of blood-brain barrier permeability	Any process that increases blood-brain barrier permeability, the quality of the blood-brain barrier that allows for a controlled passage of substances (e.g. macromolecules, small molecules, ions) into and out of the brain.
4	1	2	regulation of presynapse assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of presynapse assembly.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mRNA cap binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mRNA cap binding.
2	2	2	positive regulation of miRNA mediated inhibition of translation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of miRNA mediated inhibition of translation.
0	2	1	regulation of protein localization to chromatin	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to chromatin.
2	0	1	positive regulation of RNA polymerase II regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of RNA polymerase II regulatory region sequence-specific DNA binding.
0	0	1	negative regulation of DNA methylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA methylation.
0	1	1	positive regulation of DNA methylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA methylation.
1	0	1	positive regulation of artery morphogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of artery morphogenesis.
0	0	2	positive regulation of telomerase RNA reverse transcriptase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of telomerase RNA reverse transcriptase activity.
0	1	0	regulation of calcium ion import across plasma membrane	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion import across plasma membrane.
0	1	0	regulation of lysosome organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of lysosome organization.
0	1	0	positive regulation of adaptive immune memory response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of adaptive immune memory response.
1	0	2	regulation of plasma membrane repair	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of plasma membrane repair.
0	0	1	positive regulation of diacylglycerol kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of diacylglycerol kinase activity.
0	0	1	regulation of polysome binding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of polysome binding.
0	1	0	positive regulation of polysome binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of polysome binding.
0	1	0	negative regulation of membrane permeability	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of the passage or uptake of molecules by a membrane.
1	0	0	positive regulation of membrane permeability	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the passage or uptake of molecules by a membrane.
1	2	1	protein localization to perinuclear region of cytoplasm	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the perinuclear region of the cytoplasm.
0	0	1	cytoplasmic microtubule bundle	Any microtubule bundle that is part of a cytoplasm.
0	1	1	mitotic spindle astral microtubule end	Any microtubule end that is part of a mitotic spindle astral microtubule.
1	0	0	positive regulation of L-proline import across plasma membrane	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of L-proline import across plasma membrane.
0	0	1	positive regulation of endosome to plasma membrane protein transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endosome to plasma membrane protein transport.
0	1	0	CCR4-NOT complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a CCR4-NOT complex.
0	0	1	negative regulation of protection from non-homologous end joining at telomere	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protection from non-homologous end joining at telomere.
0	0	1	positive regulation of mesodermal cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mesodermal cell differentiation.
0	1	0	8-hydroxy-2'-deoxyguanosine DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with 8-hydroxy-2'-deoxyguanosine an oxidized purine residue found in damaged DNA.
0	0	1	negative regulation of DNA helicase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ATP-dependent DNA helicase activity.
1	0	0	positive regulation of DNA helicase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ATP-dependent DNA helicase activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of exonuclease activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of exonuclease activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of anaphase-promoting complex-dependent catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of anaphase-promoting complex-dependent catabolic process.
0	1	0	protein localization to pericentriolar material	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within a pericentriolar material.
1	0	0	regulation of chromosome separation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chromosome separation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of chromosome separation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of chromosome separation.
1	0	2	positive regulation of spindle assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of spindle assembly.
0	0	1	negative regulation of microtubule nucleation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule nucleation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of telomeric D-loop disassembly	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of telomeric D-loop disassembly.
0	0	1	regulation of cellular response to gamma radiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to gamma radiation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of heparan sulfate binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of heparan sulfate binding.
0	1	0	negative regulation of pentose-phosphate shunt	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of pentose-phosphate shunt.
1	0	0	positive regulation of heparan sulfate proteoglycan binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of heparan sulfate proteoglycan binding.
1	0	1	epididymis development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of an epididymis over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	negative regulation of 3'-UTR-mediated mRNA stabilization	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of 3'-UTR-mediated mRNA stabilization.
1	0	1	positive regulation of 3'-UTR-mediated mRNA stabilization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of 3'-UTR-mediated mRNA stabilization.
0	1	0	negative regulation of protein localization to cell leading edge	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to cell leading edge.
1	0	0	negative regulation of postsynaptic density organization	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of postsynaptic density organization.
1	0	0	regulation of cellular response to very-low-density lipoprotein particle stimulus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to very-low-density lipoprotein particle stimulus.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cellular response to thapsigargin	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to thapsigargin.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cellular response to tunicamycin	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to tunicamycin.
1	0	0	regulation of amyloid fibril formation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid fibril formation.
2	1	2	negative regulation of amyloid fibril formation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid fibril formation.
1	1	1	positive regulation of amyloid fibril formation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of amyloid fibril formation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of calcium ion export across plasma membrane	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of calcium ion export across the plasma membrane.
1	0	0	positive regulation of CoA-transferase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CoA-transferase activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell differentiation involved in phenotypic switching	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vascular smooth muscle cell differentiation involved in phenotypic switching.
0	1	0	positive regulation of vascular associated smooth muscle cell differentiation involved in phenotypic switching	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vascular smooth muscle cell differentiation involved in phenotypic switching.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cell fate determination	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell fate determination.
1	0	0	positive regulation of endothelial tube morphogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial tube morphogenesis.
5	13	11	amyloid fibril formation	The generation of amyloid fibrils, insoluble fibrous protein aggregates exhibiting beta sheet structure, from proteins.
0	1	0	inhibition of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic process	Any process that prevents the activation of an inactive cysteine-type endopeptidase involved in an apoptotic process.
3	3	3	mitotic spindle midzone	The area in the center of the anaphase spindle consisting of microtubules, microtubule bundling factors and kinesin motors where the spindle microtubules from opposite poles overlap in an antiparallel manner.
0	0	1	hippocampal mossy fiber expansion	Synaptic expansion of hippocampal mossy fiber axon that makes contact with the thorny excrescences of hippocampal CA3 pyramidal cell dendrites.
0	1	0	pinceau fiber	Dense plexus formed by the descending collaterals of cerebellar basket cells that wrap around a Purkinje cell axonal initial segment.
1	0	0	parallel fiber	A parallel fiber results from the bifurcation of a cerebellar granule cell axon in the molecular layer into two diametrically opposed branches, that are oriented parallel to the long axis of the folium.
0	0	2	calcium ion export across plasma membrane	The directed movement of calcium ions from inside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the extracellular region.
0	1	1	calcium ion import into sarcoplasmic reticulum	The directed movement of calcium ions into a sarcoplasmic reticulum.
0	0	1	stress-induced mitochondrial fusion	Merging of two or more mitochondria within a cell to form a single compartment, as a result of a disturbance in cellular homeostasis.
0	2	2	anterograde neuronal dense core vesicle transport	The directed movement of substances in neuronal dense core vesicles along axonal microtubules towards the presynapse.
0	2	2	retrograde neuronal dense core vesicle transport	The directed movement of neuronal dense core vesicles along axonal microtubules towards the cell body.
0	0	1	phosphatidic acid transfer activity	Removes a phosphatidic acid from a membrane or a monolayer lipid particle, transports it through the aqueous phase while protected in a hydrophobic pocket, and brings it to an acceptor membrane or lipid particle. Phosphatidic acid refers to a glycophospholipids with, in general, a saturated fatty acid bonded to carbon-1, an unsaturated fatty acid bonded to carbon-2, and a phosphate group bonded to carbon-3.
2	1	0	activation of protein kinase C activity	Any process that initiates the activity of the inactive enzyme protein kinase C.
0	2	0	TRAPPII protein complex	A complex that mediates intra-Golgi traffic, Golgi exit, endosome-to-Golgi traffic, and the trafficking of autophagy proteins from Golgi to the phagophore assembly site. Binds to a component of the COPI coat. In yeast it includes the following subunits: Bet3 (as homodimer), Bet5, Tca17, Trs20, Trs23, Trs31, Trs33, Trs65, Trs120, Trs130. The whole complex is thought to dimerize with itself.
1	0	0	TRAPPIII protein complex	A complex that functions in anterograde transport at the Golgi and also regulates autophagy. In yeast it includes at least the following subunits: Bet3 (as homodimer), Bet5, Trs20, Trs23, Trs31, Trs33, Trs85. TRAPPIII may include further, as yet undescribed, proteins.
1	0	2	polyuridylation-dependent mRNA catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a messenger RNA (mRNA) molecule, initiated by the enzymatic addition of a sequence of uridylyl residues (polyuridylation) at the 3' end of the target mRNA.
1	0	0	periciliary membrane compartment	A plasma membrane region adjacent to the base of eukaryotic cilia and flagella that is enriched in endocytosis-associated proteins and vesicles and that appears to regulate ciliary membrane homeostasis.
1	0	0	lens fiber cell apoptotic process	Any apoptotic process in a lens fiber cell. Lens fiber cells are elongated, tightly packed cells that make up the bulk of the mature lens in a camera-type eye.
1	8	13	cellular response to nerve growth factor stimulus	A process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a nerve growth factor stimulus.
0	0	1	protein linear deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a linear polymer of ubiquitin, formed by the amino-terminal methionine (M1) of one ubiquitin molecule and by the carboxy-terminal glycine (G76) of the next, is removed from a protein.
2	1	1	spermatoproteasome complex	A proteasome specifically found in mammalian testis. Contains the proteasome activator PA200 in the regulatory particle, and beta1i, beta2i, beta5i and/or alpha4s in the core (20S) subunit. Beta1i, beta2i and beta5i are inducible catalytic subunits, closely related to beta1, beta2 and beta5. Alpha4s is a sperm-specific 20S subunit, but unlike other alternative 20S subunits alpha4s lies in the outer alpha-ring and lacks catalytic activity.
1	1	0	RQC complex	A multiprotein complex that forms a stable complex with large ribosomal subunits (60S in eukaryotes and 50S in prokaryotes) containing stalled polypeptides and triggers their degradation (ribosomal quality control). In budding yeast, this complex includes Cdc48p, Rkr1p, Tae2p, Rqc1p, Npl4p and Ufd1p proteins.
0	1	0	ribosome-associated ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the breakdown of a protein or peptide encoded by an aberrant message and associated with a stalled ribosome. Degradation is initiated by the covalent attachment of a ubiquitin group, or multiple ubiquitin groups, to the ribosome-associated protein.
1	0	2	messenger ribonucleoprotein complex assembly	The aggregation, arrangement and bonding together of proteins and messenger RNA (mRNA) molecules to form a messenger ribonucleoprotein (mRNP) complex.
2	0	3	messenger ribonucleoprotein complex	A ribonucleoprotein complex containing both protein and messenger RNA (mRNA) molecules.
0	1	0	GATOR1 complex	A protein complex involved in regulation of non-nitrogen-starvation (NNS) autophagic process. In S. cerevisiae this complex contains Iml1p, Npr2p and Npr3p proteins. In humans the GATOR1 complex consists of DEPDC5, Nprl2, Nprl3.
0	2	0	Gtr1-Gtr2 GTPase complex	A heterodimer GTPase complex. In S. cerevisiae, this complex contains Gtr1p and Gtr2p proteins.
1	0	0	epithelial cell apoptotic process involved in palatal shelf morphogenesis	An apoptotic process in a palatal shelf epithelial cell that contributes to the shaping of the palatal shelf.
6	4	3	neuron projection extension	Long distance growth of a single neuron projection involved in cellular development. A neuron projection is a prolongation or process extending from a nerve cell, e.g. an axon or dendrite.
0	1	1	intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in response to hypoxia	A series of molecular signals in which an intracellular signal is conveyed to trigger the apoptotic death of a cell. The pathway is induced in response to hypoxia (lowered oxygen tension). Hypoxia, defined as a decline in O2 levels below normoxic levels of 20.8 - 20.95%, results in metabolic adaptation at both the cellular and organismal level. The pathway ends when the execution phase of apoptosis is triggered.
1	0	0	maintenance of translational fidelity	Suppression of the occurrence of translational errors, such as codon-anticodon mis-paring, during the process of translation of a protein using an mRNA template.
1	0	0	single-strand break-containing DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with damaged DNA containing single-strand breaks (SSBs).
2	0	0	protein localization to site of double-strand break	Any process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained at, a region of a chromosome at which a DNA double-strand break has occurred.
1	0	0	protein K27-linked deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a K27-linked ubiquitin chain, i.e. a polymer of ubiquitin formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 27 of the ubiquitin monomers, is removed from a protein.
0	1	0	protein K33-linked deubiquitination	A protein deubiquitination process in which a K33-linked ubiquitin chain, i.e. a polymer of ubiquitin formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 33 of the ubiquitin monomers, is removed from a protein.
1	0	0	protein localization to nucleoplasm	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, a location within the nucleoplasm.
0	1	0	phosphodiesterase decapping endonuclease activity	Catalysis of the removal of the cap from an unmethylated 5'-end capped RNA resulting in the release of the entire cap structure (GpppN) and a 5' monophosphorylated RNA.
1	0	0	EH domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an EH domain of a protein. The EH stand for Eps15 homology. This was originally identified as a motif present in three copies at the NH2-termini of Eps15 and of the related molecule Eps15R.
0	0	1	mitochondrial tRNA 3'-end processing	The process in which the 3' end of a pre-tRNA molecule is converted to that of a mature tRNA in the mitochondrion.
0	3	0	exosomal secretion	The process whereby a membrane-bounded vesicle is released into the extracellular region by fusion of the limiting endosomal membrane of a multivesicular body with the plasma membrane.
0	2	0	amino acid transport complex	A heteromeric protein complex consisting of a multi-transmembrane spanning subunit (the light chain) and a type II glycoprotein subunit (the heavy chain) that functions to transport amino acids across a plasma membrane.
1	1	0	peptide-serine-N-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + N-terminal L-serine in peptide = CoA + N-acetyl-L-serine-peptide.
1	1	0	peptide-glutamate-N-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + N-terminal L-glutamate in peptide = CoA + N-acetyl-L-glutamate-peptide.
3	0	5	histone methyltransferase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone methyltransferase enzyme.
1	1	3	steroid hormone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a steroid hormone.
0	0	1	histone kinase activity (H2A-T120 specific)	Catalysis of the transfer of a phosphate group to the threonine-120 residue of histone H2A.
0	0	1	histone H2A-T120 phosphorylation	The modification of histone H2A by the addition of a phosphate group to a threonine residue at position 120 of the histone.
2	2	3	N6-methyladenosine-containing RNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an RNA molecule modified by N6-methyladenosine (m6A), a modification present at internal sites of mRNAs and some non-coding RNAs.
0	1	0	regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to DNA damage	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of DNA damage.
2	4	0	cellular response to leucine starvation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of deprivation of leucine.
1	1	4	keratin filament binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a keratin filament, an intermediate filament composed of acidic and basic keratins (types I and II), typically expressed in epithelial cells.
1	0	0	signal clustering	Grouping of multiple copies of a signal at a cellular location. May promote receptor clustering and alter the signal transduction response.
1	0	2	histone glutamine methylation	The modification of a histone by addition of a methyl group to an glutamine residue.
1	0	1	histone-glutamine methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: S-adenosyl-L-methionine + (histone)-glutamine = S-adenosyl-L-homocysteine + (histone)-N5-methyl-glutamine.
0	1	0	peptidyl-tyrosine dephosphorylation involved in inactivation of protein kinase activity	Any peptidyl-tyrosine dephosphorylation that is involved in inactivation of protein kinase activity.
2	1	1	neutrophil migration	The movement of a neutrophil within or between different tissues and organs of the body.
0	1	0	response to transition metal nanoparticle	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a transition metal nanoparticle.
0	1	0	response to gold nanoparticle	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a gold nanoparticle stimulus.
0	2	3	RNA polymerase II C-terminal domain phosphoserine binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with phosphorylated serine residues in the C-terminal domain of RNA polymerase II.
0	0	1	RNA 5'-methyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the transfer of a methyl group from S-adenosyl-L-methionine to the 5'-gamma-phosphate in an RNA molecule.
0	0	1	RNA localization to chromatin	A process in which RNA is transported to and maintained in a part of a chromosome that is organized into chromatin.
0	1	0	bub1-bub3 complex	Protein complex that associates with the kinetochores.
0	2	3	cellular response to insulin-like growth factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an insulin-like growth factor stimulus.
0	1	2	Atg1/ULK1 kinase complex	A protein complex consisting of Atg1 (or Atg1 homologs e.g. ULK1, ULK2 in mammals) and Atg13 along with other proteins that regulate its function (e.g. Atg17 in yeast or RB1CC1(FIP200) in mammals). This complex has serine/threonine protein kinase activity and is involved in autophagosome formation.
1	0	2	terminal web	An actin-rich cytoskeletal network located beneath the microvilli of the apical plasma membrane of polarized epithelial cells. In addition to actin filaments, the terminal web may contain actin-binding proteins, myosin motor proteins, and intermediate filaments. The terminal web can function as a contractile structure that influences the spatial distribution of microvilli as well as the development and morphogenesis of tissues containing polarized epithelial cells.
2	0	0	lipid transport across blood-brain barrier	The directed movement of lipid molecules passing through the blood-brain barrier.
5	2	2	Lys48-specific deubiquitinase activity	Hydrolysis of Lys48-linked ubiquitin unit(s) from a ubiquitinated protein.
3	1	3	ubiquitin-specific protease binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a ubiquitin-specific protease.
1	1	0	hyaloid vascular plexus regression	The developmental process in which the hyaloid vascular plexus is destroyed as a part of its normal progression.
0	0	1	meiotic spindle midzone	The area in the center of the meiotic spindle where the spindle microtubules from opposite poles overlap.
0	1	0	mitotic cleavage furrow ingression	Advancement of the mitotic cleavage furrow from the outside of the cell inward towards the center of the cell. The cleavage furrow acts as a 'purse string' which draws tight to separate daughter cells during mitotic cytokinesis and partition the cytoplasm between the two daughter cells. The furrow ingresses until a cytoplasmic bridge is formed.
1	1	3	DNA repair complex	A protein complex involved in DNA repair processes including direct reversal, base excision repair, nucleotide excision repair, photoreactivation, bypass, double-strand break repair pathway, and mismatch repair pathway.
1	0	0	3M complex	A protein complex, at least composed of CUL7, CCDC8 and OBSL1, that is required for maintaining microtubule and genome integrity.
1	3	2	embryonic brain development	The process occurring during the embryonic phase whose specific outcome is the progression of the brain over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
5	2	0	protein ADP-ribosylase activity	The transfer, from NAD, of ADP-ribose to a protein amino acid residue.
0	3	2	protein antigen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein antigen.
1	2	2	replication-born double-strand break repair via sister chromatid exchange	The repair of a replication-born double-strand DNA break in which the DNA molecule is repaired using the homologous sequence of the sister chromatid which serves as a template to repair the breaks.
1	2	3	cellular response to brain-derived neurotrophic factor stimulus	A process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a brain-derived neurotrophic factor stimulus.
0	0	1	response to insulin-like growth factor stimulus	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an insulin-like growth factor stimulus.
0	1	0	glyoxalase (glycolic acid-forming) activity	Catalysis of the reaction: glyoxal + H2O = glycolic acid. Catalysis occurs in the absence of a cofactor.
1	0	0	ryanodine receptor complex	A voltage-gated calcium-release channel complex of the sarcoplasmic or endoplasmic reticulum. It plays an important role in the excitation-contraction (E-C) coupling of muscle cells. RyR comprises a family of ryanodine receptors, widely expressed throughout the animal kingdom.
1	0	0	mitotic recombination-dependent replication fork processing	Replication fork processing that includes recombination between DNA near the arrested fork and homologous sequences. Proteins involved in homologous recombination are required for replication restart.
1	0	2	miRNA transport	The directed movement of microRNA (miRNA) into, out of or within a cell, or between cells, or within a multicellular organism by means of some agent such as a transporter or pore.
0	1	0	peroxisomal importomer complex	A protein complex responsible for transporting proteins into the peroxisomal matrix. An example of this complex is Pex14 found in S. cerevisae which has 9 core components and 12 transient interaction partners.
0	2	0	extracellular matrix protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a protein that is part of an extracellular matrix.
1	0	0	upper tip-link density	An electron-dense plaque at the upper end of a stereocilia tip link that provides the anchor in the stereocilia membrane on the side of the stereocilium where the tip link ends.
0	0	1	U6 2'-O-snRNA methylation	The posttranscriptional addition a methyl group to the 2'-oxygen atom of a nucleotide residue in an U6 snRNA molecule.
1	0	0	MAP kinase serine/threonine phosphatase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: MAP kinase threonine phosphate + H2O = MAP kinase threonine + phosphate and MAP kinase serine phosphate + H2O = MAP kinase serine + phosphate.
0	1	1	positive regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to endoplasmic reticulum stress	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of an endoplasmic reticulum stress.
0	1	2	negative regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter in response to endoplasmic reticulum stress	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transcription from an RNA polymerase II promoter as a result of an endoplasmic reticulum stress.
0	0	1	peptidyl-threonine autophosphorylation	The phosphorylation by a protein of one or more of its own threonine amino acid residues, or a threonine residue on an identical protein.
1	0	0	F-box domain binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an F-box domain of a protein.
1	0	0	U1 snRNP binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any part of a U1 small nuclear ribonucleoprotein particle.
0	0	1	exon-exon junction complex binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with an exon-exon junction complex, a protein complex deposited by the spliceosome upstream of messenger RNA exon-exon junctions. The exon-exon junction complex provides a binding platform for factors involved in mRNA export and nonsense-mediated mRNA decay.
0	0	1	linear polyubiquitin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a linear polymer of ubiquitin. Linear ubiquitin polymers are formed by linking the amino-terminal methionine (M1) of one ubiquitin molecule to the carboxy-terminal glycine (G76) of the next.
2	2	2	mitochondrion-endoplasmic reticulum membrane tethering	The attachment of a mitochondrion and an endoplasmic reticulum via molecular tethers that physically bridge their respective membranes and attach them to each other. The tethering may facilitate exchange of metabolites between the organelles.
0	3	3	transferrin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the transferrin receptor.
0	1	2	leptin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the leptin receptor.
0	1	0	response to ultrasound	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an ultrasonic stimulus.
2	0	1	mRNA pseudouridine synthesis	The intramolecular conversion of uridine to pseudouridine in an mRNA molecule.
2	1	3	mitotic spindle microtubule	Any microtubule that is part of a mitotic spindle; anchored at one spindle pole.
0	0	1	dense core granule maturation	Steps required to transform a dense core granule generated at the trans-Golgi network into a fully formed and transmissible dense core granule. Dense core granule maturation proceeds through clathrin-mediated membrane remodeling events and is essential for efficient processing of cargo within dense core granules as well as for removing factors that might otherwise interfere with dense core granule trafficking and exocytosis.
1	1	0	dense core granule exocytosis	The secretion of molecules (e.g. neuropeptides, insulin-related peptides or neuromodulators such as serotonin and dopamine) contained within a membrane-bounced dense core granule by fusion of the granule with the plasma membrane of a cell in response to increased cytosolic calcium levels.
1	0	0	CLOCK-BMAL transcription complex	Transcription factor complex which interacts with E-box regulatory elements in target genes, including Period (Per1, Per2, Per3) and Cryptochrome (Cry1, Cry2), to activate their transcription during the daytime. The CRY-PER complexes inhibit CLOCK-BMAL1-driven transcription in a negative feedback loop to generate circadian rhythms.
0	1	0	single-stranded 3'-5' DNA helicase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate, in the presence of single-stranded DNA; drives the unwinding of the DNA helix in the direction 3' to 5'.
0	1	0	bone regeneration	The regrowth of bone following its loss or destruction.
0	1	2	phospholipid-translocating ATPase complex	A protein complex that functions as a phospholipid-translocating P-Type ATPase.
1	1	3	neuron projection maintenance	The organization process that preserves a neuron projection in a stable functional or structural state. A neuron projection is a prolongation or process extending from a nerve cell, e.g. an axon or dendrite.
0	1	0	mitochondrial transmembrane transport	The process in which a solute is transported from one side of a membrane to the other into, out of or within a mitochondrion.
0	0	4	mitochondrial ATP transmembrane transport	The process in which ATP is transported across a mitochondrial membrane, into or out of the mitochondrion.
1	0	0	mitochondrial phosphate ion transmembrane transport	The process in which a phosphate ion is transported across a mitochondrial membrane, into or out of the mitochondrion.
0	0	1	HSP90-CDC37 chaperone complex	A protein kinase chaperone complex required for the proper folding, maturation and stabilization of target proteins (mostly signalling protein kinases, some steroid hormone receptors), usually during or immediately after completion of translation. The highly conserved, phosphorylated CDC37-Ser13 (vertebrates) or cdc37-Ser14 (yeast) is essential for complex assembly and target protein binding. CDC37-Ser13 (Ser14) is phosphorylated by Casein kinase II (CK2), which in turn is a target of CDC37 creating a positive feedback loop. Complex binding also prevents rapid ubiquitin-dependent proteosomal degradation of target proteins.
2	2	8	potassium ion import across plasma membrane	The directed movement of potassium ions from outside of a cell, across the plasma membrane and into the cytosol.
0	1	0	perinuclear endoplasmic reticulum membrane	The membrane of the perinuclear endoplasmic reticulum, which is the portion of endoplasmic reticulum, the intracellular network of tubules and cisternae, that occurs near the nucleus.
0	1	0	phospholipase D activator activity	Increases the activity of the enzyme phospholipase D.
0	0	1	ATF4-CREB1 transcription factor complex	Transcription factor complex consisting of ATF4 and CREB1 subunits that is capable of binding to cAMP response element (CRE) (consensus: 5'-GTGACGT[AC][AG]-3') as part of the positive regulation of transcription. Regulatory targets include the GRP78 (HSPA5) promoter in humans, whose activation by this complex is part of the ER stress response pathway.
2	1	0	protein K69-linked ufmylation	A protein ufmylation process in which a polymer of the ubiquitin-like protein UFM1 is formed by linkages between lysine residues at position 69 of the UFM1 monomers, is added to a protein.
1	0	0	AIP1-IRE1 complex	A protein complex consisting of IRE1 (inositol-requiring enzyme-1) bound to AIP1 (ASK1-interacting protein 1/DAB2-interacting protein).
0	0	1	3' overhang single-stranded DNA endodeoxyribonuclease activity	Catalysis of the hydrolysis of ester linkages within 3' overhang single-stranded deoxyribonucleic acid by creating internal breaks.
0	1	0	IRE1-TRAF2-ASK1 complex	A protein complex of the endoplasmic reticulum membrane that consists of IRE1 (Inositol-requiring enzyme-1), TRAF2 (TNF receptor-associated factor 2) and ASK1 (Apoptosis signal-regulating kinase 1, a MAP3K).
0	0	1	IRE1-RACK1-PP2A complex	A protein complex consisting of IRE1 (Inositol-requiring enzyme-1), RACK1 (Receptor of activated protein kinase C 1, GNB2L1) and PP2A (protein phosphatase 2A). RACK1 acts as an adaptor to bridge an interaction between IRE1 and PP2A.
1	0	3	proximal dendrite	The dendrite of the dendritic tree that is closest to the neuronal cell body (the soma).
0	1	0	response to prolactin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a prolactin stimulus. The anterior pituitary hormone prolactin has a number of roles including being essential for lactation.
0	1	0	cellular response to prolactin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a prolactin stimulus.
0	1	1	AnxA2-p11 complex	A heterotetrameric protein complex comprising two Annexin A2 (AnxA2) monomers and two copies of its binding partner, S100 protein p11 (S100A10).
1	0	0	PCSK9-LDLR complex	A protein complex consisting of the serine protease PCSK9 (Proprotein convertase subtilisin/kexin-9) and a low-density lipoprotein receptor (LDLR). Interaction typically occurs through the epidermal growth factor-like repeat A (EGF-A) domain of the LDLR, and complex formation promotes degradation of the LDLR through the endosome/lysosome pathway.
0	0	1	PCSK9-AnxA2 complex	A protein complex consisting of the serine protease PCSK9 (Proprotein convertase subtilisin/kexin-9) and Annexin A2 (AnxA2).
1	1	2	vesicle fusion with endoplasmic reticulum-Golgi intermediate compartment (ERGIC) membrane	The joining of the lipid bilayer membrane around a vesicle to the lipid bilayer membrane of the ERGIC. This can involve anterograde or retrograde transport vesicles.
0	1	0	Golgi medial cisterna membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding any of the thin, flattened compartments that form the medial portion of the Golgi complex.
0	1	0	Golgi trans cisterna membrane	The lipid bilayer surrounding any of the thin, flattened compartments that form the trans portion of the Golgi complex.
0	1	0	histone H4-K16 deacetylation	The modification of histone H4 by the removal of an acetyl group from lysine at position 16 of the histone.
0	0	1	CSF1-CSF1R complex	A protein complex consisting of a macrophage colony-stimulating factor (CSF1, also called M-CSF) dimer bound to a dimerized receptor (CSF1R, also called FMS). Receptor dimerization requires the presence of the ligand.
0	0	1	DNA double-strand break attachment to nuclear envelope	A process in which the DNA double-strand breaks are attached to the inner surface of the nuclear envelope proximal to the spindle pole body, or iMTOCs.
0	1	0	cholangiocyte proliferation	The multiplication or reproduction of cholangiocytes, resulting in the expansion of the cholangiocyte population. A cholangiocyte is an epithelial cell that is part of the bile duct. Cholangiocytes contribute to bile secretion via net release of bicarbonate and water.
1	0	0	conditioned place preference	The associative learning process by which an animal learns and remembers an association between a neutral, unchanging environment and a putatively rewarding, internal state produced by a xenobiotic or drug.
0	1	0	presynaptic active zone organization	A process that results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of a presynaptic active zone.
0	0	2	HFE-transferrin receptor complex	A protein complex containing at least HFE and a transferrin receptor (either TFR1/TFRC or TFR2), proposed to play a role in the sensing of transferrin-bound Fe (Fe2-Tf) on the plasma membrane to regulate hepcidin transcription.
0	1	0	mRNA CDS binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with the coding sequence (CDS) of an mRNA molecule.
0	0	1	cytoplasmic periphery of the nuclear pore complex	Cytoplasm situated in close proximity to a nuclear pore complex.
0	0	2	VCP-NSFL1C complex	A protein complex between the ATPase VCP (p97) and its cofactor p47 (NSFL1C). In human, the protein complex consists of one homotrimer of NSFL1C/p47 per homohexamer of VCP/p97.
0	0	1	UV-damage excision repair, DNA incision	A process that results in the endonucleolytic cleavage of the damaged strand of DNA immediately 5' of a UV-induced damage site, and is the first part of a DNA repair process that acts on both cyclobutane pyrimidine dimers (CPDs) and pyrimidine-pyrimidone 6-4 photoproducts (6-4PPs).
1	0	0	microvesicle	An extracellular vesicle released from the plasma membrane and ranging in size from about 100 nm to 1000 nm.
0	1	0	protein sialylation	A protein modification process that results in the addition of a sialic acid unit to the end of an oligosaccharide chain in a glycoprotein.
1	0	0	primary miRNA methylation	The posttranscriptional addition of methyl groups to specific residues in an primary miRNA molecule.
1	1	2	EARP complex	A quatrefoil tethering complex required for endocytic recycling.
1	0	1	microtubule end	Any end of a microtubule. Microtubule ends differ in that the so-called microtubule plus-end is the one that preferentially grows by polymerization, with respect to the minus-end.
0	1	0	mitotic spindle microtubule depolymerization	The removal of tubulin heterodimers from one or both ends of a microtubule that is part of the mitotic spindle.
0	1	1	ubiquitin ligase-substrate adaptor activity	The binding activity of a molecule that brings together a ubiquitin ligase and its substrate. Usually mediated by F-box BTB/POZ domain proteins.
0	1	0	ubiquitin ligase activator activity	Binds to and increases the activity of a ubiquitin ligase.
1	0	0	osmolarity-sensing cation channel activity	Enables the transmembrane transfer of a cation by a channel that opens when a change in the osmolarity occurs in the extracellular space of the cell in which the cation channel resides.
0	0	1	growth cone lamellipodium	A thin sheetlike process extended by the leading edge of an axonal or dendritic growth cone; contains a dense meshwork of actin filaments.
1	1	1	arrestin family protein binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any member of the arrestin family, proteins involved in agonist-mediated desensitization of G protein-coupled receptors.
0	0	1	proximal neuron projection	The portion of an axon or dendrite that is close to the neuronal cell body.
0	1	0	clathrin-dependent extracellular exosome endocytosis	The clathrin-mediated endocytosis of an extracellular exosome.
0	1	2	response to angiotensin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an angiotensin stimulus. Angiotensin is any of three physiologically active peptides (angiotensin II, III, or IV) processed from angiotensinogen.
1	0	0	lipoprotein particle	A spherical particle containing non-covalently associated proteins and lipids. Examples are plasma lipoprotein particles which transport lipids in the blood or lymph.
0	1	1	protein localization to cell periphery	A process in which a protein is transported to, or maintained in, the cell periphery.
0	0	1	cytoplasmic side of dendritic spine plasma membrane	The leaflet of the plasma membrane that faces the cytoplasm and any proteins embedded or anchored in it or attached to its surface surrounding a dendritic spine.
5	3	7	protein tyrosine kinase binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with protein tyrosine kinase.
2	0	0	response to water-immersion restraint stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of water immersion while being held immobile.
1	0	0	negative regulation of hh target transcription factor activity	Any process that decreases the activity of a transcription factor that activates transcription of Hedgehog-target genes in response to Smoothened signaling. In Drosophila, Cubitus interruptus (Ci) is the only identified transcription factor so far in the Hedgehog signaling pathway. In vertebrates members of the Gli protein family are activated by Hedgehog signaling.
0	0	1	dorsal root ganglion development	The process whose specific outcome is the progression of a dorsal root ganglion over time, from its formation to the mature structure.
1	0	0	pancreas regeneration	The regrowth of a destroyed pancreas.
0	1	1	endoplasmic reticulum tubular network membrane organization	A process that is carried out at the cellular level which results in the assembly, arrangement of constituent parts, or disassembly of the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) tubular network membrane.
1	0	0	MWP complex	A protein ternary complex that anchors microtubule minus ends to mitotic spindle pole bodies. The founding complex contains a microtubule anchoring protein (Msd1 in fission yeast), A WD-repeat Wdr8 family protein and and a minus end-directed kinesin.
0	1	0	growth cone filopodium	A thin, stiff protrusion extended by the leading edge of an axonal or dendritic growth cone.
0	0	1	DNA/DNA annealing activity	A nucleic acid binding activity that brings together complementary sequences of ssDNA so that they pair by hydrogen bonds to form a double-stranded DNA.
1	0	0	RNA adenylyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the template-independent extension of the 3'- end of an RNA strand by addition of one adenosine molecule at a time. Cannot initiate a chain 'de novo'. The primer, depending on the source of the enzyme, may be an RNA, or oligo(A) bearing a 3'-OH terminal group.
2	2	2	sequence-specific mRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with messenger RNA (mRNA) of a specific nucleotide composition or a specific sequence motif.
0	0	1	hepatocyte dedifferentiation	The process in which a hepatocyte (specialized epithelial cell of the liver) loses the structural or functional features that characterize it in the mature organism, or some other relatively stable phase of the organism's life history. Under certain conditions, these cells can revert back to the features of the stem cells that were their ancestors.
0	0	1	C-rich single-stranded DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with C-rich, single-stranded DNA.
10	9	8	cellular response to leukemia inhibitory factor	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a leukemia inhibitory factor stimulus.
0	0	1	slow axonal transport	The directed slow movement of non-membranous molecules in nerve cell axons. It is comprised of a Slow Component a (SCa) and a Slow Component b (SCb) which differ in transport rates and protein composition.
0	0	1	clathrin-uncoating ATPase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: ATP + H2O = ADP + phosphate. Catalysis of the removal of clathrin from vesicle membranes, coupled to the hydrolysis of ATP.
1	0	1	response to odorant	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an odorant stimulus. An odorant is any substance capable of stimulating the sense of smell.
59	44	16	sequence-specific double-stranded DNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with double-stranded DNA of a specific nucleotide composition, e.g. GC-rich DNA binding, or with a specific sequence motif or type of DNA, e.g. promotor binding or rDNA binding.
1	0	0	poly(U)-specific exoribonuclease activity, producing 3' uridine cyclic phosphate ends	Catalysis of 3' exonucleolytic cleavage of poly(U), to form poly(U)-N containing a 3' uridine cyclic phosphate (U>P).
1	0	0	response to endothelin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an endothelin stimulus. Endothelin is any of three secretory vasoconstrictive peptides (endothelin-1, -2, -3).
3	11	19	promoter-specific chromatin binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a section of chromatin that is associated with gene promoter sequences of DNA.
1	0	3	adaptive thermogenesis	The regulated production of heat in response to short term environmental changes, such as stress, diet or reduced temperature.
0	0	1	cellular response to endothelin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of an endothelin stimulus. Endothelin is any of three secretory vasoconstrictive peptides (endothelin-1, -2, -3).
1	0	0	response to growth hormone-releasing hormone	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a growth hormone-releasing hormone stimulus. Growth hormone-releasing hormone regulates the release of growth hormone, as well as some pancreatic proteins, and possibly other proteins.
2	4	4	cellular response to chemokine	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a chemokine stimulus.
0	0	1	cytoplasmic side of nuclear pore	The side of the nuclear pore complex (NPC) that faces the cytoplasm.
1	0	0	cellular response to gastrin	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a gastrin stimulus.
1	0	0	rRNA cytidine N-acetyltransferase activity	Catalysis of the reaction: acetyl-CoA + cytidine = CoA + N4-acetylcytidine. The cytidine is within the polynucleotide chain of an rRNA.
0	0	2	H4K20me3 modified histone binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a histone H4 in which the lysine residue at position 20 has been modified by trimethylation.
0	0	1	netrin receptor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with a netrin receptor.
16	27	59	ribonucleoprotein complex	A macromolecular complex containing both protein and RNA molecules.
3	4	3	beta-catenin-TCF complex	A protein complex that contains beta-catenin and a member of the T-cell factor (TCF)/lymphoid enhancer binding factor (LEF) family of transcription factors.
0	1	3	Wnt signalosome	A multiprotein protein complex containing membrane-localized Wnt receptors and cytosolic protein complexes, which is capable of transmitting the Wnt signal. Contains at least a Wnt protein, LRP5 or LRP6, a member of the Frizzled (Fz) family, Axin and and a Dishevelled (DVL) protein.
0	0	2	response to hypobaric hypoxia	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of a stimulus indicating lowered oxygen tension combined with low atmospheric pressure. Hypoxia is defined as a decline in O2 levels below normoxic levels of 20.8 - 20.95% and hypobaric is defined as atmospheric pressure below 0.74 atm (greater than 2,500 m above sea level).
0	0	2	response to psychosocial stress	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of exposure to aversive or demanding psychological and social conditions that tax or exceed the behavioral resources of the organism.
0	0	1	sperm head plasma membrane	The plasma membrane that is part of the head section of a sperm cell.
0	0	1	ooplasm	The cytoplasm of an ovum.
1	2	0	double-strand break repair involved in meiotic recombination	The repair of double-strand breaks in DNA via homologous and nonhomologous mechanisms to reform a continuous DNA helix that contributes to reciprocal meiotic recombination.
0	0	1	short-term synaptic potentiation	The process by which synaptic transmission, induced by the arrival of a spike (action potential) at a synapse, acts to increase the amount of neurotransmitter released in response to the arrival of subsequent spikes.  This effect is seen when a train of closely space spikes arrives at a synapse with a low initial release probability.  It occurs in a timeframe of tens to hundreds of milliseconds.
0	0	1	calcium ion regulated lysosome exocytosis	The process of secretion by a cell that results in the release of intracellular molecules contained within a lysosome by fusion of the vesicle with the plasma membrane of a cell, induced by a rise in cytosolic calcium-ion levels.
0	0	3	response to amino acid starvation	Any process that results in a change in state or activity of a cell or an organism (in terms of movement, secretion, enzyme production, gene expression, etc.) as a result of deprivation of amino acids.
0	0	1	RNA N6-methyladenosine dioxygenase activity	Catalysis of the oxidative demethylation of N6-methyladenosine RNA, with concomitant decarboxylation of 2-oxoglutarate and releases oxidized methyl group on N6-methyladenosine as formaldehyde.
0	0	1	5.8S rRNA binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with 5.8S ribosomal RNA, a eukaryotic ribosomal RNA which forms a complex with 28S RNA.
0	0	1	splicing factor binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with any protein involved in the process of removing sections of the primary RNA transcript to form the mature form of the RNA.
5	7	1	ATP-dependent microtubule motor activity	Catalysis of movement along a microtubule, coupled to the hydrolysis of ATP.
1	3	0	ubiquitin ligase inhibitor activity	Stops, prevents or reduces the activity of a ubiquitin ligase.
0	0	1	intramanchette transport	The movement of vesicles and protein complexes carried out by molecular motors, kinesins and dynein, along the microtubule tracks within the manchette and by myosin along actin filaments.
2	1	1	xenobiotic detoxification by transmembrane export across the plasma membrane	A process that reduces or removes the toxicity of a xenobiotic by exporting it outside the cell.
1	1	0	xenobiotic transport across blood-brain barrier	The directed movement of a xenobiotic through the blood-brain barrier.
1	3	0	ATP generation from poly-ADP-D-ribose	The process of generating ATP in the nucleus from poly-ADP-D-ribose. Nuclear ATP generation is required for extensive chromatin remodeling events that are energy-consuming.
0	0	1	modulation by host of RNA binding by virus	A process in which a host organism modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a viral gene product binding to RNA.
0	0	1	modulation by host of viral RNA-binding transcription factor activity	A process in which a host organism modulates the frequency, rate or extent of the activity of a viral RNA-binding transcription factor.
2	1	1	regulation of DNA damage checkpoint	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a DNA damage checkpoint.
1	2	2	negative regulation of DNA damage checkpoint	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a DNA damage checkpoint.
0	0	1	positive regulation of DNA damage checkpoint	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of a DNA damage checkpoint.
2	2	3	regulation of protein localization to cell surface	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to the cell surface.
1	1	4	negative regulation of protein localization to cell surface	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to the cell surface.
1	2	3	positive regulation of protein localization to cell surface	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein localization to the cell surface.
1	0	0	positive regulation of male gonad development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of male gonad development.
2	0	1	regulation of stem cell division	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell division.
3	2	3	regulation of stem cell population maintenance	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell population maintenance.
2	2	1	negative regulation of double-strand break repair via homologous recombination	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of double-strand break repair via homologous recombination.
3	5	0	regulation of G1/S transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any signalling pathway that modulates the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G1 phase to S phase of the mitotic cell cycle.
2	2	0	negative regulation of cell-cell adhesion mediated by cadherin	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell-cell adhesion mediated by cadherin.
4	1	2	positive regulation of cell-cell adhesion mediated by cadherin	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell-cell adhesion mediated by cadherin.
1	1	1	regulation of non-canonical Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of non-canonical Wnt signaling pathway.
0	1	0	negative regulation of non-canonical Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of non-canonical Wnt signaling pathway.
1	1	0	positive regulation of non-canonical Wnt signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of non-canonical Wnt-activated signaling pathway.
1	2	0	regulation of ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process.
3	4	2	negative regulation of ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process.
3	2	1	positive regulation of ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process.
1	1	0	negative regulation of cortisol biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cortisol biosynthetic process.
3	0	1	regulation of type B pancreatic cell development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of pancreatic B cell development.
0	0	2	negative regulation of type B pancreatic cell development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of pancreatic B cell development.
0	1	0	positive regulation of type B pancreatic cell development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of pancreatic B cell development.
1	0	0	regulation of Wnt signaling pathway, planar cell polarity pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Wnt signaling pathway, planar cell polarity pathway.
2	2	1	positive regulation of Wnt signaling pathway, planar cell polarity pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Wnt signaling pathway, planar cell polarity pathway.
1	0	0	regulation of smooth muscle cell-matrix adhesion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of smooth muscle cell-matrix adhesion.
0	1	0	negative regulation of DNA-dependent DNA replication	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA-dependent DNA replication.
1	0	0	positive regulation of DNA-dependent DNA replication	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA-dependent DNA replication.
1	1	0	negative regulation of leukocyte apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of leukocyte apoptotic process.
0	1	0	regulation of macrophage apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage apoptotic process.
0	2	0	positive regulation of macrophage apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage apoptotic process.
1	8	3	regulation of establishment of cell polarity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of establishment of cell polarity.
2	0	0	regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity.
0	1	1	negative regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity.
1	0	0	regulation of removal of superoxide radicals	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of removal of superoxide radicals.
0	0	1	regulation of endocannabinoid signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of endocannabinoid signaling pathway.
6	6	5	negative regulation of G1/S transition of mitotic cell cycle	Any signalling pathway that decreases or inhibits the activity of a cell cycle cyclin-dependent protein kinase to modulate the switch from G1 phase to S phase of the mitotic cell cycle.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cell proliferation involved in heart morphogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell proliferation involved in heart morphogenesis.
2	0	0	positive regulation of cell proliferation involved in heart morphogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell proliferation involved in heart morphogenesis.
2	1	2	positive regulation of DNA-templated transcription, initiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA-templated transcription initiation.
5	6	6	regulation of cell motility	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cell motility.
2	4	2	negative regulation of cell motility	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cell motility.
3	3	3	positive regulation of cell motility	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cell motility.
0	2	0	negative regulation of ubiquitin-specific protease activity	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin-specific protease (deubiquitinase) activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of ubiquitin-specific protease activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin-specific protease (deubiquitinase) activity.
1	0	0	regulation of planar cell polarity pathway involved in neural tube closure	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of planar cell polarity pathway involved in neural tube closure.
1	0	0	positive regulation of peptidyl-cysteine S-nitrosylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-cysteine S-nitrosylation.
1	1	1	negative regulation of dendrite development	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dendrite development.
0	0	2	regulation of branching morphogenesis of a nerve	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of branching morphogenesis of a nerve.
0	1	0	negative regulation of branching morphogenesis of a nerve	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of branching morphogenesis of a nerve.
1	2	0	regulation of neural precursor cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neural precursor cell proliferation.
2	2	0	negative regulation of neural precursor cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neural precursor cell proliferation.
0	3	4	positive regulation of neural precursor cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neural precursor cell proliferation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of ribosomal small subunit export from nucleus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ribosomal small subunit export from nucleus.
3	0	1	positive regulation of anoikis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of anoikis.
1	0	0	regulation of glutamate metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of glutamate metabolic process.
1	0	0	negative regulation of glutamate metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glutamate metabolic process.
1	0	0	regulation of testosterone biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of testosterone biosynthetic process.
1	0	0	negative regulation of pancreatic A cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of pancreatic A cell differentiation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of pancreatic stellate cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of pancreatic stellate cell proliferation.
0	2	0	regulation of rRNA processing	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of rRNA processing.
1	0	0	negative regulation of rRNA processing	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of rRNA processing.
2	3	1	positive regulation of rRNA processing	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of rRNA processing.
2	11	1	regulation of actin cytoskeleton reorganization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of actin cytoskeleton reorganization.
0	0	1	negative regulation of actin cytoskeleton reorganization	Any process that stops, prevents, or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of actin cytoskeleton reorganization.
1	5	3	positive regulation of actin cytoskeleton reorganization	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of actin cytoskeleton reorganization.
1	0	0	negative regulation of feeding behavior	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of feeding behavior.
0	0	1	positive regulation of feeding behavior	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of feeding behavior.
0	1	0	negative regulation of male germ cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of male germ cell proliferation.
0	0	1		
0	0	1	regulation of blood coagulation, intrinsic pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of blood coagulation, intrinsic pathway.
1	2	0	negative regulation of blood coagulation, intrinsic pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of blood coagulation, intrinsic pathway.
0	1	0	regulation of fibroblast apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of fibroblast apoptotic process.
0	1	2	negative regulation of fibroblast apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of fibroblast apoptotic process.
3	1	0	positive regulation of fibroblast apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of fibroblast apoptotic process.
3	0	0	negative regulation of signaling receptor activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of a signaling receptor activity.
1	3	2	positive regulation of signaling receptor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of signaling receptor activity.
1	0	0	regulation of oxidative phosphorylation uncoupler activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative phosphorylation uncoupler activity.
1	0	0	negative regulation of oxidative phosphorylation uncoupler activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative phosphorylation uncoupler activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of oxidative phosphorylation uncoupler activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of oxidative phosphorylation uncoupler activity.
0	1	0	regulation of DNA biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of DNA biosynthetic process.
2	2	2	negative regulation of DNA biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of DNA biosynthetic process.
1	0	1	receptor internalization involved in canonical Wnt signaling pathway	A receptor internalization process that contributes to canonical Wnt signaling pathway.
0	1	0	positive regulation of myoblast proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of myoblast proliferation.
1	0	1	regulation of myoblast proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of myoblast proliferation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of hydrogen peroxide catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hydrogen peroxide catabolic process.
0	1	1	regulation of Rho-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Rho-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity.
0	1	0	negative regulation of Rho-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Rho-dependent protein serine/threonine kinase activity.
5	1	15	regulation of synaptic vesicle exocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle exocytosis.
1	2	0	negative regulation of synaptic vesicle exocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle exocytosis.
0	0	1	positive regulation of synaptic vesicle exocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle exocytosis.
0	0	1	regulation of ceramide biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of a ceramide biosynthetic process.
1	0	4	positive regulation of ceramide biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ceramide biosynthetic process.
0	1	0	negative regulation of tumor necrosis factor (ligand) superfamily member 11 production	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of tumor necrosis factor (ligand) superfamily member 11 production.
1	0	0	positive regulation of tumor necrosis factor (ligand) superfamily member 11 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of tumor necrosis factor (ligand) superfamily member 11 production.
2	2	9	regulation of NMDA receptor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of N-methyl-D-aspartate selective glutamate receptor activity.
0	2	3	regulation of AMPA receptor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of AMPA selective glutamate receptor activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of T-helper 17 type immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 17 type immune response.
1	1	0	negative regulation of T-helper 17 cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 17 cell differentiation.
3	0	0	negative regulation of glucocorticoid receptor signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glucocorticoid receptor signaling pathway.
0	1	0	positive regulation of glucocorticoid receptor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glucocorticoid receptor signaling pathway.
0	0	1	regulation of terminal button organization	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of terminal button organization.
1	0	0	regulation of chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 2 production	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 2 production.
1	0	0	negative regulation of chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 2 production	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 2 production.
1	1	2	positive regulation of chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 2 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of chemokine (C-X-C motif) ligand 2 production.
0	0	1	positive regulation of acrosome reaction	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of the acrosome reaction.
1	0	0	regulation of hepatocyte proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of hepatocyte proliferation.
2	0	0	negative regulation of hepatocyte proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of hepatocyte proliferation.
0	1	2	positive regulation of hepatocyte proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hepatocyte proliferation.
0	2	0	regulation of CD40 signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of signaling via the CD40 signaling pathway.
0	1	0	negative regulation of CD40 signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of signaling via the CD40 signaling pathway.
5	3	6	negative regulation of endothelial cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell apoptotic process.
2	5	1	positive regulation of endothelial cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell apoptotic process.
0	2	0	positive regulation of prostaglandin-E synthase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of prostaglandin-E synthase activity.
0	0	1	regulation of acrosomal vesicle exocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of acrosomal vesicle exocytosis.
0	2	3	regulation of clathrin-dependent endocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of clathrin-mediated endocytosis.
1	1	1	positive regulation of clathrin-dependent endocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of clathrin-mediated endocytosis.
0	2	1	positive regulation of DNA topoisomerase (ATP-hydrolyzing) activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA topoisomerase (ATP-hydrolyzing) activity.
1	0	0	regulation of oxygen metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of oxygen metabolic process.
2	3	1	regulation of reactive oxygen species metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of reactive oxygen species metabolic process.
3	3	6	negative regulation of reactive oxygen species metabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of reactive oxygen species metabolic process.
7	10	0	positive regulation of reactive oxygen species metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of reactive oxygen species metabolic process.
0	2	0	negative regulation of mesoderm development	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mesoderm development.
0	1	0	positive regulation of ovarian follicle development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ovarian follicle development.
1	1	0	positive regulation of neutrophil extravasation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neutrophil extravasation.
0	1	1	regulation of lamellipodium morphogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of lamellipodium morphogenesis.
0	0	1	negative regulation of lamellipodium morphogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of lamellipodium morphogenesis.
1	2	2	positive regulation of lamellipodium morphogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of lamellipodium morphogenesis.
0	1	0	positive regulation of ubiquitin-dependent endocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ubiquitin-dependent endocytosis.
0	0	2	regulation of lymphocyte migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of lymphocyte migration.
0	2	1	negative regulation of lymphocyte migration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of lymphocyte migration.
0	1	2	regulation of T cell migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of T cell migration.
0	2	0	negative regulation of T cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T cell migration.
2	3	1	positive regulation of T cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T cell migration.
1	0	0	positive regulation of fibronectin-dependent thymocyte migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of fibronectin-dependent thymocyte migration.
1	0	0	positive regulation of eosinophil migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of eosinophil migration.
0	0	1	regulation of apoptotic cell clearance	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of apoptotic cell clearance.
0	0	1	negative regulation of apoptotic cell clearance	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of apoptotic cell clearance.
0	1	2	positive regulation of apoptotic cell clearance	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of apoptotic cell clearance.
0	1	0	regulation of cytokinesis, actomyosin contractile ring assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cytokinesis, actomyosin contractile ring assembly.
0	1	0	regulation of protein neddylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of protein neddylation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of protein neddylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of protein neddylation.
1	1	0	positive regulation of protein neddylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of protein neddylation.
0	0	1	negative regulation of monocyte extravasation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of monocyte extravasation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of macrophage migration inhibitory factor signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of macrophage migration inhibitory factor signaling pathway.
0	1	0	regulation of CD8-positive, alpha-beta cytotoxic T cell extravasation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of CD8-positive, alpha-beta cytotoxic T cell extravasation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of CD8-positive, alpha-beta cytotoxic T cell extravasation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CD8-positive, alpha-beta cytotoxic T cell extravasation.
2	3	7	positive regulation of excitatory postsynaptic potential	Any process that enhances the establishment or increases the extent of the excitatory postsynaptic potential (EPSP) which is a temporary increase in postsynaptic potential due to the flow of positively charged ions into the postsynaptic cell. The flow of ions that causes an EPSP is an excitatory postsynaptic current (EPSC) and makes it easier for the neuron to fire an action potential.
0	0	2	negative regulation of glycogen (starch) synthase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of glycogen (starch) synthase activity.
1	0	1	positive regulation of glycogen (starch) synthase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glycogen (starch) synthase activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of hematopoietic stem cell migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hematopoietic stem cell migration.
0	0	2	regulation of opioid receptor signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of opioid receptor signaling pathway.
1	0	0	positive regulation of metanephric glomerular visceral epithelial cell development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of metanephric glomerular visceral epithelial cell development.
0	0	1	regulation of cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity.
1	2	2	negative regulation of cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity.
1	1	2	positive regulation of cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity.
0	0	1	positive regulation of hepatic stellate cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of hepatic stellate cell activation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of blood vessel remodeling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of blood vessel remodeling.
1	0	2	positive regulation of dendritic cell chemotaxis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic cell chemotaxis.
0	1	1	positive regulation of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation.
1	1	0	negative regulation of immunological synapse formation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of immunological synapse formation.
2	0	0	negative regulation of T cell costimulation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T cell costimulation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of renal albumin absorption	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of renal albumin absorption.
0	2	1	regulation of entry of bacterium into host cell	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of entry of bacterium into host cell.
0	1	1	negative regulation of entry of bacterium into host cell	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of entry of bacterium into host cell.
0	1	0	positive regulation of B cell chemotaxis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of B cell chemotaxis.
0	0	1	positive regulation of gastrulation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of gastrulation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of endothelial cell chemotaxis to fibroblast growth factor	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell chemotaxis to fibroblast growth factor.
1	0	0	negative regulation of T-helper 2 cell cytokine production	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 2 cell cytokine production.
2	2	0	positive regulation of T-helper 2 cell cytokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 2 cell cytokine production.
1	0	0	positive regulation of T-helper 1 cell cytokine production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 1 cell cytokine production.
0	0	1	positive regulation of CD24 production	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CD24 biosynthetic process.
2	0	0	negative regulation of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation.
1	1	0	positive regulation of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CD4-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation.
1	0	0	regulation of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation.
1	0	1	positive regulation of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell proliferation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of memory T cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of memory T cell activation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of T-helper 2 cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T-helper 2 cell activation.
1	5	1	positive regulation of DNA biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of DNA biosynthetic process.
0	1	0	regulation of microtubule motor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule motor activity.
0	0	1	negative regulation of microtubule motor activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule motor activity.
0	1	0	positive regulation of microtubule motor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of microtubule motor activity.
0	0	2	positive regulation of ATP-dependent microtubule motor activity, plus-end-directed	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ATP-dependent microtubule motor activity, plus-end-directed.
1	1	0	regulation of platelet-derived growth factor receptor-alpha signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of platelet-derived growth factor receptor-alpha signaling pathway.
1	0	0	negative regulation of platelet-derived growth factor receptor-alpha signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of platelet-derived growth factor receptor-alpha signaling pathway.
1	1	1	negative regulation of platelet-derived growth factor receptor-beta signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of platelet-derived growth factor receptor-beta signaling pathway.
1	1	0	positive regulation of platelet-derived growth factor receptor-beta signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of platelet-derived growth factor receptor-beta signaling pathway.
1	0	0	negative regulation of metanephric mesenchymal cell migration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of metanephric mesenchymal cell migration.
1	5	2	positive regulation of Arp2/3 complex-mediated actin nucleation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Arp2/3 complex-mediated actin nucleation.
1	0	0	regulation of thyroid hormone generation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of thyroid hormone generation.
0	1	1	regulation of histone H3-K9 acetylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K9 acetylation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of histone H3-K9 acetylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K9 acetylation.
1	1	1	positive regulation of histone H3-K9 acetylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K9 acetylation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of histone H4-K16 acetylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of histone H4-K16 acetylation.
0	2	0	positive regulation of histone H4-K16 acetylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone H4-K16 acetylation.
0	1	1	negative regulation of nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, nonsense-mediated decay	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of nuclear-transcribed mRNA catabolic process, nonsense-mediated decay.
0	1	0	positive regulation of miRNA catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of miRNA catabolic process.
1	2	0	regulation of miRNA metabolic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of miRNA metabolic process.
0	0	1	positive regulation of miRNA metabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of miRNA metabolic process.
1	1	0	negative regulation of primary miRNA processing	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of primary microRNA processing.
1	5	2	positive regulation of gene silencing by miRNA	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of gene silencing by miRNA.
0	1	4	regulation of early endosome to late endosome transport	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of early endosome to late endosome transport.
1	0	0	negative regulation of early endosome to late endosome transport	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of early endosome to late endosome transport.
2	0	4	positive regulation of early endosome to late endosome transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of early endosome to late endosome transport.
1	0	0	negative regulation of receptor catabolic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of receptor catabolic process.
0	2	0	positive regulation of receptor catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of receptor catabolic process.
1	2	0	negative regulation of stem cell proliferation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell proliferation.
0	1	5	positive regulation of stem cell proliferation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell proliferation.
1	3	3	regulation of sodium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of sodium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
0	3	4	negative regulation of sodium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of sodium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
1	2	2	positive regulation of sodium ion transmembrane transporter activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of sodium ion transmembrane transporter activity.
1	0	3	regulation of genetic imprinting	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of genetic imprinting.
0	1	0	negative regulation of cellular response to testosterone stimulus	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to testosterone stimulus.
0	0	1	negative regulation of apolipoprotein binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of apolipoprotein binding.
1	0	0	regulation of interleukin-1-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of interleukin-1-mediated signaling pathway.
0	2	0	negative regulation of interleukin-1-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of interleukin-1-mediated signaling pathway.
2	0	0	negative regulation of dendritic cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic cell apoptotic process.
0	0	2	positive regulation of dendritic cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic cell apoptotic process.
0	0	1	regulation of motor neuron apoptotic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of motor neuron apoptotic process.
0	0	1	negative regulation of motor neuron apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of motor neuron apoptotic process.
1	2	1	negative regulation of type B pancreatic cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of type B pancreatic cell apoptotic process.
0	1	0	positive regulation of type B pancreatic cell apoptotic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of type B pancreatic cell apoptotic process.
0	1	1	regulation of transcription regulatory region DNA binding	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of transcription regulatory region DNA binding.
1	0	1	negative regulation of transcription regulatory region DNA binding	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of transcription regulatory region DNA binding.
0	4	1	positive regulation of transcription regulatory region DNA binding	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of transcription regulatory region DNA binding.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cellular response to X-ray	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to X-ray.
1	0	0	negative regulation of dense core granule biogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dense core granule biogenesis.
0	0	2	positive regulation of dense core granule biogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dense core granule biogenesis.
0	1	0	negative regulation of maintenance of mitotic sister chromatid cohesion, centromeric	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of maintenance of mitotic sister chromatid cohesion in the centromeric region.
1	0	0	negative regulation of cardiac muscle cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle cell differentiation.
0	2	1	positive regulation of cardiac muscle cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cardiac muscle cell differentiation.
1	1	1	regulation of stem cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell differentiation.
1	3	4	negative regulation of stem cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell differentiation.
2	0	1	positive regulation of stem cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of stem cell differentiation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mesenchymal stem cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mesenchymal stem cell differentiation.
3	0	0	positive regulation of mesenchymal stem cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of mesenchymal stem cell differentiation.
0	1	0	histone H3-T3 phosphorylation involved in chromosome passenger complex localization to kinetochore	Any histone H3-T3 phosphorylation that is involved in chromosome passenger complex localization to kinetochore.
0	0	1	positive regulation of glucosylceramide catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of glucosylceramide catabolic process.
0	0	1	positive regulation of sphingomyelin catabolic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of sphingomyelin catabolic process.
0	1	1	negative regulation of peptidyl-lysine acetylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-lysine acetylation.
1	3	0	positive regulation of peptidyl-lysine acetylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of peptidyl-lysine acetylation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of N-terminal peptidyl-lysine acetylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of N-terminal peptidyl-lysine acetylation.
0	1	0	regulation of cytoplasmic translation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cytoplasmic translation.
2	1	0	negative regulation of cytoplasmic translation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cytoplasmic translation.
0	2	3	positive regulation of cytoplasmic translation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cytoplasmic translation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of nephron tubule epithelial cell differentiation.
2	1	2	regulation of cellular senescence	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular senescence.
1	7	4	negative regulation of cellular senescence	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cellular senescence.
0	1	4	positive regulation of cellular senescence	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cellular senescence.
0	0	1	positive regulation of proteasomal ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process involved in cellular response to hypoxia	Any positive regulation of proteasomal ubiquitin-dependent protein catabolic process that is involved in a cellular response to hypoxia.
0	2	2	regulation of double-strand break repair	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of double-strand break repair.
0	2	2	negative regulation of double-strand break repair	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of double-strand break repair.
2	4	1	positive regulation of double-strand break repair	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of double-strand break repair.
1	4	0	regulation of autophagosome assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of autophagosome assembly.
0	1	2	positive regulation of autophagosome assembly	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of autophagic vacuole assembly.
0	0	1	negative regulation of mesenchymal cell proliferation involved in lung development	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mesenchymal cell proliferation involved in lung development.
1	0	0	regulation of epithelial cell proliferation involved in lung morphogenesis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell proliferation involved in lung morphogenesis.
0	0	1	negative regulation of epithelial cell proliferation involved in lung morphogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of epithelial cell proliferation involved in lung morphogenesis.
1	0	0	negative regulation of amniotic stem cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of amniotic stem cell differentiation.
0	1	1	negative regulation of termination of RNA polymerase II transcription, poly(A)-coupled	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of termination of RNA polymerase II transcription, poly(A)-coupled.
0	1	0	positive regulation of termination of RNA polymerase II transcription, poly(A)-coupled	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of termination of RNA polymerase II transcription, poly(A)-coupled.
0	0	2	regulation of synaptic vesicle clustering	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of synaptic vesicle clustering.
1	4	3	regulation of bicellular tight junction assembly	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of tight junction assembly.
3	4	3	negative regulation of anoikis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of anoikis.
0	1	0	regulation of barbed-end actin filament capping	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of barbed-end actin filament capping.
0	2	2	negative regulation of barbed-end actin filament capping	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of barbed-end actin filament capping.
0	0	2	regulation of mRNA stability involved in response to oxidative stress	A process of regulation of mRNA stability that is involved in a response to oxidative stress.
0	0	2	negative regulation of mitotic sister chromatid separation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mitotic sister chromatid separation.
0	0	3	regulation of nucleotide-excision repair	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of nucleotide-excision repair.
0	0	1	negative regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter involved in smooth muscle cell differentiation	Any negative regulation of transcription from RNA polymerase II promoter that is involved in smooth muscle cell differentiation.
0	0	1	regulation of grooming behavior	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of grooming behavior.
1	0	0	regulation of behavioral fear response	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of behavioral fear response.
0	1	0	positive regulation of androgen receptor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of androgen receptor activity.
0	1	0	mitochondrial RNA surveillance	The set of processes involved in identifying and degrading defective or aberrant RNAs that takes place in the mitochondrion.
0	1	0		
0	0	1	positive regulation of testosterone secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of testosterone secretion.
1	0	0	regulation of estradiol secretion	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of estradiol secretion.
0	0	1	positive regulation of estradiol secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of estradiol secretion.
1	0	0	positive regulation of progesterone secretion	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of progesterone secretion.
0	0	3	positive regulation of AMPA receptor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of AMPA selective glutamate receptor activity.
1	2	0	regulation of pro-B cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of pro-B cell differentiation.
1	0	0	negative regulation of pro-B cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of pro-B cell differentiation.
1	0	0	positive regulation of pro-B cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of pro-B cell differentiation.
1	0	0	regulation of forebrain neuron differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of forebrain neuron differentiation.
1	0	1	negative regulation of forebrain neuron differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of forebrain neuron differentiation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of forebrain neuron differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of forebrain neuron differentiation.
0	1	0	negative regulation of ATP citrate synthase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ATP citrate synthase activity.
0	1	1	positive regulation of behavioral fear response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of behavioral fear response.
1	2	0	epithelial cell proliferation involved in renal tubule morphogenesis	Any epithelial cell proliferation that is involved in renal tubule morphogenesis.
1	0	2	regulation of skeletal muscle cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle cell differentiation.
1	1	0	positive regulation of skeletal muscle cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of skeletal muscle cell differentiation.
1	2	1	regulation of response to DNA damage stimulus	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of response to DNA damage stimulus.
0	3	3	positive regulation of response to DNA damage stimulus	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of response to DNA damage stimulus.
0	1	0	negative regulation of endothelial cell chemotaxis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell chemotaxis.
1	2	3	positive regulation of endothelial cell chemotaxis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endothelial cell chemotaxis.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cellular glucuronidation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cellular glucuronidation.
1	1	0	regulation of double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining.
1	0	3	negative regulation of double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining.
2	4	1	positive regulation of double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of double-strand break repair via nonhomologous end joining.
0	1	1	regulation of cellular response to drug	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of cellular response to drug.
1	1	1	regulation of integrin-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of integrin-mediated signaling pathway.
0	0	2	negative regulation of integrin-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of integrin-mediated signaling pathway.
1	0	2	positive regulation of integrin-mediated signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of integrin-mediated signaling pathway.
1	0	0	negative regulation of mesenchymal cell apoptotic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of mesenchymal cell apoptotic process.
2	1	1	positive regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity.
0	0	1		
1	1	1	glycogen binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with glycogen.
0	0	1	starch binding	Interacting selectively and non-covalently with starch.
0	0	1	positive regulation of metanephric ureteric bud development	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of metanephric ureteric bud development.
0	0	1	regulation of Rho guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of Rho guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity.
0	2	0	negative regulation of Rho guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of Rho guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity.
1	0	0	positive regulation of Rho guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of Rho guanyl-nucleotide exchange factor activity.
0	2	0	regulation of endocytic recycling	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of endocytic recycling.
0	0	1	negative regulation of endocytic recycling	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of endocytic recycling.
0	2	2	positive regulation of endocytic recycling	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of endocytic recycling.
1	0	0	positive regulation of phospholipid transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of phospholipid transport.
1	0	1	regulation of RNA biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of RNA biosynthetic process.
0	1	0	negative regulation of phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5-trisphosphate 5-phosphatase activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5-trisphosphate 5-phosphatase activity.
1	1	0	positive regulation of dipeptide transmembrane transport	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dipeptide transmembrane transport.
0	1	0	negative regulation of histone H3-K79 methylation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K79 methylation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of histone H3-K79 methylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K79 methylation.
0	1	0	positive regulation of phosphorylation of RNA polymerase II C-terminal domain serine 2 residues	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of phosphorylation of RNA polymerase II C-terminal domain serine 2 residues.
0	1	1	positive regulation of histone H2B ubiquitination	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone H2B ubiquitination.
0	0	1	regulation of ATP biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of ATP biosynthetic process.
0	2	0	negative regulation of ATP biosynthetic process	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of ATP biosynthetic process.
0	1	2	positive regulation of ATP biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of ATP biosynthetic process.
0	1	0	regulation of histone H2B conserved C-terminal lysine ubiquitination	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of histone H2B conserved C-terminal lysine ubiquitination.
2	0	0	negative regulation of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of CD8-positive, alpha-beta T cell activation.
2	1	0	negative regulation of T cell activation via T cell receptor contact with antigen bound to MHC molecule on antigen presenting cell	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of T cell activation via T cell receptor contact with antigen bound to MHC molecule on antigen presenting cell.
0	1	0	positive regulation of T cell activation via T cell receptor contact with antigen bound to MHC molecule on antigen presenting cell	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of T cell activation via T cell receptor contact with antigen bound to MHC molecule on antigen presenting cell.
1	0	0	positive regulation of gamma-delta T cell activation involved in immune response	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of gamma-delta T cell activation involved in immune response.
1	1	0	regulation of dendritic cell differentiation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic cell differentiation.
2	0	0	negative regulation of dendritic cell differentiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic cell differentiation.
1	0	1	positive regulation of dendritic cell differentiation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of dendritic cell differentiation.
0	1	0	regulation of osteoclast development	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of osteoclast development.
1	2	0	negative regulation of osteoclast development	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of osteoclast development.
0	0	1	negative regulation of vasculogenesis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of vasculogenesis.
2	2	1	positive regulation of vasculogenesis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of vasculogenesis.
0	1	4	regulation of neuron migration	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of neuron migration.
0	2	1	negative regulation of neuron migration	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of neuron migration.
4	1	5	positive regulation of neuron migration	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of neuron migration.
1	0	0	negative regulation of chloride transport	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of chloride transport.
0	1	0	negative regulation of response to gamma radiation	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of response to gamma radiation.
0	0	1	regulation of apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of apoptotic signaling pathway.
2	3	1	negative regulation of apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of apoptotic signaling pathway.
5	4	3	positive regulation of apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	3	1	regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
4	9	8	negative regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
2	6	5	positive regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	0	0	regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in absence of ligand	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in absence of ligand.
3	5	5	negative regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in absence of ligand	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in absence of ligand.
2	1	2	positive regulation of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in absence of ligand	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of extrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway in absence of ligand.
1	0	1	regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
3	4	3	negative regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
5	6	8	positive regulation of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of intrinsic apoptotic signaling pathway.
1	0	0	regulation of phosphatidylcholine biosynthetic process	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of phosphatidylcholine biosynthetic process.
0	1	1	positive regulation of phosphatidylcholine biosynthetic process	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of phosphatidylcholine biosynthetic process.
0	1	0	regulation of histone H3-K36 trimethylation	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K36 trimethylation.
0	0	1	positive regulation of histone H3-K36 trimethylation	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of histone H3-K36 trimethylation.
1	1	2	regulation of store-operated calcium entry	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of store-operated calcium entry.
0	0	1	negative regulation of cation channel activity	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cation channel activity.
2	0	3	positive regulation of cation channel activity	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cation channel activity.
0	0	1	regulation of semaphorin-plexin signaling pathway	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of semaphorin-plexin signaling pathway.
0	1	1	negative regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic signaling pathway.
2	2	1	positive regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic signaling pathway	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in apoptotic signaling pathway.
2	0	1	negative regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in execution phase of apoptosis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in execution phase of apoptosis.
0	0	1	positive regulation of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in execution phase of apoptosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of cysteine-type endopeptidase activity involved in execution phase of apoptosis.
0	1	0	regulation of caveolin-mediated endocytosis	Any process that modulates the frequency, rate or extent of caveolin-mediated endocytosis.
0	0	1	negative regulation of caveolin-mediated endocytosis	Any process that stops, prevents or reduces the frequency, rate or extent of caveolin-mediated endocytosis.
1	0	2	positive regulation of caveolin-mediated endocytosis	Any process that activates or increases the frequency, rate or extent of caveolin-mediated endocytosis.
0	0	1	malonyl-CoA biosynthetic process	The chemical reactions and pathways resulting in the formation of malonyl-CoA, the S-malonyl derivative of coenzyme A.
0	1	0	lipoxin A4 metabolic process	The chemical reactions and pathways involving lipoxin A4. Lipoxin A4 is a C20 hydroxy fatty acid having (5S)-, (6R)- and (15S)-hydroxy groups as well as (7E)- (9E)-, (11Z)- and (13E)-double bonds.
